Authors
Brian Koller
Number of Reviews
431

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
"First Contact" is the latest in the long-lived series of
"Star Trek" movies, but the first not to include any cast 
members from the original 1960s television series.
The film begins in the 24th century.  The spaceship
"Enterprise" is part of a fleet of Federation (good guys)
ships defending the universe against a Borg invasion (bad guys).
The Borg aim to conquer the universe by converting all
intelligent beings they encounter to Borg form.  This means
that they become part machine, and lose their individuality,
responding only to orders from the Borg Queen (Alice Krige).
The Enterprise must go back in time to the 21st century Earth
to prevent its assimilation by the Borg.  There, they fight
a Borg invasion of their ship, and help Earth resident
Zefram Cochrane (James Cromwell) launch his history flight
that leads to the first encounter with aliens.
I know that I am mostly alone in my dislike of this film.
The movie received critical praise and commercial success,
unlike the "Generations" film that preceded it.  I have
many faults with the film, which I will describe below:
The character Data (Brent Spiner) is an android who looks
completely human except for green pancake makeup.  If he
wants to be more human, why doesn't he wipe it off?
Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) is supposed to be French,
but has a British accent.  When prompted, he can flawlessly 
recite passages from "Moby Dick".  He is fond of grand
statements like "accumulation of wealth in the 24th
century is no longer important."  This is about as
believable as character Geordi's assertion that all
of Earth's problems (poverty, disease, etc) are solved after 
they first encounter aliens.
Worf (Michael Dorn) is an alien from another planet, but he
looks and sounds human except for wearing a mask that is
an apparent castoff from a "Planet of the Apes" movie.
The emphasis is on special effects, makeup and costumes.
This is typified by a scene of the Borg Queen's head and
shoulders lowered by cables onto her waiting body.  What
is the point of this except to impress the naive, the
equivalent of an exploding car in an action movie.
Worf, a Klingon warrior, whines about zero gravity making 
his stomach upset.  This leads a lengthy spacewalking scene 
where Picard, Worf and a doomed noname battle the Borg to blow 
up a beacon.  The Borg are kind enough to fight only one or two 
at a time while the rest hang around listlessly.  Worf has his 
space suit punctured but this has no effect on him.
In many scenes, Picard and other crew walk past Borg who ignore
them.  Picard says that they are safe as long as the Borg don't
view them as a threat.  This doesn't jive with the Borg goals:
of course they would pick off strays.
The Borg try to assimilate Data.  Picard is captured and
taken to Data, who is now an apparent Borg confederate.
Data makes several remarks to demonstrate he is now a bad guy.
It eventually turns out that Data was never converted, and
turns the tables on the Borg.  Why didn't he do that earlier
in the scene?  It is an artificial contrivance to extend
dramatic tension.  At the movie's end, the Enterprise has
been repaired, but Data still has his faceplate off.

Title
Review for Notorious (1946)
The setting is in Florida, during the second world war.
Ingrid Bergman, a drunkard socialite whose German father has 
just been imprisoned for espionage, is hosting another
party, where she meets and takes a liking to Cary Grant.
He actually agrees to go for a spin, with the drunk Bergman
swerving wildly at high speeds.  A policeman stops them;
she is likely to face jail.  But Grant shows his badge to
the cop, and the cop nods and leaves.  Bergman realizes
Grant is an agent, and detest him.  After a night's sleep,
however, she agrees to go to Argentina with him to work as a
spy against the Germans.
With the exception of Grant, the American agents have
low regard for Bergman's character and an indifference
to her fate.
Bergman and Grant have a Rio romance.  Bergman says her
character is reformed, Grant is skeptical.  The unknown
assignment turns out to be Bergman winning and spying on 
a former rejected paramour, Claude Rains.  Bergman takes
the assignment, although it means a break-up with Grant,
sharing company and bed with creepy Rains, and putting
her life at risk.  Rains pounces on the bait (Bergman is 
very lovely) and they soon are engaged and married.
The German agents are ruthless and murder an associate
who is prone to mistakes.  There is something secretive
about their champagne bottles, and Bergman cannot get
access to the wine cellar.  Grant suggests Bergman throw
a big party, so Grant can check out the cellar.  Common sense
would have Bergman draw up a floor plan for Grant prior
to the party, and Grant would bring a date to watch the
cellar door while Grant checks it out.  But for dramatic
purposes, Bergman must lead Grant to the cellar and guard
it.  Grant accidentally busts a bottle.  It is filled with
"vintage sand" that is later found to be uranium ore.
Grant hastily cleans up his mess, but unluckily Rains
shows up.  Grant kisses Bergman to make it look like
a romantic encounter rather than espionage.
But Rains is no dummy, and he later investigates the
cellar.  Hitchcock deserves his "master of suspense"
title, as he prolongs the tension in these scenes.
We learn why Rains still lives his with domineering 
mother: he needs her advice.  He knows his now hated
wife is a spy, but his life is in jeopardy from his
compatriots if she is discovered.  Sinister mother
comes up with a plan to slowly poison Bergman, first to
sicken her, later to kill her.
Bergman is sick and looks it on a rendezvous with
Grant.  He is suspicious, but buys her story of a
drunken binge.  Bergman eventually realizes her fate
(in another well-directed sequence involving her
coffee) but is too late.  She is bedridden and
isolated.  Lucky for her, Grant comes to the house
to investigate, and carries her downstairs.  Of
course he soon meets Rains and his mother, with a
group of German compatriots suspiciously viewing
the scene.  Rains cannot stop Grant without causing
a disturbance that could lead to his death.
Grant flees with Bergman to the hospital, refusing to 
take Rains along, who is begging for a ride.  Now
Rains must face the German agents, who have many
questions to ask of him.
Notorious has an excellent script and cast, and many
extremely well-directed scenes.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Atlantic City (1980)
"Atlantic City" is a character study that falls
short of expectations.  While the characters are
interesting, their actions are not always credible.
The film's message is unclear as well.
Sally (Susan Sarandon) is training to become a casino
dealer, and dreams of escaping her dreary routine
to live a cultured life, perhaps in Paris.
Lou (Burt Lancaster) is an aging small-time hood,
financially dependent upon a miserly and abusive
(by choice) elderly woman (Kate Reid).  Unknown to Sarandon,
Lancaster is in love with her.
Lancaster still has ambitions of becoming a big-shot.
He stumbles upon a financial windfall (a large
amount of cocaine, and a customer who badly wants it).
He promptly changes his lifestyle, living for the
moment and playing sugar daddy to Sarandon.  Sarandon gladly
goes along for the ride, using Lancaster for all he can
give her.
"Atlantic City" has some problems with the actions
of the main characters.  We are to believe that
Sarandon poses topless at length in front of an
unshuttered window every night, and that Lancaster
is able to peep at her unseen, every night.
Sarandan's husband Dave (Robert Joy) is the lowest form of
street-life vermin.  Why would she have married
him?  Her stated reason is to escape Saskatchewan,
but there are better ways of doing that.
Why would she let him move in with her again?
Joy cannot sell his stolen cocaine, because he looks
like the weasel he is.  But he could find another
customer, or clean up his act, rather than putting
complete trust in stranger Lancaster, who could steal the
cocaine or the money, or report him to police.
Joy is brutally murdered by hoods.  I don't have
problems with the murder, but the hoods make no
effort to get Joy to reveal where the cocaine and/or
money is, a subject that they would soon be fixated
with.
Lancaster tells the hoods that he has the cocaine and
money, ostensibly to protect Sarandon and promote
himself as a big-shot, but he has to have known the
negative consequences of this action.  He is also
fond of telling everyone that he has just killed
two gangsters, which does not seem credible even
given his need for recognition.
After Lancaster shoots one of the hoods, the other
hood just stands there, waiting to be shot as well.
Reid is apparently bedridden throughout the film,
but is up and walking without problems in the final
scene.
"Atlantic City" was shot on location in New Jersey and
has a largely American cast, but is a Canadian production.
The consensus on "Atlantic City" is that it is an
outstanding character study.  Since my opinion is
definitely in the minority, there is a good chance
that I have not interpreted the film correctly.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Touch of Evil (1958)
"Touch of Evil" is an excellent movie.  It is also one of
Universal Studio's strangest films from the 1950s.  It is
dark, lurid, and weird.
Charlton Heston plays a high-ranking Mexican law officer.
He is on his honeymoon with Janet Leigh.  On the American
side of the border with Mexico, a car explodes.  Heston
becomes involved in the case, to the annoyance of local
police celebrity Orson Welles (who also directed the film
and wrote the screenplay).  Heston accuses Welles of
framing a Mexican for the bombing.  Further complicating
matters, the Grande family has a grudge against Heston
for imprisoning their kingpin.  The Grande family seeks
revenge against Heston through Leigh, who has almost as
bad a time here as she would in "Psycho" two years later.
Heston's intense acting style suits his character well.
He is determined to seek justice, first for the framed
accused, then against Welles, then for his wife Leigh.
Welles just looks awful.  Corpulent, unshaven, slurring,
limping and corrupt, he is grossly overweight.  He is
practically worshipped by his fellow officers.  His
"game leg" gives him "hunches" which always prove correct.
This does not keep him from planting evidence to support
his hunches.  Welles' character grows increasingly
unstable throughout the movie.  This inconsistency does
not harm the film, however, but increases its tension.
Marlene Dietrich has a few scenes as the owner of a...
well, some kind of non-respectable establishment.  Her
only customer is Welles.  She may represent Death.
Dennis Weaver plays a hotel "night manager".  His character 
is so weird and quirky, it would never be credible in a
conventional film.  But "Touch of Evil" is not conventional,
and he fits right in.  His trademark expression is,
"If they think I'm gonna do that, they've got another
thing coming!"
"Touch of Evil" must be seen to be believed, and it
is remarkable that it is a 1958 product of Universal.
You would think some studio mogul would see it and say,
'What is the audience?  Who would go to see this film?
There's no love interest.  It's not a comedy or a drama.
It's not really even a mystery!'  I guess "film noir"
has claimed it, and we can only be thankful for its
existence.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
Universally acclaimed as one of the best films ever
made, "Schindler's List" lives up to its reputation.
Far different from director Steven Spielberg's previous
films, "Schindler's List" is never manipulative or
ponderous, and except for the stone-laying ceremony
at film's end, bears its 197-minute length exceptionally
well.  Filmed in glorious black and white, and with
outstanding direction and dialogue, the film is nearly
perfect.  Most surprising is the casting: no mega-stars
appear in the film, particularly in the female roles.
Casting is done to match the character, and not to
increase box office receipts.
The film takes place in Germany-occupied Poland,
during World War II.  Polish Jews are forced to relocate
from the countryside to the large cities, then packed
into a walled-off ghetto, exploited as slave labor,
and finally forced into concentration camps.  The Jews
lose first their property, then their freedom, then their
lives.  What is most chilling about the genocide is
the ruthless efficiency in which it is performed: each
person is continually placed onto one of two lists;
one marked for immediate death, the other for death postponed.
The significance of the film's title is that this list
has an opposite purpose.  It is a list to rescue its
members from near-certain death.
While the plight of the Jews serves as the film's context,
a German Gentile is its central character.  Oskar Schindler
(Liam Neeson) is initially a conceited, manipulative
womanizer, whose cynical goal is to make a fortune during
the war using Jewish slave labor.  His first employee
is taciturn, brilliant accountant Itzhak Stern (Ben Kingsley),
who sees Schindler's factory as an opportunity to save
Jews from extinction in concentration camps.  Stern's task
is made more difficult by determined, murderous stormtroopers
led by Amon Goeth (Ralph Fiennes).  Schindler is slowly
converted from capitalist to humanitarian, by film's end
risking his life and giving up his fortune to save Jewish lives.
Neeson's flexibility as an actor is impressive.  His character
is always evolving, yet always convincing.  Although perhaps
becoming too saintly: "Schindler's List" is a dramatization
more than it is a documentary.
"Schindler's List" won seven Academy Awards, including
those for Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography
(Janusz Kaminski), Best Film Editing (Michael Kahn),
Best Score (credited to John Williams, but featuring violinist
Itzhak Perlman), Best adapted screenplay (Steven Zaillian).
Neeson and Fiennes were nominated for Best Actor and
Best Supporting Actor, respectively.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for To Hell and Back (1955)
"To Hell and Back" held the honor of being Universal Studio's
top grossing film for twenty years, until surpassed by "Jaws".
While largely forgotten today, it is easy to see why the
film was so hugely successful.
Audie Murphy plays himself as World War II's most decorated
soldier.  Unfailingly self-effacing, polite, heroic and
courageous, Murphy makes up for his lack of physical stature
by always doing the right thing in battle.  Murphy's
all-american boy role model fit the 1950s era perfectly,
back when it was wise not to question the U.S. Government.
Murphy is a competent actor.  It is true that when he is
supposed to be angry, he merely shouts, and when he is
supposed to be tender, he merely talks more quietly.  He
lacks emotional commitment to his role, despite playing
a perfect version (at least in the eyes of the Army) of 
himself.  Still, his earnest demeanor and slew of earned
decorations give him credibility.
Murphy has problems when acting with women.  He is polite
and passive, and has only one brief romantic scene, with
a woman gentle enough to help him along.  This may explain
Murphy's career as an action hero more than as a romantic
lead.
Murphy's army buddies all seem interchangeable after a
while.  They shoulder their burdens with only witty and
well-crafted jabs, never whining or threatening.  One has
the feeling that the U.S. Army had an eye on the script
as a condition of their support during filming.
"To Hell and Back" is not a particularly realistic depiction 
of WWII battles from a soldier's point of view, since the
battles serve merely to depict Murphy's heroism.  But the
film does accurately reflect an idealization of WWII
as viewed by Americans during the 1950s.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Julia (1977)
"Julia" is a film about the relationship between two lifelong
friends, and the lengths that one will go to for a valued
friend.  The script is excellent and intelligent, and most of 
the characters are very well defined.
"Julia" takes place in the years leading to World War II.
Lillian Hellman (Jane Fonda) is an aspiring playwriter, 
living with retired novelist Dashiell Hammett (Jason Robards).
Lillian longs to visit childhood friend Julia (Vanessa Redgrave)
who is involved with espionage against the Nazis.  Lillian
is eventually involved in Julia's activities.  Their lives are
endangered.
"Julia" was showed with Academy Award nominations, including
Best Picture, Best Director, Best Actress and Best Script.
Redgrave and Robards copped supporting actor awards.
Redgrave's is particularly deserved.  Julia's passion
for life and fearless hatred of repression comes through.
There is also an excellent supporting role by
Maximilian Schell, playing one of Julia's contacts
in the resistance.  Also watch for Meryl Streep playing an 
affected socialite.  This was her screen debut.
One thing that bothered me about the film was that two
male supporting characters (played by Hal Holbrook and 
John Glover) are incredible drunken jerks.  Send them
first to a rehab center, then to charm school.
Jane Fonda was given a Best Actress Nomination, but something
seems to be missing in her that is needed for her character.
Lillian's emotional range is limited to nervous and angry.
Julia is almost a maternal figure to her.
Still, "Julia" is a very good movie, well plotted, 
with many moments of genuine suspense (and horror).
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for La Bamba (1987)
"La Bamba" is a surprisingly good biography of
ill-fated Mexican-American rock and roll star
Ritchie Valens (Lou Diamond Phillips).  While
sometimes overdramatized, the film provides a
good character study, not only of Valens, but
of his troubled "black sheep" half-brother Bob
(Esai Morales).
The story begins with Valens already a teenager,
working as a day laborer with his strong willed
but loving mother (Rosana De Soto) and family
friend (and telegenic beauty) Rosie (Elizabeth Pena).
Thanks partly to Bob's success as a drug dealer,
Valens is able to attend a nice high school,
where he meets WASP blonde Donna (Danielle von Zerneck).
He also joins a Rock and Roll band, with his
energy and talent attracting the notice of Del-Fi
talent scout Joe Pantoliano.  Soon, Valens has
a nationwide hit single and is touring the country.
But while his career is soaring, his half-brother,
now married to Rosie, becomes violently embittered
over his success.
The most fun for me when watching this film was
the casting of contemporary rock artists as their
more famous 1950s counterparts.  Marshall Crenshaw,
who had always been compared to Buddy Holly,
finally gets to play Buddy Holly.  Stray Cats'
guitarist Brian Setzer is an ideal match for
rockabilly singer Eddie Cochran.  The group Los Lobos
dubs Phillip's impersonation of Valens.  Carlos Santana
performs the musical score.  Valens' real life
mother and half-brother have cameos.  By the way,
the real Ritchie Valens can be found in the fifties
B-film "Go, Johnny, Go".
"La Bamba" is not a perfect film.  Too much is
made of Valens not speaking Spanish.  He even has
the line "Yo no speako Espa~ol", which strains
credibility given the fact that everyone else in
his family seems to speak Spanish fluently.
A more obvious weakness is Morales' bad boy act,
which recurs even more often than Ritchie's prophetic
nightmare of two planes colliding.  Also, the
audience is led to believe that the tragic plane
crash that killed Holly, Valens, and novelty singer
Big Bopper was caused by the breaking of Valens'
talisman necklace.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movis.html

Title
Review for Stagecoach (1939)
"Stagecoach" is an outstanding early Western, directed by
John Ford and featuring John Wayne, who was escaping from
an endless series of "B" Westerns.  While there is plenty
of drama, the characters are diverse and well-defined,
and their relationship is the heart of the film.
The plot has a stagecoach that must make it across a
vast prarie dominated by hostile indians.  The coach is
loaded with passengers of various social classes, who have
to get along with each other in tight and tense quarters.
John Wayne plays an escaped prisoner seeking revenge
on the man who killed his father and brother.  Claire Trevor
is an apparent prostitute, and is shunned by the other 
passengers.  John Carradine is a notorious gambler who
is risking his life to serve as escort for proud Louise Platt,
who is travelling to meet her officer husband.  There is
also an alcoholic doctor (Thomas Mitchell, who won 
Best Supporting Actor), a hapless liquor salesman, and an 
aging banker who is skipping town with the embezzled deposits.  
Almost forgot comic relief Andy Devine, whose trademark of 
talking off key led to a long and successful career.  The 
doctor and salesman have an entertaining friendship, with 
the doctor guzzling the "samples" despite the salesman's 
wimpy complaints. The poor salesman is also constantly mistaken 
for a reverend, and no one can get his name right.
It is interesting that the married Platt avoids Trevor, 
but basks in the attention given to her by gambler Carradine.
The moral of the film is that you cannot judge a person's
character by their social position.  Wayne, Trevor,
Carradine and the doctor all come through at the right time.
Meanwhile, the honorable bank president is actually
an ill-tempered crook.
One obvious weakness of the film is a needless musical 
number.  Mexicans are referred to as lazy and portrayed 
as horse thieves, while the indians are savage marauders.
"Stagecoach" was probably the best Western movie ever at
the time of its release, although subsequent films such
as "Red River" (1948) have surpassed it.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Night to Remember, A (1958)
Perhaps the best disaster film ever made, "A Night to
Remember" generally discards soap-opera subplots
in favor of authenticity.  Although there have been
many film attempts at depicting the sinking of the
'Titanic', and most made with bigger budgets, this
British production benefits from its source: The
book "A Night to Remember" by Walter Lord, who spent
many years exhaustively researching the disaster
and interviewing its survivors.  The result gives
the viewer the you-are-there feel of a documentary,
with ever-building tension as the ship's sinking
becomes imminent and the passengers begin to panic.
The 'unsinkable' Titanic was a British luxury ship,
carrying 2224 passengers on her maiden voyage across
the Atlantic.  As with the Hindenburg Zeppelin, it
was the biggest and best of its kind, making its
foundering all the more dramatic.  A series of human
errors led to an encounter with an iceberg, resulting
in a 300 foot gash below the water line.  The lifeboats
hold only 1200, but only about 700 will enter them,
due to disbelief and disorganization.
The enormous cast features over 200 speaking parts.
There are more heroes than villians.  Kenneth More
is the second officer, hastily organizing the lifeboat
launching and the post-sinking flotilla.  Captain
Smith (Laurence Naismith) is quick to recognize the
severity of the situation.  David McCallum tirelessly
telegraphs for help.  'Unsinkable' Molly Brown
(Tucker McGuire) leads the rescue of drowning passengers.
Anthony Bushell of the Carpathia rushes to the scene
to pick up survivors.  And there are a few villians,
mostly the clueless crew of a nearby ship watching and
misinterpreting the Titanic's sinking.  There are also
selfish passengers who save their own lives at the expense
of others.
Perhaps the Titanic's crew, while undeniably heroic,
is overly praised.  In particular, More is both fearless
and impervious to the freezing cold.  Much is made of
a newlywed couple blissfully refusing to seperate
instead of saving her life.  Some of the backdrops
showing the Titanic's sinking belie the budget ($1.7M).
But criticism seemes unimportant given the quality
of the Eric Ambler script, and Roy Ward Baker's
tight, unsentimental direction.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for After Hours (1985)
"After Hours" is a quirky black comedy.  It is an
endless series of events that don't completely make
sense, but the director (Martin Scorsese) plays it
straight, creating an ironic rather than surreal effect.
Griffin Dunne stars as an average guy who is trapped
late at night in the Soho section of New York.  Without
any friends or cash, he is dependent upon the generosity
of strangers.  Unfortunately for Griffin, everybody
he meets in Soho is eccentric, and his attempts to
go home place him in increasingly bizarre situations.
The film begins conventionally enough: Boy (Dunne)
meets Girl (Rosanna Arquette).  The first clue that
things are amiss is that Arquette's room-mate
(Linda Fiorentino) is a punk sculptress.  Arquette
apparently has burns on her body, and has curious
domestic troubles.  Dunne soon encounters burglers
Cheech and Chong, "beehive 1965" (Teri Garr), and
numerous homosexual characters.
The Academy Awards passed on "After Hours", but
Scorsese won Best Screenplay at the Cannes film festival.
I guess that it is a credit to the screenplay that
the film never loses its focus, considering that a half
hour story has become a 96 minute movie.  But Cannes may
have honored the film more for its feel than its quality.
Dunne's character becomes increasingly whiny, and
the actions of the characters often make little sense.
In particular, every female character that Dunne encounters
takes a strong interest in him.  If you are wondering
how Dunne came to be cast for the plum role, it probably
helped that he co-produced the film.
For Scorsese, best known for dramas starring Robert De Niro,
this was his second black comedy in a row, following
"The King of Comedy".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Four Musketeers, The (1974)
While Director Richard Lester was filming "The
Three Musketeers", he realized that he had too
much footage for one film.  What to do?  Break
the story into two films, and release them
one year apart.
While technically a sequel, "The Four Musketeers"
is really the second half of "The Three Musketeers".
A brief narration to "The Four Musketeers"
attempts to explain the characters and their
motives, but someone who has not recently
seen "The Three Musketeers" is certain to become
confused.  It doesn't help that at the end
of "The Four Musketeers", there are scenes
excerpted from "The Three Musketeers".
An additional problem, from a box office
standpoint, is the ending.  Action comedies
are expected to have a happy ending, but
"The Four Musketeers" ends decidedly downbeat.
Also, Racquel Welch, arguably the film's biggest
draw, has a much smaller role than in the first
film.
With these points in mind, it is no surprise
that the sequel did not fare as well with critics
or at the box office as "The Three Musketeers".
But in fact, the films are of roughly equal
quality, which is to be expected.
"The Four Musketeers", like its prequel, has
excellent sets and costumes, and a very good
cast.  Michael York stars as D'Artagnan, and
Rachel Welch is his love interest.  The villians
are scheming cardinal Charlton Heston and
murderous Faye Dunaway, while the musketeers
are played by moody Oliver Reed, sunny Richard
Chamberlain, and comical Frank Finlay.
As with the first film, the action scenes are
riddled with slapstick.  One swordfight takes
place on a frozen lake, with the combatants
stumbling and sliding.  York may be heroic,
but he is clumsy (and promiscuous) as well.
This is a big budget epic to be enjoyed, with
some suspense but little dramatic tension, at
least not until the surprisingly dark ending.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Big Sleep, The (1946)
"The Big Sleep" is the second of four films that
Humphrey Bogart made with Lauren Bacall.  It is also
the second most famous detective film that Bogart
made, after "The Maltese Falcon".
"The Big Sleep" is an entertaining film with a contrived,
overly complex plot.  The characters, however, aren't
complex at all.  It would be unfair to say that they are
one-dimensional, but generous to give them more than
two dimensions.  Carmen, for example, is lovely and
childish, but little else.  Harry Jones is the only
character to show vulnerability.  Still, the dialogue
(based on the novel by Raymond Chandler, but first
screen credit is given to novelist William Faulkner)
is good, especially between Bacall and Bogart, and
the cast and production values are first rate.
Philip Marlowe (Humphrey Bogart) is a private investigator
hired by General Sternwood (Charles Waldron) to stop
blackmail attempts against his two daughters Vivian
(Lauren Bacall) and Carmen (Martha Vickers).  Bogart's
investigation is hampered by all the suspects getting
murdered.  Bogart eventually falls for Bacall, despite
her showing up in all the wrong places, and telling him
a series of lies.
"To Have and Have Not" was Bogart and Bacall's first
film together.  The commercial and critical success
of that film, especially the dialogue between the stars,
was not lost on Warner Brothers.  "The Big Sleep" was
mostly filmed in 1944, but not immediately released.
Studio execs decided to replace several of the scenes,
reducing Vickers' role in favor of Bacall's.  Bogart
and Bacall were given suggestive dialogue unusual for
the era.  The two films have something else in common:
both directors apparently believed that Bacall could sing.
"The Big Sleep" is a male fantasy, as seen through the
eyes of Humphrey Bogart.  Something is always happening,
he knows the score, and women can't get enough of him.
The role is tailor-made for Bogart.
Since the plot is so confusing that you can't tell the
players without a program, I have done my best to make
a list of all the murders, in chronological order,
described by victim, killer, and motive.
Shawn Regan, detective for General Sternwood, murdered
by Carmen, who was jealous of his preference for Eddie
Mars' wife Mona (Peggy Knudsen).
Mr. Geiger, bookseller and apparent merchant in stolen
goods, murdered by Owen Taylor, who was General Sternwood's
chauffeur.  Geiger was blackmailing Carmen since he knew
she killed Regan.  Taylor was in love with Carmen, and
murdered Geiger.
Owen Taylor, murdered by Joe Brody (Louis Jean Heydt).
Brody, also a blackmailer, did not want competition for
Sternwood's payoffs.
Joe Brody, murdered by Carol Lundgren (Tom Rafferty).
Carol worked for Geiger, and thought Brody had murdered Geiger.
Carol hid Geiger's body to buy time to remove Geiger's
merchandise.
Harry Jones (Elisha Cook Jr), murdered by Canino (Bob Steele).
Canino worked for crooked casino owner Eddie Mars (John Ridgely).
Mars is attempting to blackmail Vivian.  Mars, for some reason,
didn't like Jones tailing Bogart.  Bogart is so impressed with
Jones' martyrdom that he praises him to the skies to anyone who
will listen, for the rest of the film.
Canino is later killed in self-defense by Bogart.
Eddie Mars, murdered by his own henchmen Sidney (Tom Fadden)
and Pete (Ben Welden).  They thought that they were
shooting at Bogart and not their boss.
Remember all this the next time you see the film, and it
will almost make sense!
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Spellbound (1945)
"Spellbound" is a slightly disappointing entry from the production
and direction team of Selznick and Hitchcock.  There's romance,
psycho-babble and an entertaining dream sequence, but character
motivation and plot development are not convincing.
The plot has an eminent young doctor (Gregory Peck) arriving to a
pyschiatric institute as its new director.  He promptly has a 
romance with lovely doctor Ingrid Bergman.  Peck begins acting 
strangely, and is revealed to be an amnesiac impostor, and murder 
suspect. Peck and Bergman flee to old timer psychiatrist 
(Michael Chekhov), who studies Peck's dreams.  Peck is cured, 
but there is still the matter of the murder.
Peck does as well as he can given his character.  Sometimes he
acts normal, then suddenly freaks out when he sees black lines 
on a white background.  He can also be threatening, testy,
or catatonic, and has amnesia and a "guilt complex" to boot.
It is frustrating to find some consistency to his character,
or the motivation for frigid Bergman to fall suddenly for him
to the extent of ruining her career.
More quibbles: one scene has the pychiatric doctors performing 
surgery.  I am no medical expert, but aren't these separate 
fields?  Another scene has Peck able to recall a dream with 
considerable detail, with Bergman and Chekhov instantly able to
surmise the significance of each detail.  Later, Peck is suddenly 
able to determine the cause of his guilt complex and recovers
completely from his amnesia at the same moment.  Peck is
jailed and tried for murder, but this is depicted as a
few Bergman speeches.
I am no psychiatrist, but it seems simplistic to me that a
disturbed person is just a supressed memory away from being
normal.  Most people who have psychological problems (eating,
drinking, smoking, gambling, spending, relationships, whatever)
are aware of their problems but simply lack the willpower or
discipline to change their behavior.  Whoops, time to get
off the soapbox!
Hitchcock movies often have terrific music, but this one seems
to borrow from both "Gone With the Wind" and "The Lost Weekend"
The latter is understandable since Miklos Rozsa did that score 
as well.  He also did the score for "A Song to Remember",
and was nominated for 1945 Academy Awards for Best Score for
all three films!
Looking for the positive, Bergman is lovely and capable,
Chekhov is well cast, and the script and story moves things along
nicely.  But the dubious pychiatry, and problems with Peck's 
character and plot resolution keep the film from being
particularly good.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
If you had never seen MTV and ran across this title, you
would think that it was among the worst ever, possibly
even a porn movie.  Mike Judge has reached mainstream
acceptance with his FOX show "King of the Hill", but
his earlier characters Beavis and Butt-head are not for 
everyone.  If you have seen and enjoyed the MTV shorts, 
however, the film "Beavis and Butt-head Do America" will
not disappoint.
Beavis and Butt-head are about fifteen years old.  They
are stupid, naive and depraved, and have spent most of their
lives watching television.  From a societal point of view, 
they have no redeeming qualities.  This doesn't prevent them
from being hilarious, as their very weaknesses reflect
the base feelings and actions that everybody has.
Our animated anti-heroes wake up to find that their beloved
television set has been stolen.  A search to find a working 
TV set gets them (as always) into increasing trouble, which
they remain oblivious to.  Somehow Beavis and Butt-head
are taken for professional killers, get a biological weapon
implanted on their clothes, and are sent on a cross-country
mission to "score" with a femme fatale arms trader.
Meanwhile, fanatical government agents are on their trail.
Mike Judge directed and wrote the script.  His gifted 
vocal chords voice the major characters.  He pulls no
punches when it come to satire.  Beavis and Butt-head,
who assumedly represent young america, are hopelessly
stupid, shallow and clueless.  Stereotypes of the liberal
middle school teacher and the relentless federal agent
(who has a thing about deep cavity searches) are lampooned.
The opening credits slam Godzilla movies, and 1970s
TV detective shows.
The animation is merely perfunctory, even ugly.  This does
not detract much, as it suits the mood of the film.
The story isn't always credible, such as the sudden
change of status for Beavis and Butt-head from America's
Most Wanted to hero.  The dumb-dumbs also survive a
definitely fatal jump from a moving vehicle, and are
not arrested after re-joining their tour bus.
Bruce Willis and Demi Moore provide the voices of the
arms trading couple.  David Letterman, who is a big
fan of Beavis and Butt-head, also has a voice
characterization.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Lonely Hearts (1982)
"Lonely Hearts" is an engaging romantic
comedy, gentle and ironic in its writing
and direction.  An Australian production,
it is refreshing in its unpredictability,
its indifference to marketing demographics,
and in the depth and credibility of its
lead characters.
Peter (Norman Kaye) is a middle-aged man
who has spent his life living with his
mother, who has recently died.  He makes
a modest living as a piano tuner, and has
a number of friends, mostly involved with
amateur theater.  He joins a dating service
and is assigned Patricia (Wendy Hughes),
a thirtyish woman who is inhibited and
frigid, perhaps due to her controlling
and demanding parents.
Some of the supporting characters are
interesting.  There is a blunt, despairing
play director (Jon Finlayson) who seems
to live for his amateur productions.
Patricia's father (Vic Gordon) seems
intent on keeping his daughter emotionally
dependent and without relationships.
The wry script deftly nails some of the
difficulties associated with romantic
relationships, especially the unrealistic
expectations that can come with them.
The low budget shows, however, as the
sets and cinematography are limited, and
most of the film has a playlike atmostphere.
"Lonely Hearts" won the Best Film award
from the Australian Film Institute.  It
was also nominated for Best Actor (Kaye),
Best Actress (Hughes), Best Direction
(Paul Cox), and Best Screenplay (Cox and
John Clarke).
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gigi (1958)
"Gigi" dominated the 1959 Academy Awards.
It won nine Oscars, sweeping all the non-acting
categories.  Best Picture, Best Director
(Vincente Minnelli), Best Adapted Screenplay
(Alan Jay Lerner), Best Color Cinematography
(Joseph Ruttenberg).  Also best sets, best
costumes, best song, best score, and best
editing.
Like "My Fair Lady", "Gigi" is a musical adaptation
of a novel about a young woman who rises from
poverty to riches.  Elaborately staged, heavily
orchestrated, with clever but carefully inoffensive
lyrics, both films dubbed the voice of the female
lead, as a pretty face must have a pretty voice.
Gigi, although played by 27-year-old Leslie Caron
(the ingenue from "An American in Paris"), is a
young teenager who has lived a sheltered life
despite coming from a family of mistresses.  Her
mother is an unseen minor opera singer; while she
often rehearses offscreen in another room, she
doesn't make an appearance even as Gigi is repeatedly
visited by famous wealthy playboy Gaston (Louis
Jourdan).  Gigi is raised by Hermione Gingold,
and trained to be a lady by imperious Isabel Jeans.
Gaston receives training of his own, from his mentor
and relative Honore (Maurice Chevalier).  Chevalier
is most famous in America for his first number,
"Thank Heaven for Little Girls" (when Broadway next
revives the play, expect 'Pretty' to be substituted
for 'Little').  However, the best production number
is "The Night They Invented Champagne".  Here, the
choreography is excellent, although it is difficult
to believe that Gigi would be able to make the wordly,
clever comments that the lyrics gives her.
The Gaston-Gigi romance provides the context for
the musical's lampooning the elaborate Victorian-era
ritual built around men obtaining sex, and women
obtaining security.  They have to work so hard at
attaining their differing ends that they can't long
savor their fleeting victories.  Gaston's intensity
at courtship is contrasted with affable Honore,
who pursues woman without emotional involvement or
any intentions of marriage.  "Gigi" seems to
side with Honore, despite the inevitable happy
ending for Gigi and Gaston.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Steamboat Bill, Jr. (1928)
"Steamboat Bill, Jr." was one of Buster Keaton's last silent
films.  There are several spectacular stunts, which is
Keaton's trademark, but sometimes the story lags.
The plot has a burly riverboat captain (Ernest Torrence)
facing new competition from wealthy rival King (Tom McGuire)
who has built a "floating palace".  McGuire and Torrence
despise each other.  Torrence's blue-blooded son (Buster Keaton) 
pays a visit to his long-lost father.  Torrence tries to
make a man out of him, while Keaton has a greater interest
in King's daughter (Marion Byron).
"Steamboat Bill, Jr." is most famous for a dangerous stunt
in which a heavy wall falls on Keaton, who survives because
his body is positioned exactly corresponding to an open window.
The film was also the inspiration for "Steamboat Willie", the
animation short that marked the debut of Mickey Mouse.
There are some problems with the story.  Byron is not given
enough incentive to fall for Keaton.  Keaton's character
changes to suit the plot.  At first, he is comic and clumsy,
but becomes an action hero by film's end (a recurrent theme
in Keaton's silent films).  When Torrence is jailed,
Keaton tries to smuggle in a file hidden in a loaf of bread,
an unlikely action for his character, and also a foolish
action that had little chance to succeed.  Finally, the
cyclone at the end of the film, while leading to decent
slapstick and stunts, is inconsistent, leveling some buildings
and boats while others are left completely unchanged.
Several people are endangered and must be rescued by Keaton.
These people just happen to be the main characters.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Rebecca (1940)
Quiz time: how many Academy Awards for Best Director did
Alfred Hitchcock receive?  Five?  Three?  Actually, none,
although he was nominated on five different occasions.
Well then, how many Oscars for Best Picture did his films
receive?  Only one did, his first American production,
"Rebecca". 
"Rebecca" was produced by David O. Selznick, who had just
finished the most successful film ever, "Gone With The Wind".
How much credit for "Rebecca" belongs to Selznick and how
much to Hitchcock is a subject worthy of study.  Certainly
much credit is due to all concerned, since "Rebecca" is one 
of the greatest films ever. 
"Rebecca" is about a wealthy man (Lawrence Olivier) who has 
recently lost his stunning wife, the title subject.  He wins
the love of reticent, humble beauty Joan Fontaine.  They go to 
live at his fabulous mansion, run by stern headmistress 
Mrs. Danvers, who is pathologically devoted to the late wife.  
Fontaine lives in the shadow of Rebecca, threatening her marriage.  
Then follows many outstanding plot surprises and twists, which 
I would gladly describe except for the unpleasant email that I 
would then receive. 
The cast is outstanding.  Judith Anderson has the role of a 
lifetime playing the foreboding Danvers.  George Sanders plays 
a shady character, and delivers his lines as slyly as ever.  
C. Aubrey Smith is a local constable and is his usual patriachical 
self.  Florence Bates is a delightfully self-important matron. 
The script is marvelous, with exchanges like: 
"They'd give their eyes to see Monte (Carlo)" 
"That would rather defeat the purpose, wouldn't it?" 
A romance, a mystery, suspense, surprises, cast, characters,
cinematography, a story, and script, "Rebecca" has it all 
and may well be Hitchcock's best picture, although 
"Strangers On a Train" is also in the running. 

Title
Review for Lion of Africa, The (1987) (TV)
"The Lion of Africa" is an HBO-produced movie that stars
Brian Dennehy and Brooke Adams.  Adams is a volunteer
doctor in remote Africa, trying to fight a cholera plague in
a village.  She has two problems: she does not have
the proper medicine to treat them, and she has had a
curse put on her by the local witch doctor.  The curse
can only be removed by returning to the village with
supplies to stop the plague.  (The witch doctor has also
taken her glasses, which she doesn't seem to miss at any
time in the movie).
The medicine is only available in a distant African town.
She has no transportation to get there.  The local
official, a well-mannered graduate of Cambridge University,
cares only about improving his own status, which he
does primarily by taking kickbacks from illegal diamond
smuggling.  Adams turns to Dennehy, who has a massive
truck (named "The Lion of Africa") and has made the trip before.
But Dennehy, a weathered, burly man known as "the Trader",
wants only to enjoy the comforts of the local whorehouse.
Adams only succeeds in obtaining a large diamond,
surreptiously given to her by a dying smuggler.  This
million-dollar diamond is the subject of an intensive
search by all of the rascals in the village.  Travel permits
are revoked until the diamond is found.
Desperate, Adams steals Dennehy's truck.  An alarm goes
off, waking Dennehy who chases after her on foot, catching her
(this being a movie) and eventually knocking her unconscious
with a single punch.  When she comes to, she offers a
deal he can't refuse: a share of diamond in return for a
trip to the distant town.
On the road, they have an adversarial relationship, bickering
and trying to out-tough the other.  Soon they meet local
police, who are after the diamond and have rifles.  They
flee, with the police firing multiple shots at Dennehy, who
is cowering in the truck bed.  They get away.
Diamond smugglers are also after Dennehy.  Eventually,
they catch up with him, torch his truck, take the diamond
and string up Adams and Dennehy, leaving them for dead.
This being a movie, the two escape their nooses, and,
incredibly, decide to go after the heavily armed smugglers
to recover the diamond.
By this time, the couple has warmed to each other and are
even making post-diamond-sale romantic plans.  Confronting
the smugglers, there is an extended shoot-out sequence.
Their luck continues as the smugglers continue to miss
clean shots at the pair.  The bad guys are terminated one
by one, the diamond is recovered, but Adams steals and
sells it, and takes a helicopter flight to the village to
remove the curse.  She leaves a package of money at the airport
for Dennehy, hot on her trail, but unluckily he runs into
the corrupt local official, who takes half of it.
At least Dennehy can fix up his truck now.  He returns
to his favorite whorehouse, only to find Adams there.
He has not been abandoned after all.
This humble sleeper works despite its flaws.  Adams and
Dennehy have an agreeable chemistry, and the script gives
them room to amply flesh out their characters.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Big Carnival, The (1951)
Also known as "The Big Carnival", "Ace in the Hole"
was a major commercial failure  for director/producer/
co-screenwriter Billy Wilder.  The theme was too harshly
critical and misanthropic for audiences who were seeking
entertainment.  However, the film is highly regarded today
in this more cynical age.  If anything, the story has become
more appropriate over the years, as the separation
between news and entertainment has blurred.
Kirk Douglas was ideally cast as cynical, talented
journalist Chuck Tatum.  Fired from several high-paying
jobs due to his reckless behavior, he takes a job
at a small New Mexico paper and waits for his chance
to reclaim the big-time.  His big break occurs when
miner Leo Minosa (Richard Benedict) is trapped in
an Indian cliff dwelling.  Tatum successfully manipulates
the story into a media circus, in the process striking
bargains with Tatum's selfish, loveless wife Lorraine
(Jan Sterling) and a crooked sheriff (Ray Teal).
Lorraine must pretend she is grief-stricken, while
Teal receives favorable publicity in return for giving
Tatum exclusive access to Leo.  Meanwhile, poor Leo is
left to die, as the rescue operation is deliberately
slowed in order to stretch out the story.
Midway through the film, Tatum has a character
transformation due to his guilt over Leo's plight.
This is the major weakness of the film: had
the venal Tatum survived and emerged triumphant,
the film would have retained greater shock value
and would have made its point more clearly.  But
it is understandable why Douglas' character was
changed; the film was too forceful for contemporary
audiences even as released.
Lorraine and the sheriff, however, remain completely
unsympathetic throughout.  Their characters' favorable
outcomes, contrasted with Tatum's self-destruction,
also makes a point.  If you have been a heel all of
your life, no one will buy it when you become a
do-gooder.  The character of cub photographer
Herbie (Robert Arthur) is also interesting: his
trusting, ethical character is quickly corrupted
by Tatum's unscrupulous, sensational brand of
journalism.
The script has some great lines.  My favorite is
Tatum's boast "Now that they've pitched me a big
fat one, I'm gonna smack it right out of the
ballpark."
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mortal Thoughts (1991)
"Mortal Thoughts" is an excellent crime drama.  It is also an
unhappy and tense film.
"Mortal Thoughts" stars Demi Moore and Glenne Headly as two
lifetime friends who together end up murdering Bruce Willis,
Headly's reel-life and Moore's real-life husband.  They
try to cover up their crime, but are all too aware that
they are unlikely to get away with it.
One can argue that Willis has it coming.  He is one of
filmdom's worst husbands.  He is drug-using, abusive,
sponging, and obnoxious.  He also makes unwanted passes at 
Moore without taking no for an answer.  Clearly, Willis 
relishes the role.
The story is told mostly in flashbacks.  At the start of
the film, Moore is under police interrogation by Harvey Keitel.
As she gets into increasing trouble attempting to explain
her actions, flashbacks take her back to the scenes she
is describing.  This technique has been used in other crime
dramas, such as "Double Indemnity (1944)."  There is also
a plot twist or two, which is almost mandatory for the genre.
Director Alan Rudolph does fine work.  He does has a 
fascination with slow-motion, particularly when the camera 
is focusing on Moore.
"Mortal Thoughts" sags a bit in the middle.  This may be
because we lose all sympathy for Moore and Headly's 
characters, who are both guilty of various serious crimes.
"Mortal Thoughts" has violent scenes.  Other scenes have
large amounts of blood everywhere, so it is not for
children or the squeamish.  One question that has to be
asked: Is the violence and blood necessary?  I think it
is, in this case, because it gets across the point that
it is a terrible crime to murder someone.  Murder is not
glorified in this film.
"Mortal Thoughts" has not received the attention or
aclaim that it deserves.  I hope that this is not due
to the presence of Moore and Willis, who may have made
other poor career decisions, but are well-cast here.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Days of Heaven (1978)
The documentary "Visions of Light: The Art of Cinematography"
lavished more screen time on "Days of Heaven" than on any
other film, even going so far as to use the theme as the
final credits rolled.  It is easy to see why "Days of Heaven" 
was so honored: it is a great argument for cinematography
rather than script or story as the most important element
of a film (I still believe that the script is the most 
important element).
"Days of Heaven" has a minimalist script and relies upon
the camerawork to flesh out the plot.  There are many
distant shots of lush wheatfields, of migrant farm workers
earning their day's wages, of steam trains and thrashers.
There are also many close-ups, not just of the beautiful
cast (then unknowns) but even of grasshoppers munching.
The slow pace allows the cinematography to tell the story.
The shots become redundant only when depicting a wheatfield 
fire.
"Days of Heaven" takes place in the Texas panhandle area
during World War I.  Richard Gere stars as a hotheaded 
itinerant worker.  His lover is Brooke Adams, but for some 
reason they tell others they are brother and sister.  They 
work on the immense wheat farm of Sam Shephard, who has been
told he has but one year to live.  Shephard falls in love
with Adams.  Gere tells Adams to marry Shephard, with the 
intention of both inheriting his wealth after his impending
demise.  It would seem that all sides benefit from this
arrangement, except that Shephard isn't getting sicker,
and suspects that Gere and Adams aren't as they appear to be.
"Days of Heaven" was a project that took place over several
years.  One reason for this was the scenes included all 
four seasons, another was that most filming took place at 
dusk due to favorable lighting.
The cast, direction, cinematography and story are all
excellent and mark "Days of Heaven" as one of the most 
important American films of the 1970s.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Elephant Walk (1954)
"Elephant Walk" has been sneered at by critics
for 45 years now.  Yet it has aged well.  Elizabeth
Taylor is lovely in her endless collection of
revealing dresses, and the cinematography and
sets filmed on location in Ceylon (modern-day
Sri Lanka) are very good.
The criticism has been aimed instead at the silly
(but entertaining) finale involving rampaging
elephants and a burning mansion, and a soap opera-ish
love triangle with ivory-skinned Taylor at the center.
But this film has been viewed too cynically, perhaps
because its target audience is female.  Certainly
the script and story is a bit ridiculous, but
that is not necessarily a disadvantage.  "Elephant
Walk" is an unintentional comedy, and with this
view in mind the film becomes an excellent waste
of two hours.
The story begins with wealthy tea planter
John Wiley (Peter Finch) bringing his new bride
Ruth (Taylor) to his immense plantation and
estate in Ceylon.  At first Taylor is pleased
by the tropical beauty and her new-found luxury,
but there is trouble in paradise.
For some reason, Finch prefers the company of his
drunken, middle-aged friends, who turn his mansion
into their club.  Taylor is apparently the only
'white' woman in Ceylon, and in her annoyance
and boredom turns to angst-ridden overseer
Dana Andrews.  Besides the usual concerns over
guilt and morality, their would-be infidelity
is threatened by a drought and a cholera epidemic.
"Elephant Walk" was beset with production problems.
The roles played by Finch and Taylor were originally
intended for Laurence Olivier and his wife Vivien
Leigh.  Filming actually began with Leigh, but
the tropical climate and a nervous breakdown
interfered.  Taylor's luck was little better: a
freak accident involving a wind machine caused
her hospitalization with a steel splinter in
her eye.
"Elephant Walk" reminds me of "Rebecca", the
1940 Hitchcock epic.  A new bride out of place
at a mansion, run by a creepy servant who
dislikes her and who has a slavish devotion to
a long dead master.  Like in "Rebecca", the hated
mansion goes down in flames, with the now-attentive
husband promising her a new and better life
away from its remains.  This formula was far
better presented in "Rebecca", but it works here
as well.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Romeo and Juliet (1968/I)
Of all the cinematic adaptations of William
Shakespeare's plays, none look better than
Zeffirelli's "Romeo and Juliet".  The sets,
the costumes, and the cinematography are
bright and colorful, while the cast radiates
with youth and energy.  The film was also
aided by a memorable score by Nino Rota,
composer for several Fellini films and who
would later be best known for his score of
"The Godfather".
"Romeo and Juliet" was the third consecutive
Shakespearean play for Italian director
Franco Zeffirelli, following a British television
production of "Much Ado about Nothing" and
a big-budget Elizabeth Taylor-Richard Burton
vehicle, "The Taming of the Shrew".  Zeffirelli
would later tackle "Othello" and "Hamlet",
but his most successful adaptation was clearly
"Romeo and Juliet", one of the biggest grossing
films of the year.
Zeffirelli made several bold moves with "Romeo
and Juliet" that paid off handsomely.  Unlike
"Shrew", the film was cast with largely unknowns
(Michael York would become a star only later)
that were very close in age to the characters.
While this created greater realism, it put quite
a burden on the leads, who had to deliver whole
paragraphs of tongue-tangling seventeenth-century
dialogue.  (Sometimes the young actors take the
melodrama too much to heart, giving exaggerated
performance.)  There's also a morning-after scene
with some nudity, which was probably a surprise
to most 1968 filmgoers.
The story is well known, loaded with tragedy
that could always have been so easily averted.
It takes place in renaissance Italy.  Romeo
Montague (Leonard Whiting) and Juliet Capulet
(Olivia Hussey) fall in love, despite the fact
that their families are bitter enemies.  Their
heavy romance is threatened by the discord,
which is especially promoted by arrogant Tybalt
(Michael York) and jester Mercutio (John McEnery).
The story's greatest weakness has Romeo,
seething with rage, avenging Tybalt's murder.
It just doesn't fit his character.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Grifters, The (1990)
"The Grifters" is a lurid, tense film that explores
the lives of three con artists and their relationships
to each other.  While the violence, language, and
sexual situations may offend some people, it does not
detract from the film's message, which is that crime
doesn't pay.  The life of a grifter may be eventful,
but it is ultimately dismal.
"The Grifters" stars Roy (John Cusack) as a young
grifter, working 'short cons' on innocents such as
bartenders and sailors.  His mother Lilly (Anjelica
Huston) works the racetracks for a sadistic mobster
(Pat Hingle).  Mother and son have an uncomfortable
relationship, partly due to Roy's need for independence,
but mostly due to his unresolved Oedipus complex.
Roy's girlfriend is Myra (Annette Bening), a ruthless
and manipulative con artist, who sees Roy as a potential
partner for her specialty, 'long cons' to be perpetrated
on desperate businessmen.  Myra and Lilly soon take
a dislike to each other, and tensions are further
increased by Roy's mistrust of Myra.
The character of Myra was the most interesting for me.
She really is a monster, and the more evil an action
is, the more she seems to enjoy it.  Roy is so independent
and mistrustful that he tries to convince Myra and Lilly
that he is a salesman, but he doesn't fool either of them.
Lilly is the film's shrewdest character, but she is
undermined by her avarice and her love for her son.
The complex relationships of these three con artists
creates tense and unpredictable plot developments.
"The Grifters" has several excellent supporting roles
for veteran character actors.  Pat Hingle plays a crafty,
sinister mobster, Henry Jones is a know-it-all motel
clerk, and Eddie Jones is the grifter who makes Roy his
apprentice.  Stephen Tobolowsky plays a jeweler who is
perhaps the film's only honest character.
"The Grifters" received several Academy Award nominations:
Best Actress (Huston), Best Supporting Actress (Bening),
Best Director (Stephen Frears), and Best Adapted
Screenplay (Donald Westlake).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Niagara (1953)
Ray Cutler (Max Showalter) is a winner of a shredded wheat essay
contest, and his prize is a trip to Niagara Falls, with his wife Polly 
(Jean Peters).  Ray is good-natured but somewhat smarmy.  Peters
has no discernable personality.  Ray is waiting at the hotel
for shredded wheat corporate bigshot Mr. Kettering, hoping for a job offer.
At a humble motel at Niagara, they meet a troubled married couple.
George Loomis (Joseph Cotten) is a moody, paranoid man, unable to
keep a job and in the process of losing wife Rose (Marilyn Monroe)
who is voluptuous and much younger.
The Cutlers are nosy, especially Peters, going out of their way to
talk to the Loomis's.  Later, while touring the falls, Peters
sees Monroe making out with a young man (Richard Allan).
It turns out that Monroe is plotting with Allan to kill her husband.  
No wonder she is in such a good mood.  She sets a trap for
Cotten, with Allan and Cotten alone in the same elevator.
Later, Monroe pretends to be frantically worried about her missing
husband.  Again the Loomis couple are brought into the story
as police search the area for Cotten.  A body is fished from
the rapids, and Monroe must identify it.  We don't see the body,
but Monroe does, screams, and is carried unconscious to a hospital.
For some reason, the motel owner moves the Cutler's belongings
into the Loomis' former room.  Peters is sleeping, when Cotten
(he's alive!) enters, brandishing a kitchen knife, thinking Peters
is Monroe.  Peters gives an excellent scream (much more spirited than
Monroe's was).  Ray doesn't buy the story about Cotten being alive,
and tells her she had a nightmare.
Mr. Kettering (Don Wilson) and wife arrive.  Wilson is a gregarious 
backslapper, and insists and showing the Cutlers the area.  They go to 
visit the falls.  
Now the story becomes increasingly unbelievable.  Somehow, Peters
isolates herself from the party, convenient for meeting Cotten, who
just happens to be there.  Peters runs from Cotten, who tracks her
down, admits to murdering Allan, wants her to "help him" without bothering 
to explain what help he wants.  Peters escape, but doesn't tell anyone 
what she's seen.  Returning to the motel, a police detective is waiting.  
Oddly, she lies to him at first, then finally tells him that Cotten is 
alive and Monroe knows it, not mentioning the murder of Allan.  
Amazingly, the detective leaves without asking any further questions.
Monroe makes the mistake of wandering about alone.  Cotten, who
certainly gets around, happens upon her, stalks her, and strangles
her in the bell tower.  He happens to get locked in the tower,
but makes no effort to escape until the door is unlocked the next
morning.  Instead of remaining in hiding in Canada, Cotten returns
to the American border, where he is sure to be spotted by a mass
of people and policeman, who by now are looking for him.
Meanwhile, the Cutlers are boating with the Ketterings.  In another
unbelievable coincidence, Cotten, after hiding behind trees, sneaks
into the boat after distracting the others.  Peters returns alone
to the boat.  She sees Cotten, he tells her to leave, she physically
attacks him, without calling for help!  He knocks her out, heads
straight to the falls to escape police, and runs out of gas.  Perhaps 
the whole movie plot has been a slow-moving setup for Peters to be 
in peril.  Cotten sacrifices himself for the damsel in distress, 
who watches in horror as Cotten goes over the falls.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mary Poppins (1964)
"Mary Poppins" is a Disney musical comedy, intended to entertain
both children and adults.  Although the movie is overlong and
loses its focus towards the end, considerable charm remains.
The story features a well-to-do British family in the early 1900s.
Mother is busy fighting for women's right to vote, no-nonsense Father 
makes his living at the bank, and the two young children need
a Nanny.  To the rescue comes Mary Poppins (Julie Andrews).
She is "practically perfect in every way", and is magic as well.
Dick Van Dyke, a street merchant and chimney sweep, shows up 
now and then to help entertain the kids.
"Mary Poppins" has a nifty sequence that combines animation
and live action.  This fantasy may be the best part of the movie.
There is similarity between this film and "Peter Pan", another
Disney film where the children are entertained by a magic figure
who is only temporarily in their lives.  
If "Mary Poppins" is lacking anything, it is dramatic tension.  
The only resistance to Mary comes from Father, who wants to 
prepare the children for the "real" world of work and drudgery.  
With Father being so tiresome, Van Dyke serves as a surrogate,
more friendly and free-spirited.  Father does have a character
transformation by the end of the film, which could alternately
be considered a nervous breakdown.
The musical numbers have contagious melodies and clever lyrics.
They work well until a chimney sweep sequence that goes on
for too long and features synchronized dancing and singing by 
every chimney sweep in London.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Flim-Flam Man, The (1967)
"The Flim Flam Man" is a reasonably good comedy, with
many good scenes, but ultimately loses credibility
as a drama.  George C. Scott gives an effective performance,
and the script gives him several good lines.
"The Flim Flam Man" stars Scott as an aging con man.
He recruits young Michael Sarrazin, also wanted by
the law, as a shill.  The pair commit various amusing
cons, and soon the local sheriff (Harry Morgan) is after
them.  Meanwhile, Sarrazin gets a love interest in
Sue Lyon (you may recognize her from "Lolita").
The film's humor comes from the marks, typically greedy,
foolish yokels.  The dumbest of them all is Slim Pickens,
who gives a great cameo performance.  There is also a
wild car chase that wrecks a beautiful sports car.
The drama works less well.  It is impossible to see why
Lyon would fall in love with Sarrazin, who stole and
wrecked her car.  It is even more silly that Sarrazin
would want to turn himself in, having just committed
a slew of serious felonies, and then commit more to
get Scott out of jail.  The stereotype of rural Southerners,
especially Sheriffs and moonshiners, as dumb and
easily-manipulated yokels wears thin after a while
as well.  Sarrazin also becomes an expert con artist
the same day that he meets Scott.
Trivia: Scott was much younger than his character, and
had to wear much makeup to look older.  "The Flim Flam
Man" was Sarrazin's first theatrical film.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Double Indemnity (1944)
For those who think that all old Hollywood movies have happy
endings and sugary values, "Double Indemnity" will change your
opinion.  It is a dark crime drama that ruthlessly explores
how people will not stop at murder in the search for love and
money.
Fred MacMurray is cast against type as insurance peddler
Walter Neff.  Neff is a little too sure of himself, and
thinks he knows all the angles.  He visits a client at his
home, but instead meets his wife Phyllis Dietrichson
(Barbara Stanwyck).  Stanwyck soon realizes that MacMurray
is stuck on her, and that this is a golden opportunity for
her to rid of her hated husband, who shows no interest in her.
Stanwyck presses MacMurray for accident insurance on her
husband, and drops hints of murder as she bats her eyes at
him.
Throughout the movie, Stanwyck's character is evil incarnate.
She has murdered before, and plans to again.  She has no
feelings, but can act any emotion required to get what she
wants.  Soon MacMurray has been reeled in completely, and
schemes to kill the unlucky husband to collect a $50,000
insurance policy.
To collect double the policy amount, Stanwyck's husband must
be killed in a train accident.  Stanwyck and MacMurray kill
him, MacMurray impersonates the husband on the train, and
once alone, jumps off the train.  The body is then placed on 
the tracks by the murderous couple.
MacMurray's boss Norton is suspicious of the "accident",
suspecting suicide.  Claims adjuster Barton Keyes (Edward
G. Robinson) suspects murder.  Fortunately for MacMurray,
Robinson is a long time co-worker and confidant, and he
does not suspect him.
Edward G. Robinson was one of the all-time great character
actors.  He did not have the looks or voice of a leading
man, but he had sufficient charisma to get leading roles
anyway, usually as a crime boss.  On an occasion when he
had a leading man role, he played the love-blinded sap
as in "Scarlet Street".
Robinson does a great job as Barton Keyes, scowling, growling,
and suspicious of everything.  He suspects that MacMurray's
imaginary girlfriend Marjorie drinks from the bottle.
Keyes was once engaged, but then suspected his girlfriend.
He had her investigated, then broke the engagement!
He always has a two-for-a-quarter cigar in his hand,
but can never find a match.  Perhaps that is why he enjoys
MacMurray's company, as he constantly lights his cigars for him.
The script, co-written by director Billy Wilder and crime
novelist Raymond Chandler, is terrific.  The direction is
excellent as well and milks the inherent suspense from every 
scene.  Many times, MacMurray or Stanwyck are on the verge
of having their evil plan collapse, but survive after much
dramatic tension.
Oh, and there's also a needless romance between MacMurray and
Stanwyck's doe-eyed daughter-in-law Lola (Jean Heather).
And MacMurray's character has an unlikely change of heart at 
the end.  But few movies are perfect!
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Hallelujah (1929)
"Hallelujah" was the first film from a major studio
with an all-black cast.  Perhaps we should be
grateful that "Hallelujah" exists, rather than
resentful that racism prevented the production
of other films like it.  But at least we have
"Hallelujah", which is more dynamic, fascinating
and unique than most of the other musicals from
the early sound era.
Daniel Haynes stars as Zeke, who, along with his
large family, makes a marginal living as a cotton
picker.  Come harvest time, Zeke gets paid for his
crop, but he promptly loses it to a pair of
con artists (William Fontaine and femme fatale
Nina Mae McKinney).  His brother is also killed.
In his despair, Zeke is born again, and becomes
a spellbinding preacher.  But his family's new-found
success is again threatened by Zeke's maddening
passion for McKinney.
The soundtrack for "Hallelujah" is excellent.
The nightclub scenes have vintage jazz performances.
There are also spirituals, folk songs, and lullabies.
Haynes has a resonant bass voice, reminiscent of
Paul Robeson.  Essentially, "Hallelujah" was filmed
as a silent, with the soundtrack later dubbed in.
That, along with cultural reasons and amateur actors,
may account for the exaggerated performances.
Distribution of the film proved more problematic,
as some theatre owners had fears that 'too many'
blacks would see the film, alienating white audiences.
King Vidor, a successful Texas-born director with
a Hollywood career spanning five decades, also
produced "Hallelujah".  His efforts were rewarded
with an Oscar nomination for Best Director.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
"Evita" is the ambitious film version of the
Andrew Lloyd Webber/Tim Rice musical, based on
the life of Eva Peron, First Lady of Argentina.
"Evita" is an Opera, a sardonic character study,
a history lesson, a tear jerker, and a Madonna
vehicle, all at once.  And it is a little better
than the decidedly mixed reviews that it has
received.
Eva's life is shown from its humble beginnings
as a poor, illegitimate peasant girl living in
the countryside.  She latches onto travelling
musician Agustin Magaldi (Jimmy Nail), who takes
her to Buenos Aires,  and promptly dumps her
to return to his wife.  Eva has better luck with
a series of lovers, each of whom plays a role
towards making her a radio and film celebrity,
and each is discarded as his usefulness to her
is eclipsed.
Eva finally settles for Juan Peron, a colonel
close to power.  As the wife of a dictator, she
is able to pursue her social agenda: a transfer
of wealth from the snob elite to the "shirtless"
masses whose worship she craves.  But as her
political power and fame increase, her health
begins to fail...
With "Evita", Madonna has finally found a female
lead role that suits her talents.  She can only
hope that future Rice/Weber projects will involve
Princess Diana and Hillary Clinton.  Madonna does
not have a great voice, but she has a screen
presence and is able to put a lot of emotion into
her vocals.
Perhaps the real star of "Evita", however, is
Antonio Banderas.  He shows up in most of the scenes,
alternately commiserating with and condemning the
actions of Eva.  Part narrator and part audience,
his character is curious but necessary to explain
the plot to Americans oblivious to Argentine history.
As a history lesson, "Evita" seems credible.  Eva
and Juan are neither glorified nor villified.  The
real power seems to be held by the right-wing military,
who will tolerate the Eva Peron show only as long as
it serves their purposes of political stability.
I suppose someone knowledgeable with Eva Peron could
pick the film apart, but a quick fact check on the
web seemed to verify the film's integrity.  One minor
discrepancy: in the film, Eva apparently has leukemia,
while the real-life Eva had uterine cancer.
Musicals haven't been a major force in cinema since
the 1960s, and are now mostly relegated to children's
fare: animated films and Muppet movies.  An ambitious,
big budget musical is risky for a studio, and it is good
to see that the genre has not been forgotten.  Perhaps
"Evita" becomes overly funereal in the final third
of the film, but it is interesting and has surprising
content for a Lloyd Webber/Rice musical.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
The ninth in an apparently endless series of films
based upon the television series "Star Trek", this is
also the third film to use the "Next Generation"
cast.  "Insurrection" gives us the answer to the
question, what would happen if a one-hour show is
stretched to a two-hour film?  While the cinematography
is better and the budget is bigger, it seems that we
have been down this road before, and too many times.
Special effects, techno-babble, and makeup that looks
like uncomfortable rubber scarecrows take the place
of plot, dialogue and character development.
Midway through "Insurrection", there are attempts to
add some warmth to the formulaic sci-fi fantasy action
plot.  Fearless captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) gets
a platonic love interest with uninteresting Donna Murphy,
while the android Data (Brent Spiner) is taught how to
play by an uninteresting pre-adolescent.
Romance is rekindled between director/second banana Riker
(Jonathan Frakes) and consellor Troi (Marina Sirtis),
both of whom are unbearably smug as a result.
There's also some kind of moral about the evils of
technology, and that it is wrong to steal planets from
people.
Then, it is back to the fantasy action adventure, with
Picard and his heroic crew rescuing the gentle, peace-abiding
villagers from the ugly mutants attempting to dislocate
them.  The plot is reconciled in wholly predictable fashion,
with nothing being done to prevent Star Trek X from appearing
in theatres two years hence.
Since the formula has run aground, I have a suggestion
for Frakes and Rick Berman.  Why not make "Star Trek X"
a musical?  Picard can perform "MacArthur Park".  Frakes can
sing "You're So Vain".  LaForge would sing "I Can See Clearly
Now".  Data will perform "Hooked on a Feeling".  Troi can
warble "Torn Between Two Lovers" while Whorf tackles "In the
Year 2525".  Sure, Trekkie fans would feel alien-ated,
but perhaps it would be a cult film classic, like
"Rocky Horror Picture Show".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
"Antz" provides proof that Hollywood takes animated
films seriously.  DreamWorks sunk 65 million dollars
into this project, much of which must have gone to
the impressive cast providing the voices: Woody Allen,
Gene Hackman, Jennifer Lopez, Sylvester Stallone,
Christopher Walken, Sharon Stone, Danny Glover,
Anne Bancroft, and Saturday Night Live alumni Dan Aykroyd
and Jane Curtin.
The results are pretty good.  While "Antz" is not the
great film that "Toy Story" was, it is thoroughly
enjoyable.  The animation is satisfying, the characters
are interesting, there are many funny moments, and
even some suspense.
The story begins with worker ant Z-4195 (Allen)
questioning his role in the ant universe.  Seemingly
fated to a life of mundane toil, his only friends
are hulking soldier ant Weaver (Stallone) and
lady co-worker Azteca (Lopez).  Z falls for Princess
Bala (Stone), who is the daughter of the queen (Bancroft).
In an attempt to meet Bala, Z cons Weaver into trading
places.  The ants declare war on a neighbor termite
colony, and Z is forced into battle.  At least he
makes a new friend in Barbatus (Glover).  The war
with the termites is part of an evil plan by general
Mandible (Hackman) to wipe out the colony.  Mandible's
right hand man (or is it, right legged ant?) is brooding
Cutter (Walken).
The best supporting characters are a snobbish wasp
couple (Aykroyd and Curtin).  They provide a great
comic relief, but unfortunately do not see much
screen time.  The characters of Z and Weaver are
very familiar to students of Allen and Stallone,
and when the action slows, it is fun to look for
the actors' personalities in their dialogue.
The animation, although very good, is not quite up to
the level of "Toy Story".  The backgrounds become
redundant in color and texture, but the foreground
action is well done.
The great weakness to the story is Mandible's genocidal
plans.  If he wants to abduct Bala and begin a new
colony, he can do it without destroying the existing
colony.  One philosophic question that "Antz" doesn't
address: does every cartoon needs a villian?
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969)
Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969)
"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" is one of the most
successful and beloved Westerns of all time.  The
film stars attractive and likeable Paul Newman and Robert
Redford, there are many action scenes and humorous lines,
and there is good cinematography.
Still, I found the film to be somewhat disappointing.
It is a good movie, but the personalities of the
main characters (engaging nice guys) do not match
their actions (ruthless bank robbers).  Many scenes
rely too heavily on the dialogue interplay between
Newman and Redford, which is only mildly entertaining.
The film has some slow moments, such as the series of
still photographs showing Redford, Newman and Katherine
Ross living it up prior to visiting Bolivia.  The comic
relief characters, such as Woodcock (who blathers on
about his loyalty to the unseen Mr. Harriman) and the
Bolivian old-timer (who not only constantly spits, but
keeps up a monologue about his success in doing
so) are charmingly eccentric but not completely credible.
Ross is never wanted by the police in Bolivia despite
participating in robberies there.  They are highly
conspicuous, yet spend much time at restaurants,
taverns, etc.
Newman and Redford are bank and train robbers in the
old west at the turn of the century.  The railroad
hires a team of crack lawmen and trackers to hunt them
down.  Newman and Redford, with their mutual girlfriend
Katherine Ross, flee to Bolivia, where they resume
robbing banks.  But they are soon hunted there, as well.
There are some spoilers in what follows.
Clues to the film's ending are obvious.  A friendly
sherrif tells them that their days are numbered and
that they will die a bloody death.  Ross says that
she doesn't want to be present when they are killed.
I felt that these hints, especially Ross's, were too
heavy-handed.
"Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid" won the Golden
Globe for Best Picture, and was nominated for Best
Picture by the Academy, correctly losing to "Midnight
Cowboy".  "Butch Cassidy" is also noted for the
Burt Bacharach score.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for I Wanna Hold Your Hand (1978)
"I Wanna Hold Your Hand" is an early directorial
effort by Robert Zemeckis, the Spielberg protege
whose biggest success, "Back to the Future", would
come seven years later.  The title is derived
from the Beatles' first #1 single in America.
This is appropriate, since the film is about the
wave of Beatlemania sweeping America in February
1964.
The Beatles are about to appear on the Ed Sullivan
show.  A group of New York teenagers, with varying
motives, are eager to get tickets to the performance.
Wide-eyed bride-to-be Pam (Nancy Allen) wants some
equivalent of a wedding shower, brash Rosie (Wendie Jo
Sperber) and nerdy Richard (Eddie Deezen) are obsessed
fans, Larry (Marc McClure) is hoping to score with
ambitious photographer Grace (Theresa Saldana), while
folkie Janis (Susan Kendall Newman) and greaser Tony
(Bobby Di Cicco) want to sabotage the appearance.
A screwball comedy ensues.  The kids get into and out
of trouble, experience setbacks and triumphs, break
multiple laws and cause much chaos.  All for an
opportunity to see the Beatles.  But a happy ending
is in store for all concerned.  Even Tony comes around,
although it takes a bolt of lightning to do the job.
The authenticity is impressive.  The soundtrack
consists of glorious, original Beatles songs, contemporary
with those available to fans in Feb. 1964.  While
there are clever, dead-on vocal imitations of the
Fab Four, whenever their faces are shown, it's the
real thing and not an impersonation.  There is an
Ed Sullivan impersonator (Will Jordan), but his Sullivan
schtick is perfect.  (One ironic moment has 'Sullivan'
announcing that next week's show includes comic
Will Jordan.)  The adult indifference to, and contempt
for, the cultural phenomenon also seems accurate.
Of course, sometimes the silliness goes overboard.
A drunken Larry knocks unconscious a man easily
twice his size.  Selfish Grace makes an unlikely
career sacrifice for the sake of dweeby Larry.
Janis, who prefers Paul Stookey to Paul McCartney,
has an unexplained transformation from Beatles
protestor to Beatles fan.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for White Heat (1949)
In 1949, James Cagney revitalized his career by
returning to the stereotype that first made him
a star.  Cagney's pugnacious, tough-guy onscreen
persona was ideally suited for playing gangsters.
In "White Heat", pathos is added to his character,
giving him even more opportunity to dominate
scenes and demonstrate his talents.  It also
helps that the direction is tight,  the story is
filled with action, the script has the right mix
of colorful slang and one-liners, and the
supporting cast (except for O'Brien) is excellent.
Cody Jarrett (Cagney) is the unstable, murderous
leader of a gang that specializes in robberies.
Verna (Virginia Mayo) is his selfish, unfaithful
wife.  Big Ed (Steve Cochran) harbors schemes to
kill Cody, steal his wife, and take over the gang.
Cody is devoted to his mother (Margaret Wycherly),
a no-nonsense elderly woman who is part of the gang
and lends Cody needed emotional support.
To avoid 'taking the fall' for a 'train job', Cody
'cops a rap' in another state.  The 'Feds' plant
'copper' Hank Fallon (Edmond O'Brien) as Cody's
cellmate.  Fallon works his way into Cody's gang,
which busts out of prison.  Cody deals with Big Ed,
but soon the police are on the trail, leading to a
finale shootout.
"White Heat" has two Cagney scenes which have become
famous in film circles.  He has a nervous breakdown
in the prison cafeteria, complete with kicking,
screaming, crawling on tables, and punching multiple
guards.  The film's ending involves an industrial
plant that suffers massive explosions, and has
Cagney shouting 'Top of the World, Ma!' as the
fireballs swell.
Cagney, Mayo and Wycherly are particularly good.
O'Brien is competent, but curiously dislikable,
perhaps because his pedestrian good-guy/hero
role compares poorly with Cagney's charisma.
His character has one of the crummiest jobs in
filmdom: who would want to be an undercover prison
inmate?
The script does has some psychobabble, and the
revealing of the Trader's identity seems unlikely.
Still, any minor problems that "White Heat" may
have do not interfere with its status as an
entertaining, intense crime drama.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for His Girl Friday (1940)
"His Girl Friday" is a comedy that satirizes the newspaper
business.  It is based on the noted Broadway play
"The Front Page", but with a plot twist in that one
of the two leads is a woman and is the ex-wife of the other.
It stars Rosalind Russell as a headstrong woman
who plans to marry a milquetoast insurance salesman
(Ralph Bellamy).  She attempts to quit her job as a reporter
working for conniving editor and ex-husband Cary Grant.
Although she is fully aware of his schemes, she gets suckered
into covering one last story; the pending execution of
a mild-mannered man who becomes unstable when carrying
a handgun.
One of the running gags of the film is that clueless
Bellamy keeps ending up in jail, an innocent victim of
Grant's machinations.  Bellamy plays the wide-eyed dupe
perfectly.  When Grant makes a ridiculous speech about
his devotion to his ex-wife, Bellamy believes it all
and can only say "Gee!" in amazement.
"His Girl Friday" makes heavy use of overlapping dialogue.
One scene has Grant, Russell and Bellamy all talking at once.
This technique works as it makes the film more dynamic.
Newspapermen are depicted in the film as prone to
cynical moralizing, embellishing the truth for dramatic
impact, and willing to commit crimes in order to win
a "scoop".  This image may be more accurate today, more
than a half century later, than it was when the film was made.
Director Howard Hawks and Cary Grant must have gotten along
well, since they made four other films together.  All but
one of these films was a comedy.  Cary Grant was a great
comic actor, usually playing a character who doesn't quite
realize that he is making a fool of himself.  "His Girl Friday"
is different in that Bellamy plays the stooge.  Of course, Grant
had success in dramatic roles as well.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for It Happened One Night (1934)
"It Happened One Night" was a great commercial and
critical success for Director Frank Capra.  The romantic
comedy was a box office hit, and took the four most
important Oscars: Best Picture, Best Director,
Best Actor (Clark Gable), and Best Actress (Claudette Colbert),
as well as for adapted screenplay (Robert Riskin).
The film continues to be very highly regarded today.
The story has Colbert just married to famed aviator
King Westley (Jameson Thomas) whom her father (Walter Connolly)
despises.  Connolly interferes with their marriage,
abducting her and seeking an annullment.  Colbert
escapes, and flees to New York and Westley on a bus,
where she meets smug reporter Gable.  Gable, in need
of a big story in order to reconcile with his editor,
makes a pact with Colbert to help her reach New York.
Predictably, romantic sparks fly between Gable and Colbert.
"It Happened One Night" is a good film, certainly better
than the average comedy.  The dialogue between Gable
and Colbert is often entertaining, especially when
he teaches her how to hitchhike.  Colbert is engaging
and sympathetic, while Gable is a capable comic actor.
But the film has its share of problems, which keep it
from being the outstanding film that it is generally
considered to be.
The film begins with Colbert's father holding her
captive against her will on his boat.  I have always
considered this to be kidnapping.  Ellie escapes, and
her father sends a fleet of detectives after her.
What if they caught up with her?  Would she be dragged
kicking and screaming into a waiting limousine?  Despite
his tyranny, Connolly is presented as a sympathetic
character. It is understandable why he dislikes Westley,
but why is he so anxious that Colbert marry Gable instead,
whom he has met just once, and when he knows that the
two have already quarrelled?
Why is Colbert's trip to New York such a huge story?
The film features a half-dozen different front page
headlines, each in screaming type.  The highs and lows
of the Colbert-Gable romance coincide with the hate/love
relationship between Gable and his newspaper boss
(Charles Wilson).
There is a song performed on the bus, "The Daring Young
in his Flying Trapeze."  Everybody on the bus loves
the song, when assumedly half of the passengers would
be trying to get some sleep.  Various passengers, strangers
to each other, take turns standing up and singing different
verses, which they do flawlessly and with matching hand
gestures.  The bus driver gets so excited by the song that
he drives off the road.
There were overall qualities about the film that I also
disagreed with.  The film is essentially a depression-era
fantasy for women, with heroine Colbert achieving
independence from her fabulously wealthy father while
exchanging uptight husband Westley for dashing Gable.
While similar themes has been put to good use, for example,
in "A Room with a View", here the characters are more
shallow and the audience manipulations are more blatant.
"It Happened One Night" also falls prey to the Hollywood
canard that people fall in love with each other through a
series of arguments.
Of course, it is possible that I am overly critical,
and carry a grudge against crowd-pleasing romantic
comedies.  Certainly most viewers have found this
to be a better film than I have given it credit for.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for 2001: A Space Odyssey (1968)
"2001" is probably the most original film ever made.
It is so different from conventional films that,
in fact, it may be a different art form altogether.
Even the very best films, such as "Casablanca",
"Rebecca" and "Chinatown" have formulaic elements.
In contrast, "2001" is in its own world, as if
all the movies made before had never existed.
While director Stanley Kubrick has made even better
films ("Dr. Strangelove" and "Barry Lyndon", and
perhaps others I haven't yet seen), "2001" will
always be the most impressive, just for its
originality and audacity.
The film has four parts.  The first section is the
dawn of man.  Man-apes are taught to use tools and
kill by an imposing black monolith.  In the second
part, a second black monolith is found buried in
the moon by astronauts in the year 2001.  This leads
to a mission to Jupiter by another team of astronauts
and a talkative, emotional computer named Hal.
The final and most surreal part has astronaut Dave
traveling to the infinite and beyond.
"2001" opened to mixed reviews.  Many critics were
(and perhaps still are) put off by the lack of
dialogue and character development, the slow pace,
and surreal imagery. "2001" is a story told by
cinematography, with much of the meaning left to
the imagination of the viewer.
The film's significance was not lost on the Oscar
committee, however, which awarded "2001" Best
Special Effects and Best Art Direction.  Kubrick
was nominated for Best Director, and the film
was nominated for Best Writing.  It is odd that
the sparse script was nominated instead of
cinematography.
The most developed character in the film is Hal,
a computer that is more emotional than the
robotlike humans that accompany him on the
mission.  The confrontation between Hal (voiced
by Douglas Rain) and Dave (Keir Dullea) is the
most interesting part of the film, more so
than the increasingly bizarre and unfathomable
finale.
Trivia: "2001" took three years to film.  Supposedly
there was 200 times more film shot than was used in
the final version.  The little girl in the telephone
video is Kubrick's daughter Vivienne.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Close Encounters of the Third Kind (1977)
Close Encounters of the Third Kind (1977)
"Stars Wars" and "Close Encounters of the Third Kind" were
both released in 1977, and were enormously successful films,
both critically and commercially.  This began a new era
in Hollywood, in which special effects became much more
important as a lure to bring customers to the theater.
The plot has aliens visiting the Earth with a fleet of
enormous, glowing spaceships.  Scientists learn how to
communicate with the aliens through musical and mathematical
codes.  The U.S. Government, of course, launches a massive
conspiracy, inventing a deadly nerve gas leak to force citizens
away from the site of the alien visits.
Richard Dreyfuss is well cast as an average man who sees
the flying saucers one evening, and soon loses his job, his
sanity, and his wife (Teri Garr).  Melinda Dillon is a
mother of a young boy (played by wide-eyed and mute Cary Guffey)
who is abducted by the aliens.  Dreyfuss and Dillon are
compelled to visit Devil's Peak, not knowing why, where
they become part of the alien's landing ceremony.
Steven Spielberg wrote and directed "Close Encounters".
As with his later film "E.T.", the aliens are benevolent,
and the special effects are used to create a mood of
childlike wonder.  This mood is ultimately manipulative,
however, and the jaded viewer may not be especially
impressed with hairless, big-eyed, unisex aliens and
glowing spaceships.  Ethical considerations, such as
the rights of aliens to kidnap whomever they wish for
close inspection, are not addressed.
Tellingly, "Close Encounters" won the Academy Award for Best
Cinematography, but was not nominated for Best Picture
or Screenplay.  While it is a very good film, it is not
outstanding.  The story succeeds as a drama, but there is
more form than content.
There are two major versions of "Close Encounters",
with perhaps fifteen minutes of differing footage.
After the film's release and great success, Spielberg
reassembled most of the cast and filmed new scenes
including the interior of the alien spaceship.  Some
other scenes in the original version were cut or
replaced.  I have not seen this latter version.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Rachel, Rachel (1968)
"Rachel, Rachel" marked the debut of Paul Newman as a
Director and Producer.  The film, highly acclaimed at the
time but since largely forgotten, stars Newman's wife
Joanne Woodward as the title character, and also features
their daughter (Nell Potts) who plays Rachel as a child.
Rachel is a 35 year old unwed schoolteacher who has grown
tired of her unrewarding life in rural Connecticut.  Since her
undertaker father's death ten years past, she has been a
servant to her manipulative, demanding mother (Kate Harrington,
who may give the film's best performance).  Her best friend
is latent lesbian Calla (Estelle Parsons).  Looking for
an escape from her mundane routine, Rachel first attends a
cultish religious meeting, then takes as a lover cynical
confirmed bachelor Nick (James Olson).
A slow-moving character study, "Rachel, Rachel" is
visually impressive and compelling.  Most interesting
are the short 'fantasy' scenes, the only scenes where
the repressed Rachel is ever able to do what she truly
wants to.  The only comic relief is ironic, but the
characters are credible and well defined.
Stewart Stern was nominated for Best Adapted Screenplay,
which was based on the novel "A Jest of God" by Margaret Laurence.
Newman won a Golden Globe for Best Director, and the
film was nominated by the Academy for Best Picture.
Joanne Woodward and Estelle Parsons were nominated for
Best Actress and Best Supporting Actress.
Despite the success of "Rachel, Rachel", Newman's career
as a director never panned out.  Of course, it did not
need to, since he was one of Hollywood's leading men
from the 1950s through the 1970s and remains a star
today (his current film is "Message in a Bottle").
Like fellow Actor/Director Robert Redford, with whom
his career often parallels, his debut film as a director
became by far his most important.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Go West (1925)
Not to be confused with a 1923 short also by
Buster Keaton having the same title, "Go West"
is a comedy, western and romance.  It is a change
of pace from the usual Keaton feature, as it
is his only 'western', and his love interest
is played by a cow named Brown Eyes.  Brown Eyes
not only received fourth billing, very unusual
for a cow even in those days, but she got better
reviews than did Keaton.
"Go West" begins much like other Keaton
comedies.  Buster plays a 'down on his luck'
fellow named Friendless.  His life in the city
has been a failure, so he decides to take the
old advice by Horace Greeley.  He hitches a ride
on a train (trains are prominent in many Keaton
silents, including his last, "The Railrodder"
from 1965) to the old west.  He somehow gets a
job at a ranch as a cowboy, where his incompetence
provides much humor.  For example, he tries to
milk a cow through persuasion, and has to use a
makeshift ladder to saddle a horse.  He learns
quickly, but never replaces his trademark porkpie
hat with western garb.  The gruff ranch owner (Howard
Truesdale) has a pretty daughter (Kathleen Myers).
But Friendless' true love is Brown Eyes, who saves
his life from a rampaging bull.
One entertaining scene has Keaton catching a bad
guy cheating at cards.  The gambler pulls a gun on
Friendless, telling him 'to smile when he says that'.
Keaton, whose nickname was The Great Stoneface,
only manages a smile by pushing up the corners of
his mouth with his fingers!
Plot contrivances result in a herd of cattle rampaging
through city streets.  These scenes are the most
spectacular of the film, with Keaton's usually dangerous
stunts kept on a modest scale here.  Keaton's father
Joe has a cameo as a barber.  Keaton mentor 'Fatty'
Arbuckle, a Hollywood pariah at the time due to acquitted
murder/rape charges, appears uncredited as a man in drag.
In keeping with silent tradition, Keaton is both the fool
responsible, and the hero that salvages the situation.
When the grateful owner asks Friendless what he wants
as a reward, Friendless points behind him and says, "Her".
The owner is visible upset, thinking Friendless is
indicating his daughter.  But no, it's Brown Eyes that
Friendless wants, and the four ride off into the sunset
together.
"Go West" is both charming and entertaining, and
deserves better than its obscure status.  It is nearly
the equal of the much lauded "Sherlock, Jr.",
although it doesn't approach the depth of Keaton's best
film, "The General". (72/100)
briankoller@usa.net
http://elvisfan.simplenet.com/movies/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Foxfire (1996)
"Firefox" is a drama about five teenage girls who become
close friends but get into trouble with authority figures.  
Though critically ignored and maligned, it is actually an
excellent film.  I liked the cinematography, the characters,
and even the eroticism.
The plot of "Firefox" has an odious high school biology 
teacher sexually harassing several of his students.
Led by teenaged drifter Legs (then-unknown Angelina Jolie), 
five girls become involved in an after school altercation 
with the teacher.  He gets his, but the girls are expelled.  
They begin hanging together in an abandoned house, but Jolie's 
hostile attitudes towards men and authority disrupts their 
lives and friendships.
Critical reaction to "Foxfire" is all over the map, and evenly
spread between condemnation, hesitation, and praise.  Common
themes for criticism include the lesbian character Legs, a
lengthy frontal nudity scene considered gratitious, a few
male characters who are complete jerks, and the similarity 
of the film's plot to any number of other films.
My only criticism is the abandoned house: how could such
a lovely house, surrounded by woods, remain empty and open.
It is a plot contrivance to give the young women a private
hangout.
Too much is made of the lesbian themes of the movie.  Of the
five girls, only Legs is a lesbian.  Maddy has a boyfriend, 
Violet is promiscuous, Rita is shy but fantasizes about men, while 
druggie Goldie is asexual.  Jolie's character has an unresolved
anger towards men, perhaps because of a troubled relationship
with her own father.  The film's occasional homoeroticism
is limited to Legs, and whatever interest is returned to her
by the other girls is from friendship.
There are two male characters in "Foxfire" that are jerks:
the predatory teacher, and a jock who for some reason wants
to revenge that teacher's downfall.  The teacher character
is too interesting to be a stereotype, while the hateful jock
helps provide needed tension in the film.  I don't have problems
with either character.  There is also Goldie's father, who 
attempts toughlove to reform his troubled daughter.  He clearly 
cares for her, and in the end you feel sorry for him.
One theme that I liked about the movie is that reckless
behaviour has negative consequences.  A teacher is assaulted;
those responsible are expelled.  Stop signs and red lights
are run; the car gets flipped.  They break into a school;
they unintentionally start a fire.  A student experiments
with drugs; she becomes a heroin addict.
I liked cinematography as well.  The close-ups all seem
appropriate, and the camera follows the action nicely.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Winchester '73 (1950)
"Winchester '73" is a Western drama starring James Stewart.
It was directed by Anthony Mann, the first of eight films
that they would work on together.  "Winchester '73" was
important to Stewart's career because the film increased
his range: he showed that he was credible in tough guy roles.
"Winchester '73" has an excellent supporting cast that
nearly steals the film from Stewart.  Will Geer (aka Grandpa
Walton) plays patriachical sheriff Wyatt Earp.  Geer had
a great character actor's voice.  Another novel casting
is Rock Hudson as an Indian chief, and actually it is one
of his better performances.  Shelly Winters does fine as
the leading lady who keeps her cool despite getting into
constant trouble.  Dan Duryea plays a creepy bad guy (what
else?) with his usual panache.  Millard Mitchell gives a
great performance as a level-headed indian trader.  Finally,
Stephen McNally is excellent as the rough killer 
Dutch Henry Brown.
The plot has Stewart tracking McNally to kill him, to revenge
his father's murder.  They finally meet at a contest to
win a prize rifle (the title character).  Stewart wins
the rifle, but it is stolen by McNally.  The gun goes through
many hands, with Stewart and McNally chasing each other and
the gun.  Whoever owns the gun considers it to be his
greatest posession, but ironically soon meets a violent
death.  Being the rifle's true owner, as well as the top-billed
star, Stewart is immune to the rifle's curse.
The script has surprising depth.  Even the most minor
supporting actors get good lines.  Brown has two criminal 
sidekicks that are cynical and critical of Brown.  Duryea
has two criminal sidekicks who delight in shoot-outs with
the law as much as he does.  Look fast for Tony Curtis,
who only has a couple lines.  It would have been easy and
simplistic to limit the story to Stewart and Brown, but
the addition of so many excellent character actors
really broadens the movie.
"Winchester '73" may not be Stewart's best Western, since he
co-starred with John Wayne in "The Man who Shot Liberty Valance".
But I prefer it to "Destry Rides Again" and "Bend of the River".
There is much dramatic tension throughout.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Hunchback of Notre Dame, The (1939)
"The Hunchback of Notre Dame" is an outstanding
adaptation of the Victor Hugo novel, set in
fifteenth century France.  One of the biggest
budget films of its era, the sets are imposing,
the cast is first rate, and the script is
excellent.
Charles Laughton is the Hunchback, deformed
but spry and intelligent.  He is a bellringer
at the cathedral of Notre Dame.  He falls in
love with young gypsy Maureen O'Hara, who is
initially terrified of him.  Also in love with
O'Hara is energetic poet/playwright Edmund O'Brien
(in his film debut) and the Hunchback's father
figure, brooding Frollo (Cedric Hardwicke).
Other characters include the King of France
(Harry Davenport) and the King of Thieves
(Thomas Mitchell).
Davenport is an obscure supporting actor, but
he has decent roles in three of the best films
from the 1930s: "Gone With the Wind", "The Hunchback
of Notre Dame", and "The Life of Emile Zola".
His King Louis is gentle and open-minded,
and France would still have a King today if
they were all like him.
It is virtually impossible to say anything
bad about this film.  The acting (especially
O'Brien) is a bit hammy at times, and it is difficult
to believe that a gypsy woman could be the cause
of so much chaos.  But when a film is so entertaining
and spectacular, all is forgiven.  There are many
rewarding moments, especially when the Hunchback
swoops O'Hara off to Notre Dame, hoists her prone
body over his head and cries 'Sanctuary' to the
enormous, approving crowd.  Now that is cinema!
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
"Men in Black" is a black comedy.  It stars Tommy Lee Jones
as a member of a quasi-government agency that monitors and
occasionally tangles with the aliens among us.  You may not
have been aware of it, but for decades now aliens from all
over the galaxy have been on earth, although most of them are 
in Manhattan.  Jones recruits energetic cop Will Smith,
whose performance is much more winning than in "Independence
Day", the last time Smith got the best of trouble-making aliens.
Smith and Jones get to dress in cool black suits, drive an
impressive car that definitely does not have a Ford engine,
and fire small weapons that pack an enormous punch.  It's all
in good fun, and there job is made easier in that most of
the aliens are OK.  As Jones says, "they're just trying to
make a living like the rest of us."  By the way, "Men in
Black" reveals that Sylvestor Stallone is an alien.  
I knew it!
But there's a bad apple in every lot.  An alien labelled
"the bug" crash-lands on Earth and begins a vendetta against
a rival alien race, threatening life on Earth as we know.
Smith and Jones are on the case.  Linda Fiorentino, looking
lovely but out of place, enters the story as a morgue doctor.
Aliens dead or alive don't seem to upset her much.
While often entertaining and even funny, I can't give 
"Men in Black" a high grade.  Smith and Jones are just fine
and are given some good lines, but there is a cartoonish
feel to the story, and the depth just isn't there.
Perhaps it would help if the aliens' characters were fleshed
out, or if Fiorentino had a credible character, or if
the agents had family members who were endangered.  Anything
that would create conflict, drama or tension.  A final
complaint is the villian is a clumsy, mumbling clod that
doesn't inspire fear, loathing, laughs or even interest.
No wonder the story focuses on the derring-do of the agents.
Smith's training is limited to a one-hour tryout, surprising
given his level of responsibility.
So, if you want to see a black comedy, rent "Army of Darkness"
instead.  It is funnier, and has more gore and violence that is 
key to the genre.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Huozhe (1994)
Better known by its English translation "To Live",
"Huozhe" tells the story of a small Chinese family,
from the 1940s through the 1960s.  The great political
turmoil of that country, from the Civil War to the
resulting Communist dictatorship, the economic
hardships and political purges, are themes examined
from the family's point of view.
The story begins with Fugui (You Ge) gambling away
the family home of his elderly father.  Fugui and
young pregnant wife Jiazhen (Li Gong) are left
destitute.  Fugui scrapes a living as a puppeteer,
then is forced to serve in both the Nationalist
and the Communist armies.  Fugui is reunited with
his family, which struggles to survive the dynamic
and dangerous political winds.  There are family
triumphs and tragedies.
Fugui has a major character transformation once
he becomes homeless.  Before, he was proud, curt
and self-destructive.  After, he is humble, hard-working,
and determined to make things best for his family.
This transformation would not be credible in most
films, but is done so skillfully in "To Live" that
it seems natural.
The novel and screenplay were both co-written by
Yu Hua and Wei Lu.  They succeed in getting across,
without ever becoming pedantic, the problems
that come with Communist dictatorships:
everyone is equally poor, brainwashed with political
slogans that eventually are seen through, with
harsh penalties for acts arbitrarily interpreted as
capitalistic or "counter-revolutionary".  Too much
success can be dangerous.
I liked the character of Fugui's rebellious son
Youqing (Deng Fei).  Being a child, Fei is not the
best actor.  A scene where he engages in a streetfight
isn't convincing.  But his impish personality and
actions keep Fugui and Jiazhen, as well as the
audience, guessing as to what will happen next.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Apartment, The (1960)
Billy Wilder's "The Apartment" was an enormous
success.  Nominated for ten Academy Awards, it won
five, including Best Picture and Best Director.
Made as a comedy, the film appears much darker
today. However, the stereotype of business executives
as cynical, manipulative skirt-chasers strains
credibility, and the actions of characters both
major and minor is entirely predictable.
Jack Lemmon works long hours in an enormous
office.  It turns out that he stays late because
he can't go home: he has allowed his corporate
bosses to borrow his apartment for sessions with
their mistresses.  Lemmon is hoping for a promotion,
which he finally obtains when he grants company
bigshot Fred MacMurray exclusive access.
Meanwhile, Lemmon is attracted to winsome elevator
operator Shirley MacLaine.  His progress with her
is limited, as she is MacMurray's mistress.  When
Lemmon discovers her secret, what will he do?
This being a movie, he tells his boss off, walks
away from his cushy job, and walks off into the
sunset with his willing love interest.  We are
awaiting the sequel, which assumedly begins with
Lemmon and MacLaine standing in the unemployment line.
Many scenes in "The Apartment" don't quite work.
Why do these executives go to such trouble to use
Lemmon's apartment, when they could get one of their
own, or rent a hotel?  MacMurray and his fellow
bosses are excessively crass, and the office party
is so wild that one expects the riot squad to show up.
Lemmon's personality change from toadying underling
to "mensch" is sudden yet predictable.  MacLaine's
hot-headed brother-in-law is an unfunny plot device
to gain audience sympathy for chivalric Lemmon.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Nybyggarna (1972)
"The Emigrants" and "The New Land" were two of the most ambitious and (at
the time of production) expensive films to come from Sweden.  They both have
outstanding cinematography, which is used more often than narration and
dialogue to tell the story.  The films were aided by a strong cast, and had
intelligent (if slow-paced) direction by Jan Troell.
"The Emigrants" told the story of a mid-19th century Swedish family, that
emigrates to America in search of rich farmland and religious freedom.  It
was nominated for several major Academy Awards in the U.S., including Best
Picture, Best Director, Best Actress and Best Screenplay.  This attention
from Oscar was highly unusual for a foreign language film.
The film's sequel was "The New Land".  As was the case with "The Emigrants",
it was filmed in Sweden in Swedish, with a version dubbed in English by the
actors themselves for American distribution.  The original cast returns, and
the story picks up where it had left off.
Stolid Karl Oskar Nilsson (Max Von Sydow) and his gentle wife Kristina (Liv
Ullmann) arrive in Minnesota in the year 1850.  Through persistence and hard
work, they build a successful homestead and farm.  Karl's younger brother
Robert (Eddie Axberg) soon leaves for the gold mines of California, taking
with him oafish field hand Arvid (Pierre Lindstedt).
As the years pass, more children are born, threatening the health of
Kristina.  A local Indian tribe, harried and starving, becomes a threat to
the growing ethnic Swedish community.  When the Civil War breaks out, Karl
must choose between patriotism and pacifism.
"The New Land" has beautiful and varied cinematography.  Deserts, forests,
and farmlands are shown under different seasons.  However, there are some
harrowing scenes of death that may preclude viewing by young children.
Those with short attention spans may lose interest in the slowly paced film.
But sticking with the affecting story will be rewarded.
Linn Ullmann, the daughter of Liv Ullmann and legendary director Ingmar
Bergman, has a small role as one of Kristina's children.
Jan Troell not only directed the film, but was the cinematographer, editor,
and co-writer.  Collaborating on the script was Bengt Forslund, who was the
film's producer.  The story was based on Vilhelm Moberg's novel "The
Emigrants".
I suspect that "The Emigrants" and "The New Land" were two parts of the same
production, and were separated due to the five hour running time of the
combined films.  When first shown on American television, the films were
merged and edited into chronological order as "The Immigrant Saga".
briankoller@usa.net
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller
http://elvisfan.simplenet.com/movies/movies.html

Title
Review for Big Parade, The (1925)
"The Big Parade" is a silent film about an
American soldier's involvement in World War I.
There are some chilling depictions of trench
warfare, but for the most part, the film
is part romance and part comedy, and lacks the
focus and intensity that is necessary for a
great film.
John Gilbert stars as the lazy son of a
wealthy businessman (Hobart Bosworth).  Under
pressure from Bosworth and sweetheart Claire Adams,
Gilbert volunteers for the Army.  Gilbert is sent
to France to fight World War I.  There, he
becomes friends with two comic-relief soldiers
(Tom O'Brien and Karl Dane), and romances
Rene Adore.  The soldiers are sent to the front,
where they performs heroic deeds while under
fire from fortified German positions.
"The Big Parade" has several problems.  The
most obvious is a lack of focus: at first the
film appears to a comedy, as Gilbert has
various misadventures in France with Dane
and O'Brien.  After Gilbert wooes Adore,
the film has become a love story.  Gilbert
gets to prove his manhood in the trenches, and
"The Big Parade" becomes a war movie.  Finally,
it becomes a love story again.
"The Big Parade" works best as a war movie.
Trench warfare is credibly depicted as grisly
and monotonous.  Still, the battle scenes lack
the scale and impact found in later films such
as "All Quiet on The Western Front", and are
handicapped by a desire to portray the American
soldiers as valiant heroes.
The film partly succeeds as a comedy.  The scenes
with Gilbert trying to move a barrel work, and
Dane in particular is a good comic actor.
Other scenes aren't as effective, such as the
three soldiers making moves on a protesting, but
stationary Adore.
"The Big Parade" is weakest as a soap opera.
The characters lack definition, and appear to
change personalities to suit the story.  Bosworth
is the very stereotype of a successful but
overly stern family patriarch.  Gilbert makes
an immediate and easy transition from smug idler
to innocent soldier.  Adore does not appear to be
deeply in love with Gilbert, until her laughably
dramatic parting from him as he leaves for the front.
"The Big Parade" was a commercial and critical
success, and made John Gilbert a star. His career
faded with the arrival of talkies.  Gilbert and
co-star Adore both died in their thirties.
The Director, King Vidor, had a lengthy and
successful career, picking up five Oscar nominations
along the way.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for All the President's Men (1976)
If you were a newspaper reporter, what would consider to be
the top story of all time?  Close to the top would have
to be the Watergate scandal, a massive tangle of abuse of
power that goes all the way to the President himself, and
most of his top aides.
Reporters Woodward (Robert Redford) and Bernstein (Dustin
Hoffman) have this dream assignment.  At first it is just
a burglary at National Democratic Headquarters, but the
reporters learn that Nixon Administration officials are
behind it.  They uncover an enormous cash slush fund,
and trace payments to top officials such as
Attorney General John Mitchell.
They say that invention is 1% inspiration and 99% perspiration.
The same seems to be true for reporters.  Redford and
Hoffman chase endless leads that go nowhere, and find
little co-operation from Administration workers, even
low-level ones.  There seems to be an organized campaign
to stonewall. The reporters eventually learn that they have
been under surveillance themselves, and even that their lives
may be in danger.
Redford has the easier role as the persistent but
compassionate Woodward.  His character is relentlessly normal,
however.  Hoffman gives a fine performance as Bernstein,
portrayed as an intense, quirky chain-smoker.  While Hoffman
has first billing, he has less screen time than Redford.
One of Woodward's sources is Deep Throat, a knowledgeable
and secretive Administration official who talks in riddles
and will only meet with Woodward in a desolate parking garage.
The film does not reveal who Deep Throat is, but he sure
sounds like Hal Holbrook.
Jason Robards plays Ben Bradlee, editor of the Washington Post.
He generally supports his reporters, but keeps them in line
when their stories lack facts and sources.  He can lose his
cool when the reporters mess up a story, at one point shouting
"Woodstein!" at them over the din of the busy office.
"All the President's Men" focuses on the reporters and not
the scandal itself.  Top Administration officials are never
seen, and only heard over the telephone when being questioned.
While not the outstanding movie that it is reputed to be, it is
a very good film that captures the excitement of a great
newspaper story and the hard work that went behind it.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Driving Miss Daisy (1989)
"Driving Miss Daisy" is a historical drama that tells 
the story of an elderly jewish woman (Jessica Tandy) 
and her black chauffeur (Morgan Freeman).
The film met tremendous success at the Academy Awards, 
winning Best Picture and Best Actress (Tandy) while the 
two male leads received nominations (Freeman and Dan Akroyd, 
who in a supporting role plays Tandy's practical businessman 
son).
The story begins in the 1940s.  Tandy is about seventy,
and wrecks her new car backing out of the driveway.  Now
uninsurable, Akroyd hires Freeman to be her chauffeur
and companion.  This leads to a power struggle between
Tandy and Freeman, as she refuses to use her hired hand,
and tries to keep her independence.  Freeman shows massive
patience and finally overcomes Tandy's blustering.  Freeman
should have won the Oscar instead, as his character must
ride the line between deference and defiance, and he does
it well.  Tandy plays the testy but vulnerable Miss Daisy 
well, but it is an easier role.
Racism is a background subject throughout the film.  Tandy
stubbornly resists treating Freeman as a friend and equal.
She also makes several catty remarks about Christians.
The audience is supposed to consider these remarks humorous,
but the major difference between her remarks and those of
the bigoted policeman is that she is not in a position of power.
Tandy and Freeman do not noticeable age as the first twenty
years pass.  It is sometimes difficult to tell which decade
a scene is taking place in.  Another minor problem I had:
Tandy asks Freeman to attend a Martin Luther King dinner only
at the last minute.  Freeman's character shows his stubborness
by refusing the invitation.  You'd think he'd swallow his
pride and attend the dinner.  When would he get another chance,
and it would be no humilation to attend.
Still, there are many scenes with depth in "Driving Miss Daisy",
such as Tandy teaching the illiterate Freeman the connection 
between letters and words, and Freeman drawing the line with
Tandy, telling her that he will park the car to "make water",
despite her objections.  The script is very good.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Great Waldo Pepper, The (1975)
"The Great Waldo Pepper" stars Robert Redford as the title
character.  The film takes place during the late 1920s.
Redford is a former World War I pilot, and is still
flying, selling rides to people in the Midwestern farm
country.  Any extra money goes to Ezra Stiles, a plane
designer working on a monoplane that can perform a
flying stunt called the "outside loop."
Soon he has competition from Axel Olsson, another
WWI veteran pilot moving in on his territory.  Pepper
politely tells Olsson to leave Nebraska, and when
he refuses, Pepper sabotages his landing gear.
Olsson has to land his biplane in the lake, to the
cheers of the hick onlookers who think that the landing
was a stunt.
Pepper hits on a young woman (Mary Beth, played by Susan
Sarandon) in a movie theater.  Soon he is telling her
his favorite story, of his encounter with Ernst Kessler
in WWI.  (Kessler, who appears later in the film, is
clearly modeled after Germany's Red Baron).
Bad luck has it that Sarandon is Olsson's girlfriend.
Olsson, apparently a good sport about Redford wrecking
his plane, shows up and deflates Pepper's story.
Pepper has never even met Kessler.
With the novelty of airplane in decline, Pepper and Olsson
can no longer make a living on their own.  They become 
partners, and try to join Dillhoefer's flying circus, 
but first must learns some stunts to perform.
This leads to Redford, hanging from a ladder extended from
a plane, crashing into a barn.  He survives, but must
mend at the house of his sometime girlfriend Margo Kidder.
Pepper recovers and rejoins the circus, which is
struggling financially.  Mary Beth becomes a wing-walker
to get publicity for the circus.  She "freezes", unable
to leave the wing.  In a daring stunt, Redford leaps from
one moving plane to another to attempt a rescue, however,
Sarandon falls to her death.  Redford is "grounded" by
the Civil Aviation Authority, headed by old friend Newt,
pending the outcome of an investigation.
Stiles completes the monoplane.  Since Redford can't fly it,
Stiles attempts to complete an outside loop at the
Muncie fair.  This results in Stiles death.  Redford becomes
angry at a crowd ogling the accident, and buzzes the crowd
with a plane, which then crashes.  Redford is thereafter 
banned for life from flying.
Redford goes to Hollywood, to work with Olsson who is there
as a stunt double.  A film is being made there based on
Kessler's famous WWI battle.  Redford works as a pilot
on the film, under an assumed name, and finally gets
to battle Kessler, if only on a Hollywood set.
"The Great Waldo Pepper" effectively combines comedy and
drama.  The movie is thickly plotted and intelligently
scripted.  It is critically underrated.  The only important
weakness comes during the last twenty minutes, as the pace
slows and too much time is spent developing the relationship
between Pepper and Kessler.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Jaws (1975)
Dickie Goodman had a top five novelty hit, "Mr. Jaws",
which mixed his rapid-fire mock interviews with answers
that were snipped from contemporary hit singles.
It began something like this...
Announcer: "We are here on the beach, where a giant shark
has just eaten a girl swimmer.  Mr. Jaws, how was it?"
Announcer: "And what did she say when you grabbed her?"
I excerpt "Mr. Jaws", not only because it was a great
novelty record, but because it demonstrates the cultural
impact of "Jaws".  It became the biggest grossing film
of all time, eclipsing "The Godfather", and subsequently
eclipsed by "Star Wars".  Also making the top 40 was
the theme from "Jaws", an imposing classical score by
John Williams that succeeds in recreating the suspense
of a shark closing in on its prey.
"Jaws" is one of the best horror films of all time.
Most of the film is consumed by Chief Brody (Roy Scheider),
his humdrum family life, his conflicts with the Mayor
(Murray Hamilton) and his male bonding with shark hunters
Quint (Robert Shaw) and Hooper (Richard Dreyfuss).
But the film still has similarities to slasher films,
with the aquatic version of Freddy Krueger scoring
five victims in gruesome fashion.
What separates "Jaws" from its landlubber successors
(the currently-playing version is "I Still Know What You
Did Last Summer") is that the monster is more credible,
the victims are not limited to comely teenagers, the script
(based on Peter Benchley's bestselling potboiler, the
screenplay co-written by Benchley and Carl Gottlieb) is
much better, and Director Steven Spielberg is much more
skilled at making horror suspense not seem like bad
horror comedy.  Of course, the cast is better as well.
Scheider skillfully underplays, allowing scenes to be
stolen by excitable Dreyfuss and salty Shaw.  Hamilton
also gives a great supporting performance.  His character
is in denial, hoping that the shark will just go away
so that the tourists will return.
"Jaws" was plagued by production problems.  The mechanical
shark didn't work, and shooting on location on the sea
led to technical difficulties.  But the results were
worth it, from both a commercial and critical aspect.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Strada, La (1954)
Every now and then I come across a film that is
universally acclaimed, but when I finally see
it, I cannot give it a high grade.  This is
always a downer experience for me, for I would
much preferred to have enjoyed the film as others
have.  I end up writing a review that will convince
no one, and will simply generate strong disagreement.
Such is the case for Italian writer/director
Federico Fellini's "La Strada", which translates
to "The Road" in English.
"La Strada" has received universal critical praise.
It was the first Oscar winner in the category of
Best Foreign Language Film.  The British Academy
Awards nominated it for Best Film, and it won the
New York Film Critics Circle Award for Best Foreign
Language film.  It won at the Bodil Festival for
Best European Film.  "La Strada" remains highly
regarded today, especially given the success of
Fellini's subsequent films.
"La Strada" starred Fellini's wife, Giulietta Masina,
who plays a simple peasant woman named Gelsomina.
She is sold in marriage to Zampano (Anthony Quinn),
a growling bear of a man who ekes out a living as
a circus and street performer.  Their marriage is
not happy, but Gelsomina stays with Zampano because
she doesn't want him to go through life alone.
That is to say, she loves him despite his abusive
and animalistic ways.  By film's end, it is apparent
that Zampano has loved her in return.
Zampano joins a circus, where he is ridiculed by
Matto (Richard Basehart), an engaging clown.  Matto
befriends Gelsomina, and teaches her that despite the
humbleness of her life, she is not worthless.  Soon,
however, Zampano attacks Matto, resulting in tragedies
for all concerned.
I feel sorry for Gelsomina, Matto and even Zampano.
The characters have depth and are well cast: Quinn
reminds me of Toshiro Mifune when playing a wild man,
and Masina is a capable mime.  Still, the magic that
so many others have found in "La Strada" completely
escapes me.  Quinn does his 'lungs of iron' routine
over and over.  A truck is dumped over a bridge and
bursts in flames, which seems unlikely and out of
place.  Basehart only has a few scenes, and Quinn's
character is limited, so the film's worth rests on
Masina's character and performance.  Her performance
is good, but her character is a simpleton, capable
only of alternately smiling and moping.  Zampano's
fist-pounding misery at film's end also seems
unlikely for his brutish, unreflective character.
But, this is only my opinion, and it has to be
tempered by the fact that nearly everyone else who
has seen the film thinks much better of it.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Operation Crossbow (1965)
There's no shortage of spy or action movies based
on WWII, but "Operation Crossbow" is separated
from the pack by a good script and a tense story.
The Nazis are developing winged bombs and rockets
with which they are devastating London.  British
Intelligence, led by limping Richard Johnson, sends
agents with both German language and technical skills
to the German plant that is producing the rockets.
George Peppard, Tom Courtenay, and Jeremy Kemp are
the agents, whose assignment is to somehow sabotage
the factory.
Sophia Loren has top billing, but her role is
a small one.  She plays the wife of the man
Peppard is impersonating.  Loren's character
was inserted late in production by her husband,
Producer Carlo Ponti, to improve box office appeal,
but her scenes are among the best in the film.
She has a screen charisma that Peppard lacks,
but give Peppard his due: he looks Aryan, making
him a more plausible agent.
There is much tension and suspense in the story.
Since it is a British production, it is inevitable
that British cleverness will triumph over German
villainy, but the Nazis have the upper hand
for much of the film.  The special effects are
generally good, although the firestorm at the
end appears to have been superimposed onto the
frames.
One supporting character I didn't much care for
is a British intelligence officer who opposes
bombings of the German rocket plant.  His constant
but ineffective opposition to Johnson only serves to
build up Johnson as all-knowing.
Still, "Operation Crossbow" is an under-rated, if
minor, spy drama.  I certainly prefer it to
"Torn Curtain", the Hitchcock spy drama from the
following year.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sunset Blvd. (1950)
"Sunset Boulevard" is one of Billy Wilder's
most commercially successful and highly praised
films.  Nominated for eleven Academy Awards,
including all the major ones, the film later
was adapted into a long-running musical by
Andrew Lloyd Webber.
"Sunset Boulevard" has a great story.  A hack
screenwriter (William Holden), bitter and broke,
is hired by an imperious has-been actress from
the silent era (Gloria Swanson).  Much younger
than her, he becomes her kept man, living at
her luxurious estate with her devoted, humorless
manservant (Erich Von Stroheim).
Norma Desmond (Swanson) has written a dreadful
screenplay, which she believes will launch her
comeback as an actress.  But her handpicked director,
Cecil B. De Mille, continues to gently put her
off.  As the gap between her aspirations and
reality widens, Desmond loses her sanity.
Some consider "Sunset Boulevard" to be a black
comedy.  But it is too gloomy and pessimistic
to be anything but a drama, with Swanson playing
her role for tragedy rather than campy laughs.
von Stroheim may have considered his role as
a servant to be humiliating, but it is a sizeable
role and his character is the most sympathetic.
It is odd seeing Jack Webb, later typecast as
robotlike Joe Friday, playing the film's liveliest
character.  Silent film star Buster Keaton has a
cameo, ironically without any lines.
"Sunset Boulevard" opens by giving away the ending:
Holden is shown floating dead in a swimming pool.
This adds tension to the film, knowing that the
Holden-Swanson 'romance' has a tragic end.  Still,
and this is only my opinion, I feel that "Sunset
Boulevard" is overrated.  Holden's character is
so misanthropic and ill-humored that it seems
unlikely that Desmond would fall for him, much
less perky Nancy Olson.  People seem all too willing
to accept the character of Norma Desmond, as if
middle-aged women are indeed prone to becoming
imperious, conceited, desperate lunatics.  Most
disappointing for me is the film's somber, pessimistic
tone, which seems to be more a condemnation of human
relationships than a commentary about Hollywood.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for To Sir, with Love (1967)
Sidney Poitier had a banner year in 1967.
He starred in three commercially successful
and critically acclaimed films: "In the Heat
of the Night", "Guess Who's Coming to Dinner",
and "To Sir with Love".  While none of the
films were as good as their reputation,
which was enhanced by Hollywood's sudden
self-consciousness regarding past racism,
the films seemed better than they were because
of the presence of Poitier.  He seems more
than a mere actor, or even a role model.
Poitier's characters are as interchangeable
as John Wayne's.  Essentially, he is perfect:
intelligent, thoughtful, courteous, with a
sense of humor.  If you really act like a
jerk, you can make Poitier angry, but his
anger is never righteous or vengeful, and it
doesn't last long.
In "Blackboard Jungle" from 1955, Poitier
played a student from a troubled, low-income
high school.  Glenn Ford was a determined,
concerned teacher.  Twelve years later,
"To Sir with Love" was a role reversal for
Poitier, as he is cast as the teacher.  This
time, the high school is set in London, with
the rebellious students having working-class
British accents.
Frustrated by his student's lack of manners,
Poitier gives up teaching them with books.
Instead, he lectures them about how to behave
as adults.  This being a movie, they soon
come around, wearing beatific smiles and
becoming polite.  All except for troublemaker
Christian Roberts, who doesn't learn respect
for Poitier until he punches him in the stomach.
Which demonstrates that courtesy will only take
you so far in the real world.  Poitier must
also sidestep advances from lovestruck student
Judy Geeson.
Like "Blackboard Jungle", "To Sir with Love"
generated a number one hit single: the melodic
title song by Lulu.  Lulu also redeems herself
capably in a supporting role.  The Mindbenders,
a British rock group whose drippy hit "Groovy
Kind of Love" was then contemporary, also show
up at a dance gig.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sorcerer (1977)
What is the worst movie title in film history?
"Beavis and Butt-head Do America" and
"Scudda-Hoo! Scudda-Hay!" are candidates, but
"Sorcerer" is also a contender.  Not because the
title itself is awful, but because it has virtually
nothing do with the film.
"Sorcerer" is a remake of the 1953 French film
"Wages of Fear".  I have not seen the original,
so I can't compare the two versions.  But it
would have to be an excellent film to top the
remake.  "Sorcerer" is an extremely tense and
dramatic film that should keep you on the
edge of your seat.
The film begins with several loose ends: we meet
a Palestinian terrorist (Anidou), a failed French
banker (Bruno Cremer), a hit man (Francisco Rabal)
and an American bank robber (Roy Scheider).  It
turns out that these four strangers have much
in common: they are criminals with their lives
in danger, and must flee somewhere where they
cannot be found.  They each end up in a rural
slum in Nicaragua.
An act of sabotage at an oil refinery causes a
massive fire, which can only be extinguished with
dynamite.  The only available dynamite is 200 miles.
Volunteers are needed for the near-suicidal, but
high-paying job of transferring the dynamite by
truck to the fire.  The four criminals, desperate
for cash, volunteer for the job.
Since "Sorcerer" is an American film, Scheider has
the biggest role.  He hardly gets to smile the entire
film, and spends most of it struggling to get
the dynamite-laden truck across rickety bridges
and nearly-impassable roads.  Character development
is marginal, and we don't see these men beyond
desperate outlaws.  Cremer is the exception, as
we get glimpses of his married and business life
before having to flee France, and in Nicaragua there
are traces of a romance with a silent middle-aged
laborer.
"Sorcerer" is directed by William Friedkin, whose two
previous films, "The French Connection" and "The Exorcist",
achieved much greater commercial success.  But all three
films favor action, cinematography and story over
character development and dialogue, and since all three
are good films, Friedkin may have been onto something.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
"Apollo 13" is an intelligent and completely credible movie
about the troubled flight to the moon back in 1970.  There
is surprising tension, despite knowing from history books
(or for those old enough, actual memories) that the astronauts
all returned home safely.
The astronaut crew is Jim Lovell (Tom Hanks), crew leader
and all-around nice guy; Jack Swigert (Kevin Bacon), last 
minute substitute and skirt chaser who must prove himself 
to the crew; and Fred Haise (Bill Paxton), who promptly gets 
sick on the flight with a fever of 104 degrees.
The crew must deal with the disappointment of not landing
on the moon, with problems such as sleep deprivation and
carbon monoxide poisoning, and the knowledge that another
mistake could cost them their lives.
Kathleen Quinlan plays Hanks' wife.  Her role is to look
beautiful and to worry about her husband.  She suffers
throughout the film.  Jean Speegle Howard plays Hanks' 
grandmother.  She is a stereotype of an elderly person, 
is given the name Blanch, and her confusion is used to provide 
comic relief.
Ed Harris, who played John Glenn in "The Right Stuff" (1984),
shows up as head of mission control.  He gives a fine
performance, and has the honor of starring in both major
Hollywood films on the American space program.
There are many heroes in "Apollo 13."  The astronauts are
heroes, of course, but so is the staff of mission control.
They are seen sleeping on the floor by their desks and
passionately discussing the best methods of getting the
astronauts home.  As different obstacles present themselves,
mission control has to meet the challenge of overcoming
them.
"Apollo 13" runs over two hours, is slow-paced, and sometimes
technical.  These features do not detract from the film as
the story needs the length and technospeak to be properly
conveyed.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for When Trumpets Fade (1998) (TV)
HBO has a reputation for making the best made-for-TV
films.  "When Trumpets Fade" won't change that
evaluation.  It is an intense, grim war drama based
on an obscure World War II battle with the Germans
that cost 24,000 American lives.  Continuing recent
interpretation, war is depicted as a grisly, evil
force in which there are no heroes or villains,
only the dead and survivors.
It is late 1944.  American GIs are pushing into
Germany, but are overextended, and the Germans are
putting up stiff resistance.  The casualties are
devastating: Private Manning (Ron Eldard) is the
only survivor from his squad.  Promoted to sergeant
over his own objections, he is now forced to share his
battlefield survival skills and experience, putting
his life at increasing risk.
Manning's character is open to interpretation.  He is
not exactly a coward, but he certainly prefers some other
guy to get shot instead.  This extends to his field
leadership; he has fresh-faced recruit Sanderson (Zak Orth)
take the risks as point man, and in the assaults on the
tanks and 88mm guns he waves the other soldiers forward.
This is perhaps as it should be, since the other soldiers
must be trained, and their lives are less valuable to
the Army.
"When Trumpets Fade" succeeds in its depiction of battle
scenes.  However, Manning's heated conversations with
his superiors aren't as credible.  Officers generally come
off poorly.  Captain Pritchett (Martin Donovan) prefers
to remain in safety while ordering his sergeant to lead
raw troops to their certain death.  Lt. Lukas (Timothy
Olyphant) comes off even worse, turning into a shell-shocked
coward on the battlefield.
"When Trumpets Fade" is a minor but respectable entry in
the crowded genre of war films.  While perhaps not worth
tracking down, it is worth seeing if it happens to be on
and your other cable movie channel is busy showing
"Bride of Chucky".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for For Whom the Bell Tolls (1943)
Ernest Hemingway won a Pulitzer Prize for his dramatic
novel about an American sabateur briefly joining a
loyalist guerilla band during the Spanish civil war.
For the screen adaptation, he supposedly insisted
upon Gary Cooper and Ingrid Bergman as the leads,
against the wishes of studio moguls who had already
cast (and cropped the hair of) Vera Zorina.
Cooper has orders to blow up a bridge during a
loyalist offensive.  In this operation, he is
aided by a small band of rebels led by Pablo (Akim
Tamiroff) and his 'woman' Pilar (Katina Paxinou).
Others at the camp include elderly patriot Anselmo
(Vladimir Sokoloff) and a comic relief gypsy.
Cooper, as always, plays the stolid hero well,
with his eyes showing much more emotion than his
voice or expressions.  Bergman, surprisingly
unattached despite living for months with a
nearly all-male guerilla band, predictably falls
immediately and deeply for Cooper.  The screenplay
has a heavy emphasis on their courtship, with
many of the lines either tedious or unintentionally
humorous.  Much drama is also made of Pablo's
character, a grating 'cowardly' drunkard whose
loyalties are always in question.
The screenplay was de-politicized by Dudley Nichols,
removing references to Franco, loyalists, and Falangists.
However, there is a prophetic comment about German and
Italian war machines using Spain for target practice.
Despite the setting, only a handful of Spanish actors
are used.  Bergman's hair is blonde, Paxinou is Greek,
with Tamiroff and several others ethnic Russian.
The Academy was duly impressed, and "For Whom the Bell
Tolls" received nine Oscar nominations, including Best
Picture, Best Actor (Cooper), Best Actress (Bergman),
Best Supporting Actor (Tamiroff), and Best Color
Cinematography (Ray Rennahan, whose nomination was
well deserved).  Paxinou was the only winner, taking
home the Best Supporting Actress Oscar.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
Probably the best of the "Star Wars" series,
"The Empire Strikes Back" was the sequel to the
immensely successful "Star Wars" film from 1977.
The follow-up retains the strengths of the original:
great sets, costumes, cinematography and special
effects.  The story is even tighter and with more
action than "Star Wars", and there is plenty of
quality comic relief.  Upon its release, "The
Empire Strikes Back" became the second highest
grossing film of all time, with only "Star Wars"
ahead of it.
The theme once again is good versus evil.  Evil
is represented by Darth Vader (chillingly voiced by
James Earl Jones), made more imposing by his black cape
and helmet.  Vader represents the Empire, which is
bent on interstellar domination.  Battling Vader is
Jedi master Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill), cynical
but passionate Han Solo (Harrison Ford), lovely but
humorless Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher), marvelous
clumsy comic relief invention and robot C3PO (voiced by
Anthony Daniels), feisty, bleeping robot R2D2, and
incoherent but endearingly loyal Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew).
Skywalker takes time out from battling the Empire
to receive training from wise, aged Yoda (voiced by
Frank Oz), while Solo and company try to hide from
the Empire on a planet run by the unpredictable
Lando Calrissian (Billy Dee Williams).
"The Empire Strikes Back" is a highly entertaining
film.  It is difficult and even pointless to look
for flaws, although one could ask why only a handful
of creatures can effectively use the Force, and
one can wonder if those who can use the Force
constitute an exclusive club that one can still
attend even after death.  You may conclude that Imperial
Stormtroopers are all really bad shots and should
attend remedial marksmanship classes, while their
counterparts manning the controls of Empire ships
share their inability to hit a target.
In the end, the viewing must discard a cynical
approach to the film, and simply enjoy the production
values that come from a massive budget and meticulous
planning by producer George Lucas.  The dual protagonists
of Skywalker and Solo, working independently, with
different goals and methods, and yet acting in concert
against the Empire, creates much more variety and
depth than found in a typical action film.  Minor
elements of the film, such as Vader's method of
promoting Empire officers, and his sinister pleasure
in serving Solo to the Alien bounty hunter, work very
well.  And comic relief is always around the corner,
especially from C3PO, but also from Yoda and Solo.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Apocalypse Now (1979)
The Vietnam War has proven to be an irresistable subject for
noted Hollywood directors.  The carnage, the waste, and the
illogic behind the war (in order to stop communism in a small,
dirt-poor nation, it is proper to devastate it and kill much
of the population) makes for more than an allegory of might
and morality gone astray.  It is a setting for excellent
cinematography, and the tension latent to having nervous
rifle-toting faceless teenagers (often played by much older
famous actors) face violent death just around the corner.
Each director has his own spin on the war.  Stanley Kubrick
in "Full Metal Jacket" looks for irony.  Michael Cimino in
"The Deer Hunter" finds terror and torture in a P.O.W. camp.
Oliver Stone in "Platoon" is concerned with ethics and
power struggles.  Francis Ford Coppola in "Apocalypse Now"
sees the war as a bad acid trip, surreal and deadly.
It is ironic that "Apocalypse Now" begins and ends with
the Doors' "The End".  Ironic, because both the song and
the movie are good despite a surreal and somewhat incoherent
style.  Perhaps it would have been more fitting if Marlon
Brando's final words were "what a mess" rather than
"the horror".
Martin Sheen plays a soldier whose new assignment is to
go to Cambodia and kill a renegade colonel (Marlon Brando)
who has gone insane and is worshipped as a god by his
stoned troops.  Rather than parachuting Sheen into the
Cambodian jungle by plane, which would make too much sense,
the plot has him taking a slow boat ride down a deadly
river to Cambodia with several troubled young soldiers.
(Admittedly, this makes for increased plot tension and
excellent cinematography.)
Along the way, Sheen encounters Robert Duvall as a
Lt. Colonel more interested in surfing and male bonding than
in military strategy.  Duvall has one of his goofiest roles,
and is given great lines like "Charlie don't surf" and
"I love the smell of napalm in the morning".
With most of the film leading up to Sheen's confrontation
with the insane colonel, it is a letdown that the colonel
turns out to be bald, bloated and blithering Marlon Brando.
Brando's character is fond of reading aloud sheets of paper
that have all the wisdom of "Zippy the Pinhead" comic strips.
My favorite part of "Apocalypse Now" is the U.S.O. show,
which I have always associated with the likes of Bob Hope
and Martha Raye.  Instead, we get Playmate of the Year
Cynthia Wood, who dances and teases the hard-up young
soldiers until they mob the stage, forcing the dancers to
make a panicked exit by helicopter.
"Apocalypse Now" was a troubled Phillipines production that
took over a year to film and went well over budget.
A hurricane wiped out the set, Martin Sheen had a heart
attack, Marlon Brando proved uncooperative, and the helicopters
(ironically) were sometimes taken away by Marcos to fight
guerillas.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Manchurian Candidate, The (1962)
"The Manchurian Candidate" stars Laurence Harvey
as Raymond Shaw, who returns from the Korean War
a hero and a Medal of Honor awardee.  Major Marco
(Frank Sinatra) remembers Shaw differently, however,
in a recurring nightmare as a killer brainwashed
by Russian and Chinese brass.  Harvey's mother
is Angela Lansbury, a calculating Communist Agent
and wife of blustering Senator Iselin (James Gregory).
If Shaw is an assassin controlled by communists,
who is his target, and can Marco stop him?
At first viewing, "The Manchurian Candidate" is a tense
drama.  Subsequent viewings transform the film into a
black comedy, with Shaw and his Senator stepfather the
most humorous characters.  Shaw is stolid but bewildered,
almost sympathetic in his contempt for everything,
while the alcoholic, idiotic Senator gives a great
performance as Lansbury's shameless puppet.
"The Manchurian Candidate" is not without minor flaws.
The audience must accept two enormous coincidences:
Shaw overhears a bartender advise a game of solitaire
with Marco arriving as a witness, and Jocie arriving
at the costume party wearing the Queen of Diamonds.
Lansbury is only three years older than Harvey, who
plays her son.  And Janet Leigh's character falls over
herself picking up Sinatra, despite his inability to
light a cigarette, his distance, and his getting arrested.
These flaws aren't important compared to the film's
strengths.  "The Manchurian Candidate" never compromises
in its attack on right-wing demagoguery, and Shaw's
willingness to kill without remorse is chilling.
Lansbury may be the worst mother in screen history.
Sinatra's fight with Henry Silva is a memorable brawl,
complete with eye gouging and rib kicking.  And
the dream sequences with the laconic soldiers
and cynical communists are mesmerizing.
When John F. Kennedy was assassinated a year after
"The Manchurian Candidate" was released, the film was
shelved by Sinatra, and was unavailable for the next
two decades.  The film's cynical, satirical, and
conspirational attitude toward politics and assassination
had become unacceptable.  Seen today, however, the
film's viewpoints appear as valid and relevant as ever.
The British Academy Awards awarded "The Manchurian Candidate"
Best Film of 1962.  Their American counterparts were not
as receptive, but Lansbury was nominated for Best Actress,
and Ferris Webster was nominated for film editing.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
"Return of the Jedi", of course, is the third
chapter in the first "Star Wars" trilogy.  Which
isn't to be confused with the second trilogy,
which takes place before the first trilogy.
This would all be confusing, except that media
hype has ensured that we know all these things
already.
"Return of the Jedi" packed the theaters as
well as its predecessors, becoming the biggest
grossing film of the year.  Perhaps the most
sentimental film of the series, the combination
of action, special effects, and the good versus
evil theme again proved to be a winner.
The story picks up where "The Empire Strikes Back"
left off.  Solo (Harrison Ford) is still frozen
in carbonite, and hangs on the wall of Jabba's
palace.  Luke (Mark Hamill) and Leia (Carrie Fisher)
make separate attempts to free Solo, and after
much peril are successful.  The action then shifts
to the Empire's latest death star, which must
be destroyed or the rebellion will be crushed.
The death star is protected by a force field
generated on a nearby planet.  Our heroes land
on the planet to disable the shield, on the
way encountering a furry, pygmy tribe called the
Ewoks.  Meanwhile, Luke tries to turn Vader
(voiced by James Earl Jones) from the dark side,
but instead is taken to the evil Emperor
(Ian McDiarmid), who has plans of his own for Luke.
After praising the first two films, critics
weren't as complimentary to "Return of the Jedi".
It is much easier to take potshots at "Jedi".
Yoda (voiced by Frank Oz) has lived 900 years,
but dies of old age within ten minutes of Luke's
arrival.  While the revelation that Vader is
Luke's father is a shocker, to learn that Leia
is his sister seems bogus, turning the trilogy
into a soap opera.  Leia's character, so
independent and combative in the first "Star Wars",
here has been softened and reduced to Solo's
love interest.  The Ewoks are a cross between
teddy bears and aborigines, and a sign that
George Lucas may be targeting kiddies rather
than adults.  (This marketing trend would be
further in evidence in 1999's "The Phantom
Menace".)
Still, there are many entertaining moments.
Jabba the Hutt is an original villian, the
speed chase through the forest is exciting, and
the final confrontation between Vader, Luke and
the Emperor is suspenseful.  And Leia's costume
at Jabba's Palace makes the viewer wish for a
gust of wind.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Never Give a Sucker an Even Break (1941)
Never Give a Sucker an Even Break (1940)
"Never Give a Sucker an Even Break" was the last real film
that Fields made (he had bit parts in a few support-the-war
movies).  He also co-wrote the screenplay.  It is an
excellent and unique comedy, often ridiculous and even surreal.
W.C. Fields was a funny guy.  Maybe it was his deadpan expression,
maybe it was his delivery: halfway between a mutter and a drawl.
Whatever his magic ingredient, he could transform lines that have no
business being funny.  When he says "Got my soap, got my razor,
got everything" you have to laugh, but then you wonder just why
it is so funny.
Just as it is a wonder how such a plotless, silly movie could
be so much fun to watch.  The "Naked Gun" series has nothing on
W. C. Fields: he was the master at stringing together unrelated
(or nearly so) scenes that have continuity only in being equally
funny.
The plot, if it could be said to be such, has Fields hanging
around a movie studio, peddling a script and promoting the career
of his young niece, Gloria Jean.  His script is alot of nonsense
involving a plane with an open air observation deck (don't miss
what follows after W.C. Fields drops his whiskey bottle out of
the plane), a grown woman who has never seen a man before, and her
homely but wealthy mother.  His script rejected, Fields and Jean
leave the studio but become involved in rushing a non-pregnant
pregnant woman to the hospital.
This film marked the high-water mark for the career of Gloria Jean.
Shirley Temple was one of the biggest stars of the late 1930s,
and studios searched for young actresses who could duplicate her
success.  They came up with three of them: Judy Garland, Deanna Durbin,
and Gloria Jean.  All three were photogenic and could sing.
Jean's career was the least successful, but Fields knew what to
do with her.  Cast as her adoring niece, she also serves as his
protector, trying (without much success) to keep him out of trouble.
There is a terrific "chase scene" at the film's end.
One curious scene has a character similar to Will Rogers saying
"I suffered from high blood pressure for years, then I lost
my dough and had to give it up."  Fields overhears this and
dryly mutters "Very comical."  Perhaps Fields disliked Rogers,
even five years after Rogers' death.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Prt--Porter (1994)
"Ready to Wear" was Robert Altman's disappointing
successor to 1992's "The Player".  This time,
Altman targets a prestigious fashion show in
Paris, with the message that everyone involved
in the fashion industry is shallow, conceited and
eccentric.  Even assuming that this sweeping
stereotype is correct, it is insufficient grounds
for a film that is over two hours long.
Another problem with "Ready to Wear" is the
ensemble cast.  There are so many characters that
it is difficult to remember who is what, much
less identify with any of them.  Much of the
comedy also falls flat: a recurring gag is a man
stepping in dog-doo, something that one would
more expect from a Leslie Nielsen vehicle.
While "Ready to Wear" fails as a comedy, it is
not a complete waste of celluloid.  There is the
parade of naked supermodels at the film's end (in
this case, forgetting to rewind the video is doing
the next renter a favor).  There is a vaguely
amusing subplot involving Tim Robbins and Julia
Roberts as strangers 'forced' to share the same
hotel room (with predictable results: poor Lyle
Lovett, who has a bit part and looks lost).
Despite a lack of structure and an absence of
plot, the film is only occasionally truly boring.
Other subplots have Sally Kellerman, Linda Hunt
and Tracey Ullman playing fashion magazine
publishers, each of whom are desperately trying
to hire photographer Stephen Rea, who is more
interested in taking embarrasing photographs
of them.  Sophia Loren is romanced by Marcello
Mastroianni (the scene where she strips is a parody
of their corresponding scene in 1964's "Yesterday,
Today and Tomorrow") and has a husband who gets
murdered.  And the cast goes on and on: there's
four gay fashion designers who cheat on each other,
Kim Basinger is a witless reporter, Danny Aiello
is a cross dresser, Lauren Bacall and Teri Garr
show up for no discernable reason, lotsa others
whom I don't recognize, and a dozen or so
disinterested fashion models.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Spartacus (1960)
"Spartacus" is a historical drama that takes place
in Italy in the first century B.C.  Kirk Douglas
stars as the title character, an escaped slave who
leads an army of slaves against the Roman army.
The lengthy, expensive epic was directed by Stanley
Kubrick and adapted from the Howard Fast novel.
"Spartacus" is very loosely based on a true story.
Douglas is trained to be a gladiator by Marcellus
(Charles McGraw) at a facility owned by Batiatus
(Peter Ustinov), where Douglas falls for servant
Varinia (Jean Simmons).  In due time, Douglas leads
a revolt and takes the complex, then raids the
countryside building an army of slaves, among them
"singer of songs" Antoninus (Tony Curtis).
Back in Rome, the politicians and generals discuss
how to deal with Spartacus.  These include would-be
dictator Crassus (Laurence Olivier) and generous
schemer Gracchus (Charles Laughton).
"Spartacus" is a good movie.  The cinematography is
impressive, and the cast of extras rivals "The Ten
Commandments" for sheer size.  While far from Kubrick's
best work, the film is well directed.  Douglas,
Olivier, Laughton and Ustinov are entertaining
and well-cast.  When grimacing Douglas dunks McGraw's
head in a hot bowl of soup, you will be cheering for him.
But "Spartacus" is not as good as its reputation.
First of all, the action sometimes drags, especially
during the romantic scenes.  While the Romans are
given witty and sophisticated dialogue, the slaves
aren't as fortunate.  Stone-faced, sexually ambivalent
Curtis has to deliver lines like "It could be argued
so, master."  Douglas and Simmons actually have
the exchange:
Douglas: "Oh, Varinia, Don't make me weak".
Simmons: "You're strong enough to be weak."
(several melodramatic lines later)
Douglas: "Oh, Varinia, Varinia, Varinia."
The Romans are portrayed as either brutally
repressive or morally corrupt.  The slaves, in
contrast, are gentle and noble, with strong
family units.  The consistency of these opposing
depictions reduces the credibility of the film.
The plot also has some needless and unlikely plot
twists towards the end, involving Simmons and Douglas.
Douglas produced "Spartacus", replacing Anthony Mann
with Kubrick after they had an argument.  Douglas
and Kubrick had previously worked together on the
superior "Paths of Glory".  Kubrick disliked the
script but was stuck with it.  Much of the footage
never saw the theatre, and wasn't restored until 1991.
"Spartacus" won the Golden Globe award for Best
Picture.  Tellingly, the Academy didn't nominate
"Spartacus" for Best Picture, but it did award Oscars
for Cinematography (Russell Metty), Sets and Costumes,
and Best Supporting Actor (Ustinov).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Claudine (1974)
"Claudine" is an intelligently scripted and directed drama.
The characters are generally believable and compelling.
The acting is excellent, even by the small children,
and the soundtrack is very good as well.
"Claudine" tells the story of an unwed mother (Diahann Carroll) 
with six children.  She is on welfare, has a job as a maid, but
is still so impoverished that no one in the family has
a car.  She develops a relationship with a garbageman
(James Earl Jones) who has reservations about becoming
stepfather and provider for her children.  Claudine has the
impossible task of raising her children properly, earning
a living, staying on public assistance which she clearly needs,
and keeping her lover satisfied and stationary.
The soundtrack is performed by Gladys Knight and the Pips, 
with the songs written by Curtis Mayfield.  The opening title,
"On and On", was a top ten pop hit in 1974.  The songs are
all very good.
James Earl Jones, a character actor who has become famous 
primarily for his deep and resonant voice, demonstrates 
in this film that he is also a capable leading actor.
I liked the characters of the children.  While sometimes tender,
they can also be selfish, bratty, and manipulative, just like 
non-celluloid children are.
The film's ending is a little muddled.  It's hard to tell 
whether the family is going to jail or taking a walk in the
park.  There is a confrontation between demonstrators and
police that somehow gets mixed up with the wedding.  Also,
how Jones plans to reconcile his financial problems with the
provider role is discussed but not resolved.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Tootsie (1982)
"Tootsie" is a successful and entertaining comedy.
While not as good as its reputation, there are
many genuine laughs to compensate for its
weaknesses.
"Tootsie" stars Dustin Hoffman as a talented but
troublesome actor, unemployable due to his
reputation.  Out of desperation, he dresses up
as "Dorothy" to win a role as a woman on a daytime
soap.  He is somehow able to pull off this fraud
for a year, although it causes problems with his
old girlfriend Teri Garr, his new girlfriend
Jessica Lange, and his boyfriend (?) Charles
Durning.
"Tootsie" examines gender roles and differences,
and seems to conclude that women are better than
men.  In his final lines, Hoffman admits that he
was better as a woman than he is as a man, whatever
that means.  One of the male characters is a jerk
(soap director Dabney Coleman) and another is a
romantic buffoon (George Gaynes).  Admittedly,
the principal female characters have their faults
as well.  Lange drinks too much, while Garr can't
get her life together.
Other than two Steven Bishop songs, the most obvious
weakness of "Tootsie" is that no one except his roommate
(Bill Murray, in one of his best supporting roles)
and his agent (Sydney Pollack, who also directed)
knows that "Dorothy" is a man.  Even more unlikely
is the unwanted romantic attention he receives, from
Gaynes and Durning.
This was the first feature film for Geena Davis.
She makes an auspicious debut in a dressing room.
"Tootsie" was nominated for numerous Academy Awards,
including Best Picture, Best Actor (Hoffman),
Best Director, Best Original Screenplay,
Best Supporting Actress (Garr) and Best Cinematography
(Owen Roizman).   Somehow, the sappy "It Might Be
You" was nominated for Best Original Song.
The only Oscar the film won was by Jessica Lange
for Best Supporting Actress.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Grande illusion, La (1937)
"The Grande Illusion" is a French film set during
World War I.  While the main subject is the plight
of French prisoners of war held in Germany, the film
also explores themes of class conflict, and the
desire to be free and living in one's own country.
Marechal (Jean Gabin) and de Boeldieu (Pierre Fresnay)
are pilots shot down by German aristocrat von
Rauffenstein (Erich von Stroheim).  Taken prisoner,
the pilots are introduced to Rauffenstein, who proves
a gracious host.  They are soon taken to a POW camp
in Germany, where prisoners fight the tedium by plotting
escapes and even by cross-dressing.  Eventually, Marechal
and de Boeldieu, along with Jewish officer Rosenthal
(Marcel Dalio) are re-united with Rauffenstein, now
a POW camp commander afflicted with war injuries.
de Boeldieu must decide whether his loyalties lie
with France or with gentlemanly snob von Rauffenstein.
Marechal must reconcile both his prejudice against
Rosenthal and his working class contempt for white-gloved
de Boeldieu.  "The Grand Illusion" also questions
whether aristocrats can survive in the new order emerging
from the tumultous world war.
"The Grand Illusion" is considered by some to be the
best film ever made.  While undeniably an excellent film,
IMHO it does not rank among the very best films.  It has
been called anti-war, but it doesn't convey that message
as well as "All Quiet on the Western Front" and "Paths of Glory",
or even "Full Metal Jacket".  The taking, losing and
re-capaturing of French cities, while implying the useless
waste of trench warfare, is depicted through second-hand
information, which lacks the visual impact of seeing soldiers
suffering in the field.  von Stroheim's character is remarkably
deep and sympathetic, but this does not apply to the French
officers.  Their characters, while perfectly credible, aren't
as deep.  Marechal is most interesting when conversing with
a cow, and Rosenthal when in despair over being abandoned
by Marechal in the German countryside.  At other times,
Marechal seems simply an opportunist, albeit an honest one.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Three Musketeers, The (1973)
There have been many film versions of the Alexander
Dumas classic, but Richard Lester may have directed
the best one.  A great looking movie, the costumes,
sets and cinematography are also backed up with an
excellent cast, a solid script, and some good
slapstick and action scenes.
The story takes place in renaissance France.  Young,
energetic D'Artagnan (Michael York) leaves home to
seek his fortune as a swordsman.  He makes friends
with three musketeers: world-weary Athos (Oliver Reed),
comically arrogant Porthos (Frank Finlay), and
chivalric Aramis (Richard Chamberlain).  Their enemy
is aristocratic schemer Cardinal Richelieu (Charlton
Heston), who plots to prove the infidelity of the
Queen (Geraldine Chaplin) to the King (Jean-Pierre
Cassel) to increase his own power.  The Queen's lover
is Englishman Duke of Buckingham (Simon Ward).
Racquel Welch plays the Queen's handmaiden.  Faye
Dunaway is entertainingly evil as Milady, who along
with proud Rochefort (Christopher Lee) is part
of Richelieu's intrigue against the Queen.
As you might expect, there are many swashbuckling
scenes.  Lester does his best to give them variety,
changing the sets for each swordfight.  One takes
place in a forest at night, another by a windmill,
another in a tavern, another by a castle among
fireworks.  Comic slapstick is cleverly mixed among
the tragedy of injury and death by the sword.
While the Musketeers fight for France, the King,
and the Queen's honor, they do have other interests.
D'Artagnan is obsessed with Welch (who can blame
him?) while the others are not above gambling and
plundering.  Their adventurous and fearless spirit
is charming in this more cynical age.
Perhaps "The Three Musketeers" is too plotty, with
an overabundance of characters.  Perhaps the
slapstick could be more effective at times, and
perhaps the King is just too stupid.  The setting
seems more like England than France, since so many
of the cast are Brits (Reed, York, Finlay, Lee, etc.).
These complaints are more than compensated for
the quality of the direction, sets, costumes,
cast and screenplay.
"The Three Musketeers" had a sequel, "The Four Musketeers",
which was released in 1975.  It was no problem to
reassemble the cast, since the two films were made
at the same time.  This resulted in a lawsuit when
the sequel was released, since the cast had only been
paid for a single film.  "The Return of the Musketeers"
(1989) was an unsuccessful second sequel reuniting
much of the original cast.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Matinee (1993)
"Matinee" is a comedy with dramatic elements.  It takes
place in Key West, Florida, in 1962 during the Cuban Missile
Crisis.  John Goodman is perfectly cast as Lawrence Woosley,
a producer of schlocky horror films, who comes to Key West
to promote his latest film, "Mant."  His special other is
the jaded Ruth Corday (Cathy Moriarty) who also is the leading
lady in his films.  She makes frequent vague threats to 
leave him, but Goodman's character is so good-natured 
that he always just laughs.
Meanwhile, Gene Loomis (Simon Fenton) is a teenage boy
living on the Key West Naval base with his parents, his
father having been sent to help blockade the Cubans.
He is a big fan of Goodman's films and, discovering that
Goodman is in town, follows him around to learn the secrets
of the trade.
Gene's love interest is Sandra, a student whose passionate 
and unpopular political opinions are encouraged by her
liberal parents.  Gene becomes friends with Stan, who has
a thing for Shelly (Kellie Martin).  Shelly has strong
sexual desires that Stan doesn't quite understand.  
Unfortunately for Stan, she has has a former boyfriend,
a street punk named Harvey Starkweather.
Harvey's character is the weak link of the film.  The
writers try to do too much with him.  He writes beatnik
poetry, dresses in leather, is unstable and acts like a
punk.  He also is in love with Shelly, and has jealous
rages over her that threaten Stan's health.
Threatended by Harvey, Stan breaks a date with Shelly,
instead going to see "Mant".  Gene is there also, with
his kid brother and new girlfriend Sandra.  Harvey has
been hired by Goodman to run the film's sound controls,
and to dress up in a Mant suit and run around the theatre
at key moments of the film.  Spector, a big movie distributor,
is also at the movie and is being wooed by Goodman.
Gene talks to Shelly and patches things up between Shelly
and Stan, who neck in aisle seats.
"Mant" is a hilarous parody of a fifies/early sixties
horror film.  A man has been exposed to radiation and is
turning into an ant, head and arms first.  There is a silly
love triangle between Mant, his wife, and his dentist.
At other moments during the film there are several parodies
of sixties movies and their previews that are equally funny,
especially a scene from "The Shook Up Shopping Cart" that is
a riot.
Harvey, in the Mant suit, catches Stan and Shelly and goes
beserk, later dragging her off at knifepoint.  In the commotion
Goodman and company leave the theatre. The theatre owner has a bomb
shelter with a bolted time-controlled lock.  Mistaking the
movie for a bombing raid, the owner prepares his bomb shelter,
but accidentally locks Gene and Sandra inside, who believe 
that the world is coming to an end.
Once Harvey has been taken away by the police and Shelly
is safe, Goodman returns to the theatre.  The unsupervised kids 
have been rioting in the balcony, threatening the lives of
the patrons.  Goodman switches films, making the audience
believe that nuclear holocaust has come.  The theatre empties
except for Gene's kid brother, who must be rescued from the
collapsing balcony.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ministry of Fear (1944)
"Ministry of Fear" is a greatly underrated
'film noir' mystery thriller from the 1940s.
Strange and confusing, the plot is pieced
together slowly and only by film's end does
it make complete sense.  The film's lead,
Ray Milland, is as much in the dark as is
the audience.  His confusion throughout the
film is only matched by his determination to
unravel the whole mystery, a Nazi spy ring
that is fronted by a charitable organization.
Stephen Neale (Milland) has spent the past
two years in an English asylum after mercy
killing his wife.  Released during the World
War II era of German bombing raids, Milland's
attempts at establishing a normal life are
thwarted when he is mistaken for a Nazi agent.
As a good patriotic citizen, Neale wants to
get to the bottom of it.  It seems that the
only people willing to help him are
good-natured Willi Hilfe (Carl Esmond) and
his sister Carla (Marjorie Reynolds).
Eventually, Neale is accused of murder, and
must clear his name in addition to uncovering
the spy ring.
What makes "Ministry of Fear" special isn't
just director Fritz Lang's ability to string
along the viewer, or the screenplay adapted
from the Graham Greene novel.  It isn't even
the 'film noir' feel of dark lighting and
shady, mysterious characters.  The best part
is that the film is completely unpredictable:
the viewer knows that something is about to
happen, but has no idea what it is.  In other
words, the suspense.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Punchline (1988)
"Punchline" is a drama about stand-up comics.   They want
to become stars, but their dreams are often reduced to making 
it through the next gig.
Lilah (Sally Fields) is housewife by day, stand-up comic
by night.  The movie opens with her buying jokes, as covertly
as if buying drugs.
She performs at a nightclub as part of a lineup of comics.
(Look for Damon Wayans as one of the troop.)
Fields is not a very good comic.  Her jokes aren't funny,
she's nervous, and can't handle hecklers.  She also faces
problems at the home front.  Her husband (John Goodman)
doesn't support her new career, and her three young daughters
are a handful.
Another comic who performs at the club is Steven (Tom Hanks)
a medical student who flunks college when he can't remember
the word for rectum during an oral exam.  Tom is an
excellent comic and has a bright future, but has yet to
break the news to his father who wants him to be an open-heart
surgeon like himself.
Fields begins to follow Hanks around, pestering him to learn
why he is so much better as a comic than she.  When he learns
she is broke, he at first disdains her, then for some reason
decides to help her.  Under his guidance, she is transformed
into a funny comedian.  This story line is hard to swallow:
Fields is more believable as a flying nun than a hilarious comic.
Goodman wants his wife to entertain business clients,
who are church pastors, to demonstrate his family values.
Pressed for time after hanging with Hanks, Fields must dress up 
and cook a fancy dinner.  The dinner goes well until one
of the bratty daughters tells a dirty joke.
Hanks learns that a network talent scout is considering
putting him on television, a chance at the big time.
He tries to hide this from the other comics to no avail.
One night, he is told that a network bigwig is in the audience,
but the man in the suit turns out to be his father.
Hanks has a nervous breakdown on stage, blabbering about
his relationship with his dad and how fellow med students
taunted him for squeamishness.
Hanks later hits on Fields, another unlikely story line.
She rejects him.  His reaction is to do an imitation of
Gene Kelly in "Singin' In The Rain" while Fields gapes at
him.
The talent scout tells Hanks that there is to be an audition
between the comics with the winner going on Carson.  Fields
has them rolling in the aisles.  Everyone knows that Hanks
is the better comic, but he is self-destructive, mocking the
judges and bigwigs.  He recovers, and by the end of his
routine everyone is laughing.  Fields wins the contest
due to Hanks bad politics.  But she refuses the prize in
order to return to her loving family.  Hanks is then the winner.
The moral is that everyone has a place in life that must be
accepted.  Fields is a housewife not a comic, Hanks a comic not
a doctor.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Body and Soul (1925)
"Body and Soul" is a silent film independently produced
by Oscar Micheaux, who also directed, wrote the screenplay
and the novel that the film was based upon.
One actor in the film is white.  The remaining cast is
African-American, and the film was distributed only in
segregated black communities.  The crew was largely
black as well, except for white cameramen who could
be hired cheaply as they were unable to get into the
cinematographer's union.  One of the film's supporting
characters is white, played by a black in "whiteface".
The only white actor is a character selling rancid
meat, perhaps implying white exploitation.
Although "Body and Soul" is a marginally good film,
it is significant for marking the film debut of
Paul Robeson.  Robeson was already a successful
stage performer, and his screen charisma and strong
bass voice would eventually make him a film star
as well.  His signature performance was "Old Man River"
in "Showboat" from 1936.
Robeson has a dual role.  He plays an escaped convict and
con man who imposters as a Reverend.  He also plays the
Reverend's brother, who is as moral as the Reverend is
immoral.  (The roles of good and evil twins apparently is
as old as the craft of film-making.)  Both Robesons have an
interest in blank-faced young Mercedes Gilbert, whose
mother Julia Theresa Russell unwisely trusts the Reverend and
prefers him as a suitor.
The film's conclusion is a mess.  There is a murder,
or is there, which quickly becomes meaningless when the
last half of the film is revealed to be just a dream.
The dream ending was a desperate measure for Micheaux,
who had run out of money and was having trouble getting
the film past the National Board of Review.  The board
objected to the miserably unhappy ending and the depiction
of a Reverend as a complete scoundrel.
If "Body and Soul" was a Hollywood production, it
would be considered racist.  The dialogue is an
offensive dialect, and many of the supporting characters
are foolish and even stereotypical.  Perhaps the
comparison of black characters to white characters
is in itself racist.  I have no solution to this
dilemma.
The film's editing is amateurish and jarring at times.
The technique of narrowing the picture to a small circle
to highlight a facial expression (with the rest of the
screen darkened) was also used in "Birth of a Nation",
but soon went with the silents.
Despite the film's technical, budgetary and censorship
problems, "Body and Soul" is still an interesting film.
Robeson is an impressive screen presence, and Micheaux
clearly put everything he could into the film.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
There is a world out there where everyone is equally
stupid, weird and funny.  And they don't even know it.
That world can be found in "Raising Arizona", an inspired
comedy with a feel that has never been successfully
imitated.
Nicholas Cage and Holly Hunter are a husband and wife,
ex-con and ex-cop team that have one thing missing from
their lives: she cannot have children.  With Cage's
criminal record, adoption is impossible.  Reading about
a furniture magnate's wife delivering quintuplets,
the young couple kidnaps one of the kids.
The plot becomes ever more complex and crazy as Cage
loses his job, and returns to robbing convenience stores.
John Goodman and William Forsythe show up as stupid
prison escapees who learn the secret behind the baby's
sudden arrival.
Much of the humor comes from Cage's deadpan expressions.
Hunter is adorable as Cage's excitable wife, while
Goodman gets more good lines than he did on the final
two seasons of "Roseanne".
Bratty kids alert!  Cage's boss pays him a visit,
bringing his pre-adolescent kids, who are among the
biggest brats in celluloid history.  It doesn't help
that father actually encourages them.  Are they too
young for military school?
You know that "Raising Arizona" must be a great comedy if
it can find a good role for Randall 'Tex' Cobb, former
Larry Holmes punching bag.  Cobb was born to play the Lone
Motorcyclist of the Apocalypse, who wears a tattoo that
states "Mama Didn't Love Me".
Web surfing reveals that Roger Ebert only gave this film
one-and-a-half stars.  Well, I'm sure that some people laugh
at my grades too!
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Night at the Opera, A (1935)
"A Night at the Opera" was the sixth movie starring the
Marx Brothers, and the first without straight man
Zeppo Marx.  Groucho delivers many hilarious one-liners,
and the Marx Brothers create great chaos, but the film
is hampered somewhat by a love interest subplot and
unnecessary musical numbers.
Groucho is the agent of wealthy socialite and comic foil
Margaret Dumont.  Dumont becomes a patron of an opera
house managed by pompous Herman Gottlieb (Sig Rumon).
Gottlieb is eager to have famed tenor Lassparri (Walter
Woolf King) perform at his opera house.  Meanwhile,
the conceited Lassparri chases soprano Kitty Carlisle,
who is love with obscure tenor Baroni (Allan Jones).
The Marx Brothers prove willing to sabotage Lassparri's
opening night performance to promote Baroni's career
and romance.
Like other Marx Brothers movies, "A Night at the Opera"
is inconsistent, with some comic scenes working much
better than others.  Certainly the best (and most famous)
skit has the Marx Brothers and numerous strangers crowding
in a small room.  The skit combines the two best components
of their comedy, Groucho's clever and sarcastic one-liners,
and the Marx Brothers propensity for causing chaos.
Nearly as good is a scene with determined Detective
Henderson (Robert Emmett O'Connor) chasing the Marx Brothers
and their beds from room to room.
Groucho is the major talent of the Marx Brothers.  Harpo
is a good mime, with a gift for facial expressions.  Chico
is competent, but has-a fake-a accent.  Both Harpo and
Chico can play the piano, but that doesn't mean they're
funny at the same time.  Harpo should never have learned
to play the harp.
Kitty Carlisle and Allan Jones make a nice couple and
they can sing.  Still, they're not funny, and can be
detracting, such as their farewell as the ship is departing.
They provide a motive for the Marx Brother's madness,
but perhaps a better (and more funny) plot device could
have been found.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gandhi (1982)
The life of Mahatma Gandhi is inspirationally
depicted in this three hour plus biography,
which won an incredible eight Academy Awards.
Ben Kingsley was plucked from obscurity by
director Richard Attenborough to play the
legendary spiritual leader, a proponent of
Indian independence, religious harmony, and
nonviolence.
The film takes place over a half century,
with Gandhi's aging made fully credible by
outstanding makeup and costumes.  The story
begins with Gandhi as a young lawyer in
South Africa, where his status as an Indian
makes him subject to Apartheid laws.  Gandhi
develops his philosophy of nonviolent
resistance to authority, which makes him
a hero in the cause of Indian independence
from England.
Most of the many characters in this lengthy
epic can be put into four different categories.
There are the segregationalist Western
politicians, alternately smug and despairing.
There are the pro-independence Hindu activists
and politicians, who must be taught nonviolence
by Gandhi.  There are Western press and
clergy who are sympathetic to Gandhi's cause.
And there are Gandhi's devoted followers, most
notably his wife (Rohini Hattangady) and
adopted daughter (Geraldine James).  Ironically,
in a film whose theme is that everyone is equal,
the famous actors of European descent with small
roles are given top billing over Indian actors
with larger parts.
The problem with making a film about heroes
is the difficulty in presenting them as human
beings, complete with flaws.  Any eccentricities
that they have must be lovable, such as Gandhi's
insistence upon adopting the dress and lifestyle
of an Indian peasant.  Attenborough attempts to
humanize Gandhi by presenting a heated argument
with his wife, in which he orders her to leave
the commune because she won't clean toilets.
But the spat is immediately settled, the wife
happily reconciled and relenting, and the behavior
of both is saintly thereafter.
There is also a natural tendency to portray
the British as arrogant snobs.  This is often
avoided by Attenborough, but he sometimes
slips: John Gielgud is a sneering blueblood,
and a needless scene is inserted with preppy
cricket players.  But the religious hatred
between Hindus and Moslems is realistically
presented, with the resulting sorrow of the
aging Indian independence leaders effective
and credible.
In a film with a running time of 188 minutes,
there are bound to be some slow moments.  Gandhi
and wife repeat their wedding ceremony for a
reporter, and the wife's death is drawn out.
On the other hand, the scenes with Gandhi
fasting are well done.
Richard Attenborough was most famous as an
actor prior to making "Gandhi", a project
which he had been pushing for years prior
to production.  He directed "Cry Freedom"
a few years later, a film with similar themes
involving South African civil rights activist
and martyr Steven Biko.  Attenborough has
also continued his acting career, including
a memorable character in "Jurassic Park".
Perhaps due more to its values than its actual
quality, "Gandhi" won a mountain of Academy Awards,
including Best Picture, Best Director, Best
Actor (Kingsley), Best Original Screeplay
(John Briley), Best Cinematography (Billy Williams
and Ronnie Taylor), Best Editing (John Bloom),
Best Art Direction and Best Costume Design.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for McHale's Navy (1997)
"McHale's Navy" is transparently a screen adaptation of the 
mid-1960s U.S. television show, but it has more in common
with the "Police Academy" movie series of the 1980s.
It attempts to be a comedy, but does not succeed.
Nothing is funny, nothing works, and lots of things blow
up.  Too bad the producer's house was not among them.
"McHale's Navy" stars Tom Arnold, whose character is despised
by the Navy brass, but beloved by the common sailor.  He is
a profiteer who somehow gets caught up with fighting "the
second best terrorist in the world" (Tim Curry).  To prove
how bad he is, Curry kills several people for no obvious reason.
These deaths are supposed to be funny.
I do have something nice to say.  The tropical locale where
this film was shot looks like a terrific place to take a
vacation.
Ernest Borgnine has a cameo, and serves as a dubious link
to the old television show, which was much better and knew
enough not to involve world terrorists in situation comedy
plots.  Many talented actors are wasted on this hopeless 
project.  I will do them a favor and not mention them.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for My Fair Lady (1964)
It's far too long at 170 minutes.  The pace is too slow.
Some of the songs are tedious (especially "On the Street
Where You Live", the theme song for stalkers worldwide).
Eliza's father (Stanley Holloway) should make his own
movie, as his character doesn't quite fit in this one.
Hepburn is more likeable as a squawking flower girl than
as a robotic fashion model.
But despite all its faults, "My Fair Lady" is still a
good film.  The costumes are excellent, the script, sets
and casting is good, and, with the exception of lovesick
Freddy (Jeremy Brett), the main characters are both
likeable and credible.  While songs come from the moon/june
school of songwriting, blandly tailored to appearl to
the widest possible audience, the choreography that supports
them is good (My favorite has Hepburn fantasizing an
execution of Harrison).
"My Fair Lady" is based on the George Bernard Shaw play
"Pygmalion".  Conceited linguistics Professor Henry Higgins
(Rex Harrison) makes a bet with fellow blue-blood Colonel
Pickering (Wilfrid Hyde-White) that he can transform flower
girl Eliza Doolittle (Audrey Hepburn) into a lady.  Hepburn
becomes subject to Harrison's relentless and degrading
training methods, but at least she gets to wear a wide
variety of expensive dresses.  Hepburn is a success at a
ball, winning Higgins' bet, but the question of Hepburn's
future, and her relationship with the insulting Harrison,
remains to be settled.
For years, "My Fair Lady" could only be seen on NBC.
Eliza's exhortation "Move your bloomin' arse" was dubbed
to "Move your bloomin' legs", thus demonstrating that
even a G-rated movie could not always get past network
censors.
"My Fair Lady" is regarded as a dinosaur today; a lavishly
produced musical whose target audience is middle-aged
women and not their teenaged sons.  Of course, the film
was more highly regarded in its era.  It won eight Oscars
including Best Picture, Director (George Cukor), Actor (Harrison),
Cinematography (Harry Stradling) and Score (Andre Previn).
It also won for sets, costumes, and sound. Supporting actor
nominations went to garrulous Holloway and Gladys Cooper
(She played Harrison's mother, and was the fortunate recipient
of the film's best lines).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1931)
"Frankenstein" is a highly entertaining, action-packed,
and suspenseful version of the Mary Shelley classic.
The sets, makeup, and cinematography are excellent,
and more than enough to compensate for the hammy
acting and sensational storyline.
Dr. Frankenstein (Colin Clive), a young man obsessed
with bringing the dead to life, and his loyal hunchbacked
assistant Fritz (Dwight Frye) troll the graveyards
for corpses.  They have assembled a composite corpse
which is brought to life during an electrical storm.
Unfortunately, the former corpse (Boris Karloff) is a
violent monster with a criminal's brain.  This being a
film, the monster escapes to terrorize the rural German
countryside, spoiling the wedding of Dr. Frankenstein
to blonde mother substitute Mae Clarke.
There is much to enjoy about "Frankenstein".  The
sets, especially the laboratory, the mill, and the
German village, are excellent.  The performances of
Clive, Frye and Karloff are so memorable that they
defined the stereotypes (respectively) of the mad scientist,
his hunchbacked assistant (more often named 'Igor'),
and Frankenstein's monster.  Ironically, Karloff in
later years would be acknowledged for his perfect-diction
speaking voice (e.g. "The Grinch who Stole Christmas")
but here his character, in the role that made him famous,
only gets to grunt.
Although it was only James Whales' third film as a
director, he has the touch of a master.  The close-ups
of Clive and (especially) Karloff are effective, and
the scene with the peasant (Michael Mark) carrying his
lifeless daughter (Marilyn Harris) through the astonished
village may be the best in the film.  Comic relief is
provided by Frederick Kerr as Dr. Frankenstein's
curmudgeony father.
Universal Studios felt the need to soften the impact
of this early horror film.  Edward Van Sloan, who has
a small role as Frankenstein's precise university
professor, begins "Frankenstein" with an introduction
warning the faint of heart to exit the theatre.  To
Whale's distress, the scene with Karloff tossing Harris
into the lake was cut (although it has since been restored).
The ending was also modified, with Dr. Frankenstein
surviving to see a happy ending with Clarke.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mary, Queen of Scots (1971)
Religious warfare threatens the British Isles.  
Elizabeth (Glenda Jackson) is the protestant Queen of 
England. Mary (Vanessa Redgrave) is the Catholic Queen 
of Scotland.  Both nations have Catholic and Protestant
princes and lords with ambitions to be King.  There is
little tolerance on either side: Protestants are heretics,
Catholics are papists.  Catholics consider Elizabeth a
bastard since she is not the daughter of King Henry's first
wife.  The politics are labyrinthian.
Mary lives happily in France with her husband. Unfortunately, 
her husband dies a dramatic death.  Her Catholic advisers
push her to go to Scotland to claim her title as Queen.
She does go, but it is not as planned.  Elizabeth takes her
stable of horses, denies her entrance to England, and Mary
makes an ignomious landing in Scotland.  There, she is
surrounded by hostile Protestant Lords who tolerate her 
but despise her Catholic court.  She is to be a puppet ruler, 
with real power in the hands of James Stuart, her Protestant
brother.
Crafty Elizabeth sends Lord Darnley (Timothy Dalton)
to Scotland, to woo and wed Mary.  Her plan succeeds, and
we soon learn that Dalton is unstable, bisexual, controlling
and grasping.  Mary finally sends him away, but not before
becoming pregnant.  Dalton is kidnapped by Scottish lords.
He begs like a coward for his life.  He signs a death pact
against Mary.  The lords take Mary's castle, killing her
Catholic minister, but spare Mary since her child can be
the future King unifying England and Scotland, raised as
a Protestant.
Mary converts Dalton back to her side, escapes the lords,
and somehow ends up back in control of Scotland.  Mary
gives birth to a son.  She takes loyal subject Lord Bothwell 
as a lover.  Meanwhile, Dalton's sexual escapades have given 
him the pox.  He is denied the Queen's bedside and ends up 
wearing sheets over his black-spotted face.  Meanwhile, the 
Scottish lords seek vengeance on Dalton since he betrayed 
their blood pact.  They try blowing up his castle, but Dalton 
escapes, only to be strangled.  Bothwell has arranged the murder.
Bothwell also has a wife, but she has conveniently died also,
freeing Bothwell to wed Mary.  This is quite a scandal, giving
the ever-ambitious Scottish lords the needed excuse
to campaign against Mary and take her castle.  Mary is
forced to abdicate, exiled to England, where Elizabeth
imprisons her "for her protection".
Mary spends many years in prison.  She makes the mistake
of joining plots to murder Elizabeth, with the King of Spain
and the Pope as co-conspirators.  Elizabeth's advisors
want Mary executed.  Elizabeth is reluctant to execute her 
cousin.  She has a private meeting with Mary (they never met 
in real life).  Elizabeth wants a written apology, but 
Elizabeth refuses, preferring to be a martyr.  There is a 
trial, which the director chooses to skip over, the sooner 
to get to the execution scene, which Mary meets bravely.
One can complain that of the two characters who are 
bisexual men, one of them is an incredible jerk, and both 
meet their death cowardly.  
"Mary, Queen of Scots" is not historically accurate.
It doesn't have to be.  It is a movie and not a documentary.
"Schindler's List" wasn't accurate either, according
to his still-living ex-wife.  The cinematography is superb.  
(Do you ever wonder how the post-Medieval English court
kept their lawns so well manicured?)  The costumes are 
great, and the acting, while often hammy, is entertaining.  
It is a two hour soap opera laden with plot and action.  
The two queens have all the power,  but are surrounded by men 
who want to take it.  
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Man with the Golden Arm, The (1955)
Otto Preminger directed this intense, dramatic
character study involving heroin addiction.
While sometimes overblown, the film is
interesting throughout.  The depiction of
addiction is not quite as harrowing as in
"The Lost Weekend", but still has more teeth
than most attempts by Hollywood studios.
Preminger's efforts were rewarded with three
Academy Award nominations, including a
Best Actor nod to Frank Sinatra.
Frank Sinatra starred as Frankie Machine, a
respected card dealer in illegal poker games,
and a sometime dope addict.  Frankie attempts
to rebuild his life after leaving prison,
by becoming a professional drummer.  But,
having returned to the old neighborhood,
the old vices return as well, and Frankie
ends up back where he started: addicted and
dealing.
Sinatra gives an excellent performance, and
any excesses can likely be attributed to
Preminger's direction.  The supporting cast
is good as well, with some interesting
characters.  Arnold Stang plays a nasal-voiced
dog lover who is also dog-like in his devotion
to Frankie, and in his antagonism towards
Frankie's enemies.  Eleanor Parker is fine
as Frankie's clinging, disturbed wife, who
pretends to be paralyzed in an attempt to
keep his sympathy.  Darren McGavin is
surprisingly creepy as Frankie's pusher.
Kim Novak plays Frankie's mistress, but her
character is flat and conventional.  Well,
you can't have everything.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Cat on a Hot Tin Roof (1958)
"Cat on a Hot Tin Roof" was originally a
successful play by Tennessee Williams, who had
earlier created a sensation with "A Streetcar
Named Desire".  For the film adaptation,
some changes had to be made to get past Hollywood
censors, and to prevent Paul Newman from
playing a character with homosexual overtones.
Newman plays Brick, a former football hero who
has become an angry alcoholic.  His wife is
Maggie (Elizabeth Taylor), an aggressive Southern
belle whose frequent attempts to seduce Brick
are always rebuffed.  They are visiting the
mansion of Brick's father Big Daddy (Burl Ives),
a wealthy, domineering man who has terminal
cancer.  Brick's grasping brother Gooper (Jack
Carson) is also at the mansion, along with his
pregnant, obnoxious wife Mae (Madeleine Sherwood)
and their bratty little kids.
Although one would imagine that Big Daddy's
estate would go to his wife Ida (Judith Anderson)
upon his death, the plot has the brothers'
families battling for the estate.  Big Daddy
despises Gooper and his family, but is also
unwilling to cede everything to his other son,
whom along with his marriage is deeply troubled.
Also, the terminal nature of Big Daddy's illness
has not been disclosed to him, and both he and
his wife are in denial.
The story provides the frame for a script loaded
with impassioned speeches and vicious arguments;
the final outcome amazingly creating a happy ending
with Newman's personal demons apparently cured.
While never boring, the intense drama is sometimes
overblown.  Newman constantly drinks but, except
for the opening scene, is never drunk.  It is also
difficult to believe Taylor's faith in her
embittered husband, and that she would repeatedly
throw her gorgeous self at him despite his rejection.
The film achieved strong commercial and critical
success despite its excesses.  It was nominated
for six Academy Awards, including Best Picture,
Best Actor (Newman), Best Actress (Taylor), Best
Director (Richard Brooks), Best Adapted Screenplay
(Brooks and James Poe), and Best Color Cinematography
(William Daniels).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Within Our Gates (1920)
"Within Our Gates" is the earliest surviving feature
film directed by an African-American (pioneering
black director-producer Oscar Micheaux).  Thought
lost for decades, a single copy was found in Spain
back in 1979.  The original dialogue cards were lost,
as the found copy had the cards replaced with ones
in Spanish.  New title cards were made, translated
back from Spanish into English.  One brief scene
has inexplicably been lost.
The much-ballyhooed top 100 list released by the
American Film Institute was selected from a list of
400 films.  "Within Our Gates" was on that list of 400.
"Within Our Gates" has three major storylines, all
focusing on Evelyn Preer's character.  The first
story has Preer refusing disreputable suitor Jack
Chenault for fiance James D. Ruffin, but her engagement
with him is broken due to intrigues by Flo Clements.
Preer then becomes involved in saving a rural school
for impoverished black children, by securing a large
donation from white philanthropist Mrs. Evelyn.
The third storyline is a flashback. It turns
out that Preer has a white father who secretly
funded her education, while she was raised by a
black family.  This family became victims of a
an angry lynch mob, who wrongly believe that
her adopted father William Stark murdered cruel white
landowner Ralph Johnson.  A happy ending is suddenly
pasted on.
I have seen two Micheaux-directed silents, "Within
Our Gates" and "Body and Soul".  Both films are
good, but have problems with continuity and exaggerated
characterizations.  Both films feature corrupt preachers.
Micheaux can put on a show, though: the viewer may
become perplexed but never bored.
One of the black actors (E. G. Tatum) is an outrageous
stereotype, gossipy, pandering to whites, apparently with
the mind of a child.  The other characters aren't portrayed
in this manner.  Tatum is later lynched by whites.
Micheaux's message may be that while conforming to a
racist's expectation of behavior can result in short-term
gains, sooner or later you will be betrayed (or punished
through divine justice).  Hey, these are just my opinions.
See the film yourself and form your own.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Shichinin no samurai (1954)
Better known by its English translation title,
Directed by Akira Kurosawa, "The Seven Samurai"
is one of the most famous and highly praised of all
Japanese films.  I have seen it on many critic's
all-time top ten lists.
"The Seven Samurai" takes place in feudal Japan.
A small farmer's village will soon be raided by
bandits after the harvest.  The village elder
decides to hire Samurai (proud, experienced mercenaries)
for its defense.  Kambei (Takashi Shimura) is
the first to join, and as the leader recruits
others, notably young Katsushiro (Isao Kimura)
and aboriginal, emotive Kikuchiyo (Toshiro Mifune).
The villagers are trained as soldiers, and the
village is quickly fortified.  The bandits attack
on schedule.  Will the Samurai and the village
be successfully defended?
It is a terrific story, one that Hollywood adopted
(appropriately turning it into a Western) as
"The Magnificent Seven".  But while "The Seven Samurai"
is an excellent film, it is not outstanding.  The
story has a few problems.  There are some spoilers
in the following paragraphs.
The bandits repeatedly attack the well-defended
village.  These assaults all fail, with the bandits
taking heavy losses every time.  Yet they continue
their efforts until all the bandits have been
killed.  This does not make sense to me, as surely
one small recently-raided village would not rate
such desperate, suicidal attention.  The argument
"but then there would be no story" isn't convincing,
as the film is already two hours old when the
first assault is repelled.
I am, I also don't understand Kambei's decision to
let all the bandits into the village for the final assault.
This results in many deaths of both Samurai and villagers.
Picking off the bandits one or two at a time had been
the best strategy all along.
There is also an unneccessary romance between
Katsushiro and farmer's daughter Shino.  He behaves as
shlyly as if he has never seen a girl before, while she
is as desperate to lose her virginity to him as her father
is to preserve it.  More interesting is the other romantic
subplot, which has Rickichi (Yoshio Tsuchiya) anguishing
over his lost wife.
But aside from these relatively minor problems with
the story, "The Seven Samurai" is an excellent film.
The battle scenes are well choreographed, and the cast and
characters are excellent (especially Mifune, who provides
the film's soul and comic relief).
Beware of edited versions.  Since the original release is
203 minutes long, as much as an hour has been removed from
some prints.  These cuts tend to make the film more of a
war or action picture, and less of a character study.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Wuthering Heights (1939)
Time has not been completely kind to the 1939 version of
"Wuthering Heights".  Intended as a great tearjerker, it
now comes across almost as camp.  The hammy performances
and dramatic dialogue is very entertaining, however.
The Emily Bronte classic has been condensed to feature
the romance between Cathy and Heathcliff.  Petulant beauty
Cathy (Merle Oberon) and her sadistic, self-destructive brother
Hindley (Hugh Williams) inherit the Wuthering Heights estate
from their benevolent father (Cecil Humphreys).  Left out
is brooding adopted son/gypsy/stableboy Heathcliff
(Lawrence Olivier).  Since society would frown on their
relationship, Cathy dumps Heathcliff for wealthy snob
neighbor David Niven.  Heathcliff vows revenge on all
concerned, which he does upon making his fortune.
Oberon and Olivier had been teamed up before in the
highly successful "Divorce of Lady X" from 1938,
but Olivier, not yet a star in America, had wanted lover
Vivien Leigh (they would wed in 1940) as Cathy.
United Artists instead offered Leigh the secondary lead,
which she declined.  ("Gone with the Wind" gave her a
better role anyway).  Ironically, Oberon and Olivier
supposedly detested each other.  Hollywood legend has
it that when Director William Wyler yelled "cut" after
a particularly romantic scene, Oberon shouted at him
"Tell him [Olivier] to stop spitting on me!"
"Wuthering Heights" had excellent production values.
The sets, particulary the rocky crags, are elaborate,
as are Oberon's costumes.  The film was rewarded with
box office success and a slew of Oscar nominations:
Best Picture, Best Director, Best Actor (Olivier),
Best Original (?) Screenplay (Ben Hecht), Best Art
Direction (James Basevi), Best Cinematography (Gregg Toland),
Best Score (Alfred Newman), Best Supporting Actress
(Geraldine Fitzgerald).  Given strong competition from
films such as "Gone with the Wind", "Wuthering Heights"
did not win any awards.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Eight Men Out (1988)
"Eight Men Out" tells the story of the Black Sox scandal,
the 1919 Chicago White Sox baseball team that threw that
year's World Series.  The film has the over-riding message
that greed is the root of all evil: stingy owners, corrupt
players, and cynical gamblers chase dollars, forfeiting their
future for a brighter present.  Only the sportswriters and
the fans are honest.
The players' owner is Charles Comiskey (Clifton James).  He is 
notoriously stingy, paying starvation wages, and welching on player 
bonuses.  When the team reaches the World Series, the players are 
given flat champagne to celebrate.  This fuels resentment among the
players that makes them susceptible to the influence of gamblers.
There are several very interesting characters in "Eight Men
Out."  The kingpin gambler Arnold Rothstein (Michael Lerner) 
carries a chip on his shoulder against athletes.  This is the result
of ridicule he faced as a child when trying to play sports.  He 
seeks revenge by fixing sports events and taking the profits, but
no amount of money will satisfy his resentment.
Christoper Lloyd also plays a gambler, a former pitcher looking
for a big score.  For once his role is not eccentric.
Once the fix is in, the gamblers get greedy and stop paying off
the players.  "It's all out on bets" is their favorite line.
Several of the Chicago players are in on the fix but play their
best anyway, leaving it to starting pitcher Eddie Cicotte (David 
Straithairn) to throw the games. In the film, I count six World 
Series games that Eddie starts. Web research indicates that 
Lefty Williams pitched and lost three series games but is portrayed 
at that position in the film. Perhaps the two characters were 
essentially combined for dramatic purposes.  Another inaccuracy is 
that the players are tried and suspended apparently during the 
offseason, when in fact they played much of the 1920 season.
The director focuses on one player in particular, and 
surprisingly it isn't Joe Jackson, the most famous of the 
Black Sox players.  The spotlight is often on Buck Weaver
(John Cusack) instead, perhaps because his character is
more eloquent than the simpleton Jackson.  Cusack has several
scenes hanging with kid fans that don't seem completely
credible.
Despite its minor weaknesses, "Eight Men Out" is an excellent
film that demonstrates a love of baseball and the corruption
of character that occurs with greed.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Pink Panther, The (1963)
"The Pink Panther" is a light comedy, with strong romantic,
fashion, and slapstick elements.  While some scenes are
funny, as a whole the film doesn't quite come off.
There are problems with casting and characters and dialogue,
and overall shallowness.
David Niven stars as a man leading a double life: suave
playboy Sir Charles and a jewel thief known as 'The Phantom'.
His conquests include two women half his age, Simone (Capucine)
and Princess Dala (Claudia Cardinale).  Both these women
have apparently been cast for their looks and their accents.
Simone is also the wife of police detective Inspector Clouseau
(Peter Sellers) a bumbling fool who is hot on the trail of
The Phantom.
Much of the film takes place in a hotel bedroom, with Sellers
attempting to seduce his wife, who must gently parry his
unwanted advances while keeping him in the dark about Niven's
double identity.  To make her job even more difficult,
Robert Wagner shows up as Niven's nephew, with his uncle's
personality traits of smugness, seduction and thievery.
Capucine must tease and mislead him as well, but as he is
more sharp than Sellers, matters begin to unravel.
Sellers, of course, plays Inspecter Clouseau well, but
not all of his gags are funny, such as when he burns
his hand.
"The Pink Panther" is notable for introducing the Clouseau
character, which Sellers played in a series of sequels
until his untimely death.  The later films are centered
around Clouseau and not the criminals that he is ineptly
chasing.
The film was nominated for one Academy Award, for Henry
Mancini's inspired jazz score.  While the title refers
to a 'priceless' jewel, it has become associated with
the score and the cartoon panther character, who shows
up in the opening and closing credits.  The Pink Panther
later became the star of a cartoon show, and for a while
even had his own breakfast cereal (it was really gross:
it made the milk turn pink).  Sadly, the Pink Panther has
since been relegated to commercials for Owens Fiberglass.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for General, The (1927)
"The General" is a silent film starring Buster Keaton.
It is his most ambitious work, and probably his best.
"The General" takes place during the Civil War.  Keaton
is an Southern engineer who has two loves: his steam train 
and his girlfriend.  Because of his occupation, he is
refused conscription.  He loses his girlfriend, as her
family considers him a coward.
One day, Northern agents steal his beloved train.  In a long
chase scene, he follows the agents North in a second train.
He later manages to recapture the train and begins the
journey back South, but this time he is being chased, by
Northern soldiers in their steam train.  Keaton also gets
involved in a Civil War battle fought over a bridge.
All the Keaton hallmarks are in "The General."  He plays
an ordinary man forced by events to perform heroic feats
to win his true love (who, by an amazing coincidence, has
been taken hostage by the same Yankee agents who swiped
his train).  There are several excellent gags (my favorite
has Keaton having all sorts of problems loading lumber
on a train car) and one magnificent stunt (a steam train 
collapses a burning bridge).
But there are differences between this and other Keaton
films.  There is fine cinematography of steam trains
and Civil War armies in the field.  Keaton's love of
trains and railways is evident.  The extended "chase"
scenes build dramatic tension and are fascinating in
the multiple obstacles that Keaton's character must
overcome.
Some people consider Keaton to be as important a silent
film director as Chaplin.  I can't agree with this.
Several Chaplin films were clearly better than 
"The General". Chaplin's tramp character is more 
charismatic and had greater emotional range.  Also, 
Chaplin had a greater social awareness: he was trying to 
make a statement as well as to make you laugh.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Lost Weekend, The (1945)
Many films have been made about alcoholism, but surely one
of the best is "The Lost Weekend".  Billy Wilder directed
the drama, and Ray Milland played the lead.  Milland was
not the director's first choice, but several other actors
had turned down the part.  Milland himself was reluctant, for
the character is a detestable anti-hero: selfish, lying,
stealing, caring nothing except for getting another drink.
"The Lost Weekend" begins as it ends, with a camera pan
of the New York City landscape, then focusing on a whiskey
bottle hanging on a string from an apartment window ledge.
Milland has put it there to hide it from his brother
(Phillip Terry) and girlfriend (Reagan-ex Jane Wyman),
who have devoted the last few years of their lives in
a failed attempt to reform Milland.  Milland spins lies
to escape their watch, steals money from his brother,
and goes on an drunken binge, suffering endless humiliations
and nearly getting arrested.
The story is incredible in the depths that Milland will
sink to for his next drink.  Wilder leaves little hope that
a drunk can be reformed, despite a requisite happy ending.
One wonders how Milland's brother and girlfriend could
remain so loyal to him for the past few years, when he is such
a manipulating loser.  It seems that the only character who
can see him for what he is, is a bartender (Howard Da Silva)
who has seen the kind before.
My favorite scene has Milland watching an opera.  Butlers
are serving the characters, filling their champagne glasses
as they prepare for a toast.  As glass after glass is filled
and raised, Milland can't bear it anymore and must leave
the theatre.
"The Lost Weekend" is not an enjoyable movie to watch.
It faces truths about addiction without sugar coating.
But sometimes the best films are those that sacrifice
entertainment for quality, in this case exploring the
character of a drunk without softening it to make him
more likeable.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Times of Harvey Milk, The (1984)
In 1977, Harvey Milk was the first openly gay man
elected to the city council of a major U.S. city.
But within a year, he had been murdered, at the hands
of fellow San Francisco council member Dan White.
White's subsequent conviction of voluntary manslaughter,
rather than capital murder, led to violent protests
from the bay city's large gay minority.
This summary makes for an interesting story, and
"The Times of Harvey Milk" does a good job of
putting the pieces together.  People of various
backgrounds who worked with Milk are extensively
interviewed.  This is combined with still photographs
and documentary footage of Harvey Milk, which brings
his energetic, thoughtful personality to the surface.
Best of all are the local television news stories,
about Milk, White and their agendas, giving a "you
are there" quality to the documentary.
Born in New York, Milk spent his young adult life
in the closet.  He spent time in the Navy and as a
stock analyst.  Eventually, he came out, becoming
a Broadway producer, and later moving to liberal
San Francisco to run a camera store in the heart of
the burgeoning gay community.  He ran unsuccessfully
several times for the city council, succeeding only
when the voting was changed from city-wide to by
district.  For the first time, various minorities
were represented on the council, including Milk.
Also new on the board was idealistic, deeply
conservative Dan White.  White's had financial
troubles, and an inability to compromise led to
political defeats.  He resigned his seat, but was
soon convinced by supporters to ask for it back.
Liberal mayor George Moscone decided to give it
to somebody else, enraging White.  After shooting
Moscone, White targeted Milk, not for being gay,
but for being his most vocal opponent on the council.
Before the trial, Defense lawyers carefully selected
a jury that would be sympathetic to Dan White.
The murders came days after the Jim Jones tragedy
in Guyana, with hundreds of San Franciscans among
the victims.  The peaceful protests that followed
were in stark contrast to the riots that later broke
out when White was given light sentences.  White was
released from prison in 1984, and committed suicide
in 1985 (after the documentary was made).
The film's interviews include a gay man and a lesbian
(his campaign director).  But the most interesting
interview targets are those that are less biased: an
middle-aged Union man (Jim Elliot) who thought that
Milk's political views were simply good common sense,
and an Asian business advocate who praises Milk for
his support for minority causes.  Harvey Fierstein
provides the unemotional narration.
For his efforts here, Produceer/Director/Editor
Robert Epstein received an Academy Award for
Best Documentary Feature.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Fury, The (1978)
Trivia time!  Brian DePalma has directed two 1970s films starring
Amy Irving.  One of them marks the screen debut of Darryl Hannah.
Bzzzzzt!  We're talking about "The Fury", a mystery drama that 
turns into a horror film.
Kirk Douglas and his teenage son Robin are vacationing at a
Middle Eastern beach.  Douglas is to send Robin to special 
institute in the states to better develop/understand Robin's 
unusual ESP ability.  Long-time friend and co-worker Childress 
is also there.  Suddenly, snipers fire at Douglas, but somehow 
are unable to shoot him.  He ends up in the hiding by rocks along 
the beach, but takes a rifle from a dead sniper and manages to 
shoot Childress, whom he realizes is behind the attack.  Childress,
who works for a secret government agency, has kidnapped Robin 
to use his special powers for espionage purposes. 
Douglas now is on a quest to find and liberate Robin.  He is
wanted by the Feds, who have many men on his tail.  Douglas
hires the psychic Raymond Dunworthy, to find a better psychic 
who can find Robin.  Dunworthy comes up with Irving, a teenager 
also with strong ESP powers.  But Dunworthy is being monitored
by the Feds and leads them to Douglas, who makes a narrow
escape that involves jumping half-naked from a hotel room,
tying up innocent bystanders, stealing a new car occupied by
two cops, and later driving that car off into a lake, much
to the cops chagrin.
Meanwhile, Irving's abilities are attracting the interest
of her teachers.  She can make a toy train move by telekinesis,
and makes classmates bleed when they make the mistake of
touching her.  She is sent to the same special institute 
Robin was sent to. At first, life is peaceful there, and
she bonds with instructor Hestor (Carrie Snodgrass) who
is also Douglas' girlfriend.  The institute is headed
by Charles Durning, who recognizes Irving's power and
tries to protect her from Childress, who has spies at
the institute and is looking for more psychics to add to
his collection, that already includes Robin.
Irving begins having visions of Robin.  Sometimes these coincide
with her being touched.  After Irving causes a hemmorage in one
of the staff, Childress gets wind of this and begins drugging
Irving, in preparation of removing her from the institute to
work with Robin.  Douglas and Snodgrass decide that Irving must
escape from the institute before it is too late, with Douglas
wanting to use her to locate his son.
Meanwhile, Robin is under great stress at his government gig.
He is isolated and treated as a guinea pig.  His only contact
is with an attractive but manipulative agent whom he does not
trust.  He is being drugged and is emotionally unstable, 
becoming paranoid and psychotic.
Irving escapes from the institute, but it isn't easy,
with Douglas killing two security guards and Snodgrass also
killed.  Irving and Douglas go to rescue Robin.  They
break into the government compound.  Robin senses her
presence, and afraid of being replaced, goes into a
rage, torturing and killing his agent girlfriend using his
powers.  The film has definitely slipped into the horror
genre, as blood splatters the walls.
Irving and Douglas are caught by Childress.  Childress
sends Douglas to go after Robin, who is killing everyone
who enters his room.  Douglas enters the blood soaked
room.  He finds Robin suspended in mid-air with a crazed
look on his face.  Robin attacks Douglas.  They fall out
of the window and land on the roof.  Douglas hangs on
the gutter for dear life, with the other arm supporting
Robin, who is suspended high above the cement street.
We think they will make it, but Robin claws Douglas
and both fall to their deaths.
Now Childress only has Irving to use as a psychic.  He
visits her the next morning in her new bedroom, and
tells her that life must go on, that she is special
and important, etc.  She responds by using her powers
to make his head explode.  This explosion is graphically 
shown several times from different angles.
"The Fury" is a surprisingly good film.  Douglas' struggle
to find and save his son, and Irving's and Robin's struggle
to cope with their abilities, are successfully developed themes.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Modern Times (1936)
"Modern Times" is Charlie Chaplin's last silent film.
It is my favorite of his movies, at least of those that I've
seen.  It has several outstanding sets, and a great score.
There are also many clever gags, and the Tramp character
is, as always, both funny and affecting, often at the 
same time.
"Modern Times" begins with the Tramp working in a factory.
Repetitive motion causes a nervous breakdown.  He loses his
job, and ends up in jail.  Released for good behaviour,
he befriends an equally poor but spirited young woman
(Paulette Goddard).  They dream of a better life, but their
actual efforts just seem to get them in and out of trouble.
The sets for this film are superb.  The factory has a
conveyer belt assembly line, leading to a marvelous 
conglomerate of gears and levers.  Chaplin, and later another
employee, get stuck in this immense set to great effect.
Another wonderful contraption is an automatic feeding device
that the Tramp is strapped to, and when this device malfunctions
it is the funniest part of the film.  A dilapated old house,
and various levels of a department store also make great sets.
One problem that most silent films have is that the original
score has been lost or replaced, if it ever existed.  Since
"Modern Times" is the last significant silent, falling well
inside the sound era, the soundtrack has been preserved, and
the score (by Caplin and Alfred Newman) is much better than 
anything John Williams has ever composed.
Goddard has a lot of energy, and makes an appealing sidekick
for Chaplin's Tramp character.  No wonder she also starred in
his next film, "The Great Dictator".
Surprisingly, "Modern Times" was not nominated for any
Academy Awards.  Perhaps the Academy was annoyed because
it was a silent picture.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Comfort and Joy (1984)
"Comfort and Joy" is a glacially paced whimsical comedy that
doesn't quite make it.  Bill Paterson stars as Alan Dickie,
an Adult Contemporary disk jockey that is locally famous.
Alan's live-in girlfriend, Maddy (Eleanor David), suddenly 
moves out leaving Alan distraught.  His surgeon friend
Colin (Patrick Malahide) is there to sympathize, but Alan
finds himself fantasizing about Maddy and wistfully inspecting
other women.
He sees a pretty woman in a "Mr. Bunny" ice cream truck.  She 
smiles at him, and he follows the truck with his car.  He is 
surprised to see goons wearing masks appear from nowhere and 
beat the truck with clubs.  One of goons spots Alan and gets his
autograph.
This incident has a strong impact on Alan.  He becomes fascinated
by ice cream, and makes an on-the-air offer to arbitrate the
ice cream wars between "Mr. Bunny" and rival "Mr. McCool".
He is so coy about this that his radio boss thinks he's lost it,
sends Alan to a shrink, and takes him off the air.  And Alan
does seem to have lost, babbling on to everyone about ice cream 
and Mr. Bunny.
The only people who take Alan seriously are the feuding ice
cream vendors.  The McCool's are of Italian heritage, which
apparently makes them act like mobsters, a stereotype complete
with the head speaking Italian and the son translating and
talking about family honor.  Mr. Bunny has employed an attractive
daughter of the McCool's.  Worse, the Bunny's control the
fish and chips market, that the McCool's want to break into.
Poor Alan is caught in the middle, naively attempting to
arbitrate the dispute, and only ends up blamed by both sides
and getting his beloved car bashed with clubs.  But, eventually,
Alan comes up with a solution.  He invents a recipe for ice
cream fritters and convinces Mr. Bunny and Mr. McCool to
market the concoction as a "joint venture", taking a cut
for himself as well.  Apparently, Alan's boss is pleased as
well, since Alan returns to the airwaves to plug his new 
product on his show as the credits roll.
Although "Comfort and Joy" is certainly watchable, it has
its problems.  The pace is too slow, and the various characters
that are supposed to be humorous are not.  The plot resolution
is too tidy, as the warring clans band together upon one
taste of Alan's recipe.  The soundtrack is as tame and lame
as Alan's on-air music.  But perhaps the biggest mistake is
the attempt to present violence and vandalism as something
amusing.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Romance, A (1979)
While on a field trip with schoolmates to a movie studio in France,
Daniel (Thelonious Bernard) meets Lauren (Dianne Ladd), who has 
been taken there by actress Kay King (Sally Kellerman).  Both 
Bernard and Ladd are barely into their teens, and they have 
something else in common: they're very smart and virtually 
friendless.  They connect, and begin arranging furtive dates behind 
their parents' back.
For Ladd's birthday, a party for her has long been arranged.
But her own mother forgets about this and gives a wrap party for
her latest picture on the same day.  Ladd and her friends,
one of whom is Bernard, are relegated to her room, which is
just as well since they evade parental supervision, drink
champagne, and dance closely.  Leaving her room, Bernard
runs into the jerk director, who makes a public snide remark
about his scoring with Ladd.  Bernard punches the director
in the stomach and demands an apology.  This puts Bernard
on Kellerman's blacklist, and Ladd is told she cannot see
him again.  Which she does anyway.
Kellerman has been married three times.  Current husband
Richard (Arthur Hill) is patient but still frustrated with her 
cavorting with her latest film's director.  Good news (for him) 
comes when his company informs him that he will be transferred 
from France to Houston at the end of the month.  Kellerman isn't
happy about the coming move.  Even less so is Ladd.
While hanging in the park, Bernard accidentally knocks down 
an elderly gentleman (Laurence Olivier).  Bernard and Ladd
help him up and are then treated to lunch, with Olivier
telling lies and tall tales to impress them.  Ladd believes
the stories, but more worldly Bernard is suspicious.
One of Olivier's stories is that lovers who kiss in a gondola
in a Venice under a certain bridge at sunset when church bells
are tolling will love each forever.  Ladd takes this story
to heart and becomes obsessed at fulfulling this destiny
with Bernard.
Tbey need money for the trip, and go to the racetrack with
Olivier to win it.  Bernard's horse loses the race, but
Olivier switches bets and wins big.  (It turns out that
Olivier is a con artist and pickpocket, and he stole the
money).
Olivier, for some reason interested in getting himself and
his new friends in endless trouble for the sake of a first 
crush, helps Bernard and Ladd run away from home, putting
them on a train to Italy.  The kid's parents get wind of the
scheme and go to Italy to retrieve them.  Ladd's pretty
face is in the newspaper as a missing child.  To avoid
capture, Bernard, Ladd and Olivier join a bicycle race,
which appears to be a plot device to have Olivier crash his bike.
Bernard and Ladd after some further difficulty manage to
kiss in a gondola under that bridge at sunset with the church
bells tolling.  Olivier and the lovesick teens are caught
and return to France.  On the day that Ladd must return to the
states, Ladd sees Bernard and Olivier (who curiously is not
in jail) and has a tearjerker parting.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for No Time for Sergeants (1958)
My respect for Andy Griffith as an actor rose
considerably after seeing him in two very good
films from the late 1950s, "A Face in the Crowd"
and "No Time for Sergeants".  While it seems
that Griffith has always played Southerners,
he doesn't play them all the same: each role is
a different character entirely.  Griffith shows
his talent and range in his early films and
television work, able to do comedic and dramatic
roles, and he was even a good singer.
Griffith is a naive (but not stupid) yokel drafted
into the Air Force as a Private.  His inexperience
and misconceptions with the Real World cause
endless trouble for those in contact with him,
especially world-weary Sergeant Myron McCormick
and querulous bunkmate Nick Adams.  Don Knotts
has a cameo, and the Griffith-Knotts chemistry
is as strong as it would be in "The Andy Griffith Show".
"No Time For Sergeants" could very well have been
a harmless but stupid comedy.  That it is much more
than that is to the credit of Griffith, who gives
his hayseed character genuine depth, and the script,
which is based on the novel by Mac Hyman.
That is not to say that the film is perfect.  The
boot camp has an overly relaxed atmosphere, and the
only time Griffith gets a deserved dressing down
is when he gapes in amazement at a WAC officer
(Jean Willes).  It does seem an amazing coincidence
that a lost Air Force plane should wander into a
nuclear test.  Also, Murray Hamilton's character,
a bullying Private, is not well developed.
Still, "No Time For Sergeants" is an entertaining
comedy, with excellent performances from Griffith
and McCormick.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Another Man's Poison (1952)
The fourth husband of Bette Davis was actor Gary Merrill.
They would make three films together over three years.
The first was "All About Eve", which was perhaps the best
and most successful film of Davis' long career.  Davis had
just a minor role in "Phone Call From a Stranger".  However,
in their third film together, Davis and Merrill were the
leads.  And are they nasty to each other!
But then, Davis relished roles that had her playing selfish,
bitchy, even murderous characters. "Another Man's Poison"
gave her such a role.  She poisons two men, and enjoys
watching them die.  She also impetuously breaks up an
engagement between the perfect couple.  But there's something
good to be said about her character.  She's in love with her
horse, Fury.
This only begins to explain the hopelessly implausible plot
of "Another Man's Poison".  Set and filmed in England, Davis
plays a mystery writer with an absentee, bank robber husband.
He returns, she kills him, and her husband's partner in crime
(Merrill) pays a visit and decides to take his place.  He
thinks it makes for a good cover, but delightfully
inquisitive neighbor Dr. Henderson (Emlyn Williams) is
suspicious.  While Henderson gradually and cleverly unravels
the crimes of Merrill and Davis, Davis keeps herself busy
stealing much younger Larry (Anthony Steel) from his fiancee
Chris (Barbara Murray).  Chris is secretary for Davis, and is
as sweet and gentle as Davis is cynical and cruel.  The
character contrast makes Davis' mistreatment of Chris all
the more entertaining.
Based on Leslie Sands' play "Deadlock", the stage origins
are apparent.  Most of the scenes take place in Davis' mansion.
And the story is overripe, especially when Davis cons Merrill
into driving a jeep at night during a thunderstorm on a
dangerous winding road.  It is unlike Merrill's suspicious,
ill-tempered character to eagerly agree to such a stupid task.
Still, it is almost as fun to watch Davis' campy 'bad girl'
performance as it must have been for her to play it.  Davis
seems to know every affected pose and cunning facial expression,
and her voice practically drips with venom.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
http://briankoller.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Man Who Would Be King, The (1975)
"The Man Who Would Be King" is a good film that should have
been a great film.  It had so much potential: it was
well-cast, with Sean Connery and Michael Caine playing the
leads.  John Huston, a force behind many great films, was
the director.  The set and costumes are excellent: you
feel as if you are actually there in remote Karafistan.
It is a very good story, and with an important
moral: lust for power and greed can do you in.
Connery and Caine are 19th century British soldiers stationed
in India.  They are expelled from India due to roguish
behavior such as theft, gun-smuggling and blackmail.
They decide to visit remote Karafistan, install themselves
as rulers there, then confiscate any treasure to be found
there.  Their plan goes very well, until Connery discovers
that he would rather remain as king than flee with treasure.
What bothered me most about "The Man Who Would Be King"
is the conceit of the main characters.  Caine delivers a
line similar to "He's not a God, but an Englishman.  The
next best thing."  The soldiers truly believe that it is
their right to slaughter, mislead and plunder Karafistanis
if it serves their interests.  Early in the film, Caine
throws a subservient Indian out the window a moving train.
This is supposed to be humorous.  The Englishmen consistently
are able to fool Indians and Karafistanis, who ought to
know better.
Other minor complaints: a Karafistani woman (Shakira Caine,
Michael's real-life spouse) has the Western name 'Roxanne'.
Upon reaching Karafistani, the British soldiers immediately
encounter the only man (Billy, played by Saeed Jaffrey)
who speaks English in the entire country.  Even more
incredibly, at their first meeting Billy offers unconditional
loyalty to the Englishmen.  The first local ruler that the
Englishmen encounter (Ootah, played by Doghmi Larbi) is
conveniently an obliging fool.
Still, the cast, sets, costumes, story, script and score
are all very good.  "The Man Who Would Be King" remains
a good movie, but it would be properly titled "The Film
That Would Be Great".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Heiress, The (1949)
"The Heiress" is adaptation of the play by Augustus 
and Ruth Goetz, which in turn was an adaption of the
Henry James novel "Washington Square."  
The story is about a plain young woman (Olivia De Havilland,
best known for her role in "Gone With The Wind") who is
courted by an attentive suitor (Montgomery Clift).
Her prim father (Ralph Richardson) correctly judges Clift
to be an ingratiating idler and threatens disinheriting
her should she elope.  Will De Havilland disobey her
father?  Will Clift marry her without her fortune?  Will
father and daughter be reconciled?  If you've seen the
latest adaptation of the novel, "Washington Square", you
already know the answer to these questions.
"The Heiress" was nominated for a flood of academy awards,
but the only major award was Best Actress to De Havilland.
Her character begins the story as an earnest wallflower,
but becomes proud and mature by its end.  De Havilland
could play both sides of the character equally well.
The film was also nominated for Best Picture, Best Director,
Best Supporting Actor (Richardson) and Best B & W Cinematography.
The competition must have been very strong that year,
although I suspect that Oscar votes went to "All the King's Men" 
and "Twelve O'Clock High" because of their appeal to men, 
while the target audience of "The Heiress" was women.
Why is "The Heiress" such an outstanding movie?  The script
is excellent.  Clift and especially Richardson are well
cast.  De Havilland is too lovely to play the plain daughter,
but she does it so well.  The three major characters
are well defined, particularly the father, who belittles
his daughter by comparing her with the idealized memory 
of his late wife.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Bird (1988)
"Bird" is director Clint Eastwood's tribute to bebop jazz
saxophonist Charlie Parker (Forest Whitaker).  Although
lengthy, and often dwelling on the more lurid aspects
of Parker's life, it is an excellent film.  Parker comes
alive, as an artist and a person, whose talents and
torments are depicted as inseperable.
"Bird" zigzags backwards and forwards through Charlie Parker's
adult life.  His relationship with his wife Chan (Diane Venora)
is fully explored.  We also hear a great deal of Parker's
sax playing.  Parker's mentors are mocking, unimaginative
Buster Franklin (Keith David) and respectful but disapproving
jazz visionary Dizzy Gillespie (Samuel E. Wright).
Parker becomes a mentor himself, to white Jewish trumpeter
Red Rodney (Michael Zelniker), who decides to imitate Parker
with his addictions as well.  Perhaps over-explored is Parker's
alcoholism and drug-abuse, and coupled with ulcers and
suicide attempts, even the most naive viewer expects an
early death.
Eastwood played a jazz DJ in 'Play Misty For Me', an
early directorial effort.  He would later be associated
with country music in a series of films from
"Every Which Way but Loose" to "Honkytonk Man".  But
Jazz must be his first love, and that comes through in
the effort put into "Bird".  Unreleased Parker performances
were merged with backing by contemporary musicians, with
the editing undistinguishable.  Attempts are made to
explain the significance of his style, and to convey
the wide-ranging reactions to Parker's music, both from
fans and from fellow musicians.
Whitaker gives a warm and winning performance.
Smiling but sad-eyed, well-intentioned but unreliable,
drug addicted but condemning drug abuse, his Parker
is a swirl of contradictions.  His wife Chan, like
his various girlfriends, are white jazz fans from
assumedly wealthy families.  Chan is intelligent and
sometimes frustrated, but she is always loyal to
her husband despite all of his troubles.
My favorite scene in the film has Parker and his
band playing at a Jewish wedding, a gig arranged by Rodney.
The warmth bridging the immense cultural gaps was
great to see.
While "Bird" only received an Academy Award for Best Sound,
Whitaker won Best Actor at the Cannes festival,
while Eastwood, Whitaker and Venora received Golden Globe
nominations.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Rome Adventure (1962)
"Rome Adventure" is a romantic fantasy targeted to young women
and armchair tourists.  The cast is lovely and the photography
of Rome is interesting.  However, the pace is deadly slow,
and the two hour length is too long for the skimpy story.
Suzanne Pleshett, in her film debut, plays an American
librarian who decides to quit her job and take an extended
vacation in Rome.  Apparently her parents are wealthy and
obliging and pay for the associated bills.  Once there, she
must choose between handsome and interested suitors, and
find her one true love.
Pleshett is a capable actress, but in this role she may
as well be perfect.  Let's see, she's educated, gorgeous,
intelligent, young, of wealthy parentage, and relentlessly
normal.  As a result, she's also impossible to identify with.
There's not much drama in which paramour she will choose,
since any one of them is a reasonable choice.  Anyway, it
isn't revealing much to state that Troy Donahue is her
favorite.  They later wed in real life, just in time for
his career to falter.
More trivia: The song "Al De La" featured here became
a top ten pop hit in 1962.
Pleschett and Donahue spend many romantic and photogenic
moments among Rome's ancient ruins, elaborate churches
and fountains, and art museums.  Curiously, although the
weather is fine, they are always about the only people
there.  But when they are in a nightclub, it is always 
crowded.
Romans, who built and preserved the featured landmarks,
are in this film reduced to the role of deferential
servants.  Tourists and foreigners have apparently
taken control of Rome.
Jazz trumpeter Al Hirt has a cameo.  His character is
supposed to provide comic relief, but it just doesn't 
work.  He's no actor, and he's not helped by the stupid 
lines he must deliver.
Despite all its faults, the film is not awful.  What
strength it has comes from the cinematography and the
attractive cast.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for My Favorite Year (1982)
"My Favorite Year" is not a great film, but
it is an entertaining comedy that provides several
memorable characters.  The basic story is good,
and the film is well-cast.  However, the film
does drag in the middle, some scenes don't quite
work, and there is an unnecessary mobster subplot.
Peter O'Toole has a great role as a former matinee
star, a swashbuckling action hero in the style of
Errol Flynn.  He has since taken to drink and
philandering, although he retains enough fame to
merit an appearance on the 1954 series "The King
Kaiser Show".  Kaiser (Joseph Bologna) is an amusing,
impulsive comic.  His staff includes young comic
writer Benjy Stone (Mark Linn-Baker), whose love
interest is gopher Jessica Harper.
Linn-Baker is assigned to keep O'Toole out of
trouble while the show is in production.  Predictably,
O'Toole is heedless of Linn-Baker's protestations,
instead taking him on a series of drunken adventures
in New York.
Mel Brooks produced "My Favorite Year", and the
story idea came from his experiences with Errol Flynn
when he was a young comic writer on the Sid Caesar show.
Richard Benjamin directed instead of Brooks, leading
to a more subtle comedy.  Still, not all of the scenes
work, such as when O'Toole steals a horse, or dines
with Linn-Baker's starstruck extended family.
But some of the gags are very funny, especially O'Toole
crashing a party by swinging down from a fire hose.
O'Toole briefly rejuvenated his career with his performance,
earning a Best Actor Academy Award nomination.
I also liked the romance between Linn-Baker and Harper,
especially the scene where he attempts in vain to
teach her how to tell a joke.  The off-and-on humor
makes for half of a great movie, which is a much
larger portion than most comedies have.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
Watching "Jackie Brown" for the second time, still
somewhat confused from its intricate plot of criminal
double crosses, I was reminded of "Get Shorty",
which had the same bewildering complexity.  It turns
out that both films were based on novels by Elmore Leonard,
with "Jackie Brown" an adaptation of "Rum Punch".
But "Get Shorty" was a much lighter film, while
"Jackie Brown" is more tense and violent.
"Jackie Brown", of course, is the third film fortunate
enough to have the talents of Quentin Tarantino
both as a director and screenwriter.  (We won't count
"Four Rooms", a.k.a. "Four Directors")  Elements present
in the first two films are here as well.  There is rampant
violence and obscenities, imaginative casting, scenes
taken out of chronological order, heavy doses of pop oldies
and outstanding dialogue.  While "Jackie Brown" may not
be as great as "Reservoir Dogs", it may actually be better
than the deservedly much-lauded "Pulp Fiction", and has
to be considered to be a nearly complete success.
The title character, an airline stewardess in her forties,
is played by Pam Grier.  She works with violent and
talkative arms merchant Samuel L. Jackson smuggling
currency into the country.  Jackson has several beachfront
properties, sharing them with girlfriends Bridget Fonda,
Lisa Gay Hamilton, and Hattie Winston.  (Fonda fans will
be glad to learn that her druggie "surfer girl" character
gets much screen time and shows much skin.) Robert DeNiro
shows up as Jackson's brooding assistant.
Grier is busted by cop Michael Bowen and ATF agent Michael
Keaton.  Grier, with her liberty, career and life at stake,
devises an elaborate scheme with lovestruck bailbondsman
Robert Forster.  Can she recover the illicit money,
and keep it from both the cops and revenge-minded Jackson?
The score is loaded with pop-soul oldies from the 1970s,
one of the best of which, "Long Time Woman" is performed
by Pam Grier herself.
Tarantino, despite casting African-Americans in the two
most important roles, came under criticism for the script's
heavy use of the n-word.  In my ever-ready opinion, this
word is in the same category for a screenplay as an expletive,
meaning that it can be readily abused but also can be
powerful in the proper context.  In Tarantino films,
expletives are typically used by violent and desperate
criminals, a context which seems appropriate.  I don't
believe that Tarantino's films promote violence either.
Like old gangster flicks starring James Cagney or
Edward G. Robinson, the proponents are unredeeming and
tend to meet death by their own measures.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Going My Way (1944)
"Going My Way" was the sensation of the 1945 Academy Awards,
winning oscars for Best Picture, Best Actor (Bing Crosby),
Best Supporting Actor (Barry Fitzgerald), Best Director
(Leo McCarey), and Best Screenplay.
With all those Oscars, the movie had to be either very good
or demonstrate excellent family values.  It must have been
the latter, for while "Going My Way" is pleasant enough,
it doesn't have the depth or drama to be a great film.
The plot has easy-going Catholic priest Crosby taking over 
aging Fitzgerald's parish.  Only Fitzgerald isn't supposed
to know that he is no longer in charge.  Crosby must win
over the Irish curmudgeon, solve the parish's financial
woes, reform the neighborhood delinquent kids, help a single
mother saddled with kids keep her apartment, and help
an attractive young singer (wide-eyed Jean Heather, whom you may
recognize from "Double Indemnity") find her place in the world
(which is to be married, of course, as 1940s Hollywood would 
have it no other way).  Crosby performs all these miracles
with the same grace as his seamless baritone, never breaking
a sweat or raising his voice.
Crosby's relationship with Fitzgerald is the centerpiece of
"Going My Way".  Fitzgerald must be gradually put to pasture.
Crosby tries to teach him golf, and talks him into visiting
his elderly mother.  Fitzgerald is relegated to one of Crosby's
projects, like the delinquents or Heather.  The two have genuine
warmth, and the film relies heavily on their charm.
Crosby has little trouble turning a street gang of hooligan
kids into a church choir.  This is the biggest problem I had
with "Going My Way": it is as if he waved a wand and cast a
spell on the formerly troubled kids.  Their presence as a
choir gives an excuse for Crosby to sing a few numbers.
It must be remember that Crosby was the biggest selling
pop singer ever prior to Sinatra and Presley.  Opera singer 
Rise Stevens drops by to smile widely and help with the high notes.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Midnight Cowboy (1969)
"Midnight Cowboy" is an excellent film that demonstrates
the gap between ambitions and reality, and gives
a flavor of what New York City (and rural Texas)
was like in the late 1960s.  "Midnight Cowboy" was
also a landmark film in its explicit treatment of sexual
behavior, especially homosexuality, which initially
earned an 'X' rating.  (The rating was later rescinded
after the Oscars had awarded it "Best Picture".)
Joe Buck (Jon Voight) is a young Texan who decides to
leave his dishwashing job and move to New York City.
He is naively certain that he can make a good living
as a "hustler", meaning a prostitute with older women
as customers.
Upon reaching New York, he is soon hustled himself.
Slow to realize the difference between reality and
his fantasies, he becomes impoverished and a male prostitute.
He moves into a condemned apartment already occupied
by small-time con and cripple Ratso Rizzo (Dustin Hoffman)
who has dreams of his own: living as an important man
in Florida.
The director, John Schlesinger, makes frequent use of
brief, long-ago flashbacks of Buck's childhood, and
pairs these flashbacks to relevent events in the present.
We learn that Buck was raised by his grandmother, who had
multiple boyfriends and who neglected and possibly sexually
abused him.  There are also fantasy scenes paired with
their real-world result.  For example, Voight approaches a
would-be customer, and there is a fantasy scene of him
escorting her to a posh suite.  The reality scene has
her making a quick exit, leaving Voight standing in
the street with a stupid look on his face.  These
flashback/fantasy scenes are even better than the rest
of the film, and it is a wonder that more films do not
make use of them.  Certainly Schlesinger was deserving
of his 'Best Director' Academy Award.
Dustin Hoffman is endearing in the role of Rizzo.
Hoffman can be very likable in secondary roles (as in
"Papillon"), where his character can show more
eccentricities.
Voight was a late casting, after the role had been
offered to Michael Sarrazin and even Elvis Presley.
The Joe Buck character is perhaps too naive and
stupid, but Voight is very credible as a yokel.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Dresser, The (1983)
"The Dresser" is a British production starring
Albert Finney and Tom Courtenay.  Derived from
Ronald Harwood's stage play, it has a quality
script and characters with some depth.  It
compares favorably with most Hollywood projects,
which, in their search for young audiences,
would avoid tackling such a film that appeals
to older demographics.
The story takes place during World War II.
Despite endless bombing raids by the Germans,
a group of middle-aged and elderly Shakespearean
actors is giving performances throughout England.
Finney always plays the lead role, and is the
famous actor whose drawing power sustains the
troup.  Unfortunately, he suffers a nervous
breakdown, and it is up to his loyal dresser
Norman (Courtenay) to get him through his
performance.
The film has multiple themes.  Finney's character
must confront his stage fright, and his fear of
impending death.  The courage of the British
people is demonstrated by their risking their
lives to attend sell-out performances.  The
unsung, unrewarded back-stage staff, without
whom the show cannot go on, are represented by
Norman.
Finney is a marvelous actor, and his blustery
manner and booming voice are perfect for his
character.  Indifferent to the feelings of
others, he lashes at his staff for inadequacy
after they have exhausted themselves trying
to simulate a thunderstorm for a play.
Courtenay is less effective, as he camps up
his alcoholic, blatantly homosexual role.
Both actors, however, received Academy Award
nominations for Best Actor.  The film was also
nominated for Best Picture, Best Director
(Peter Yates) and Best Adapted Screenplay
(Harwood, adapting his own play).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Army of Darkness (1993)
"Army of Darkness" is a black comedy.  The genre may appear to be
horror or action-adventure, but the whole movie is just one big wink
from the director to the audience.
Bruce Campbell, also the film's co-producer, is perfectly cast
as the hero Ash.  Ash is in a cabin in the woods with his girlfriend,
when he makes the mistake of opening "the book of the dead".
This awakens demons who kill his girlfriend, then invade his hand,
which he obliged to cut off with an ax.  All of this occurred in
an earlier film which I have not seen.  Army of Darkness is a
sequel.
If the above description is revolting to you, this movie may not be
for you.  While the movie has a large amount of violence and gore,
it is cartoonish in character.  It is something to laugh at, like
Bugs Bunny whacking the stooge with a mallet.
Ash somehow finds himself in Medieval England.  This is not
well explained, but explanations aren't relevant anyway.  The
British knights attack his car with lances, then drag Ash off as
an enemy of the people, condemned to die by getting shoved into
a pit full of demons.
But Ash proves very good at fighting demons.  He has anti-hero
qualities: he does good things, but for the wrong reasons.  Not
to save his people, or to restore justice, but for the fun of
it.  Ash likes nothing better than spearing, torching, and hacking
his enemy.  This is revealed not just by his actions but by
statements like "Let's Rock" and "Want some of this?".  Life is
boring when there are no battles to be fought.
Now Ash is the people's savior against the demons.  He is taken
to a castle and meets a prophet.  He is told that the book of 
dead must be retrieved from a forest controlled by demons, 
not just to return Ash to his own time, but to save the people 
from demonic ravages.  
After much bluster and a silly romance (he shows no interest in
the heroine until she slaps him), Ash goes to the forest to find 
the book.  There, he is beset by various evil, animated objects,
including miniature and full-size wicked versions of himself.
Ash takes a licking but keeps on ticking.  He has to repeat an
incantation before taking the book.  He says it wrong but takes the
book.
Ash returns to the castle to a hero's welcome, until he admits
he told the incantation wrong.  The prophet says that now the
dead will awaken to retrieve the book.  At first, Ash insists
on returning home, but, later coming to his senses, decides
to stay and lead the coming battle against the dead.
In the forest, cool animated skeletons arise from graves, sword
in hand, and march against the castle.  This leads to much 
humorous carnage on both sides, with the battle's momentum shifting 
between the defenders and the dead.  It becomes clear that the battle 
is really just between Ash and the dead's general, as all the other 
soldiers on both sides aren't good fighters and are just 
expendable extras.
The defenders hold the castle, and the skeletons are forced to
retreat.  Ash repeats a chant from the book to return him to his
own time.  Of course he says it wrong, and while he is back working
at his beloved S-mart, a demon returns with him, giving Ash a final 
opportunity for battle.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Roman Holiday (1953)
"Roman Holiday" was the film that made Audrey Hepburn
a star.  Playing a young princess, her slender body,
her beauty, and her ability to project youth and innocence
made her perfect for the part.  While "Roman Holiday"
is slightly over-rated, most of the comedy works, and
the few sad scenes add to our sympathy for her character.
The story was good enough to merit its Academy Award.
Princess Anne (Hepburn) is a teenager trotted about
Europe for speeches, ceremonies, etc. by her overscheduling
handlers.  Anne escapes her handlers and her constricting
life, soon meeting newspaper reporter Joe Bradley (Gregory
Peck).  Bradley, smelling a big story, enlists the help of
photographer Irving (Eddie Albert), then takes Anne on a
pleasure tour of Rome.  Many embarrassing, valuable photos
are surreptitiously taken of the Princess.  This leads to
star turns for Peck (Will he fall in love with her, and
not destroy her reputation by publishing his story?) and
Hepburn (Will she fall in love with him, and reject her
crown?).
The biggest surprise that this film had for me was
provided by Eddie Albert.  Later known as a competent
but unengaging straight man (e.g. "Green Acres"), here
his character is excitable and bohemian, and even sports
a beard suitable for a temperamental artist.  The
revelation is that Albert plays this character perfectly,
and it is a shame that middle age led to his casting
in less challenging roles.
Peck radiates self-confidence and star power, and
has the looks to make his role convincing as a love
interest for Hepburn.  While somewhat limited in his
emotional range, Peck can project indignation well.
His character also matches well with Hepburn's, as
his advantages in experience and cynicism are more
than offset by Hepburn's appealing innocence and
vulnerability.
Like nearly all comedies, "Roman Holiday" isn't
perfect.  We are to believe that Bradley can convince
his elderly Italian landlord to play soldier, that
Bradley and Irving are in the front of a large
contigent of an extremely well-behaved press, and
that Bradley (much less Irving) wouldn't publish
their career-making story.  Anne, after acting like
a child throughout, suddenly gains maturity at film's
end.
"Roman Holiday" was nominated for ten Academy Awards,
including Best Picture, Best Director (William Wyler),
Best B & W Cinematography (Frank Planer and Henry Alekan),
Best Screenplay (Ian McLellan Hunter and John Dighton),
and Best Supporting Actor (Albert).  Hepburn won
Best Actress, and Edith Head won for her costume.
Hunter was fronting for blacklisted Dalton Trumbo,
who received a posthumous Oscar in 1993.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for French Connection, The (1971)
"The French Connection" is probably the most famous and heavily
praised of all buddy-cop films.  It is an excellent film
with much action and dramatic tension.
Gene Hackman and Roy Scheider play cynical but determined 
New York City cops out to bust a big heroin ring.  Stake-outs 
and hunches lead to encounters with the criminals, who vary 
from dangerous assasins to wealthy businessmen to streetwise
hoodlums.  There is a famous "chase" scene which has Hackman
driving a car, recklessly weaving through traffic, following
a sniper who has commandeered a train.
"The French Connection" won a mountain of Academy Awards.
Best Picture, Best Director, Best Actor (Hackman), Best Film
Editing, and Best Writing.  The Academy must have been
impressed by the film's gritty edge and realism, and forgiven
its excesses (Hackman engages in violence, threats and racial
slurs; He accidentally kills a cop which is given trivial
treatment; In one scene his young blonde one-night-stand
has handcuffed his leg to a bedpost; There are the usual
dramatic arguments between the "rogue" cops and their
supervisors).
There are some great moments besides the chase sequence.
Hackman tries to follow criminal mastermind Fernando Rey,
who plays cat and mouse games to escape.  Another great scene
has Hackman and Scheider tapping a criminal couple's home phone,
and falling over laughing after hearing the wife lay down
the law.
The Three Degrees appear as nightclub performers.  They are
best known for the hit "When Will I See You Again."
Is "The French Connection" the best buddy-cop film ever?
Perhaps it doesn't qualify, since Scheider has a lesser part.
Maybe "48 HRS. (1982)" is a better movie.  But it avoids
the pitfalls of later police dramas, which are too heavily
cynical or have unrealistic portrayals of the cops 
and criminals.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Young Philadelphians, The (1959)
"The Young Philadelphians" is an early vehicle for Paul Newman.
It is a soap opera similar to his later movie "From The Terrace",
where Newman must choose between his career and his ethics.
Ultimately, we know that Newman will do the right thing,
even if it takes more than two hours for the resolution.
Kate (Diane Brewster) has dumped reliable steady Mike Flanagan
(Brian Keith) for wealthy socialite William Lawrence (Adam West).
West, as hammy as ever, proves impotent on the wedding night,
fleeing the hotel room leaving the willing bride in tears.
She runs to Keith, West kills himself, and nine months later
Anthony is born.  Kate refuses to marry Keith, in order to keep
the Lawrence name.  Kate makes sacrifices for her son, ambitious
for his prospects.  Anthony grows up to be Paul Newman,
travels in the right social circles, and goes to college to
become a lawyer.
Newman wins the love of pretty Joan Dickinson (Barbara Rush),
but her father Gilbert prefers the very wealthy Carter Henry.
Newman and Rush decide to elope, but scheming Gilbert strikes
a deal with Newman, offering to become his precept in return
for a delayed wedding.  Rush is devastated that Newman would
trade love for a career, and soon weds Henry, to Gilbert's
delight.  Newman sulks and decides to "play the game", meaning
freely sacrifice principals for personal ambition.
Newman soon leaves Dickinson's law firm for that of John Wharton.
There, he shamelessly flirts with his Wharton's younger wife Carol.
Their romance is curiously cut short.  Even more curious, 
John Wharton notices their romance but pays little attention.
We soon never hear from Carol again, though Newman stays
at Wharton, becoming a tax specialist.
His career is interrupted by a stint in the Korean war.  This 
significant part of his life is represented by a single scene 
in the film, which has Newman visiting his hapless, drunkard 
friend Chester (Robert Vaughn) at a hospital.  Poor Chester has 
lost an arm.  Carter Henry also dies in Korea, a plot device 
leaving Newman again free to tackle Rush, who is a tougher sell
the second time around.
Back in the states, Newman's career takes off when he steals
a wealthy client (Billie Burke, better known as the good witch
in "The Wizard of Oz") from Gilbert Dickinson.  Newman shows 
Gilbert up, making him fume like a jealous schoolboy.
Rush happens to be Burke's niece, an unlikely coincidence.
Pathetic Vaughn gets in more trouble, showing up first in a
drunk tank, then charged with murder with the motive of an
inheritance dispute.  The evidence is stacked heavily against
Vaughn, and Newman is no courtroom lawyer, but apparently has
watched enough "Perry Mason" shows to imitate that show's
theatrics, which include baiting of witnesses, surprise
witnesses, demonstrations that go off perfectly, and courtroom
confessions.  Newman also gets to show up Louis Donetti
(Paul Picerni), who has been a smug rival throughout the movie,
and by no small coincidence is the prosecuting attorney.
With Vaughn freed, Newman regains the love of Rush and the
requisite happy ending has been reached.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Birth of a Nation, The (1915)
"The Birth of a Nation" is considered to be the
first great silent film, the one film that transformed
cinema from mere entertainment to an art form.  In
an era when even feature films were under an hour
in length, the 190 minute running time was unheard
of.  Most films were one or two reel shorts, and
were base comedies, romances or action films.  The
ambition, scope and political messages of "The Birth
of a Nation" created a sensation, and the film grossed
$18 million, far more than any film of its era.
It is necessary to consider the film's strong political
messages before its quality can be analyzed.  Obviously,
"The Birth of a Nation" is racist.  Black men, portrayed by
white men in blackface, are generally depicted as beasts:
lawless, abusive and lusting after white women.  Director
D.W. Griffith tries to balance this characterization by
blaming this behaviour on white "scalawag" carpetbaggers,
and by having a few "good" black characters.  These "good"
blacks are former slaves still loyal to their former
white masters.  The Ku Klux Klan, a murderous, racist
vigilante organization, are presented as heroes
for restoring "order" and white minority rule.
Scenes suggesting that blacks should be shipped to
Liberia were deleted from the film after protests.
The film was released in 1915, during a time when WWI
was raging in Europe, and the U.S. was attempting to
stay out of it.  Many of the dialogue cards for
"The Birth of a Nation" deplore war and its waste.
Woodrow Wilson was President at the time, and excerpts
from a racist history book that he had written are
quoted in the film.
Abraham Lincoln is depicted heroically in the film.
This is curious given the pro-South, anti-war, Jim Crow
sympathies of the film.  Griffith's first talkie would
be "Abraham Lincoln", a warm tribute to the Civil War
President.  Lincoln's assassination is blamed for
the excesses of reconstruction.
"The Birth of a Nation" is mostly the story of two
families.  Not content to stick to the plot, Griffith
inserts scenes presenting historical moments, such
as Grant's surrender and Lincoln's assassination.
Griffith takes pains to re-create the architecture
of Ford Theater and the Appomattox Courthouse (and is
proud to tell us so), which is ironic given his
polemic interpretation of American history.
"The Birth of a Nation" is typically described as
a flawed but great film.  While the film undeniably
has great historical importance, this is not relevant
to its grade, which should be based only on its
quality.  From a critical standpoint, "The Birth
of a Nation" has many problems.
The characters are simplistic.  Besides the depiction
of blacks, the three main female characters are
lovely simpletons, the subject of lust from blacks
and heroic rescue from whites.  The white male
heroes are a stereotype of chivalry and bravery.
We are left with reconstructionist congressman
Austin Stoneman (Ralph Lewis) as the only character
with some depth.
The action scenes are many.  There are Civil War battles,
lynchings, black mobs, and Ku Klux Klan rescue missions.
Admittedly, these scenes add excitement to the film,
but they are sometimes muddled and sometimes lack
credibility due to the extreme characterizations.
One scene has a white man taking on, and defeating,
a dozen black men.
"The Birth of a Nation" remains an historically important
film, but it is not a great film.  Its major theme,
the effect of the Civil War and reconstruction on
wealthy white Southern families, is much better realized
a generation later in "Gone With a Wind".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Born on the Fourth of July (1989)
"Born on the Fourth of July" is an excellent film
that tends to be under-rated since it is not
entertaining.  The film is mostly a downer, but
so is its message, and the message is both
important and well-conveyed.
Ron Kovic (Tom Cruise) is a small-town high school
student during the mid-1960s.  Anxious to serve his
country, he joins the Marines, and soon finds himself
in Vietnam.  A series of devastating experiences
follows: he takes part in a massacre of innocent
villagers, he accidentally kills another Marine,
he himself is shot and paralyzed from the chest down,
his recovery is at a wretched Veteran's hospital.
Kovic returns to his hometown and is welcomed
as a war hero.  But he soon becomes bitter over his
handicap, and looks for targets for his resentment.
At first he subjects his family to tirades against
draft protestors, but later decides that the
government is to blame, and that the Vietnam War
is wrong.  Evicted by his own parents, Kovic tries
to find his place in Mexico, but his inner demons
follow him there.
"Born on the Fourth of July" improves as it moves along.
Early scenes with Kovic in high school don't completely
work, as the actors are ten years too old for their roles.
Kovic's stint in boot camp is bypassed, and his service
in Vietnam is a blur, depicted as only a handful of scenes.
The film begins to find its identity in its second hour,
with Kovic in a miserable Veteran's hospital.  Kovic's
character becomes more clear, and he is shown as something
more than just a naive patriot.  The depiction of the
hospital as a hell-hole with rats, indifferent staff and
broken equipment is effectively chilling.
The film becomes still better after Kovic's return home.
His disillusionment with the War and the government
changes his character, and causes conflicts with his
deeply conservative parents.  His parents (Carolyn Kava
and Josh Evans) are well portrayed, and their clothes
and hairstyles are a perfect fit for the era.
"Born on the Fourth of July" does leave a few loose
ends.  Donna (Kyra Sedgwick) vanishes after a Vietnam
war demonstration, and after building up Kovic's
speech at 1976 Democratic Convention, we don't get to
see it.  We also don't know whether Kovic ever reconciled
with his parents.
Still, an excellent if painful-to-watch film.
This was Oliver Stone's second film to earn him an
Oscar for Best Director, the other also dealing
with Vietnam, "Platoon".  But "Born on the Fourth
of July" covers new ground by concentrating on the
postwar effect of a paralyzed veteran.  The film
was nominated for "Best Picture", "Best Writing" and
"Best Actor" (Cruise).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for On the Waterfront (1954)
"On The Waterfront" is a classic film that nearly measures
up to its reputation.  While the characters are too neatly
divided into good and evil, and the drama is sometimes
overdone, there's never a dull moment, and the cast and
cinematography is excellent.
Marlon Brando stars as a dense washed-up boxer who works on
the waterfront as a flunkie for corrupt union boss Lee J.
Cobb.  Brando's older brother, Rod Steiger, is Cobb's
attorney.  Cobb has a policy of murdering workers who inform.
Brando unwittingly assists in a union-ordered murder,
and gets a subpoena to testify against Cobb.  Aggressive
priest Karl Malden and goody two-shoe new girlfriend
Eva Marie Saint want him to testify.  Cobb tells Steiger
that Brando had better not, or else.
"On The Waterfront" is most famous for Brando's performance,
especially the scene where he tells Steiger that "I coulda
been a contender, I coulda been somebody."  Brando is fine,
but almost anyone could have played the palooka.  Malden
is a bit hammy, but his energy is still welcome.  Cobb is
excellent as the menacing union boss.
Academy Awards and nominations were showered on the cast
and crew of "On The Waterfront".  The film won Best Picture,
Best Writing, Best Actor (Brando), Best Director (Elia Kazan),
Best Cinematography and Best Art Direction (sets).
Eva Marie Saint won Best Supporting Actress, while Malden,
Cobb and Steiger had to settle for Best Supporting Actor
nominations.
It was Marie Saint's first feature film, although she was
already a veteran television performer.  She is proof
that a great production contributes more to receiving
an Oscar than one's performance.
Kazan and Malden must have worked well together, since
Malden had a starring role in four of Kazan's films.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Elmer Gantry (1960)
"Elmer Gantry" was a controversial film when it
was released.  So controversial, that no studio
would finance it.  Based on a Sinclair Lewis
novel, preachers are often depicted as cynical,
fundraising businessmen who consider themselves
to be in the entertainment industry.
Burt Lancaster is the title character, a small-time
salesman, con artist, and would-be preacher.  He
latches onto popular evangelist Jean Simmons, elbowing
into her traveling tent show.  While Simmons takes
the kindler and gentler route to saving souls,
Lancaster preaches fire and brimstone.  Lancaster
tries to change his sinful ways to win Simmons' heart,
but has a lapse upon meeting a woman from his past,
now a prostitute (Shirley Jones).
Considered a classic, "Elmer Gantry" has received
much critical acclaim.  Lancaster won his only
Best Actor Oscar for the film, which also won for
Screenplay and was nominated for Best Picture.
Despite her small role, Jones won Best Supporting
Actress.  Jones had been typecast as The Girl Next Door,
so her cynical hooker role must have shocked some.
"Elmer Gantry" has problems that prevent it
from being a very good film.  Lancaster's character
shifts like the wind.  Early, he appears to be
a grasping if charming con artist.  Upon befriending
Simmons, he drops his bad habits (drinking, smoking,
gambling) just like that.  He mixes heroic actions
with manipulative ones.  Does he love or lust for
Simmons, or is he simply using her as a platform for
a preaching career?  Jones' character is also
too flexible.  At first she is fun-loving but
cynical, but suddenly she seems to be in seriously
in love with Lancaster.
There are some spoilers in the following.
The last third of the film is increasingly
bewildering.  Arthur Kennedy, playing a newspaper
man with the utmost integrity who hangs around
the revivalists, betrays them with a devastating
column, but later gets into a fistfight *for* them.
Lancaster finally seduces the spiritual Simmons,
and neither has any regret, anger or guilt afterwards.
Lancaster's character is completely destroyed, then
completely redeemed, in a few days.  Jones
blackmails Lancaster, then won't take the money,
then tells the press that Lancaster was setup.
Why the sudden turn-around?  Is Lancaster that
hunky?  Lancaster, who is enraged at Jones, ends
up beating up a man who is attacking her.  His
suit is pelted with fruit, but is spotless in
the next scene.  A deaf man is healed by Simmons.
How?  Why?  Then she is killed in a fire, an artificial
contrivance to bring the story to a close.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Blazing Saddles (1974)
"Blazing Saddles" is a parody of the Western movie.
While it is not a particularly good film, it became
the second grossing film of 1974 and has enjoyed a
strong reputation since that time.
The plot has greedy schemer Harvey Korman trying
to become wealthy by grabbing land associated with
a new railroad.  He must drive off the present owners,
who live in the western outpost Rockridge.  Part
of his schemes involves giving them a black sheriff
(Cleavon Little), who soon gets a sidekick (Gene Wilder).
It is hard for a slapstick comedy to be a good film.
The plot isn't much, and the setting exists mostly
to set up gags and jokes.  The film's quality becomes
dependent on how good these gags and jokes are.
How funny they are may be subjective: cowboys farting
after eating a plate full of beans may be hilarious
for a sixth grader, but not so funny for others.
On the other hand, youngsters may miss the humor in
Yiddish-speaking Indians.
Some moments in "Blazing Saddles" are funny.
The theme song (by Mel Brooks) is a riot.
Madeline Kahn's Marlene Dietrich impersonation scores
some points.  Dom DeLuise has a great cameo
as the director of a gay chorus line.  Howard Johnson
owns an ice cream parlor with a sign saying 'one flavor'.
But most of the humor is more silly than effective,
not enough to overcome the thin plot and characters.
Kahn got an Oscar nomination for Best Supporting
Actress for her performance.  Comparing her Dietrich-like
character with the real thing, Dietrich was a lot more
fun in another western comedy, "Destry Rides Again"
from 1939.  Another difference between the two films,
besides the quality of script, cast, plot and characters,
is that "Destry Rides Again" seemed to have a focus,
a direction, while "Blazing Saddles" wanders amiably
but aimlessly.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Pee-wee's Big Adventure (1985)
"Pee-Wee's Big Adventure" was a surprise summer hit in 1985.
Kids loved it, leading to a lengthy Saturday morning television
run for star Pee Wee Herman.  But while the TV show was
only twenty minutes and tightly structured, the film version
has only a thin plot that must cover ninety minutes, leading
to inconsistent humor and an episodic storyline.
Pee Wee Herman's prize possession is his eyesore neon-red
bicycle.  After it is stolen, Pee Wee searches nationwide
for it.  He runs into various characters that are almost as
eccentric as he is.  There is a chase scene involving
Godzilla and Santa Clause.  There is a happy ending.
For those who have escaped American eighties culture, as
well as episodes of Murphy Brown, I will attempt to describe
the character of Pee Wee Herman.  He is nerdy, pre-adolescent,
asexual, and uninhibited.  He makes curious faces, has a
goofy laugh, and has no visible means of support.  When
standing, his arms jut at odd angles from his body, as
if imitating a tea kettle.  He has no clue about what
impression he is making, and has no qualms about turning
people he dislikes into enemies.  He is naively trusting
when it comes to meeting strangers.
While kids embraced the film, the intention was to make a
comedy that adults would enjoy.  But the supporting cast
of chums and antagonists are all cartoonish, especially
a gang of look-alike bikers that share the same two emotions 
of joy and anger.
The best thing about this movie is the soundtrack by 
Danny Elfman, which bounces along merrily.  Burton's direction 
is hit and miss, much as we would expect a movie to be if a 
camera simply follows Herman around.  It is sometimes funny 
and always a little odd.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sergeant York (1941)
"Sergeant York" is a very good, if sometimes
unintentionally humorous, biography of Alvin York.
York was one of the most famous heroes of WWI,
killing 20 Germans and capturing another 130
single-handedly.
Released at a time when the U.S. was preparing for
war, "Sergeant York" reassured the public that
serving your country in war is good, that the Germans
deserve a good beating, and that even Joe Sixpack
can become a stirring war hero.  The film also
has the message that religion can turn around a
failed life, and that religion and defense of your
country do not conflict.
Alvin York (Gary Cooper) begins the film as
a hard drinking Tennessee hellraiser, trying to
scratch out a meager living as a farmer on
bad land with his mother (Margaret Wycherly) and
stone-faced younger brother (Dickie Moore).
After Alvin falls for perky Joan Leslie,
he makes a valiant but unsuccessful attempt to
obtain good "bottom" farmland.  Helped by
preacher Walter Brennan, he turns to religion
and his fortunes immediately improve.
When the U.S. enters WWI, Alvin at first resists
the draft because "killin' is aginst the Bible".
But once he is fighting the "krauts", the former
pacifist seems to enjoy picking off the Germans,
even boasting that it is "just like [shooting]
a flock of turkeys".  Alvin's war heroics play
like a ten year old boy's fantasies, and in the
face of massive acclaim afterwards, he still
retains his 'Aw, Shucks' demeanor.
Cooper is perhaps too old for the role, but he
still deserved his Best Actor Oscar.  Cooper
gives York a self-effacing, rural Southern
character that seems credible.  Cooper is helped
by a fine script, which was co-written by John Huston
and was nominated for Best Original Screenplay.
Howard Hawks was nominated for Best Director,
Sol Polito was nominated for Best B & W Cinematography,
and Walter Brennan and Margaret Wycherly were
respectively nominated for Best Supporting Actor
and Actress.
Sometimes the film is so corny that it seems
ripe for parody, like an unintentional comedy.
But the quality of the script and production values
is very high, and Cooper gives a winning performance.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Only When I Laugh (1981)
Stage actress Marsha Mason is checking out of an alcohol
rehab center, where she has spent the last three months.
She is given a ride back to her New York City home by
Toby (Joan Hackett), her best friend.  Toby is a fading beauty who
is obsessed with her appearance in an attempt to
retain her looks and marriage.  Jimmy (James Coco), her other 
best friend, is stocking the fridge and preparing the
homecoming.  Jimmy is a gay middle-aged actor.
This being a Neil Simon play, there is lots of dialogue,
which is supposed to be funny and heart-warming but
mostly fails to be either.
Later, Mason meets her teenage daughter Kristy McNichol, 
who wants to move in and re-establish their relationship.
Mason also meets her most recent ex-husband, who has
written a play based upon their failed marriage,
and wants her to play the lead. After first saying no 
to both McNichol and her ex, McNichol moves in, and
Mason does the play.  No one asks the question,
who would want to see a play based upon a couple painfully 
arguing for two hours.  I'd rather visit my dentist.
Mason develops an interest in her ex, buying him a present.
But he brings his special other to "meet" her.  She learns
that Toby's husband has left her and filed a divorce.
And Jimmy has been fired from his play.  Mason uses all
this bad news as an excuse to drink again, getting plastered,
causing a scene.  There is much dialogue and hand-wringing.
Mason goes to bar late at night, hits on a guy there, who
then follows her after she leaves, confronts her on the
streets, and assaults her when she is less than friendly,
giving her bruises and a black eye.
The next day, Mason must apologize and explain to her
daughter, who decides to move out.  We are supposed to cry.
Mason wants to cop out of a lunch date, with McNichol and
her father, who is another ex of Mason's.  She says no,
but shows up anyway, wearing sunglasses to cover her
bruised eyes.  We are supposed to stand up and applaud
her courage.
Coco, Hackett, Mason, and McNichol were all nominated
for Academy or Golden Globe awards.  I am surprised that
such an average film received so much attention.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Babe (1995)
It was the battle of the pig movies.  Who would come out on top?
Would it be Gordy or Babe?  Both played in theaters in the
summer of 1995.  Gordy had a three month head start, but it was 
Babe who was the clear winner, both in terms of box office gross 
and in quality.
When the Golden Globe awards for 1995 were announced, the
surprise winner for Best Comedy Picture was "Babe", a movie that 
featured pigs, dogs, and sheep.  Unfortunately, Babe the pig
was not nominated for Best Actor, a clear case of Hollywood
discrimination!  Since dozens of different pigs played Babe,
it would have been quite a spectacle for them all to clomp
down the stairs to the microphones for their acceptance speech.
"Babe" is the story of a pig, destined for greatness rather than
gravy.  Parted from his mother at an early age, and chosen at
random to escape the factory for a life on the farm, Babe must
find his place there.  He hangs with the dogs, and is adopted
by them.  He learns their ways, including how to herd sheep.
He is entered in a sheepdog contest by the Boss, the farmer
husband.  But Babe must overcome many obstacles if he is to win 
the contest and prevent the Boss from being the laughingstock 
of the country.
There are some sad moments in this film.  Some of the animals
meet cruel fates.  The powerlessness of farm animals comes
across: the may not fear God, but they certainly fear man.
Why is this an outstanding film?  First, Babe is a sympathetic
character, an orphan, a little guy, who has to prove himself
worthy, instead of being a pork dinner.  The story is compelling.
The cinematography is beautiful, with the lush greens of the
fields, and lovely black and white puppy dogs. The various animals 
each have their own distinct personalities.  Finally, the 
casting of the farmer (James Cromwell) and his wife 
(Magda Szubanski) is perfect.  After seeing the movie, it is as 
if no one else could have played the roles.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ship of Fools (1965)
"Ship of Fools" was nominated for eight Academy Awards,
but has since fallen into relative obscurity.  It is
chiefly remembered for being Vivien Leigh's final film
(she would die two years later).  While an excellent film,
its strange combinations (1930s politics and 1960s
hairstyles, soap opera-ish romantic subplots and telling
cultural/political insights) manage to reduce its impact.
I last saw the film three years ago, but before seeing it
a second time I could remember only one scene: Lee Marvin
sexually assaulting Leigh.  And I remembered it wrong: she
assaults him!
The story takes place in 1933 on a cruise ship on a voyage
from Cuba to Germany.  The passengers are of mixed
nationalities but mostly wealthy, except for a large
contingent of deported menial Spanish workers.  (It isn't
made clear why they would be going to Germany instead of
Spain, or why a cruise ship would allow them on board).
There is much prejudice shown towards these workers
as well as the Jewish passengers.
"Ship of Fools" tries to be many things: a 'Love Boat'
with multiple love interests and subplots, a character study,
and a satire.  The comedy is provided by outrageous Nazi
Jose Ferrer and punch-drunk washed-up athlete Marvin.
Their exaggerated racist opinions match their exaggerated
characters.  More interesting is the ingratiating Jewish
merchant Lowenthal (Heinz Ruhmann), who is returning to
Germany blissfully indifferent to the cultural changes
occuring there.  There are aging, bitter women (Leigh and
drug-addicted socialist Simone Signoret).  There is a
dwarf (Michael Dunn) who is otherwise an everyman and the
most normal character on board.  The ship's doctor is
played by Oskar Werner, whose chronically depressed
character falls for Signoret.  Other unhappy romances
include those of painter George Segal and Elizabeth Ashley.
Also onboard are a group of predatory Spanish entertainers
led by Jose Greco.
Still, the film is much better than this description
would indicate.  Based on Katherine Anne Porter's novel,
the Abby Mann script was Oscar nominated, and manages to
make the characters ironical and deep despite the discontinuities
of serving an ensemble cast.  Ernest Laszlo's black & white
cinematography (most of the best films up to 1965 were
filmed in B/W) won an Academy Award, as did the sets.
"Ship of Fools" was nominated for Best Picture and
received three acting nominations as well (Werner,
Signoret and Dunn).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Welcome Stranger (1947)
"Going My Way (1944)" starred Bing Crosby and Barry
Fitzgerald, and was such a hit that Hollywood naturally
sought to duplicate it.  Crosby and Fitzgerald would
make four more films together over the next four years.
In "Welcome Stranger", the formula is repeated from
"Going My Way" but with even better results, having
all the charm of the earlier film with none of the
manipulations.
Once again, Fitzgerald is the aging local legend, this
time a country doctor rather than a Catholic priest.
Crosby is again the new man in town, (and definitely
not welcome) called upon to help out the old-timer out.
Fitzgerald dislikes and resents Crosby after numerous
and humorous accidental run-ins.  Of course, they eventually
learn to grow fond of each other.
Crosby romances lovely and respectable schoolteacher
Joan Caulfield, as she is the only attractive woman in
the town.  He has competition from her obnoxious fiance
Robert Shayne, who conspires with his father Charles Dingle
(who also played a schemer in "The Little Foxes") to
put Fitzgerald to pasture and replace him with a crony.
These storylines have exactly the predictable and tidy
endings that you can already guess from this summary,
but there is much charm in the telling.  Crosby's screen
presence is as relaxed as his baritone (of course, several
short musical numbers are worked into the script),
and Fitzgerald is as sly, cantankerous and lovable as ever.
Percy Kilbride has a minor role as a country bumpkin,
a dress rehearsal before playing Pa Kettle in numerous
Universal pictures.
"Welcome Stranger" is a simple comedy with no aspirations
of greatness, but nearly achieves it anyway.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Panic in Needle Park, The (1971)
Stardom would have to wait until "The Godfather"
and "Serpico", but "The Panic in Needle Park"
was the first starring role for Al Pacino.
And what a role: he plays a heroin addict, a
thief and drug dealer, who pimps for his wife
and even helps shoot her up with heroin.
While the plot is secondary to presenting the
addict's lifestyle, there is a story.  Intense,
moody Bobby (Pacino) wins shy, gentle Helen
(Kitty Winn) from indifferent painter Marco
(Raul Julia).  While he is attentive, she soon
realizes that he is an addict living a marginalized
existence.  She becomes addicted as well,
prostituting herself to support her habit.
Bobby dreams of becoming a 'big man', a top
drug dealer, but the New York City police are
closing in.  Among them is Hotchner (Alan Vint),
a narc fond of yellow leather coats whose motto
is 'Every addict rats'.
Pacino plays his character with the cool and
bluster that he would become famous for, but
Winn is also effective as his devoted but
desperate girlfriend.  Winn's career would
fade quickly after her role in "The Exorcist".
Director Jerry Schatzberg has no interest in
glamorizing heroin abuse.  Junkies are presented
as pathetic petty criminals, with sunken and
glazed eyes.  They overdose, they 'rat' on each
other to the police, and getting heroin has become
all-consuming for them.  There are many closeups
of spoons cooking smack, needles piercing veins,
and addicts with their mouths open and eyes vacant.
Sometimes the film has the feel of a documentary:
even the tedium of their laconic, bleak lives
comes across.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Our Hospitality (1923)
"Our Hospitality" is a silent comedy starring Buster
Keaton, one of his first features.  Grading this film
provides one of the occasions where my grade is much
lower than that of the consensus, and it may well be
that I have severely undergraded it.
"Our Hospitality" has Keaton returning via a rickety
train to the land he left as an infant to claim an
inheritance.  Keaton's family (the McKays) and a rival
family (the Canfields, similarity to Hatfield and McCoys
intended) have had a feud spanning several generations.
This feud is typically resolved with a shotgun.
Upon arrival, the Canfield men make numerous attempts
on his life.  Keaton is also courting a Canfield daughter.
This leads to much slapstick and several stunts,
which are hallmarks of Keaton silents.
The plot has some elements later put to use in better
Keaton films.  A train is central to the story, as in
"The General" (1927).  Keaton is a stranger entering a
family feud (and courting the rival family's daughter),
as in "Steamboat Bill, Jr." (1928).
Perhaps the best part of "Our Hospitality" are the scenes
with a mock circa-1830s steam train.  The sluggish train
and its bumpy ride are the butt of many gags.  My favorite
is when a mule refuses to budge from the train tracks.
The train conductor stops the train, and unable to move the
mule, he picks up the train track and moves it!
The film has a slow start, and the characters are
one-dimensional.  The plot also has several repetitive
elements, such as the point made about how slow the train
is, and especially the Canfields shooting at Keaton
in one scene after another.  An occasional gag that
works, and a spectacular stunt or two, do not have a
significant effect on a film's grade.
Some trivia: Keaton's father Joseph and his son Buster Jr.
have bit parts.  Keaton's wife Natalie Talmadge plays his
love interest (this was their only film together).
The film's most famous stunt (Keaton swings from a rope to
rescue Talmadge from falling off the edge of a waterfall)
was executed by Keaton, but a dummy stood in for Talmadge.
Keaton was injured performing the stunt.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for I Walked with a Zombie (1943)
Between 1942 and 1943, Jacques Tourneur directed
three cerebral horror films for RKO studios.
They were "Cat People", "I Walked with a Zombie",
and "The Leopard Man".  While ignored by the
Academy Awards, these films quickly developed
a strong reputation and a cult following.  While
"Cat People" is in the National Film Registry,
and is the more famous and commercially successful
film, "I Walked with a Zombie" may be Tourneur's
best effort.
The story has often been compared to "Jane Eyre",
but the film's mood is very different.  Young
nurse Betsy (Frances Dee) takes a position in
Haiti, where she lives on a sugar plantation
run by unhappy, quarrelling half-brothers
Wesley (James Ellison) and Paul (Tom Conway).
Her patient is Jessica (Christine Gordon),
Wesley's lovely wife who is now in a zombie-like
trance.  With 'modern' medicine unable to cure
her, Jessica is taken by Betsy to the local
witch doctor, whose voodoo cult seems to dominate
the Haiti culture.
The romance between naive Betsy and gloomy Wesley
isn't quite convincing.  But while the leads aren't
interesting, the supporting characters certainly
are.  Paul is a bitter alcoholic, still in love
with Jessica and resentful towards Wesley, whom
he blames for her catatonic state.  Edith Barrett
plays the mother of Paul and Wesley, and her
character has the habit of suddenly appearing
at the most unexpected moments.
The eerie Black & White cinematography is credited
to J. Roy Hunt, who must have seen this film as
a major change of pace.  Calypso singer Sir Lancelot
has a cameo singing a chilling song about the
plantation owners (he would also appear in "Curse
of the Cat People" the following year).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Citizen Kane (1941)
"Citizen Kane" has often been considered the best film
ever made.  While I don't believe this is true ("Casablanca",
among others, is better) it comes close enough to validate
such a strong judgment.
"Citizen Kane" is loosely based on the life of "yellow journalism"
newspaper magnate William Randolph Hearst.  Kane (Orson Welles,
who also directed and co-wrote the screenplay) is separated
from his parents as a child and made heir to an enormous fortune.
Coming of age, he decides to run a newspaper, sensationalizing
the news and considering himself to be the voice of the people.
He develops loyal colleagues in Jedediah Leland (Joseph Cotten)
and Bernstein (Everett Sloane).  With ambitions beyond publishing,
he runs for New York Governor, and later promotes the singing
career of second wife Susan (Dorothy Comingore).  He also
builds Xanadu, an extravagant palace that is never finished.
These various ambitions fail, and Kane dies a wealthy but
spiritually broken man.
"Citizen Kane" is a character study, about a man who
superficially has everything, but still isn't satisfied.
Charles Foster Kane has to prove something, but that
something always changes, and simply cannot be achieved.
This is demonstrated at length by Kane building a lavish
opera house for Susan to perform in, then sending her on
a cross-country tour, in the face of widespread ridicule of
her hopeless lack of talent.
The film is at its best when Kane is a young man, dynamic and
with the straightforward goal of "defending the working man".
A scene where he sings and dances with chorus girls is
marvelous chaos.  Also outstanding is a series of breakfast
encounters between Kane and first wife Emily (Ruth Warrick)
that cover several years and show the fading of the marriage.
In comparison, later scenes drag ever so slightly, as Kane
is reduced to playing lord of Xanadu.
"Citizen Kane" plays little tricks with the audience.
Early in the film, there is a perfect send-up of the
newsreels.  In the scene that Kane's parents discuss his
future, he can be seen through a window playing in the snow.
The chronology mixes past and present events, with dialogue
in the present giving away subsequent events that take place
in the past.
Welles was the leader of the Mercury players, and "Citizen
Kane" marked their transition from radio to cinema.  Welles,
Cotten, and Moorehead would also appear together in
"Journey Into Fear" and "The Magnificent Ambersons" before
nervous studio executives put a halt to Welles' projects.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for C'era una volta il West (1969)
"Once Upon a Time in the West" was the last of
director Sergio Leone's four 'spaghetti westerns'
from the 1960s.  The formula of the first three
films is repeated: excellent cinematography, with
frequent lingering close-ups.  There is much
violence, a notable score by Ennio Morricone,
and the pace is excruciatingly slow.  The major
characters are famous actors from America, but
otherwise the cast and crew are Italian.
The story has crippled magnate Morton (Gabriele
Ferzetti) building a railroad across the West.
Standing in his path is stubborn, hot-headed McBain
(Frank Wolff) who has built land needed by the
railroad.  Morton sends brutal killer Frank
(Henry Fonda) to take care of McBain, but his widow
(Claudia Cardinale) inherits the property.  She
is protected by two other killers; reflective
outlaw Cheyenne (Jason Robards) and mysterious
loner Harmonica (Charles Bronson).
Leone's first three big budget westerns featured
Clint Eastwood.  There was a role for him in
"Once Upon a Time in the West" as well, but he
turned it down.  The role went to Bronson, who
is as tough as Eastwood but not as cool.  Fonda's
murderous character came as a shock to those
used to seeing him in benevolent "Mister Roberts"
roles (supposedly John Wayne had turned down the
part).
This is not, as many claim, Leone's best film.
"The Good, The Bad, and The Ugly" is certainly
better, and better still is "Once Upon a Time
in America".  One can blame the slow pace, but
the other films were slow as well.  Perhaps the
problem is that Fonda's and Bronson's characters
don't seem quite human.
The story is deliberately muddled as well, with
actions taking place long before they are adequately
explained.  I'm still wondering whether Morton dies;
perhaps he was shot by Cheyenne, or perhaps he
crawled out of the train to avoid being shot by
Frank.  Also, if Cheyenne was stopped from reaching
Yuma by his men (the only plausible explanation),
how would they have known to intercept him?
Still, "Once Upon a Time in the West" is a very
good western. It was undeservedly ignored by
the Academy Awards, who should have at least
nominated the film for the sets and cinematography.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Network (1976)
"Network" is an excellent black comedy that attacks
the television industry, its lust for ratings, and its
willingness to sacrifice any standards necessary to
achieve ratings.  While some of the many speeches by
the actors have more passion than spontaneity, they
are well written, and the various plot lines fit together
like a glove.
William Holden plays a world-weary news executive at
money-losing television network UBS.  Peter Finch
is the long-time UBS news commentator.  He is to be
yanked from the air for low ratings, but in one
of his last broadcasts threatens to commit suicide
on the air.  Audience reaction is sensational, and
thanks to prodding from programmer Faye Dunaway,
Finch keeps his job.  The UBS evening news becomes
an entertainment show, complete with psychics, gossips,
and wild rantings from Finch, who closes each broadcast
by fainting onstage.
Holden tries to fight the transformation of the
news show, and is fired by UBS boss Robert Duvall.
Duvall is even more ambitious and cynical than
Dunaway, and it is one of his most energetic
performances.
"Network" is unusual in that the two male leads are
men in late middle age.  Both Finch and Holden were
nominated for Best Actor.  Holden gives the better
performance, and has a magnificent gravelly voice.
However, Finch had died before the awards ceremony,
and his award for Best Actor may have been for
sentimental reasons.
Despite having a very small role, Beatrice Straight
won Best Supporting Actress.  She plays Holden's
wife, who has been abandoned by Holden for Dunaway.
Straight and Holden have an argument that is
very well written and acted.
Dunaway also won an Oscar for Best Actress.  "Network"
deserved won Best Writing, and was nominated for
Best Cinematography, Film Editing, Director (Sidney
Lumet) and Best Picture.  While "Rocky" won that year,
"Network" was the real star of the 1977 Academy Awards.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Death of a Salesman (1985) (TV)
"Death of a Salesman" may be the Great American
Tragedy.  No matter how many other successful plays
Arthur Miller may have had, he will always be
remembered for bringing Willy Loman to life.
In 1984, Dustin Hoffman was cast as Willy in a
Broadway revival.  Most of the cast was retained
for a broadcast television production.  Volker
Schlondorff, whose entire previous career was
spent in Germany and France, became the director.
The story is depressing and even disturbing, as
it has the effect of challenging the viewer to
consider the value of his or her own life.  Willy
has spent his adult life as a struggling salesman,
and has lived under the delusion that he and his
family were destined for success, even greatness.
His wife Linda (Kate Reid) knows the truth, but
participates in his husband's delusions since
dreams are all that he has left.
But now Willy's dreams are shattered.  Prematurely
senile, he is fired from his longtime job and lives
on handouts from his old friend Charley (Charles
Durning).  Son Biff (John Malkovich) is jobless
and a kleptomaniac.  Son Happy (Stephen Lang) is
a cynical womanizer.  A broken man, Willy is
considering suicide.  As the story unfolds, it is
finally made clear why Biff has been such a failure,
with the blame seeping into Willy's life as well.
The play also ironically contrasts the parenting
skills of Willy and Charley.  Willy lives for his
two sons, and showers attention on them.  Charley
takes little interest in his nerdy son Bernard
(David S. Chandler), who nonetheless becomes an
important lawyer.
"Death of a Salesman" is not an enjoyable film
to watch.  The title gives away the ending, and
casts a gloomy pall over an already depressing
storyline.  If most folks live a life of quiet
desperation, Willy has graduated to the next
level.  While downbeat films have made great
cinema before (e.g. "The Lost Weekend"), it
doesn't happen here.
"Death of a Salesman" did well at the Golden Globes
(in the television movie category).  Hoffman won
Best Actor, while Malkovich and Reid were nominated
for their Supporting roles.  The film was also
nominated for Best Picture.  Hoffman and Malkovich
also won Emmy awards.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
Atom Egoyan directed, co-produced, and wrote the
screenplay for "The Sweet Hereafter", a critically
acclaimed film about a tragic school bus accident
and its effect on a small town.  While parts of the
film are good, it never fully takes off, and the
lead character (a grim lawyer with family problems)
is disappointing.
The story is told through a series of chronologically
jumbled pieces, sometimes leaving the viewer confused
as to whether the scene took place before or after
the accident.  Friendly, dependable Mrs. Driscoll
(Gabrielle Rose) has been driving the school bus for
the past twenty years.  This time, however, the bus
hits an ice patch, and careens off the road onto a
frozen lake.  The ice cracks, the bus sinks, and some
children die, while some survive with injuries, as
does Mrs. Driscoll.
While the parents are still shocked and grieving,
middle-aged lawyer Mitchell Stephens (Ian Holm) arrives
on the scene, seeking to file a class action lawsuit
against someone or something, and enlisting the parents,
children and bus driver to his cause.  To complicate
the plot, Stephens has a runaway, drug-addicted daughter
(Caerthan Banks), and we learn that several of the
parents are involved in illicit affairs, which apparently
includes incest.
Those who love disaster films will be disappointed in
the accident scene: we see the bus go off the road, but
we don't see what is happening inside.  The chaos, drama
and horror of the actual accident is bypassed.
The gloomy atmosphere is shared by the entire cast.
Driscoll and her stroke victim husband (David Hemblen)
are well-defined characters, as is paralyzed teenager
Nicole (Sarah Polley).  However, Stephens, an unhappy,
reflective man, seems to come alive only when somebody
(including himself) is angry.
The reservations I had with the film were not shared
by the Academy, which gave "The Sweet Hereafter"
Oscar nominations for Best Director and Best Adapted
Screenplay.  The film also won the Cannes "Special
Grand Prize of the Jury".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Razor's Edge, The (1984)
"The Razor's Edge" is an ambitious and well-intentioned film,
but it just isn't very good.  The story needs severe
tightening, and the script could use improvement as well.
"The Razor's Edge" is based on the W. Somerset Maugham novel.
Bill Murray was hot for this project, and agreed to act in
"Ghostbusters II" in order to achieve the financing for this film.
He plays a wealthy American hedonist who has (apparently out of 
boredom) volunteered to serve in a Red Cross-style outfit during 
World War I.  He soon learns that war is hell.  Murray returns 
home, then decides to go to France, where he works as a fishpacker, 
then a coal miner.  Now searching for the meaning of life, he 
travels to the mountains of India.  He grows tired of this and 
returns to France.
While Murray does his globetrotting, his friends back in
America suffer financial and personal setbacks.  They come
to France to spounge off wealthy relation Denholm Elliot.
There are two women who want Murray and yet don't want him.  
Will Bill get the girl?  Which one?  And will the viewer 
have lost interest by then?
"The Razor's Edge" is a mess, and the problems begin with
the storyline.  There may well be two or three good movies
here, for example, Murray the World War I soldier,
Murray the coal miner, or Murray the seeker of truth.
Perhaps even Murray the womanizer.  But in attempt to
cover the entire novel, the movie loses its focus and
becomes episodic.
Theresa Russell plays one of Murray's love interests.
She is very pretty, but can she act?  Maybe the script is
partly to blame, since she is given some dreadful lines.
"The Razor's Edge" also seems confused as to genre.  It isn't
a comedy, or an action film, or a soap opera.  It is a little
bit of all three, but mostly a lot of nothing.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Dear Brigitte (1965)
"Dear Brigitte" is a harmless family movie and comedy that 
passes time agreeable enough, but is rarely funny and
has a storyline that lacks credibility.
James Stewart plays an irascible college professor, a poet who
mocks science while promoting liberal arts.  His dutiful wife
is Glynis Johns.  He has an attractive but stupid daughter,
who is dating an attractive but stupid man (Fabian, who somehow
got second billing for his minor role).  Also about is eccentric
"captain" Ed Wynn.  Stewart has a pre-teen son Erasmus, who proves to
be a math prodigy and the world's greatest racetrack handicapper.
The film centers around Stewart and his son.  Stewart wants
to make an artist of him, but instead the kid, who is tone deaf
and color blind, suddenly develops math abilities far beyond 
anyone who has ever lived (but is otherwise completely normal).  
He can also pick the winner of any horse race.  Stewart at
first wants to protect the child, but later sacrifices his
values and gambles large amounts of money recklessly.
Brigitte Bardot, the title subject and apparent mother substitute
for young Erasmus, has a cameo near the end of the movie.
One thing that annoyed me about this film is that the various
pretty young women are all stupid.  Glynis Johns isn't, so the 
writer apparently believes women gain thirty I.Q. points as they
age.  Speaking of age, Stewart would be better cast as the
prodigy's grandfather.
"Dear Brigitte" is watchable despite its flaws.  Still, it
too often surrenders plot and character development in an 
attempt for a laugh that doesn't arrive.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for America, America (1963)
Born in Turkey, Elia Kazan became one of Hollywood's
best directors.  He is best known for "On the Waterfront",
"A Streetcar Named Desire", and "Gentleman's Agreement",
but my favorite film of his was his first, "A Tree Grows
in Brooklyn", from 1945.
"America, America" was Kazan's most personal effort,
telling the true story of his uncle's struggle to emigrate
to America at the turn of the century.  It was the first
screenplay that Kazan wrote, and it is outstanding.
Judging from this film, one could conclude that Kazan
was even better at writing scripts than directing films.
The Turks, then part of the Ottoman Empire, oppressed the
Armenian and Greek minorities.  The Armenians, who would be
slaughtered by the hundreds of thousands in 1915, get the
worst of it because they resist.  The Greeks endure their
subjegation in silence.
Abdul (Lou Antonio) is an intense and serious young man,
of Greek heritage. He is the oldest son of his father, who
depends on him to improve the lives of his family.  Abdul
is obsessed with leaving his homeland for the land of
opportunity and wealth, America.  But to reach his goal,
he must suffer hardships and compromise his character.
After he is robbed of the family's savings, he tries to save
money for the ship's passage by working as a day laborer.
He is slow to realize that money can never be saved
in such a life, and must swallow his pride and accept an
arranged marriage to secure passage.  Further indignities
are in store for him, as he is willing to make any sacrifice
neccessary to reach America and live up to the expectations
and faith that his family has placed in him.
"America, America" was nominated for several important Academy
Awards, including Best Director, Best Picture and Best Screenplay.
But 1963 was also the year for "Tom Jones", another excellent
film, and one that Academy voters were likely more comfortable with.
Antonio's intense performance was relatively ignored with the
focus on Kazan, although Antonio has since become one of the
top directors of American television shows.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for M (1931)
Fritz Lang's first sound film was "M", a crime
drama that also made Peter Lorre a star.  The film
was made in Germany shortly before the Nazis
came to full power.  Both Lang and Lorre had
Jewish family connections, and would soon emigrate
to America where their respective careers would
continue successfully.
The story has Lorre playing a pathetic, tormented
murderer of little girls.  As the list of his
victims grow, Berlin falls into a state of panic.
Citizens begin accusing each other of being the
child killer.  In their frustrated search for the
murderer, the police crack down heavily on criminal
activity.  Organized crime figures decide that they
must find the killer themselves, to return to
business as usual.  Soon, both the cops and the
crooks are closing in on Lorre.
Lang takes pains to show the similarities between
the police captains and the crimelords.  Both meet
seperately to decide how to stop the killer, and
Lang switches back and forth between the two meetings.
While the two groups may have different methods, the
end result is the same: Lorre is to be identified,
captured, tried, and executed.
Lorre was well cast as the killer.  His nasal voice
and unsettling manner and appearance played to
stereotypes of what a child killer would be like.
Once he becomes hunted, his wide eyes and furtive
behavior express fear and desperation.  Once in
Hollywood, he would overcome this early stereotype
in a series of Mr. Moto films, and was later best
known for his supporting roles in "The Maltese Falcon"
and "Casablanca".
Hollywood would remake "M" in 1951, using none of
the original crew or cast.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Local Hero (1983)
"Local Hero" is a gentle comedy from Scotland.
There's little action or plot, but the script,
characters and direction all have a quirky
irreverence that is charming if not fully
convincing.
Peter Riegert is a young executive sent to
Scotland to buy a small coastal town for its
oil rights.  Burt Lancaster is his boss, but
he is more interested in astronomy than business.
Riegert soon has a goony-eyed sidekick in
Peter Capaldi, who is in love with aptly named
Marina (Jennifer Black).  Riegert finds that
the townsfolk, particularly proprietor Dennis
Lawson, are greedily willing to sell out.
The cinematography of the seashore and ocean is
attractive, and the little Scottish village is
quaint.  The charm of the quiet village life is
contrasted with the frantic corporate lifestyle
of Houston, Texas.  At film's end, Riegert is
obligated to return to Texas, and it clear
that he does not want to go.
"Local Hero" has more than its share of humorous
moments, which unfortunately can't be revealed
without spoiling them.  Other scenes don't come
off as well, especially those involving Lancaster's
abusive shrink (Norman Chancer).  We are to believe
that young and indolent Capaldi knows a dozen
different languages. The whimsy of the script and
eccentricities of the supporting characters can't
fully hide the simplicity of the plot, which
takes us nowhere slowly.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for L-Shaped Room, The (1963)
Leslie Caron may be best known for playing
the love interest in "An American in Paris",
"Father Goose", and "Gigi", but those weren't
the films that earned her two Best Actress
Academy Award nominations.  They came ten
years apart, in the 1953 children's film
"Lili", and in the 1963 character study
"The L-Shaped Room".
In the latter film, a British production
directed by Bryan Forbes, Caron plays a
pregnant woman who is unsure of her future.
Jane is from a well-to-do French family, but
emigrates to England to find her own way
seperate from her lover and family.  She
soon discovers poverty, but also makes friends
in the low-rent apartment building where she
stays.
First among these is Toby (Tom Bell), an
attentive, impassioned but failed writer, and
helpful, gentle Johnny (Brock Peters, fresh
from playing the defendant in "To Kill a
Mockingbird").  There's also a middle-aged
lesbian (Cicely Courtneidge).
Then as now, there is little glory in unwed
pregnancy.  Everyone assumes that Jane is
looking for a then-illegal abortion.  Toby
is the last character to be aware of her
predicament, which Jane keeps secret from
him out of fear of losing his romantic interest.
Jane herself is uncertain of what to do about
her pregnancy and her life, but she knows one
thing.  She won't do anything just because
somebody wants her to do it, and her refusal
to commit to anyone or anything leads to
much suffering.  The major characters are all
sympathetic to Jane, but are frustrated by
her indecisions.
Considered almost shocking at the time of
release, "The L-Shaped Room" actually is much
more conservative than the black comedies of
the era (e.g. "Dr. Strangelove", "Manchurian
Candidate", "Whatever Happened to Baby Jane").
The film itself is sometimes slow, and the
dialogue, especially from Courtneidge, can
be difficult to follow for these Yankee ears.
The sets are drab, which is realistic but
not lending itself to pleasing cinematography.
Caron is a fine actress, but her character's
restless nature doesn't give her enough to
work with.  In the end, "The L-Shaped Room"
is well-intentioned but fails to execute.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Rebel Without a Cause (1955)
"Rebel Without a Cause" had an outstanding, if unfortunate,
promotional gimmick.  Young, charismatic lead James Dean,
his star on the rise from his performance in the highly
successful "East of Eden", died in a car accident less
than a month before the film's release.  Perhaps this was a
case of life imitating art, since a dangerous game of 'chicken'
is one of the highlights of "Rebel".  With its attractive
leads, a teens-in-peril theme, and a fast-moving plot,
"Rebel" was a tremendous commercial success.  It also
created a cultural impact that formed the basis for its
critical praise.  Along with "The Wild One", "Blackboard
Jungle" and rock 'n' roll music, "Rebel" fanned fears
(justified or not) among conservative parents that teens
would choose anti-establishment heroes and values.
The story features three teenagers, each from dysfunctional
families.  Jim (James Dean) has a shrewish mother (Ann Doran)
and spineless father, leaving him afraid of becoming a
'chicken' like his father (Jim Backus).  Judy (Natalie Wood)
has a father (William Hopper) who is physically repelled by
her, making her anxious to find love from a father substitute.
Plato is a creepy, sad-faced teen whose parents are absent,
leaving him to be raised by a nanny (Marietta Canty).  Plato
is looking for substitutes for both mother and father,
momentarily achieving this when Jim and Judy appear willing.
Anyway, that is my amateur psychological evaluation of the
leads.  Your mileage may vary.
Our three troubled teens have brushes with the law and
with gangs of tough-talking hoodlums led by Buzz
(Corey Allen) and Goon (Dennis Hopper).  "Rebel Without a
Cause" expresses the theory that juvenile delinquents
from affluent, 'good' families is not the fault of the
mixed-up kids, but their mixed-up parents.  The apparent
conclusion is that the social problem can be solved by
assigning a psychiatrist to every juvenile offender,
ideally with their parents participating.
James Dean's onscreen persona is surprisingly sensitive
and loyal to his friends.  He only resorts to violence
when he is forced to, except for a frustrated attack on
his dithering, hapless father.  Backus actually wears a
large, matronly apron throughout one lengthy scene: Dean,
you'll have to find a role model elsewhere.
"Rebel Without a Cause" was nominated for three Academy
Awards, including Best Supporting Actor (Mineo) and
Actress (Wood).  Dean was posthumously nominated for
Best Actor that year, but for the film "East of Eden",
losing to (believe it or not) Ernest Borgnine.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Strangers on a Train (1951)
"Strangers on a Train" is an outstanding crime drama, and
is perhaps Alfred Hitchcock's best film.  The story's focus
is on creating and extending dramatic tension, and Hitchcock
succeeds in this completely.
Farley Granger is a top tennis player, unsuccessfully seeking
to divorce promiscuous wife Laura Elliot to marry Ruth Roman,
who is the daughter of U.S. Senator Leo G. Carroll.
Granger accidentally meets Robert Walker on a train.
Walker is a charming but no-account son of a demanding wealthy
businessman.  Walker has the idea that they exchange murders:
Walker kills Elliot, while Granger kills the businessman.
Granger laughs off Walker as an eccentric, but soon Walker
kills Elliot, then demands that Granger kill his father, or
else.  Meanwhile, Granger is the prime suspect for the murder.
Hitchcock does all that he can to create suspense.
Many scenes, such as Elliot screaming in the tunnel of love,
Walker straining to retrieve a dropped cigarette lighter, or the
famous scene of an elderly man crawling under a wildly spinning
merry-go-round to shut it down, are used to promote
the tension.  A lengthy sequence has Granger having to
rush through a tennis match and escape police to confront
Walker.  Granger and fiancee Roman have many shots during these
scenes with anxious looks on their faces: the tension
that they are feeling is translated to the audience.
There is also the open question of whether Granger will
try to kill Walker's father.
There are two characters in this film that I really
liked.  Walker is a terrific villain: crazy but wily,
unpredictable, and he always has a clever line.
Walker did not live long to enjoy his success: he died
while the film was still playing in theaters.  I also liked
the Senator's youngest daughter (played by Patricia Hitchcock),
whose brash personality and similar appearance to Elliot
are cleverly used in the plot.
But even with a nearly perfect film a few flaws can be found.
Three separate characters, matronly ladies about sixty years
old, are given similar eccentric and excitable characters
(Walker's mother, Walker's demonstration victim at the party,
and the woman whose car is seized by policemen).  Also, in the
great merry-go-round climax, a policeman fires recklessly
into a crowd of people.  Give that man a desk job!
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Anderson Tapes, The (1971)
"The Anderson Tapes" is part comedy, part crime drama, easily
and effectively shifting gears.  Sean Connery is John Anderson,
a safecracker who has spent the past ten years in prison.
Once freed, he returns to his former girlfriend Ingrid (Dyan Cannon), 
staying at her apartment.  They are so glad to see each other that
they make love at every opportunity.
He also returns to his old ways, planning a major heist of the 
apartment complex.  He forms a team, mostly of old buddies from
prison.  Crooked antiques dealer Tommy Haskins (Martin Balsam)
is needed to appraise and fence the goods.  Balsam plays an
outrageous homosexual.  Normally, my reaction to such a stereotype
is stereotypical in itself, but Balsam clearly relishes the
role, and is so funny at it that all is forgiven.  He has the
best line of the film, directed at Connery: "Meet anybody
interesting... in your cell?"
"The Anderson Tapes" is Christoper Walken's first feature film.
He is Connery's protege, also a safecracker.
Connery also solicits mob money from Alan King.  King also sends
middle-aged goon Socks (Val Avery) with the stipulation that
Socks must be killed in the robbery.  Connery is shook up by
this, and we learn that he abhors violence.
Wherever Connery goes, he is being recorded.  Even at the bus
stop out of prison.  All the ex-cons he visits are also being
bugged or videotaped, all by different government agencies with
different motives.  None of them seem to care that Connery is
planning a robbery, however, since that is not their area.
One agency only cares about narcotics, another only about
political activists, etc.
The apartment building robbery goes well at first.  Dressed
as Mayflower movers, they move from room to room stealing
goodies.  Connery struggles to keep Socks from beating the
tenants, but he needs him to force their cooperation.
Connery is eventually tricked by a clever crippled teenager
who reports the crime with a ham radio, leading to a
swarm of police waiting outside the building.  There is
an inevitable confrontation, with some spectacular car
crashes.
The soundtrack is by Quincy Jones.  It is full of nifty jazz
numbers, plus occasional bleeping and buzzing related to
Connery's various encounters with cameras.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Black Swan, The (1942)
"The Black Swan" is a technicolor swashbuckler, combining
romance and adventure, with colorful costumes.  However,
the film often plods, and the epic pirate swordfights
have more energy than conviction.
It is the seventeenth century.  A treaty has been signed 
between England and Spain, awarding Jamaica to British rule.
The pirate ships that have been raiding Spanish vessels
are now targets themselves.  Former pirates Henry Morgan
and Jaime Waring (Tyrone Power) hunt fiery pirate Billy Leech, 
but are betrayed by foppy spy Roger Ingram. Ingram's fiancee 
is Margaret (Maureen O'Hara), but he has a rival in Waring.
O'Hara is beautiful, but her character is a stereotype
of a proud woman accustomed to wealth and privilege.
None of the characters, in fact, is broadly drawn
except for red-bearded pirate Leech, who will never
bow to the authority of any king.
There are too few scenes of true swashbuckling action, and
too much time spent on political intrigue and Margaret's
romance with Waring.  She plays hard to get, while he
justly wonders why he keeps trying (perhaps because she
has second billing).
The costumes are good, but the film was clearly filmed
on a Hollywood set and not on the high seas.  There are
many "outdoor" scenes with superimposed backgrounds.
Sometimes this is an acceptable means of expediting a
film's shooting on budget, but in this case the effect
simply adds to the movie's superficial atmosphere.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Three Musketeers, The (1921)
"The Three Musketeers" is a silent film starring Douglas
Fairbanks Sr.  Although it has the same elements of comedy,
swashbuckling action and romance as the superior Richard
Lester version from 1974, it is not nearly as good.
It is also not as good as some other Fairbanks vehicles
such as "The Mark of Zorro" and "The Thief of Bagdad",
which were also action epics based on foreign language
classics.
"The Three Musketeers" is based on the French novel by
Alexandre Dumas.  The King of France (Adolphe Menjou) is
a weak-minded man manipulated by his sinister advisor
Cardinal Richelieu (Nigel de Brulier).
The Cardinal conspires against the Queen who opposes his
influence.  Fortunately for her, she is aided by
the King's Musketeers, who have just welcomed young
D'Artagnan (Fairbanks) into their ranks.
Fairbanks is truly a hammy actor. He is particularly fond
of sweeping arm gestures.  Still, over-acting is not
necessarily bad acting, and he is fun to watch.
One does gets the feeling that he is always playing the
same character, whether he is dressed as Zorro,
D'Artagnan, or the Thief.  Although the setting
changes with each film, Fairbank's character is always
at the center of attention, and can do the impossible.
The problem with this film is that it lacks cohesion.
While there is much action, it is often muddled, and it
is tough to follow what is going on.  The comic relief
(e.g. a Musketeer is invited to dinner, and four show up,
including a rotund one who looks like he could consume a
whole hog by himself) does not come off.
"The Mark of Zorro", a Fairbanks film from the year
before (1920) is a better film and a lot more fun.
The major differences between the two is that the Zorro
flick had more swordplay and a simpler story, unencumbered
by the heavy plotting and the numerous supporting players
that "The Three Musketeers" had.  Sometimes more can
be less.
By this way, this silent film was not the first adaptation
of the French novel.  According to the ever-useful
www.imdb.com, there are four earlier versions, the first
dating from 1911.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for College (1927)
"College" is a silent film starring Buster Keaton.  It is
loaded with slapstick gags, most of which succeed.  Two Keaton
trademarks are missing here: there are no stunts to speak of,
and the plot does not center on transportation (no boats,
trains or automobiles star in this picture).
Keaton plays a nerdy Valedictorian graduate at high school.
He wants to win "the most popular girl in school", but she
prefers athletes.  Now at college, Keaton tries out for the
baseball and track teams in order to impress her.  Keaton,
of course, is a spectacular failure at every athletic event
he attempts.  More slapstick occurs as Keaton works at 
part-time jobs.
In this, as in other Keaton silent films, his character makes 
a sudden (and unlikely) transition from klutz to hero.
In the climax, Keaton executes flawlessly all the track and field
events that he was such a flop at earlier in the picture.
"College" was made the same year as "The General".  However,
it is not nearly as compelling.  Perhaps this is because
James Horne and not Keaton is credited as Director.  Perhaps
the shorter length puts the focus on a series of gags rather
than developing character or broadening the plot.  But
"College" simply isn't very ambitious: it succeeds as a
comedy, but the lack of drama limits the film.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Don King: Only in America (1997) (TV)
"Don King: Only in America" is a biography of the colorful
kingpin of professional boxing.  However, it also works as a
comedy, and as a commentary on how corrupting the search for 
wealth and power can be.
The HBO production, a made-for-TV film, is very daring in 
its depiction of King.  He is portrayed as a pimp, a murderer,
a numbers-runner, a liar, a thief, and a con artist, with 
strong ties to organized crime.  One has to separate the real 
Don King from his portrayal in the film: I am writing about the
character, who may or may not have done the things he is
alleged to have done.  How accurate the movie may be, however,
is not relevant to its high quality.
"Don King: Only in America" begins in the 1950s, but moves
rapidly in time to the mid 1970s.  Don King is seen killing two
people, the second of which puts him in prison for manslaughter.
There, he dreams of becoming a fight promoter.  Upon release,
he has great success.  He is a natural salesman and broker, 
clever with bribes and knowing what people can further his
career.  Gradually, he takes over heavyweight boxing, signing
all the top boxers even as he cheats them of their purses.
There is a lot of profanity in this movie.  It didn't bother
me at all, as it seems natural to King's character and situations.
My only complaints are minor: Darius McCrary plays Muhammad Ali 
well and has his voice inflections perfectly.  However, he still 
looks like Eddie Winslow from the dismal sitcom "Family Matters."
And the boxing scenes aren't too realistic: mostly one boxer
beats on another with no defense demonstrated at all.
Ving Rhames gives a great performance as Don King.  It is rare for a
film to succeed so well when concentrating on a single character,
but the character is rich and the portrayal is convincing.
Someone remarks that King "could sell sand to a desert",
and this is credible despite all of King's weaknesses.
Waving a cigar, hair pointed up "to hide the horns", mixing
profanity and invented (but very humorous, e.g. "negro-ciating") 
verbs, always with a briefcase of cash and a blank contract 
(to be filled in AFTER it has been signed), Don King may be 
the greatest swindler and deal-maker of our era.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for When We Were Kings (1996)
The 1974 heavyweight championship fight between
George Foreman and Muhammad Ali is the subject of
this film, which won an Academy Award for Best
Documentary Feature.  A pair of famous journalists
who attended the fight, George Plimpton and Norman
Mailer, provide reminiscenses.  Their commentary
is fronted with archival footage of Ali, Foreman,
fight promoter Don King, performers at a concert
organized by King, dictator Mobuto, and Zaire
itself, where the fight was held.  There is also
narration by Spike Lee and Thomas Hauser.
Ali's brash, charismatic personality comes across
in numerous press conferences and interviews.
He was not only a great champion, but highly
entertaining as well.  Africans were quick to
embrace him over the menacing, sullen Foreman,
the reigning champion who had seemed invincible
after quick knockouts of Joe Frazier and Ken
Norton.  The press loved and respected Ali as well,
not only for his good-natured banter and boasting,
but for the values he represented and his
apt observations.  In those days, Foreman had
no resemblance to the amiable, loquacious
person that he would later become.
Promoter Don King is described as brilliant and
hard-working but 'completely amoral'.  Mobuto is
labelled as a murderous dictator, and is compared
to Joseph Stalin for his cult of personality.
Norman Mailer makes the from-left-field observation
that all dictators are ugly.
Before the fight, there was a major concert
in Zaire.  James Brown, B. B. King and The
Spinners were among the performers.  Footage from
this concert also makes it into the documentary.
The documentary succeeds in recreating the atmosphere
of the Ali-Foreman fighter.  It does seem padded,
however, and the series of film clips sometimes
lack a cohesion which is only partly provided by
the Plimpton-Mailer narration.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Top Hat (1935)
"Top Hat" was one of ten films that Fred Astaire
and Ginger Rogers made together, and is probably
the most famous of those films.  It was nominated
for Best Picture, and features songs by Irving
Berlin.
The plot has dancer Astaire working on a show
with producer Edward Everett Horton.  He romances
Ginger Rogers, who plays hard to get, mostly
because she thinks that he is Horton, who is
already married to Helen Broderick.  Astaire's
rival for Rogers is Erik Rhodes, who plays a
comic relief character, the pompous fashion
designer Beddini.
Astaire's vehicles are praised primarily for the
dance numbers.  Certainly, Astaire can glide
across a dance floor, and he can tap dance and
choreograph a production number.  It is apparent
that much effort has gone into his performance.
He knows how to sing, although his voice is nothing
special, and the songs have been painstakingly
composed, although bland from being stripped of
anything that anyone would find objectionable.
One of the dance numbers has Astaire shooting
a row of dancers with his cane.  Originality
like this is much more interesting to me than
watching Astaire flail his arms and tap dance,
which Bugs Bunny can do with more flair.
But most of the movie is dialogue, and if you
are renting the film for the dancing you will
need to do plenty of fast-forwarding.  The script
is average, with the plot based on a misunderstanding,
as if taken from an episode of "Three's Company".
The character with a thick foreign accent, Beddini,
is also the biggest jerk in the film.  Normally
this "co-incidence" would bother me, but I have to
admit that he is my favorite character in the film.
Director Mark Sandrich should have given him more
scenes.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Adam's Rib (1949)
"Adam's Rib" is a comedy starring Spencer Tracy and
Katherine Hepburn, one of many films that they made
together.  The film is well cast and well directed,
with a fairly good script.  The script does resort
to petty bickering, and some of the characters
should have been made more sympathetic.  The script
also makes unnecessary points about gender equality.
The story has Tracy and Hepburn as a married couple.
Tracy is a Prosecutor, Hepburn an attorney, and they
end up on opposite sides of an attempted murder trial.
Judy Holliday is the not-too-bright defendant, having
shot her negligent husband Tom Ewell after catching
him with floosie Jean Hagen.  Hepburn's defense
relies on the dubious assumption that a husband would
be found innocent of such a shooting, and thus
convicting Holliday would be a sexist double standard.
The Tracy/Hepburn marriage is strained by Hepburn's
zealous defense, and also by obnoxious composer
David Wayne, who has the hots for Hepburn.
This comedy has two love triangles, Holliday-Ewell-Hagen
and Tracy-Hepburn-Wayne.  One problem is that all
members of the first triangle are unsympathetic,
and that justice would be served by locking them
all indefinitely in the same jail cell.  The second
love triangle is more interesting, especially since
Hepburn subtly encourages Wayne's behavior.  Movie
audiences at the time may have taken a pool as to when
Spencer would finally punch Wayne.  He does so, at about
the ninety minute mark, and certainly no jury would
convict him of assault.
The point being made by the Ruth Gordon/Garson Kanin
script is that there is little difference between the
sexes.  During the trial, Hepburn puts three women
on the stand.  They have no relevance to the case,
except that they have all succeeded in "masculine"
fields.  Hepburn makes a circus of the trial, enraging
Tracy.  Tracy is clearly the more sympathetic of the
protagonists.
The basic story is good, and served as a premise for
an "Adam's Rib" television series in 1973.  The script
received an Oscar nomination, and the New York Film
Critics Circle awarded Judy Holliday their Best Actress
award.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Things Change (1988)
Gino (Don Ameche) is an eldery shoe-shiner working at his small
shoestore in Chicago, who dreams of being a fisherman back 
in his native Sicily.  One day two serious, well-dressed men
enter his shop, give him a $100 bill, and tell him to appear
at the home of a gentleman that evening.
When Ameche appears, he is asked to plead guilty to a
murder in return for cash.  Ameche, it turns out, looks much
like the Mafia henchman who committed the murder.  Ameche
says no, but changes his mind.  He signs a confession and
puts his fingerprints on the murder weapon.  He is given
a silver coin as a sign of friendship.
Jerry (Joe Mantegna) is a likeable Mafia flunkie who has disobeyed
orders and is "on probation", which entails kitchen duty
and ridicule.  Mantegna is given the assignment to keep watch
over Ameche in a hotel room until he can appear at a hearing
on Mantegna.
Mantegna instead takes Ameche with him to Lake Tahoe.  There is
no mention of who pays for this junket.  When the two arrive,
Mantegna tries to impress a Mafia limo driver with a tale
that Ameche is a top Mafia kingpin.  Ameche is given a royal
treatment, the best room in the hotel, and is pandered to,
because the limo driver tells the hotel manager about Ameche.
Ameche is given gambling money and wins because the roulette
wheel has been fixed in his favor.  Ameche later loses the money.
The stereotype of crooked games and crime-run casinos isn't
very believable.
Two beautify women, apparently Mafia groupies, proposition
Ameche and Mantegna.  Their offer to go fishing is declined.
A local kingpin (Robert Prosky) hears of Ameche's arrival, 
and sends for him.  Suspicious, he is about to have Ameche killed, 
but decides not to when Ameche gives him the silver coin.  One is
reminded of "Being There", which had Peter Sellers mistaken
for someone of great importance.  Like Sellers, Ameche's
character is completely bland and unassuming.  Prosky
gives Ameche a quarter, telling him that he should give him 
a call if he is ever in trouble.
Feeling things are getting out of control, Mantegna decides
to return to Chicago early.  The hotel is having a
convention of Mafia businessmen (such a coincidence) and
they have to sneak out and steal one of the expensive cars.
Mantegna first runs out of gas, then discovers he has
no money.  The gas station owner is about to call the
sheriff, but Amecha pays the tab.  He has borrowed money 
(in another amazing coincidence) from the beautiful women 
who just happened to be returning from their fishing trip and 
getting gas at that same time at the same gas station.
Mantegna returns Ameche to the Chicago hotel room that they 
were never supposed to have left.  Mantegna, feeling bad 
about the shaft Ameche is getting, tells him to run for it, 
but Ameche stays put, saying he has made a deal.
A henchman shows up and walks Mantegna and Ameche to court.
The henchman gives Mantegna a handgun and gives him two minutes
to off Ameche, as things would be "cleaner" this way.  Mantegna
confronts Ameche but can't do it.  Instead, Mantegna assaults
the henchman, knocking him dazed to the ground.  Ameche calls
Prosky, who fixes things up: the henchman takes the rap, and 
Ameche is back working at his shoe story.  But Ameche now has a 
co-worker, Mantegna.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
The original Dr. Dolittle was a children's book by
Hugh Lofting.  It was later a 1927 German-made silent
film.  The version most familiar, of course, is the
1967 film starring a diffident Rex Harrison, which was
perhaps the worst film ever to be nominated for
Best Picture.  The 1967 film did win an Oscar for
Best Song, "Talk to the Animals".  The song is the only
link to the latest incarnation, which is a comedy
starring Eddie Murphy.
Murphy began his film career on a high note, in "48 HRS."
and "Trading Places".  His films have never the same
since then, although "Coming to America" and "The Nutty
Professor" were good efforts.  Murphy is a gifted comic,
an inspired mimic and trash talker, and a master of the
double take.  But as he has succeeded in reaching a
mass audience in making films with strongest appeal to
children, he has had to abandon much of his R-rated
persona in the process.  The older, tamer Murphy still
owns the double take, but I miss his more dangerous side.
The plot of "Doctor Dolittle" has Murphy cast as a
successful surgeon, about to complete some kind of sell-out
to a conglomerate with some fellow doctors that will make them
all even more rich.  Murphy suddenly realizes that he can
communicate with animals, and his resulting bizarre behavior
threatens to sabotoge the business deal.  There are
four plot lines to provide mild suspense: Will the business
deal come off?  Will Murphy's loyal wife (Kristen Wilson)
write him off as a lunatic?  Can Murphy save the life of
a tiger with double vision?  Will Murphy accept his misfit
daughter (Kyla Pratt) who also has a thing for animals?
Other movies, notably "Babe" and certain Disney cartoons,
have had success with talking animals.  But these animals
only talked to other animals, and lived in an innocent world
unaware of human pop culture.  Not so in "Doctor Doolittle",
which has the spunky pet guinea pig (voiced by Chris Rock)
disco dancing and imitating Bob Dylan.  Other incongruities
(e.g. a pair of penguins appear unescorted at Murphy's
door; a tiger threatens to commit suicide by jumping from
a tower) tag the film as pandering to an audience of pre-adolescents,
the only audience who will buy into the fun.
"Doctor Doolittle" earns its PG-13 rating with some bathroom
humor, and a repeated story line that has Murphy about to
make love to his wife, but gets interrupted by pesky talking
animals.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Back Street (1941)
"Back Street" is a high-quality tear jerker and
soap opera.  While the intended audience is women,
men should also be able to appreciate the sets,
cinematography, and performances.
Margaret Sullavan stars as a vivacious young
woman at the turn of the century, who has several
suitors, most notably automobile tinkerer Richard
Carlson.  She is not interested in losing her
freedom, however, until she meets ambitious banker
Charles Boyer.  Boyer and Sullavan have a brief,
potent romance, but wedding plans are dashed due
to a misunderstanding.
Years later, Boyer and Sullavan are re-united.
Boyer is now married and has a strong career.  They
have an affair over many years, but he is unwilling
to make sacrifices for Sullavan.  Sullivan bypasses
opportunies for her own happily married life.
The first half of "Back Street" is the best.  Sullavan
is brims with energy, and is optimistic and carefree.
As she becomes Boyer's kept woman, these qualities
disappear, and Boyer's character becomes less likeable.
Sullavan, Boyer and Carlson give excellent performances.
The sets are also very good.  As for film weaknesses,
some of the minor supporting characters aren't
credible, in particular an ever-complaining co-worker
of Sullavan's at the dress shop.
"Back Street" was originally a novel by Fanny Hurst.
This was the second of three Hollywood productions of
the novel, and is easily the best version.
Department of unhappy coincidences: both Boyer and
Sullavan would later die from barbiturate overdoses.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Hustler, The (1961)
Like so many classic black and white films
from the early 1960s, "The Hustler" is a
tense, brooding drama whose only humor is
ironic in nature.  "The Hustler" is an outstanding
film that explores the relationships between
talent and success, love and desperation,
and greed and evil.
Eddie Felson (Paul Newman) is a pool hustler,
traveling from city to city with fellow con
Myron McCormick.  Certain that he is the best
pool player around, Felson challenges Minnesota
Fats (Jackie Gleason, in his best film role) and
loses.  Newman nurses his wounded pride with the
help of alcoholic cripple Piper Laurie, and is
forced to team up with creepy, manipulative gambler
George C. Scott in order to mount a comeback.
Murray Hamilton, best remembered as the Mayor
in "Jaws", plays a Southern aristocrat whose
confidence is as over-extended as Newman's.
Based on the Walter Tevis novel, "The Hustler" was
nominated for a mountain of Academy Awards: Best Picture,
Best Director (Robert Rossen), Best Actor (Newman),
Best Actress (Laurie), Best Supporting Actor
(Gleason, Scott), and Best Adapted Screenplay
(Sidney Carroll).  The film won Oscars for Best
B & W Cinematography (Eugen Shuftan) and for its
sets.
The strength of "The Hustler" comes from the
script, which gives the characters both depth and
great lines.  The story is filled with tension,
deriving not only from Felson's fortunes at pool,
but also from his shifting relationships with
Laurie, Scott and McCormick.  Newman and especially
Laurie are sympathetic characters, and it is
always uncertain whether Newman's skill at pool
can overcome his personal demons.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Pleasure of His Company, The (1961)
The sugary stepdaughter (Debbie Reynolds) of a wealthy
businessman is to be married.  She lives in a mansion
with her mother (Lilli Palmer) and stepfather (Gary Merrill).  
She adores her real father (Fred Astaire), whom she 
does not remember, and wants him to appear at her wedding 
to give her away.
Astaire is a hedonistic world traveller.  He speaks many
languages fluently, and is sufficiently famous that his
daughter has been able to keep a scrapbook of newspaper
articles and photos of his adventures.  While superficially 
charming, he is self-centered to the point where he regards
his external environment (including other people) as mere
objects to be manipulated for his own pleasure.
Astaire arrives at the mansion and makes himself at home,
rearranging the furniture and changing the wedding plans,
infuriating Merrill.  The mother, having married
and divorced Astaire, is immune to his charm, but for 
Reynolds, her father is still the greatest.  Reynolds
maternal grandfather has also visited and, amused with the
bickering between Astaire, Merrill and Palmer, decides
to stay at the mansion until after the wedding.
There are lots of long conversations and arguments between
the primary characters throughout the movie.  These grow
tedious and repetitious.  Everyone excepts Reynolds drinks
and smokes constantly.  
Astaire gives Reynolds a tour of the town, filling her
pretty head with his prattle as if wooing her.  On one
occasion, her fiance (Tab Hunter) is obliged to come along,
and steams with resentment at Astaire's high-handed
behavior.  Hunter and Reynolds get into such a row over 
Astaire that Reynolds' parents have to smooth things over.
Now the question is, will Astaire succeed in keeping Reynolds
from marrying Hunter?  On the day of the wedding rehearsal,
Astaire falls from a horse while impressing Reynolds, and
shows up at the church in a sling.  He triggers another 
long-winded argument between the betrothed couple.
Reynolds wants to postpone the wedding to tend to Astaire's
injury.  Curiously, Astaire has a change of heart, does not
want sympathy, and is able to reconcile the couple.
After the wedding, the stepfather has something new to
worry about: he discovers that Astaire has two flight
reservations to Japan and concludes that Astaire is taking
his ex-wife with him.  But it turns out that Astaire is just
taking Toy, who is the family servant and a grating stereotype.

Title
Review for Navigator, The (1924)
"The Navigator" is a silent film starring Buster Keaton.
Keaton, as usual, plays an ordinary man who must learn
to perform extraordinary feats in order to win his love
interest.
Keaton plans his honeymoon, buying tickets for an ocean
cruise.  However, the plans are spoiled when his girlfriend
refuses to marry him.  Keaton goes on the cruise anyway.
A plot contrivance has Keaton and his girlfriend alone on
the ship, which has been set adrift by foreign agents.
Keaton must perform various heroic actions, especially to 
save the ship from a cannibal tribe.
Keaton has a flair for slapstick.  There is a scene
where he attempts to cook breakfast.  He does everything
wrong, with comic results.  Keaton dons a scuba suit
to repair the ship.  The resulting underwater photography
must have been innovative at the time.  
With the emphasis on slapstick, the stunts that are so 
spectacular in subsequent Keaton films such as 
"Sherlock, Jr." and "The General" are largely absent here.  
The battle with the cannibals is impressive, however,
with good panning shots of the island, the ship, and
the cannibals rowing towards it.
I have a few minor complaints about the film.  Keaton's
character makes an unlikely change from klutz to hero.
The word "formula" also comes to mind, as so many Keaton
films have him playing a clueless man trying to win a 
love interest.  Only the setting is different from 
"College", "Seven Chances", or "Sherlock, Jr."
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Universal Story, The (1995) (TV)
This is a movie about the movies: a documentary about 
Universal Studios.  It is narrated by Richard Dreyfuss
and features the most famous scenes of the most
famous Universal movies, shown in roughly chronological
order.  Universal is one of the oldest, most prolific
and most comercially successful of all movie studios.
The first part of the documentary is the most interesting.
It covers the early years of Universal, when it was
owned by Carl Laemmle, and the survival of the studio
depended upon the box office success of its next picture.
Universal, known then by a different name, made its first
film, Hiawatha, a one-reeler silent epic, in 1909.
We learn back stage gossip of Laemmle and early directors
and producers, and glimpse scenes from long-forgotten
silent films.  The Universal Studios lot was opened in
1915, and its first film recognizable to today's audience
was filmed the previous year, The Phantom of Opera
starring Lon Chaney.
Talkies began production in 1929, with the then-current 
Universal production Show Boat hastily modified to part
silent, part talky.  "All Quiet On The Western Front"
became one of the first great talkies upon release in 1930.
Universal became known for its horror films in the
thirties, giving us Bela Lugosi as "Dracula" and 
Boris Karloff as "Frankenstein".
The great depression cost Laemmle his beloved studio in
1935, and it has been corporate-owned since that time.
Until this point, the documentary has been dominated by
gossip about Laemmle and his feuds with directors.
Such back-stage talk disappears with the new owners.
Universal was, as always, prolific and profitable during
the 1940s through the 1950s.  But most of these films
are not notable: big box office winners came from characters
such as Abbott & Costello, Francis the Talking Mule, and 
Ma and Pa Kettle.  Other profitable but forgettable
films were produced by Ross Hunter, starring the likes
of Rock Hudson and Doris Day. There were good films made, 
of course.  We see scenes from James Stewart films such 
as "Destry Rides Again", "Harvey" and "Winchester '73".  
Hitchcock directed "Saboteur" and "Shadow of a Doubt". 
Orson Welles directed "A Touch of Evil", a weird, dark 
film that is unlike any Universal production before or since.
Television cut into movie-going audiences in the 1950s.
If you can't beat them, join them. The Universal lot was 
bought by MCA, then a talent agency with ties to television.  
Universal became known for its television programs and
later, TV movies, as much as for its theatrical releases.
Universal shed its schlocky image as it released better
"A" pictures during the 1960s, with Stanley Kubrick's
"Spartacus" and Ross Hunter's "Airport".  Hitchcock began
working exclusively with Universal beginning with
"The Birds" (1963) but unfortunately his work was in
decline by then.
Starting in the 1970s, the documentary's focus is purely
on famous directors and their blockbusters at "Universal".
Three of the biggest grossing films of their era,
"Jaws", "E.T." and "Jurassic Park" are Steven Spielberg 
productions at Universal.  We see clips from the likes 
of "American Grafitti", "The Deer Hunter", "Back To The Future",
"Apollo 13", "Out of Africa", "Born On The Fourth of July",
"Field of Dreams" and the great "Shindler's List".
We don't hear about any colossal bombs the studio made
during this time.  Although well-made, this documentary 
could almost be seen as studio promotional material made 
for potential film investors.
The presentation is well-organized by category and
chronological, with the only obvious miscue following
the studio's first full-length animated motion picture
"An American Tail" (1986) with Woody Woodpecker shorts
from the 1940s.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for My Favorite Martian (1999)
Films like "Shakespeare in Love", "Elizabeth" and
"The Thin Red Line" are currently playing in theatres.
The Academy Award season is usually the best time
to go to the movies, as the studios hope to capitalize
on the resulting publicity of the nominees.  But with
all these fine films playing, I went to see
"My Favorite Martian".  I have an excuse: my wife
wanted to see it, and with Valentine's Day approaching,
I needed brownie points.
Having wasted ninety minutes of my life watching this
bad-but-not-truly-awful attempted comedy, I now must
further waste time writing a review.  The pen may
not be mightier than the sword, but at least I can
get some sort of revenge on Disney studios with
my review.
Is there anything nice that can be said about
"My Favorite Martian"?  There is an entertaining chase
scene involving a spaceship, a sewer tunnel, and a
roto-rooter.  There might be three good jokes
for those with great patience and forgiving natures.
Elizabeth Hurley is very attractive and has nice legs.
She also overacts, but perhaps the director can
be blamed for this.  There is a silly silver suit that
talks (think "Roger Rabbit".  Whatever happened to Roger,
anyway?).  I was indifferent to the suit's antics, but
the kids in the theater loved it.  If, God help us,
there is a sequel, expect the silver suit to have a
leading role.
Hollywood is determined to make a movie version of
every 60s television series, no matter its quality.
When will they get around to 'Green Acres', with
Dustin Hoffman replacing Eddie Albert and Fran Drescher
replacing Eva Gabor?  And who will play Arnold the pig?
While the World ponders this momentous casting
decision, I guess that I had better say something
about the film I am supposed to be reviewing.
A plot summary is overdue.  Jeff Daniels is a struggling
reporter, who wants selfish daddy's girl Hurley,
instead of Darryl Hannah who wants him.  Daniels gets
a scoop opportunity when a Martian (Christopher Lloyd,
with his usual goofy mad scientist schtick) lands and
kidnaps him.  Like in "Starman", Fed agents pick up
the trail, led by obnoxious character actor Wallace Shawn.
Daniels does better than expected. Hannah needs better
costumes. Ray Walston has the requisite cameo to provide
a link to the original series.  Lloyd makes goofy faces.
Ten year old kids will enjoy the movie more than their
escorting parents.  Enough said.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Streetcar Named Desire, A (1951)
One problem common to most plays that have been adapted for
the movies is that there's too much dialogue, and not
enough action.  Scenes of two people talking (or, more
likely, one person mostly talking and one person mostly
listening) seem to stretch on and on.  Of course, if the
script is good enough, all is forgiven.
Although "A Streetcar Named Desire" received an Oscar
nomination for Best Screenplay, the script, based on the
Tennessee Williams' play, is not strong enough to fully
overcome the stagy nature of the film.  The character of
Blanche (Vivien Leigh) in particular is burdened with
rambling speeches, which she must deliver in her affected
whisper.
"A Streetcar Named Desire" has aging beauty Blanche forced
to leave her hometown, as the family estate has been lost,
and her scandalous behaviour has made her not welcome.
She moves in with sister Stella (Kim Hunter) in New Orleans,
who lives with brutish husband Stanley (Marlon Brando).
There, the emotionally fragile Blanche spins lies to cover
her scandals, and to further a romance with lonely Mitch
(Karl Malden).  As her true past comes out, Blanche becomes
the only person to believe her lies.
The film caused a sensation, as did the play.  Brando,
who received an Oscar nomination for Best Actor, has
the most controversial role, a swaggering, bullying
blue-collar character.  Both Malden and Brando make
sexual advances on Blanche, with wild gleams in their
eyes.  Blanche is pitied by other women, but is a
subject of derision for men.
I have not seen any of Williams' plays, but several
of his screen adaptions.  From what I have seen, he
appears to be over-rated as a playwright, drawing
excessive publicity through the use of controversial
and sexual themes.
"A Streetcar Named Desire" is a very good film
despite its problems.  The cast is excellent, and
the characters are sharply defined.  The cast
was mostly taken from the successful Broadway
play, with Leigh substituting for Jessica Tandy
as Blanche.  Leigh is so convincing that she has
been identified with the role, her second most
famous after Scarlett in "Gone With the Wind".
It is ironic that her later years are said to
resemble Blanche's character in some ways.
"A Streetcar Named Desire" won Oscars for Best
Actress (Leigh), Best Supporting Actor (Malden),
Best Supporting Actress (Hunter) and for the
sets.  It was also nominated for Best Picture,
Best Director (Elia Kazan) and Best Cinematography.
But despite its critical success, the film is
somewhat over-rated, while more deserving
Kazan efforts such as "A Tree Grows in Brooklyn"
and "America, America" are comparitively obscure.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Manhattan (1979)
"Manhattan" is a play with good cinematography.  That is,
there's no action scenes, but there is a great deal of
dialogue, George Gerschwin music, and shots of New York
City.  The Gershwin soundtrack is actually intrusive,
but the script is excellent.
Woody Allen directed, co-wrote and starred in the film.
He is torn between two girlfriends: young and earnest
Mariel Hemingway and indecisive pseudo-intellectual
Diane Keaton.  Keaton also has an on-off affair with
Michael Murphy (who had just played another philandering
husband in "An Unmarried Woman").  To complicate things
further, Allen has quit his day job to write a novel,
and is trying to stop his ex-wife (Meryl Streep) from
publishing a tell-all expose of their marriage.
The script is terrific.  Allen has a gift for
self-deprecating humor, and can also milk commonplace
setbacks (e.g. his new, inferior apartment has brown
tap water) for laughs.  Allen's sense of humor and
romantic nature makes it almost credible that his
character would be dating Hemingway and Keaton despite
his unemployment and unromantic appearance.
Allen and his film characters seem to have much
in common.  Allen uses "Manhattan" as a platform
to promote his art preferences (Bergman and Fellini
for films, Louis Armstrong and George Gerschwin
for music, etc) clearly favoring the nostalgic
and esoteric over the present and popular.  For
most actors, this would be egotistical and distracting,
but for Allen and "Manhattan" it works.  This may
be because Allen's character is an intellectual
who would be expected to have and espouse such views.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Egg and I, The (1947)
"The Egg and I" is a comedy.  The film stars Claudette Colbert
and Fred MacMurray as a newlywed couple.  MacMurray, who has
recently returned from the war, decides against the 9 to 5
routine and buys a chicken farm in the country.  While
MacMurray seems to know everything about chicken raising
and is eternally optimistic, many things go wrong, especially
for Colbert.  Tension develops between the newlyweds, as Colbert 
becomes jealous of neighbor Louise Allbritton, who has designs 
on MacMurray.
"The Egg and I" introduces the characters Ma and Pa Kettle.
Neighbors to MacMurray's farm, they are down to earth bumpkins. 
They have fifteen children who run wild on the Kettle farm.  
Ma (Marjorie Main, who received the film's only Academy Award 
nomination) can't even remember all their names.  The success
of the movie and the popularity of the Kettles led to nine
sequels starring Ma and Pa Kettle, keeping Universal Studios
in the black.
One the Kettle children is Tom (Richard Long).  He is a
Dana Andrews lookalike, with no accent.  It isn't credible
that he would have grown up in the Kettle household.
The story of "The Egg and I" is told from Colbert's point of
view.  Her struggles to succeed as a farmer make her a
comic foil, sort of a Lucy Ricardo of the 1940s.  This is
certainly a change from the glamourous roles she played
in earlier movies such as "Cleopatra."
While "The Egg and I" has its entertaining moments, the
depth isn't there to qualify as a particularly good movie.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sullivan's Travels (1942)
Preston Sturges wrote and directed a series of successful
comedies during the 1940s, all of which for some reason
co-star William Demarest.  Among these comedies was
"Sullivan's Travels".  While it received no Oscar
nominations (Sturges had won Best Original Screenplay
the year before for "The Great McGinty"), today it is
considered to be a classic.  It missed the recent
AFI top 100 list, but only after an effort by Steven
Speilberg, who tried to substitute "Sullivan's Travels"
for one of his own directorial efforts.
The story has successful comedy director John L.
Sullivan (Joel McCrae) wanting to make an 'important'
film about the poor.  He decides to live the life of
a hobo, to learn more about them.  Along the way, he
encounters a struggling actress played by Veronica Lake.
Eventually he learns just how badly the poor have it,
when his adventures result in his imprisonment for assault.
"Sullivan's Travels" is Sturges' social commentary
with several messages, one of which (ironically)
is that film directors should stick to entertainment
and not social commentary.  Another message is
that there is nothing glamorous or revealing about
the lives of the poor.  This is best stated in a speech
by Sullivan's butler:
"Poverty is not the lack of anything, but a positive
plague, virulent in itself, contagious as cholera, with
filth, criminality, vice and despair as only a few of its
symptoms. It is to be stayed away from, even for purposes
of study. It is to be shunned."
"Sullivan's Travels" only has a few obvious weaknesses.
The film makes jarring transitions from screwball comedy,
to satire, to social commentary.  Sullivan develops
a case of amnesia that ends only after his conviction
for assault.  His status as a famous Hollywood director
should not entitle him to a "Get Out of Jail Free" card.
While Veronica Lake is gorgeous, she fulfills the
predictions of Lebrand "but with a little sex" and
Sullivan "every picture has a girl in it".  (Lake dominates
the movie posters I have seen for this film, implying
that she and not McCrae is the star.)
"Sullivan's Travels" does provide many fine roles
for character actors.  I especially liked the black
preacher (Arthur Hoyt) and helpful convict Jimmy Conlin.
However, the sadistic guard is a stereotype, and none
of the bums that Sullivan encounters make much of an
impression.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for All About Eve (1950)
"All About Eve" is a black comedy that cynically skewers
the theater, with an outstanding and wicked script.
It was nominated for an amazing fourteen Oscars,
winning six including Best Picture, Best Director
and Best Screenplay.  Joseph L. Mankiewicz both
directed and adapted the screenplay from Mary Orr's
"The Wisdom of Eve".
Bette Davis stars as aging actress Margo Channing,
whose long-successful Broadway career is based upon
plays written by Lloyd Richards (Hugh Marlowe) and
directed by Bill Sampson (Gary Merrill).  Bill is also
her lover, although their relationship is stormy due to
temperamental Davis' insecurity about their age
difference (Bill is eight years younger).  (Davis
and Merrill wed in real life, later in 1950).  Margo's
best friend is Lloyd's wife Karen (Celeste Holm).
Karen takes pity on a starstruck young woman who keeps
hanging around the theater, hoping to get a glipse of
Margo.  This lovely, ingratiating young woman is Eve
(Anne Baxter) who, upon being introduced to Margo, soon
becomes her servant and secretary.  Gradually it becomes
apparent that Eve wishes to become the next Margo Channing,
as she tries to take Margo's place in Lloyd's upcoming
play, and even tries to steal both Lloyd and Bill.
Eve's rise is partly choreographed by sarcastic,
cold-hearted theater critic Addison De Witt (George Sanders).
Marilyn Monroe, already stereotyped, has a small supporting
role as a dim-witted would-be actress.
The script is about as good as it gets.  Margo's line
"Fasten your seat belts, it's going to be a bumpy night"
is the most famous, but in their context many others are
just as good.  My favorite is Margo's withering comment
"All playrights should be dead for 300 years!"
Underpinning the script and story is Margo's fear of
losing both Bill and her career to the younger, more
attractive Eve, while not realizing that even her spoiled
diva personality is superior to Eve's fraudulent humility
and cunning manipulations.  The awards ceremony shown
at film's beginning and end epitomizes Eve's (and the
theater's?) phoniness, with Eve in her acceptance speech
thanking Margo, Lloyd, Bill, and Karen while they
in turn watch her with ironical contempt.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Missing (1982)
"Missing" is a moving and credible film about
a young American's disappearance during a 1973
coup in Chile, and the attempts of his wife and
father to locate him... or his body.  The viewer
quickly realizes that the son almost certainly
has been killed, and that the U.S. military is
behind the coup.  After that, the film becomes
repetitive, and is interesting mostly for
Lemmon's outraged performance.
There are many scenes of soldiers occupying
the streets, shooting people arbitrarily.
These scenes are like some science fiction films
set in the future, with the resisting "humans"
on the wrong side of alien search and destroy
missions.  However, this presentation of a
third world nation's military coup is believable.
After the son's disappearance, his wife
(Sissy Spacek) remains in Chile, at some risk
to her life, to find him.  She makes little
progress with the disinterested American
officials.  The son's father (Jack Lemmon)
arrives and also gets nowhere.
Lemmon, who considers his son to be a layabout
radical, is the stereotype of a conservative,
middle-aged American businessman.  He has several
generation gap arguments with Spacek, but gradually
learns to respect her, and the son he never really
knew.  This respect may be due to his embracing
their political philosphies, once it becomes
apparent to him that the lying American officials
were behind the coup and care little about the
life of his 'troublemaking' son.
Lemmon is fine, and his confrontations with
American officials are the best scenes of the
film.  A bureaucrat tells Lemmon, "there are
no such [covert military] operations", with a
prominent portrait of Nixon in the background.
Spacek is also good, although her character
isn't as defined as it should be.
One problem I had with "Missing" is that Lemmon,
the young Americans and reporters caught in the coup
are all innocent and have perfect integrity, which
is contrasted against the contemptible American
officials and military personnel.  Sometimes the
action of the latter aren't credible, such as a
U.S. military officer attempting to seduce Spacek,
or officials presenting a bill for $973 to Lemmon.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
At one point during the film "The People vs. Larry Flynt" a
Supreme Court justice makes a statement similar to "The First
Amendment is very important, but it isn't everything."
But to Larry Flynt, freedom of speech _is_ everything, becoming
more and more important after other aspects of his life have
been taken away from him.
In the movie's first half, "The People vs. Larry Flynt" plays
as a comedy.  Larry Flynt (Woody Harrelson) rises from small-time
adult nightclub operator to the publisher of the sleaziest
porn magazine, along the way marrying free-spirited lesbian
Althea (Courtney Love).  Much female naked flesh is paraded,
but this is acceptable given the context of the film.
This leads to legal problems for Flynt, who is prosecuted by
cynical politicians.  These politicians seem more interested
in putting Flynt behind bars than in stopping his magazine,
which continues to flourish.  Flynt does not help his cause
by antagonizing judges and prosecutors in court.  He becomes
less interested in running a magazine, and more interested in
seeing what behaviour he can get away with under the protection
of free speech.
Flynt is paralyzed from the waist down by an unknown assassin.
This changes the nature of the film, which becomes much weirder,
as does Flynt and Althea.  Flynt's southern drawl becomes
a mixture of W. C. Fields and James Stewart, while Althea's
hair color is dyed multiple unnatural colors.
"The People vs. Larry Flynt" is an excellent film.  I especially
liked the variety of the script: the roles of a tough federal judge,
Jerry Falwell, and Flynt's lawyer (Edward Norton) are played
straight with credible lines, while Flynt and Althea can be as
bizarre as, well, the First Amendment allows.
I am not an expert on the real Larry Flynt's life, and I don't
know how accurately he is portrayed.  I don't believe that it
is relevant.  This film should be treated as fiction, even if
it has much basis in fact.  I don't think it glorifies Flynt,
transforming a porn peddler into a fighter for free speech.
Actually, the Flynt character is presented as a jerk, and
sometimes as a lunatic.
There are many standout performances here.  Richard Paul
makes a perfect Jerry Falwell, and Courtney Love is well-cast
as Althea (can't see her playing girl-next-door roles though).
Norton is fine as the intense, disapproving, fresh-scrubbed
lawyer for Flynt.  Donna Hanover is a convincing Ruth Carter
Stapleton.  Clinton pit-bull James Carville even succeeds.
Harrelson is the only actor who gets a raspberry, camping
it up and talking as if he had marbles in his mouth.  He can
be very funny delivering lines, though.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Connecticut Yankee in King Arthur's Court, A (1949)
A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthur's Court (1949)
"A Connecticut Yankee in King Arthur's Court" is a
Mark Twain satire that has been frequently reinvented
by Hollywood since the silent era.  The protaganist's
age and occupation is changed, as is the story's tenor.
In this version, the Yankee is played by a middle-aged
Bing Crosby, and Camelot becomes the setting for
various musical numbers.
Turn of the century blacksmith Hank Martin (Crosby)
is somehow sent to the era of Camelot by a blow to the
head.  He is soon captured by dim-witted Sir Sagramore
(William Bendix), and taken to King Arthur's court.
Magician and requisite villain Merlin (Murvyn Vye)
convinces Arthur (Sir Cedric Hardwicke) to sentence
Crosby to death.  Crosby escapes this and other hazardous
situations through clever improvising.  He also woos a
court beauty (Rhonda Fleming, whose Patti Page-styled
vocals don't seem contemporaneous with the dark ages)
incurring the jealous wrath of humorless Sir Lancelot
(Henry Wilcoxon).
Hardwicke's elderly, sneezy King Arthur seems patterned
after Harry Davenport's King Louis from 1939's "The Hunchback
of Notre Dame".  The long white hair, the mildly cantankerous
personality, and the sense of fairness are the same.
Unlike Davenport, however, Hardwicke gets a musical
number, and watching him in a chorus line with Crosby
and Bendix may be the film's best moment.
At worst slow and tedious, at best mildly amusing, and
with a script that is only adequate, the wonder is that
the film holds together.  Despite its baggage, it is a
good movie.  Credit goes to first to the sets and costumes,
which are colorful and successfully evoke the era of
King Arthur.  Crosby has a laconic charm that is
uniquely his, and Bendix makes a good sidekick.  Now if
one could only accept the preposterous coincidence of
a total eclipse occuring at the same time as Crosby's
scheduled execution...
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Auntie Mame (1958)
Based upon the Broadway play also starring Rosalind
Russell, which was in turn based upon the novel by
Ed Fitzgerald, "Auntie Mame" is an exuberant comedy.
While sometimes overdone, and with a plot that amounts
to a series of skits dominated by Russell, the
production has much energy and wit.
The film takes place during the years 1928 through
the early 1940s.  Russell plays the title role, an
eccentric socialite obligated to raise her orphaned
nephew Patrick (Jan Handzlik).  Patrick is earnest
and naive, but also something of a twit.  Mame is at
odds with conservative bank trustee Babcock (Fred Clark)
over Patrick's education.
Mame loses her fortune during the 1929 stock market
crash, and is forced to work at demeaning jobs.  She
is rescued by wealthy southerner Burnside (Forrest
Tucker), who soon leaves her a widow.  Meanwhile,
Patrick (now played by Roger Smith) has grown up,
but is still a twit.  He is engaged to marry nasal-voiced
snob Gloria (Joanna Barnes), whose buffoonish father
(Willard Waterman) bears a prejudice against Jews.
Most of the supporting cast is more eccentric than
Auntie Mame.  Vera (Coral Browne) is an affected
drunk, O'Bannion (Robin Hughes) is a phony 'Irish'
writer, Gooch (Peggy Cass) is a mousey secretary.
House servant Ito (Yuki Shimoda) laughs like a
delirious idiot.  The parade of colorful characters
robs the film of its credibility, and the certainty
of a happy ending robs the film of any suspense.
Still, it is fun watching Russell try to walk in
wrong-sized boots, and Barnes' performance is a hoot.
Morton Da Costa produced and directed "Auntie Mame",
and also has a bit part playing Patrick's father.
He closes many scenes by freezing the actors,
darkening the set, and putting a spotlight on
Russell's face.  This technique seems artificial,
but it does express the warmth and vitality of
Russell's character.  The film was remade in 1974
as the infamous flop "Mame", starring Lucille Ball.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Kid from Brooklyn, The (1946)
"The Kid from Brooklyn" is a comedy, and a vehicle for
talented comedian Danny Kaye.  However, Kaye's charm 
cannot overcome the many severe problems that the movie 
has.
Kaye is a humble milkman who meets Virginia Mayo
when his cart-horse gives birth.  Mayo never seems
to get upset when Kaye drops by unexpectedly at early
morning hours, before she has dressed.  While defending
a ladies' honor from two drunken clods, one of the
clods is knocked unconscious.  This man turns out to
be the middleweight champion.
Publicity from this leads to Kaye becoming a boxer,
winning a series of fixed fights.  Meanwhile, Mayo and 
Kaye's sister both become successful nightclub singers.
Will Kaye survive a real boxing match against the champ,
and will he win the love of Virginia Mayo?  (What do
you think?)
"The Kid from Brooklyn" has a major weakness: the script.
It just isn't funny.  The jokes fall flat.  Reliance on
Kaye's physical humor (he often shows off his pathetic boxing 
skills) doesn't work either.  Another problem is the many
musical numbers: they are just above the quality of a
Lawrence Welk production, and better only because of 
the costumes.
In this film, boxing is presented as a fixed sport much as
professional wrestling.  I can't accept this premise,
and Kaye, who shows no boxing talent except an ability to
duck, could never convince anyone as a boxer.  Also not
credible is both Mayo and Kaye's sister as stars of
musical productions, a plot device to fill the movie with
the tiresome songs.  Finally, Kaye's character is not
consistent.  First, he is a humble milkman, and later he
is Danny Kaye, doing his complicated standup shtick.
I have not seen a Danny Kaye vehicle that was very good.
Perhaps there are some out there, most likely when he
plays a straight character.  Tailoring a movie to Kaye's
talents doesn't appear to work.  Perhaps he needed zany
character actors to support him, as for example is
provided for in successful Marx Brothers comedies.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
What can be said about "Star Wars" that hasn't been
said already?  It finished its lengthy theatrical run
in 1977 as the highest grossing movie of all time,
then reclaimed that title with another massively
successful re-release in 1997.  The two films that
have replaced "Star Wars" atop the all-time Box Office
charts, "E.T. the Extra Terrestial" and "Titanic",
also relied heavily on special effects.  This was
the true impact of "Star Wars" and its many sequels:
it raised the bar for audience expectations of
blockbusters.  No longer was a great story sufficient,
as it was for "The Godfather" in 1972.
I doubt that anybody reading this hasn't seen the
film, but a plot summary is obligatory.  Luke Skywalker
(Mark Hamill) is an excitable, idealistic young man
who lives with his 'uncle' as a farmer on the remote
planet of Tatooine.  He hungers for adventure, and
gets his wish when he encounters Obi-Won Kenobi
(Alec Guinness).  Kenobi endeavors to train him as
a Jedi, a master of a universal 'force' that can be
used for good or evil.
Skywalker and Kenobi hire Han Solo (Harrison Ford),
who is a mercenary with a heart of gold, to help
deliver 'death star' plans stored in the robot
R2-D2.  Solo's sidekick is 'walking carpet'
Chewbacca (Peter Mayhew), and R2-D2's sidekick is
comic relief C-3PO (Anthony Daniels).  Along the
way our heroes rescue beautiful but independent
Princess Leia (Carrie Fisher) from the clutches of
imposing, panting Darth Vader (voiced by James
Earl Jones).
"Star Wars" is refreshingly innocent, lacking
the cynicism common to 1970s films.  With its
good versus evil theme, it is easy to criticize
the story as simplistic.  But the plot is
elaborate, and the depth of the main characters
has been underrated.  Luke, for instance, may
be a goody-goody, but his boundless faith in
Kenobi and his unjaded enthusiasm for adventure
is winning.
As far as genre goes, the "Star Wars" series seems
derived principally from "Flash Gordon" 1930s serials,
albeit with far greater production values.  But
the thrills of the old serials are lost on adults,
who can see through the hokey script and sets, while
only the most stubbornly snobbish viewer can disregard
the magic of "Star Wars".  Except for a gratuitous
awards ceremony at films end, this is one blockbuster
that really delivers.
"Star Wars" received 11 Academy Awards, winning
in all the technical categories (sets, score, sound,
editing, costumes) but losing in the major
categories (Best Picture, Best Original Screenplay,
Best Director, Best Supporting Actor (Guiness)).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Many Adventures of Winnie the Pooh, The (1977)
The Many Adventures of Winnie the Pooh (1977)
Animated features are often for children only.
I had the misfortune once of seeing part of "The
Chipmunk Story" and I was only impressed by how
incredibly awful that movie was.
But there are exceptions, and "The Many Adventures
of Winnie the Pooh" is definitely among them.
In fact, the film is likely in the top 5% of all
movies, unless it doesn't count.
It many not qualify as a genuine movie since it
is a compilation of three animated shorts, with only
a very small amount of additional footage added to sew
the parts together.  The shorts are "Winnie the Pooh
and the Honey Tree", from 1966, "Winnie the Pooh and
the Blustery Day", from 1968, and "Winnie the Pooh
and Tigger Too!" from 1974.
In "The Honey Tree", Winnie the Pooh is foiled in
an attempt to raid a bee's nest for honey.  He instead
visits Rabbit's burrow, where he eats so much honey
that he is unable to fit through the exit hole.
In "The Blustery Day", which won an Academy Award
for best animated short, Pooh and his friends are
caught in a windstorm, then in a flood.  The ultimate
extravert, Tigger, is also introduced.
There are two versions of this compilation.  Both
have "The Honey Tree" and "The Blustery Day".  They
differ in the third short.  The better short, which
I believe is "Tigger Too", has the following storyline:
Rabbit gets lost in the woods, while Tigger gets stuck
up a tree.  There is a bittersweet ending.
This version is the one that I have graded.
The other version substitutes a good, but still
inferior short.  Eeyore must be rescued from a stream,
and Pooh learns a new game called "Pooh sticks".
While the film is targeted at children, the quality
is so high that anyone should enjoy it.  The voice
characterizations are excellent.  Sebastion Cabot makes
a perfect narrator, and Paul Winchell is an outstanding
Tigger.  Sterling Holloway has become best known as
the voice of "Winnie the Pooh", but had been a voice
in several of Disney's great animated features, notably
as a singing stork in "Dumbo", and the Cheshire Cat in
"Alice in Wonderland".  Even the songs are good,
which is especially important in animated features.
The writing is funny even to adults, who are clued into
how foolish Pooh really is.  The characters (Pooh, Tigger,
Rabbit, Piglet, Christopher Robin, Owl, Kanga, Roo)
are given distinctive and endearing personalities.
Clever games are played with the narrator and text pages
of the book, paying due homage to original author
A. A. Milne.
"Blustery Day" is slightly better than "Honey Tree",
which is better than "Tigger Too".  But all three shorts
are excellent, and much better than most 'serious' films.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for O.S.S. (1946)
"O.S.S." is a competent spy drama, set during World War II.
Alan Ladd stars as an American agent operating in France,
trying to obtain information about German troop movements.
The O.S.S. is the Office of Strategic Services, a CIA
predecessor.  While workmanlike in its story developments,
and with Ladd surprisingly dislikable (although credible)
in the lead role, the film has good script and direction,
and plenty of action and suspense.
Ladd and other future O.S.S. agents are first seen
being trained in the U.S.  Ladd's fellow spies include
sculpter Geraldine Fitzgerald, friendly hockey player
Richard Benedict, and middle aged and uneffacing
Don Beddoe.
Proud nazi officer John Hoyt falls for Fitzgerald, who
uses him to plant plastic explosives in a bust, sabotaging
a train.  Hoyt survives, and spends the rest of the film
hunting her down.  Meanwhile, O.S.S. activities are
aided by a greedy German traitor (Harold Vermilyea)
and a successful plant in the German Army (Richard Webb).
Predictable, the relationship between Ladd and
Fitzgerald is a plot focus.  Ladd is initially
chauvinistic, but Fitzgerald's field successes
change his mind.  Benedict also gets a love interest,
with his unseen contact Gloria Saunders.
The American agents are heroic, ready to sacrifice
their lives if necessary for the cause of Allied victory.
Not surpringly, the Germans don't come off as well.
Both Hoyt and Vermilyea put selfish interests first.
When Ladd is getting a beating in a later scene, a group
of German soldiers is shown drunken and approving.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for She Wore a Yellow Ribbon (1949)
"She Wore a Yellow Ribbon" was the second leg in
John Ford's 'Calvary trilogy', following "Fort Apache"
and preceding "Rio Grande" by one year.  Each film
starred John Wayne as an aging calvary officer
fighting Indian wars, with always entertaining
Victor McLagen in a supporting role.  James Warner
Berner was the writer for each film.
The plot has Wayne approaching his day of retiring
from the army in 1876.  However, Custer has just been
killed, and various indian tribes are united and
on the warpath.  Wayne has the chivalrous task
of leading a troop escorting two women to safety.
The young and pretty woman (Joanne Dru) flirts and
fights with Lieutenants John Agar and Ben Johnson,
while showing proper admiration for Wayne.
"Ribbon" is best known for its cinematography by
Winton Hoch, which deservedly snagged an Academy Award.
Much of the footage takes place in the Utah desert,
with picturesque rock and cloud formations.
The film has been restored to its former glory.
I can't speak so kindly of the score, which is
heavy-handed and blaring.  The same can be said of
the title track, and after the second or third reprise
you may hope that she takes the ribbon off.
My favorite scenes involve comic relief McLagan,
especially one where he single-handedly whips eight
men between drinks.  His presence certain can light
up a movie.
While "She Wore a Yellow Ribbon" is a good film,
the story and script are too nondescript to merit
a higher grade.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Nothing Sacred (1937)
"Nothing Sacred" is one of those long-ago
films that remind you just how little has
really changed over the years.  Pro
wrestling is as fake now as it was then,
some reporters are still as willing to
not let the truth interfere with a great
story, and sharp, sarcastic comedies can
be just as funny.
"Nothing Sacred" falls into the latter
category.  The script was co-written by
Ben Hecht, who is best known for the
similar comedy "The Front Page".  The
story has an elderly, drunken doctor
(Charles Winninger) misdiagnosing Hazel
Flagg (Carole Lombard) as having a
terminal illness.  Gullible reporter
Wally Cook (Fredric March) learns of and
promotes the story, unaware that the
diagnosis was wrong and Hazel is actually
in good health.
Hazel is taken from her small town to New
York City, where she lives in luxury,
feted by Wally and praised by all for her
courage in facing death.  Romance
inevitably blooms between Hazel and Wally.
But what will happen when Wally's editor
boss (Walter Connolly) learns that she is
healthy, and the newspaper has been conned?
The script was based upon the story
"Letter to the Editor" by James Street.
It was later adapted to become the
Broadway musical "Hazel Flagg", and
the plot was again used for the Jerry
Lewis/-Dean Martin vehicle "Living It Up".
To show just how little has changed,
many story elements also show up in the
currently playing "Runaway Bride", a comedy
which also has a newspaperman trying to
salvage his career by using a small-town
woman for a scoop, but ending up falling
in love with her.
Connolly's character is named Oliver Stone.
This leads to much unintented humor, since
the Stone character keeps referring to himself
in the third person (e.g. "She'll know one
thing, that Oliver Stone is worse than
radium poisoning!").  Any similar to the
Academy Award-winning director, who was born
nine years later, is purely coincidental!
While Lombard was a gifted comedienne,
in "Nothing Sacred" her voice does get
whiny on occasion.  March is best known for
his dramatic roles, but displays good comic
timing here.  Winninger is perfectly cast
as the incomepetent doctor, and Connolly
does well as the blustery, despairing editor.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for North by Northwest (1959)
"North By Northwest" is one of Alfred Hitchcock's most
famous and heavily praised films.  It is a very good film,
full of suspense and action, but it is not among his
best films.  The romance between Cary Grant and Eva
Marie Saint is unintentionally amusing, and several
of the action scenes lack credibility.
Grant is a business executive who is mistaken
for a government agent by henchmen working for suave
bad-guy James Mason.  Grant survives a murder attempt,
then is accused of murder himself.  While on the
run, Grant romances double-agent Marie Saint.  Gradually,
Grant becomes the agent that for the first half of the
film he claims not to be.
"North by Northwest" is admittedly fun to watch.
Something is always happening, and if you pretend that
the events are plausible, the film might live up
to its reputation.
"North by Northwest" has several problems with
casting and credibility.  There are spoilers in the
following analysis.
Cary Grant is one of my favorite actors, but he was about
fifteen years too old for this part.  The actress playing
his mother, Jessie Royce Landis, looks younger than Grant
and in fact is.  The romance between Grant and Marie Saint
begins with laughably too-clever dialogue.  Later, Grant
becomes as jealous as a schoolboy over her behaviour, at
a time when both their lives, and national security, are
in danger.
The film's most famous scene has Grant being hunted
by a crop duster's plane.  This scene ends with Grant
getting knocked down by a large truck, immediately followed
by the plane flying into the truck and bursting into
flames.  Why would the plane do this?  Wouldn't the pilot
have seen the truck?  Even more surprising, Grant runs
away without a scratch.
Why does Grant follow Marie Saint to the auction,
and then confront Mason there?  He is risking his and
her neck for no reason except to pick petty arguments.
I know that people dressed more formally back in the
1950s, but Grant seems bent on wearing a particular
gray flannel suit throughout most of the film.  Even
when it becomes soiled, and even when there is a nationwide
manhunt for him.
Grant's transition from businessman to spy and action
hero, without any training, isn't plausible.  He is able
to break into Mason's house, and the minute he arrives,
he overhears a conversation that deals with a murder plot
and where the microfilm is hidden.
In his earlier film "Saboteur", the finale involved
the hero, the bad guy, a life-risking rescue attempt,
a spectacular fall and the Statue of Liberty.  "North by
Northwest" repeats the formula, only substituting Mount
Rushmore for the Statue of Liberty.
I fully admit that I am being very picky, and that
"North By Northwest" is a very good (and certainly
suspenseful and entertaining) film.  I am making these
negative comments only to support my position that it
is not the outstanding film that most consider it to be.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sjunde inseglet, Det (1957)
Better known by its English translation title,
"The Seventh Seal", "Det Sjunde inseglet" is
a pensive art film set in the Middle Ages.
The success of the film earned international
acclaim for director and writer Ingmar Bergman.
But today, the fixation with death and rejection
of the hereafter, as well as the relentlessly
gloomy and overstated imagery, makes for an
inaccessible, and worse, overheated film.
The plot is simple.  A plague is sweeping
through Europe, killing a large percentage
of the population, and causing some terror
and paranoid among the superstitious peasants.
Death (Bengt Ekerot) visits a knight who
has participated in the Crusades (Max von Sydow).
The knight delays Death by challenging him
to a game of chess.  The game has frequent
and lengthy breaks, enabling the knight to
wander around seeking the Truth about the
hereafter.  He encounters a young woman
who is to be burned as a witch (Gunnel Lindblom)
and a couple with a small child, Joseph (Nils
Poppe) and Mary (Bibi Andersson).
For Bergman, death is a repudiation of life, a
proof that all is in vain.  This extreme attitude
avoids the truth about death.  Death is simply a
part of life.  From the point of view of a dying
man, the world may be coming to an end, but the
world goes on as before.  Bergman depicts death as
an evil force, rather than as a biological process,
and supports his view with imagery showing horror
and suffering.
Cynics will find the film ripe for parody, and those
seeking entertainment will avoid it.  "The Seventh Seal"
is an Art film that may be embraced by fans of the
genre who accept rather than question the film's overripe
imagery.  The film is marginally good; well cast and
with stark cinematography by Gunnar Fischer.  But
it is no masterpiece.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Kumonosu jo (1957)
"The Seven Samurai" is generally considered
to be Kurosawa's best work.  But my favorite
film from the Japanese director is his
inspiration from Shakespeare's "Macbeth",
"Throne of Blood".  Adapted to feudal Japan,
it is the story of the rise and fall of a
samurai due to murderous ambition.
Washizu (Toshiro Mifune) and Miki (Minoru Chiaki)
help the warlord Tsuzuki (Takamaru Sasaki)
put down a rebellion.  They are granted an
audience with the warlord, but while travelling
to the warlord's Cobweb castle, they encounter
an evil spirit (Chieko Naniwa) in the forest.
The spirit tells their future: Washizu will
soon become the ruler of Cobweb castle, with
Miki's son succeeding him.
The spirit's predictions are destined to become
true.  Washizu is prodded by his scheming wife
Asaji (Isuzu Yamada) to kill Tsuzuki and take
his place.  Washizu's success begins to unravel,
however, due to suspicions and betrayals.
He just doesn't know when to stop.
Mifune was perfectly cast as Washizu.  In
"Rashomon" and "Seven Samurai", his character
was half lunatic.  Here, the wild eyes and
aggressiveness remain, but his character is
more rational, and from a higher social class.
However, the most interesting character is
Asaji.  Her face is an expressionless white
mask, which combined with her murderous,
manipulating comments creates a chilling effect.
"Throne of Blood" has been criticized for its
slow parts, such as the Tsuzuki funeral procession,
but even that sequence has suspense since
the actions of Miki are unknown.
Kurosawa was co-producer, editor and co-writer,
as well as director.  He would again borrow from
Shakespeare for 1985's Ran, which was based on
"King Lear".  Like "Throne of Blood", "Ran" also
took place in feudal Japan and blamed a wife
for the destruction of an empire.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Saboteur (1942)
"Saboteur" is not one of Alfred Hitchcock's best films,
but it is a good film despite all its problems.
The plot lacks credibility at times, and the acting
is surprisingly hammy.  However, the story is exciting,
and there is some fine cinematography.
The plot has a young man (Robert Cummings) falsely
accused of blowing up a factory.  He eludes the police
while searching for the real saboteur (Norman Lloyd) 
to prove his innocence.  He uncovers a major network
of saboteurs, headed by wealthy and respected members
of society.  Will Cummings escape these agents?  Will
the police believe his story?  Will the saboteurs
succeed in their evil plans?  Will Cummings win the
heart of pouty love interest Priscilla Lane?
Cummings was not Hitchcock's first choice.  They would
work together again in "Dial M for Murder", so
Hitchcock must have been pleased with his acting.
Certainly Cummings is likeable, and probably it is
the fault of the script, but he delivers multiple
fiery patriotic speeches that become jingoistic.
His character also commits many crimes in order
to prove his innocence (kidnapping, stealing a horse,
escape, resisting arrest, etc), an oxymoron that
is shared by similar films such as "The Fugitive".
There may be some spoilers in the following paragraphs.
I had complaints with other characters as well.
Cummings encounters a truck driver and a blind man who
are willing to break the law to help a fugitive from
justice whom they have just met.  Lane, who has the world's
biggest lips, is kidnapped by Cummings when she attempts
to turn him in.  Initially she despises him and thinks
him guilty.  For no apparent reason, she suddenly changes
her mind and does all she can for him.  When the evil
saboteurs finally catch them, they fail to kill them
or even physically restrain them.  These are the same
people who plot to blow up ships and dams?
Cummings plays Superman in the final scenes of the movie.
He manages to escape, guesses the next sabotage act
correctly, manages to prevent it, tells all to the police,
who believe and release him despite his status as
America's Most Wanted.  He then finds the saboteur,
and nearly kills himself while trying to save the
saboteur's life.  All in a day's work, I suppose.
But "Saboteur" is still a good movie.  It is exciting
and loaded with action and (albeit heavy-handed) drama.
The cinematography is occasionally outstanding, with
great shots of the ship launch, the Statue of Liberty,
a ritzy party, city skyscrapers, and of course, the 
famous scene of the saboteur falling.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Paths of Glory (1957)
"Paths of Glory" is an excellent anti-war film
that dramatizes the enormous gap between the
enlisted men who do the fighting and the officers
who take the credit.  "Paths of Glory" was banned
in France for many years, but the story, based on
a true incident, is timeless and can apply to any
military or political situation.
The setting is France in 1916.  World War I
has dragged on for two years, and become a
stalement of fortified trenches and heavy
casualties.  Commander Broulard (Adolphe Menjou)
asks General Mireau (George Macready) to
have his decimated division take the "Ant Hill",
an impregnable fortress, promising Mireau
a promotion if he succeeds.
Mireau orders Lieutenant Dax (Kirk Douglas) to
carry out the mission, which is a complete failure
with heavy casualties.  To place blame elsewhere,
Mireau then orders the court martial for cowardice
(under penalty of execution) of three arbitrarily
chosen soldiers (Ralph Meeker, Joseph Turkel and
Timothy Carey).
Douglas is perfectly cast for the role.  He
seethes with indignation throughout.  Emile Meyer
gives an excellent performance as a priest.
Macready, whose character is a pompous jerk,
is also excellent.  There are only a few battle
scenes, but they are well done.
"Paths of Glory" isn't perfect.  Bert Freed's
alcoholic sergeant character is a bit muddled.
The three unlucky soldiers show extreme
cowardness and bitterness prior to their
execution, especially pathetically sobbing
Carey.  And perhaps the depiction of military
brass as cynical, ambitious and self-serving
is a little overdone.
Directed by Stanley Kubrick, "Paths of Glory" was not
a box office success, and was not nominated for any
Academy Awards.  Kubrick and Douglas teamed up again
three years later for "Spartacus", an inferior but
much more successful film.  Kubrick would make
another anti-war film, "Full Metal Jacket", thirty
years later.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Taxi Driver (1976)
"Taxi Driver" is a brooding, sometimes violent
character study.  Although controversial, it has
generally been highly praised.  While it is a
good film, it lacks focus, and De Niro's character
transitions sometimes lack credibility.
A very lean Robert De Niro is Travis, a taxi driver
in New York City.  Travis is a loner, spending off
hours in porn movie houses and brooding alone in
his apartment.  He keeps a journal in which he
condemns the street life of NYC, and wishes that
somebody would clean the city up.  He develops
obsessions for political staffer Cybil Shephard,
her Presidential candidate Senator Palantine
(Leonard Harris), handguns, and a twelve year old
prostitute (Jodie Foster).
The climax of "Taxi Driver" has the heavily armed
De Niro attempting to rescue Foster from her pimp
(Harvey Keitel, who has shoulder-length hair).
This results in a graphic shootout.  I don't object
to the bloodfest, but its aftermath.  It is as if
nothing has happened: Travis is again working as
a cab driver, and has recovered his mental faculties.
After Shephard's brief relationship with De Niro ends,
her character keeps resurfacing.  This is as confusing
to me as De Niro's actions.  He attends a Palantine
speech, apparently to assassinate him, with the
assumed motive of impressing Shephard.  But by this
time, his interests have turned to Foster and Keitel.
The Bernard Herrman score, good as it is, increases the
confusion, changing back and forth from sleepy retro
jazz to something more brooding and ominous.
"Taxi Driver" is a very interesting film.  It is
impossible to predict where the story will go next,
the dialogue is very good, and the cast and direction
(by Martin Scorsese) is good.  Palantine, a stereotype
of an ambitious, platitude-spouting politician, is
the only weak character.
1976 was the year of "Network" and "Rocky", preventing
"Taxi Driver" from winning any Academy Awards.  The
film was nominated for Best Picture, Best Actor (De Niro),
Best Supporting Actress (Foster) and Best Score.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Bambi (1942)
"Bambi", of course, is a Disney-produced animated feature.
It was released two years after "Pinocchio" and one year after 
"Dumbo", both of which are vastly better films.
"Bambi" tells the story of a male deer, from birth to maturity.
As a baby, he learns how to walk and talk.  He is helped in
these activities by his soft-spoken mother, and by a host of
friendly animals, especially Thumper the rabbit.  As Bambi
grows up, he courts an obliging doe and learns about man,
a sinister, unseen force that kills animals and eventually 
burns down half the forest.
"Bambi" has lots of problems, and has to be considered a
disappointment.  The songs completely lack charm,
and are performed by a lifeless ensemble chorus.
The first half of the picture is slow, almost tedious.  
The second half is somber.
Bambi's character is uneven.  He is shown to be gentle and 
confused in the first half.  However, whenever a crisis arises,
he suddenly becomes brave and heroic, such as defending his
mate against a competitor buck or a pack of menacing dogs.
Bambi's father is sort of the king of the forest.  He shows
his fatherly ways by ignoring Bambi until he is in trouble,
then magically appearing to tell Bambi what to do.  The strong
and silent type, Bambi's dad can be distinguished a mile off
from the other deer since his body is twice as wide.
The forest animals have reversed courtships.  The male
of the species plays hard to get, while the female does all
she can to wear down his resistance.
The character I enjoyed most is Thumper.  Perhaps the film
should have been called "Thumper" instead, and starred the
fun-loving rabbit, with the deer as supporting cast.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
If 'Rain Man' became a concert pianist, he would
be David Helfgott.  "Shine" is the true-life
story of David, taking him from repressed childhood
to demented adulthood.  "Shine" is always interesting
and never drags, but sometimes misses the mark.
David is the only male son of tough-love father
Armin Mueller-Stahl, a Jewish concentration camp
survivor now living in Australia.  Father succeeds
in making David a child protege, but is reluctant
to give up control over him.  As David matures,
he develops greater psychological problems, with
the blame blatantly placed on his father.  David's
growing success as a pianist is wrecked by a
nervous breakdown, and he ends up institutionalized.
But he gradually recovers, and there is a happy
if unlikely ending.
Three actors play David.  Alex Rafalowicz is
child protege David, timid and polite.  Noah
Taylor is adolescent David, awkward and self-effacing.
Geoffrey Rush is middle-aged David, jabbering,
joyous and oblivious.  The Taylor and Rush versions
of David appear to have nothing in common except
their skill with a piano.
"Shine" is a good movie, but it has been over-rated.
I have several explanations for this.  The addition
of John Gielgud and Lynn Redgrave in minor roles
adds class to the cast, as does the extensive
use of (and references to) classical music.  Also,
the notion of an 'idiot savant' is appealing, a man
who can't tie his shoes or carry a conversation, but
who has some redeeming, extraordinary talent.  Give
David a piano and he's the life of the party.  Take
it away, and it's back to the funny farm.
Rush won the Academy Award for Best Actor, while
Mueller-Stahl was nominated for Best Supporting Actor.
Both give excellent performances, but I can't say
the same for their characters.  Demented David
always charms and never alienates, while his father
has psychological problems that rival his son's.
It just seems too easy to put all the blame for
David's dementia on his abusive father.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Endless Summer, The (1966)
Bruce Brown directed, produced, edited and
narrated "The Endless Summer", a pseudo-documentary
that follows two professional surfers around
the world.  It was filmed as a silent, with
witty narration and a surf music score later
added.  You would think that a documentary on
surfing would eventually reach low tide and
become beached, but the expected repetition
and boredom never quite arrives.  This has
much to do with the skill of Brown's editing,
and his knowledge of and enthusiasm for surfing.
Our surfer protagonists are Mike Hynson and
Robert August.  We don't get to know them
beyong surfing (and some clever comic relief
pantomiming) and it fact it is difficult to
tell which one is which.  Perhaps this is
just as well, since that allows the focus
to be on the sport of surfing, and how the
surf varies worldwide from beach to beach.
Brown and the crew stay behind the camera,
creating the illusion that they aren't there,
and that it is just Mike and Robert who are
surfing around the world.
The best part of the film comes early.  Mike
and Robert begin their travels with the northwest
coast of Africa, becoming the first ever to
surf there.  They encounter local villagers,
fishermen and their kids, who had never seen
a white man, much less a surfer, in their lives.
It is entertaining to see our surfing heroes
trying to communicate with the locals, who of
course speak no English, and attempting to teach
them how to surf.
You don't have to be an expert surfer to
appreciate the film.  Surfing techniques are
explained in amusing slang expressions, and the
cinematography, while on the cheap, is
very good.  Sometimes the waves are awesome,
with the surfers risking their lives for
the thrill of the ride.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Brainstorm (1983)
"Brainstorm" has Louise Fletcher and Christopher Walken
developing an amazing device that can record a person's
sensual and emotional experiences.  The resulting tapes,
when played by a different person, take over that person's
senses and feelings.
Unfortunately, the research has been funded by
unsavory Defense Department staffers, fronted by
Cliff Robertson. When they take over the project,
Walken rebels, and develops an obsession with
experiencing a tape made by a dying staffer.
"Brainstorm" is remembered mostly as Natalie Wood's
final film.  She died in a tragic boating accident
(thus inspiring the joke, "What kind of wood doesn't
float?") while the film was in production, resulting
in heavy script rewrites that delayed release of the
film for nearly two years.
This may have actually resulted in a better film,
since the rest of the cast, especially Fletcher, give
better performances.  Walken is mesmerizing as usual.
Robertson is fine as a man forced to betray his
engineers in the face of pressure from his superiors.
"Brainstorm" has interesting special effects, but the
story does have a few holes in it.  Wood seems eager
to help husband Walken play a tape that at worst could
kill him, and at best land him in prison.  Walken may
be a genius with robots, but his dial-in factory
sabatoge is perhaps too impressive.  He makes a tape
for Wood with his memories (in perfect clarity) but
from her viewpoint, which doesn't seem possible.
The "death tape" is full of flashbacks that only
include recent scenes from work, which are followed
by a light show that implies death is a good head rush.
Still, warts aside, "Brainstorm" is a fine effort,
with a solid script and performances, and a decent
sci-fi story.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for From the Terrace (1960)
This movie is one long soap opera.  It is well enough done to
be watchable, with the script and plot carefully executed.
Leon Ames is the owner of a large steel factory.  Myrna Loy
does a good imitation of Shelley Winters as his drunken, unloved,
pathetic wife.  Ames's eldest son died of spinal meningitis as
a child, somehow making Ames bitter towards the rest of the family.
Young, angst-ridden son Alfred (Paul Newman) returns from World War 
II, in time to quarrel with his father and beat up his mother's 
boyfriend.  Refusing to work for his father, Newman instead partners
with a friend designing aircraft.
Barbara Eden makes an obvious pass at him, but Newman only has
eyes for Joanne Woodward, despite being engaged to ever-present
Jim Roper.  She treats Newman coldly, but smugly enjoys the attention.
Newman keeps working her until they are married.  On the wedding
day, Newman and Ames have an argument.  Ames has a heart attack and dies.
Myrna Loy is not to be seen from again.
Woodward still treats Newman poorly, and cheats on him with
Roper whenever he is away, which is often due to his workaholic
ambitions.  Newman is impatient with his aircraft design job,
and leaves it to work for a zillionaire executive, whose grandson
he dramatically rescues from a fall into a half-frozen lake.
His success at the firm draws the rivalry of Howard Caine, who
will stop at nothing to show Newman up.
Newman falls for a doe-eyed dark-haired daughter (Ina Balin) 
of a client. The audience is supposed to approve of his affair 
but not his wife's.
Newman's boss is high on family values, and it will ruin
his career if he gets a divorce.  Woodward starts being nice
to him again, and it turns out that it is because he is to
be made partner.  But Caine has taken photos of Newman and Balin
in a hotel bedroom and tries to blackmail him.  Newman is
given the promotion before the board of directors.  Newman
delivers what begins as an acceptance speech, then transforms
into a missive complaining about how terrible wealth and 
ambition is, etc.  He then hails a taxi, ignoring Woodward
who is still trying to keep him, and goes to live in the 
country with Balin, where they are seen having a blissful
reunion as the music sweeps and the credits roll.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Swiss Family Robinson (1960)
"Swiss Family Robinson" is an entertaining spectacle for
kids through the early teen years, with excellent
cinematography.  However, it is too wholesome and
episodic, and lacks depth.
A European family escaping the terror of Napoleon Bonaparte
is shipwrecked on a lush deserted island.  After narrow
escapes from pirates and carnivores, they adapt and live
in grand style.  A teenage girl joins their clan, sparking
rivalry between the two teenage boys.  The pirates return
and must be fought off.
The problems with the movie begin with the premise.
A ship is abandoned by its crew, leaving as its only
passengers a family unit.  Their ship happens to wreck
on an island's reefs, and that island somehow has no 
inhabitants but has a very wide variety of African animals.
The youngest son, impish Francis, is supposed to provide
comic relief but his one-note acting performance of
enthusiastic shouting is quickly tiresome.  Mother (pop singer
Dorothy McGuire) and Father (John Mills) are perfect parents
who never lose their temper.  Somehow the family constructs
marvelous treetop penthouses, displaying unusual architectural
and engineering talent.  Where did they get the tools?
The pirates are scary but impotent.  One can't help but
notice the Caucasian adults are brave and heroic, while
the vile and cowardly pirates are of undetermined ethnic 
origins.
The sibling rivalry between older son Fritz (James MacArthur)
and Ernst (Tommy Kirk) is the most interesting part of the
movie.  One can identify with both Fritz's condescension and
Ernst's desire for the respect and privileges of birthright.
Still, a lesser Disney production that sugar coats what
could have been an interesting character study of adaptation
and resilience.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Thief of Bagdad, The (1924)
TOB is a lengthy, silent movie that moves slowly but is still
very interesting to watch.  The story is a classic of
love not only conquering all, but also changing one's very
nature.
Douglas Fairbanks Sr is the Thief, who is proud of his
ability to take whatever he wants.  He steals a magic rope
that can be used to scale the highest walls.  He raids the
Royal Palace to steal the Princess' jewels, but falls in
love with her from one gaze as she sleeps.
On her birthday, royal custom has it that she must choose
a husband from among suitors, who must be princes.  Four
princes are the candidates.  The first is nondescript, the
second is very fat, the third is evil, the fourth
is our hero, the Thief, who has stolen princely garment
from a slumbering merchant to have dress for the occasion.
He proclaims himself "Prince of the Isles and Seven Seas".
His fraud is discovered, and he is caught, beaten and 
released.  But his efforts has won the love of the Princess.
She does not want to wed any other Prince, so she stalls
by saying she will choose the suitor who in seven moons
brings the rarest treasure.
Our hero must overcome many obstacles to procure his
treasure, a magic box from which any object desired can
be removed.  The other princes each also find rare objects:
a magic crystal that can see the future, a flying carpet,
a magic apple that can restore life to the dead.
The evil prince is the villian in this movie.  He is oriental,
and is always cunning and scheming.  The other orientals in
the film are also this way, actually a weakness of the film.
He poisons the princess so that his apple can cure her.
He stocks the palace with soldiers so that he can conquer
Bagdad.  Our hero the thief must overcome not only his
treachery, but also his army.
The movie has reasonable special effects, although the
monsters would be more scary if they did not simply loom
over Fairbanks until he gets around to slicing them with
his trusty knife.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Young Lions, The (1958)
"The Young Lions" is a lengthy war epic that focuses not on
battles, but on the people that have been forced to fight
them.  The theme of war as an evil, destructive and pointless
force is well-developed, and the quality of the script and
story more than compensates for minor problems.
It is the story of three soldiers.  Marlon Brando plays a
German lieutenant whose growing disillusionment with war
and the German cause parallels the decline of the Axis war
machine.  Montgomery Clift plays a jewish private who must
overcome harassment from his fellow soldiers.  Dean Martin
plays a Broadway entertainer who is racked with guilt for
trying to avoid fighting in the front lines.
Dean Martin has the weakest character.  He is clearly in his late
thirties, but is so guilty over not serving in the trenches
that he falls to drinking and abuse of his girlfriend.  Martin
doesn't seem comfortable, looking as if he'd rather be somewhere
else.
Clift effectively underplays.  Clift always landed terrific
roles, due either to his excellent judgement of scripts, or 
from film directors noticing his charisma.  His character
briefly deserts his unit, an action not well explained.  Also,
perhaps he is made too much of a hero in rescuing his bullying 
fellow soldiers.
Brando has the best role.  His German accent isn't quite right,
but he underplays his character perfectly.  Torn between duty
and the revulsion of his actions, he soon has the unhappy look 
of a condemned man.  
Well directed, there's not a scene wasted, and the film
never drags.  The Germans are portrayed as humans reluctantly
following an evil cause, rather than as murderous stereotypes.
The script and cinematography is also excellent.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Man for All Seasons, A (1966)
"A Man For All Seasons" is a contest of will between
King Henry VIII of England (Robert Shaw) and Sir Thomas 
Moore (Paul Scofield).  The King's marriage is not going
well.  His wife cannot deliver an heir, which is necessary
to avoid potential civil war upon the King's death.
The King wishes to divorce his wife and marry again,
this time to his brother's widow, with whom he is already
having an affair.  If the King cannot obtain the permission
of the Pope for a divorce, no matter.  He will start his
own church, with himself at its head.
The King's government officials readily accept the wishes
of the King, mostly for their own protection.  But not
Moore, who does not approve of the divorce. He believes
that if he does not say so, publicly or privately, he
cannot be convicted of treason.  Moore is influential
in society, and the King insists that Moore take an
oath that approves of the divorce and King Henry's
place as head of the Church.  But Moore believes that
if he takes this oath, his soul will be condemned, and
he would rather lose his head than his soul.
Early in the film, Moore becomes Chancellor of England.
Due to his believes, Moore gives up the title, his family
becomes poor and outcast, Moore is imprisioned in the
Tower of London, and eventually executed.  While this
slow submission of Moore to the King's will is 
well scripted and plotted, it does get a little repetitive.
The dry nature of the film prevents any comic relief,
and any humor is ironic.  The alignment of the cast
into "good" (Moore's family, the Duke of Norfolk) 
and "bad" (Cromwell, Richard Rich) is also simplistic.
Moore being a lawyer, and speaking in sixteenth century
English, most of what he says takes considerable
concentration to comprehend.  The film ends up less
of a character study and more of a lawyer's deposition.
Admittedly, I am scratching around for reasons I
did not grade this film very highly.  Might as well
mention the character of Moore's daughter (Susannah York)
who is so perfect that she may as well sprout Angel's
wings.
"A Man For All Seasons" was the star of the 1966 
Academy Awards, winning Best Picture, Best Director
(Fred Zinnemann) and Best Actor (Scofield).
The Academy must have found more charm in the film
than I was able to.
Orson Welles is indeed in this movie, but is limited
to only two scenes in the first few minutes.  He looks
as heavy as John Candy and Marlon Brando joined at
the waist.
Shaw's portrayal of the King is my favorite part of
the movie.  King Henry VIII is usually depicted in 
film as gluttonous, murderous, and debauched.  Henry
here is portrayed as mercurial and self-centered,
but also as a patron of the arts.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Graduate, The (1967)
"The Graduate" is a good comedy that has generally
been over-rated over the years.  While the film
launched Dustin Hoffman's career, it is by no means
his best film (my bets are on "Little Big Man").
Most of the humor works, which admittedly is the
point, but the characters of Hoffman and Ross
lack consistency and motivation.
Perhaps "The Graduate" should have been called
"The Three Faces of Dustin" instead.  Benjamin
(Hoffman) has just graduated from college, but
continues to live at home.  He is polite and
earnest.  He is seduced by his father's partner's
wife, middle-aged Mrs. Robinson (Anne Bancroft).
As the furtive affair continues, Benjamin becomes
secretive and dissipated.  Mrs. Robinson's daughter,
Elaine (Katherine Ross) returns home from college.
Under pressure from his parents, Benjamin dates
Elaine but soon falls for her.  This leads to
The Third Face of Dustin, the obsessed Stalker,
as he tries to get her to marry him.
Benjamin is extremely naive for a college graduate
with his golden resume, which includes captain
of the track team and editor of the college
newspaper.  It doesn't help that Hoffman was thirty
years old in 1967, nearly ten years older than his
character.  His first encounter with Bancroft
at a swank hotel is endearingly clumsy, but not
completely credible.  After several such encounters,
he still refers to her as "Mrs. Robinson".  You
think they'd be on a first name basis by then.
Katherine Ross is lovely, but her character seems
to just go with the flow.  When Benjamin is cruel
to her, she cries.  When he wants to make up, she
agrees.  Benjamin stalks her, and she believes that
he raped her mother.  So, why does she show up at
his apartment.  And agree to marry him against her
parent's wishes and her better judgment?  And
whatever happened to the beautiful brand new Alfa
Romeo? If he doesn't want it, I'll take it!
Look fast for Richard Dreyfuss.  He's the guy who
wants to call the police.  Buck Henry, who also
co-wrote the screenplay, has a small part, as does
Norman Fell.  All three are funny.
The soundtrack is full of Simon & Garfunkel tunes.
The soundtrack had as much success as the film,
topping the charts.  The tunes are wimpy but still
very good.
"The Graduate" won the Oscar for Best Director
(Mike Nichols).  The film was nominated for many
other Academy Awards, including Best Picture,
Best Actor (Hoffman), Best Actress (Bancroft), Best
Adapted Screenplay, Best Cinematography (Robert
Surtees), and Best Supporting Actress (Ross).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Life with Father (1947)
"Life With Father" is a comedy with a theme.  Men believe
that they are in control of their lives and call the shots,
when in fact their wives and girlfriends are running the
show.  The humor comes from the expressions on the men's
faces when they realize that something is going on
that wasn't planned, and that they are unable to do
anything about it.
The film takes place in New York in the late 1800s.  Clarence
Day (William Powell) is a successful businessman with
a doting wife (Irene Dunne) and four sons.  The eldest,
Clarence Jr, is trying be an adult a bit too soon.
The second son, John, is good natured and interested in science.
The third son, Whitney, is trying to pass catechism but
is more interested in baseball and tormenting the youngest
son Harlan.  
A running gag in the film is that the maids keep quitting
because Powell is impossible to live with.  He is so clueless
that he blames his wife for this.
Powell and Dunne are affectionate to each other, but there is
an undercurrent of tension in their relationship, about who
is in control.  They mostly quarrel about money and religion.
Powell is too practical for religion, and his comments on the
subject terrify his wife, who is afraid she will be alone in
heaven.  Dunne externally obeys, but subtly manipulates her
husband.
There is a visit from Cousin Cora and her daughter Mary
(A teen-aged Elizabeth Taylor).  Cora is a busy-body sterotype,
while Taylor is ever-smiling and says nothing but bland
pleasantries.  Powell tries to tell his wife that they can't
stay, and won't go out to dinner, but is outmaneuvered.
Taylor and Clarence Jr connect, and the oldest begins to
behave unnaturally, trying to impress Taylor with his
dreadful violin playing and contrived "adult" conversations.
Father casually mentions that he has never been baptized.
This leads to a lengthy battle of wills between Powell and
Dunne.  Powell is stubborn in his belief that baptism is
not important, while Dunne is devastated.
A curious story line is that Jr is given father's suit to
wear, and Jr believes that he can't do anything father wouldn't
do while wearing his suit.  This means he can't embrace
Taylor, which leads to an argument between the two leaving
Jr bewildered.  Powell sees this and gives his son advice
about being "firm", advice that is shown useless when Powell
is tricked in a subsequent discussion with his wife over
the household budget.
Dunne's health declines from worry over Powell's refusal to
be baptized.  She becomes more sick after being given patent
medicine being peddled by sons John and Jr.  She only
begins to recover after Powell reluctantly agrees to
be baptized, a promise he tries to back out of as her health
improves.
Dunne goes shopping and buys an expensive ceramic pugdog.
Powell is mortified and has her return it.  But instead it
is exchanged for a new suit for Jr.  The next morning,
the gap between Powell's expectations and reality comes
clear when he learns that he is still out the money for
the pugdog, that Cora and Mary are returning for another
visit, that his sons have been selling poisonous medicine,
and that he is to be taken in an expensive rented carriage
out of town to be baptized.  Exasperated, all Powell can
say is "Gad!" as he submits to his wife's will.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sherlock, Jr. (1924)
"Sherlock, Jr." is one of the most famous of all silent films.
It is a comedy, and is filled with many excellent stunts and gags.
Buster Keaton plays an everyman who has a dreary job running a
film projector, but dreams of becoming a detective.  He courts
a pretty girl at her father's house, but has competition:
a much bigger man who is also a criminal.  The rival steals
the father's pocket watch and frames Keaton.  Keaton has
lost his girlfriend unfairly.
At the theatre, Keaton falls asleep during a film he is showing.
In a dream, he sees himself joining the movie's plot.
Here, Keaton plays the great detective Sherlock Jr.
His rival plots to kill Keaton so that he can continue
stealing from others.  This all leads to several incredible
stunts, usually involving moving vehicles and intricate timing
ordinarily found only in cartoons.
Keaton performs these stunts himself.  Legend has it that
years after the most famous stunt from this film (Keaton 
jumps from a moving train, grabs a watertower's drainage pipe, 
turning in downwards, thus dousing himself, leading to a nasty 
fall) Keaton went to a doctor for a checkup, and the doctor 
asked him "When did you break your neck?"
"Sherlock, Jr." is considered to be one of the best silent
films.  I assume that this is because of the stunts.  However,
these stunts only take up a few minutes (in total) of the film,
and cannot have a major impact on its grade.
There is much to like about the film.  There is genuine
dramatic tension when Keaton is playing pool, surrounded by
bad guys who are attempting to kill him.  It is also easy to
identify with Keaton, who dreams of a better life and
courts his girlfriend with such innocence.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Invasion of the Body Snatchers (1956)
"Invasion of the Body Snatchers" is an interesting, intelligently
scripted film, particularly for a 1950s horror film.  However, 
the melodramatic score, heavy-handed direction and hammy acting 
make it more of a comedy than it was intended to be.
The plot has a Dr. Binnell arriving to town after a vacation
and encountering a rash of people claiming that their relatives
are no longer themselves.  Later, these same people recant.
Gradually, Binnell comes to believe that these people are
controlled by aliens and that they are after him as well.
This film asks the questions: What if the people closest to you
were suddenly different.  What if they had some secret and evil
plan?  What if they wanted you to join them, even against your
will?  While the plot has these people's bodies possessed by
alien pods from outer space, the screenplay may be a thinly
disguised jab at cold war paranoia in the U.S., and the general 
belief that communists were around every corner and out to 
subvert the country.  Since screenwriters as well as actors
were blacklisted (see Woody Allen's "The Front") and lived
in fear of losing their jobs during the cold war, any protest
that a screenwriter made would have to be between the lines.
The "pod people" in this film don't act like the controlled zombies 
you would expect them to be, except in the group scenes.  Taken
one by one, they just seem to be bad tempered.  Often they
act quite human.  More consistency for "pod people" behavior
would have been an improvement, as well as greater contrast
in personalities between those converted and those still alive.
Binnell, who has somehow remained single and unattached all these
years, meets old flame Becky Driscoll, also unattached.
They are a couple for the rest of the film.  This begs the
questions: Why does a sci-fi flick have to have a love interest
subplot?  Why can't Binnell and Becky be cast as happily
married rather than just reunited long lost lovers?
Is a relationship only considered interesting if it is brand new?
The studio wanted to soften the ending of the "Invasion of
the Body Snatchers", so the put additional scenes at the beginning
and end of the film.  It can be argued that tampering with
the director's concept ruins the film, but a three minute
scene added to an eighty minute film cannot significantly
affect its grade.
Petty criticisms aside, "Invasion of the Body Snatchers" is
a good and original film that successfully explores the
paranoia that sometimes lurks within us all.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gycklarnas afton (1953)
"Gycklarnas afton" is from the early directing career
of Ingmar Bergman.  In the U.S., the film was shown in
theatres under the title "The Naked Night", and on
television with the title "Sawdust and Tinsel".
The film explores romantic relationships, reaching
a pessimistic conclusion.  There is little action
but many close-ups, and the major characters deserve
neither sympathy nor particular interest.
Ake Gronberg is the obese, depressive, middle-aged owner
of a struggling circus.  His lover is Harriet Andersson,
who is young and beautiful, but lower class.  His
estranged wife is Annika Tretow.  Gronberg attempts a
reconciliation with Tretow, while Andersson begins
a tawdry romance with self-assured, pallid actor
Hasse Ekman.
The film's biggest problem is with the characters.
Ekman is the least credible. He begins his courtship
with Andersson with begging, but soon reveals a
sadistic nature.  He quickly loses interest in her.
Andersson is an unlikely match for the unattractive,
unstable, abusive, and impoverished Gronberg.
Gronberg is jealous of Andersson, yet is anxious to
trade her in for his indifferent wife.
The point that Bergman is making is clear.  Love is
a mirage that vanishes before you can reach it,
and is driven by selfish motives such as lust, vanity,
and security.  Unfortunately, this pessimistic
evaluation is supported by characters who lack
sufficient credibility in their actions, and are
too loathsome for the viewer to develop an interest
in their fate.
While the film is mostly imagery and dialogue,
there is a brief action scene.  Gronberg and
Ekman have a fistfight, and these few minutes
are easily the film's best.  Even the gloomiest,
most relentless dramas need a change of pace.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Rio Grande (1950)
"Rio Grande" was the third chapter of director John Ford's
cavalry trilogy, after "Fort Apache" and "She Wore a
Yellow Ribbon".  Much of the cast and crew from those
features returns, including John Wayne, comic relief
Victor McLaglen, Jack Pennick, and writer James Warner
Bellah.
"Rio Grande" is set at a remote, undestaffed fort near
the Mexican border in 1879.  Lt. Col. Yorke (John Wayne)
is facing an uprising of Apache Indians, who emerge
from protected villages in Mexico for hit and run attacks.
Yorke's young son has failed West Point and enlisted to
prove his manhood, by coincidence assigned to his father's
command.  Wayne's estranged wife Kathleen (Maureen O'Hara)
arrives to claim her underaged son from the Army, and rekindle
romance with Wayne.  Meanwhile, Tyree (Ben Johnson) is wanted
for Manslaughter, and there are several songs from the
impressive 'Sons of the Pioneers'.
"Rio Grande" is better than "Fort Apache" and about equal
to "She Wore a Yellow Ribbon" in quality.  Competently
directed, with a fine cast and cinematography, the film
is surprisingly sentimental but sometimes drags.  As usual
in Ford films, the Indians are faceless Savages, with
audience sympathy intended for the cavalry soldiers.
Claude Jarman Jr. is well-cast for the role of Wayne's
son.  He looks the boy his character is supposed to be,
and conveys the earnest and determined character traits
necessary for the role.  The father-son/commander-recruit/
guerilla-war theme was previously used in "Lives of a
Bengal Lancer" from 1935, another film in which the son
has to perform heroic feats to win the respect of his
father.
Trivia: John Wayne's son Patrick makes his film debut.
John Ford used "Rio Grande" as a bargaining chip for
"The Quiet Man", with Republic Studios willing to gamble
on the latter film only if a sure-winner Western was
made first.  Wayne, O'Hara and McLaglen would star in
the superior "The Quiet Man", which turned out to be
a hit after all.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Great Dictator, The (1940)
Charlie Chaplin's films always had their share of social
commentary, mixed in with a large dose of humor.
"The Great Dictator" is a very good film that accomplishes
both its goals: it is often hilarious, and it effectively
lampoons Hitler and his oppressive policies.
"The Great Dictator" was apparently written prior to
Hitler's invasion of Poland that triggered World War II.
Chaplin's targets are Hitler, his henchmen, Mussolini,
Hitler's treatment of Jews, and the acquisition of Austria.
Stormtroopers are invariably portrayed as bullying,
stocky and stupid.
Chaplin plays the story's hero, a Jewish Barber who has spent
the past twenty years unconscious in a hospital.  Upon
recovery and release, he is unaware of the changes to German
society and the new plight of the Jews.  He has no problem
getting a girlfriend (Paulette Goddard) but makes enemies with
the stormtroopers.
Chaplin also plays a Hitler clone.  The satire is very cleverly
done.  Hitler's fiery speeches are ridiculed, as is the
ubiquitous salute (famous statues such as "The Thinker"
are shown saluting).  Hitler's schemes to conquer the world
and install a master Aryan race are also mocked.  A Mussolini-like
character eventually arrives to argue with Hitler about
who will control Austria.  Mussolini is hilarously played
by Jack Oakie as a swaggering egotist, complete with an
exaggerated Italian accent.
"The Great Dictator", in addition to its heavy political
messages, marks several changes in Chaplin's career.  Although
there are many silent scenes (Hitler dances with a globe,
Jews eat puddings laced with coins that they try to put on
another's plate) this is Chaplin's first talkie.  Chaplin
does not play his Tramp character, and allows another actor
(Oakie) to upstage him.
While "The Great Dictator" was not the masterpiece that
his previous film ("Modern Times" from 1936) was, it
remains a fascinating film that makes an important statement
and marks an era.  It flags only in the final scenes, when
the Barber makes an uncharacteristic (and overlong)
impassioned speech.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Patriot Games (1992)
"Patriot Games" has a lot of action and high-powered stars, but
the usual problems of unlikely plot and character development
turn this would-be thriller into a disappointment.
The film stars Harrison Ford as Jack Ryan, a tourist in
England who interferes with a IRA terrorist act.  The terrorist
escapes imprisonment and keeps coming after Ford and his
family.  Meanwhile, Ford returns to work for the CIA to fight
the IRA renegades.
Ford's wife is played by Anne Archer.  They have a preteen
daughter Sally.  Ford is the perfect father and husband,
Archer the perfect wife and mother, and Sally is the perfect
daughter.  Even their professions stretch belief, as Ford
is both a former Marine Lieutenant and CIA operative,
and Archer is a surgeon who wears heavy eye makeup while
performing operations.
While touring England, Ford happens upon terrorists attacking
a car with Royal family members.  Unarmed Ford tackles and
kills one of them, while the other is taken prisoner.  The
prisoner is notorious IRA terrorist Sean Miller.  Ford
testifies against Miller in a trial that apparently takes
place very shortly and soon thereafter.  Ford returns to the
states, but Miller escapes.  Forgetting his cause, he
becomes obsessed with getting revenge on Ford and his family.
This obsession increasing loses credibility almost as
much as Ford's heroic actions protecting himself and family.
The finale has Ford chased by Miller in speedboats
(fortunate to the plot that wife and daughter has been
already rescued, and that there are two speedboats waiting
at the shore to be taken).  Miller is a trained terrorist
who has a machine gun, while Ford only has his wits.
All I can say is that IRA hitmen need plenty more target
practice.
This adaptation of a Tom Clancy novel has something in common
with another adaptation, "The Hunt for Red October".
James Earl Jones plays a top U.S. agent in both films,
essentially the same character, and even delivers a similar
line in both films to the hero: "Have you slept any lately?"
"Patriot Games" tries to create tension with the constant
placing of Ford and his family in jeopardy, but the
certainty of a happy ending and the shallowness of the
villian characters causes only mild annoyance.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Avalon (1990)
Barry Levinson directed, co-produced and wrote the
screenplay for "Avalon", his third film (after "Diner"
and "Tin Men") set in Baltimore and based on
semi-autobiographical events.  It is a beautifully
photographed, intelligently written and somewhat
sad film.
"Avalon" tells the story of a Polish-American family.
Sam (Armin Mueller-Stahl) and wife Eva (Joan Plowright)
are immigrants from Poland.  Their grown son Jules
(Aidan Quinn) is a salesman, with wife Anne (Elizabeth
Perkins) and young son Michael (Elijah Wood).  Jules's
ambitions with cousin Izzy (Kevin Pollak) lead to a brief
merchandising empire built on a warehouse full of consumer
goods.
Most of the film takes place in the late 1940s, and
Levinson takes pains to point out the great transformations
that were occuring in American society during that period.
Mass transit was being replaced by the automobile,
the middle class was moving to the suburbs, the extended
family was shrinking into the nuclear family.  Television
was being introduced, and America was fascinated by the
small glowing screen.  These cultural changes are
worked effortlessly into the story and characters.
The comic relief mostly comes from Sam and Eva's
conversations.  They are circular and repetitive,
but entertaining.  To Jules and Anne, it appears that
their parents are arguing.  This is one of many examples
of the cross-cultural gap between the aging immigrants
and their American-born children, who have no accents,
find the 'Family Circle' ritual tedious, and have
Americanized their last names.
"Avalon" was nominated for several Academy Awards,
including Best Original Screenplay (Barry Levinson),
Best Cinematography (Allen Daviau), Best Original
Score (Randy Newman) and Best Costume Design
(Gloria Gresham).  The Golden Globes nominated it
for Best Film in the Dramatic category.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mark of Zorro, The (1920)
"The Mark of Zorro" is a silent epic starring
Douglas Fairbanks Sr.  It is a good film with
plenty of action, and decent comic relief,
but the characters (except Fairbanks') lack
the depth that is required of a better film.
Don Diego Vega (Fairbanks) has returned to
California after many years in Spain.  He is
vaguely discourteous, perpetually fatigued,
and particularly fond of his handkerchief.
His stereotypical father (Sidney de Gray)
disapproves of his character and idle lifestyle.
What father doesn't know is that his son is
also Zorro, masked avenger of the pathetic and
repressed.  Zorro is easily the most skillful
and smartest swashbuckler in California, and
enjoys humiliating the local soldiers, especially
Sergeant Gonzales (Noah Beery).
de Gray orders his son to woo Marguerite de la
Motte, whose family is unfairly repressed by the
Governor (George Periolat).  However, she prefers
Zorro, who makes regular appearances to ward
off obnoxious suitor Robert McKim.
"The Mark of Zorro" is at its best when Fairbanks
is playing Don Diego Vega.  Fairbanks is known
for his action roles, and it is a pleasant change
to see him in a comic relief role.  Vega's
feeble courtship with de la Motte is entertaining.
Fairbanks as Zorro is a laughing, mocking, smoking
tormentor.
"The Mark of Zorro" was filmed in black and
white, of course, but made frequent use of
tinted lenses.  Various scenes have red, green
or blue tints, depending upon whether the scene
takes place in daylight, at night, or indoors.
I have not seen enough early silent features
to know if this was a common technique, but
it was no longer used by the mid-1920s.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Thief of Bagdad, The (1940)
"The Thief of Baghdad" was an elaborate technicolor
remake of the 1924 silent classic.  Producer
Alexander Korda struggled mightily to make the
film, going through six directors, and he was
forced by the war to move the final production
from North Africa to the U.S.  The expenses
associated with the enormous sets and the early
color cinematography made "The Thief of Baghdad"
one of the most expensive films ever made to that
point, costing more than "Gone With the Wind".
The story is greatly changed from the 1924 version.
Douglas Fairbanks' character is split into two roles,
a love interest (Ahmad, played by John Justin) and
an adolescent thief (Abu, played by Sabu).  Ahmad is
the puppet prince of evil magician Jaffar (Conrad Veidt).
Jaffar conspires to kill Ahmad, who is saved by
the ever-resourceful Abu.  Ahmad soon falls for
a foreign princess (June Duprez), who is the daughter
of a foolish, toy-obsessed king (Morton Selten, who
is also credited as one of the writers).  Jaffar
also wants the lovely princess, who in turn pines
for Ahmad.  Ahmad and Abu spend the rest of the
film trying to pry the princess from the clutches
of evil Jaffar, frequently performing brave and
heroic deeds in the process.  These deeds are aided
by a bombastic genie (Rex Ingram), an all-seeing eye,
a magic bow, and a flying carpet.  Many of these
story elements later found their way into Disney's
"Aladdin" (1992) animated feature.
"The Thief of Baghdad" was nominated for four
Academy Awards, including Best Color Cinematography
(George Perinal), best sets (Vincent Korda, the
producer's brother), Best Special Effects (Lawrence
Butler), and Best Original Score (Miklos Rozsa).
"The Thief of Baghdad" is highly regarded today.
No amount of web-surfing could come up with a
negative comment about the film.  But my experience
with the film was different.  I found the soundtrack
blaring, the special effects cheezy, and the entire
story was implausible (admittedly from an adult's
point of view).  I am aware that the film is a fantasy,
but then there is the instant, mutual love that
Ahmad and the princess have.  There is also the
obsession that Abu has for Ahmad, and that Jaffar
has for the princess.  I can accept that there is
an all-seeing eye, but not that flinging it against
rocks will send you to a sky palace where elderly
sultans will greet you as a hero.  I can accept
that enormous genies can be trapped inside a bottle,
but not that they are so stupid as to go back inside.
I can accept that Abu must kill a giant spider to
steal the all-seeing eye, but the eye's 'guardians'
seem thoroughly confused.
And, personally, if an evil magician made me blind
or turned me into a dog, I wouldn't mess with him
anymore.  Hey, you can have the princess.  It's
just not worth it.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Man Who Shot Liberty Valance, The (1962)
The Man who Shot Liberty Valance (1962)
When I was a kid I would hear the "The Man who Shot
Liberty Valance" on the radio.  The song that is, which
was a hit for mawkish singer Gene Pitney.  There were
lyrics somewhat like "When Liberty Valance strode the
town, the folks would step aside, they'd hide".  So
bad it was good, the song has always made me look forward
to seeing the movie and the bad guy Liberty Valance.
Well, the song wasn't in the movie, and Valance turned
out to be Lee Marvin, creating the stumbling, wild-eyed,
cartoonish character put to better use in "Ship of Fools"
and "Cat Ballou".  Director John Ford assembles a stellar
cast, but like Marvin, the actors are given somewhat
stereotypical characters familiar from previous roles.
John Wayne is a good-guy rancher, handy with a gun
("Red River"), Jimmy Stewart is the new man in town,
out of place and unwilling to use a gun ("Destry Rides
Again"), Andy Devine is a comic relief character, the
only man able to talk off-key ("Stagecoach"), Vera Miles
is the headstrong, beautiful woman torn between two men
("The Searchers"), Edmond O'Brien is the drunken yellow
journalist (help me fill in the blank here, folks).
Fortunately, Ford is such a masterful storyteller that
the film can partly overcome the conventional characters.
The story begins with an elderly Stewart and Miles arriving
in a sleepy Western town to attend the funeral of a nobody.
When a nosy reporter asks why, Stewart obliges.  The film
becomes a flashback.  Stewart arrives from the East, and
plans to establish himself as a lawyer in the town.  Since
he is pro-statehood, he becomes the enemy of Liberty Valance,
a crazy, mean-spirited man with two sadistic sidekicks.
Valance is in cahoots with greedy ranchers who oppose statehood.
Aiding Stewart is the one-man newspaper firm O'Brien.  Stewart
is also befriended by good-guy, tough-guy Wayne, whose gal
is Miles.  Miles and Stewart work together in the kitchen
of a restaurant, where they frequently exchange meaningful
glances.  A showdown between gunslinger Marvin and the
ungainly, inexperienced Stewart is inevitable.
Although the film is over two hours long, there are only a
few slow moments.  Miles leads some cute schoolkids in their
recital of the alphabet, while Maxwell Scott has failed to
memorize the Declaration of Independence (ironic that he
stumbles on the phrase "All men are created equal").  Since
lauded as a great film, "The Man who Shot Liberty Valance"
is a good but conventional Western that has become somewhat
over-rated due to its famous cast and director.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ran (1985)
In 1957, Japanese Director Akira Kurosawa borrowed
from Shakespeare's "Macbeth" for his film "Throne
of Blood".  Nearly three decades later, Kurosawa
returned to the setting of medieval Japanese armies
at war, this time adapting plot elements from
Shakespeare's "King Lear".  "Ran" is the Japanese
symbol for chaos, an apt description of the story:
the disintegration of a family dynasty through ambition,
treachery and war.
Elderly warlord Hidetora Ichimonji (Tatsuya Nakadai)
decides to cede power to his eldest son Taro (Akira Terao).
Middle son Jiro (Jinpachi Nezu) approves, but youngest
son Saburo (Daisuke Ryu) objects, suggesting that the family
will be destroyed by the rival ambitions of the older
brothers.  Hidetora banishes his impudent son, but his
prophecy quickly comes to pass.  Hidetora is turned out
by his sons, becomes lunatic, and hides in the countryside
aided only by court jester Kyoami (Peter) and loyal servant
Tango (Masayuki Yui).  Meanwhile, Taro's wife Kaede
(Mieko Harada) uses Taro and Jiro in her machinations for
revenge against the Ichimonji family, leading to a
disastrous war with Saburo's soldiers and allies.
As in "Throne of Blood", the destructive ambitions of
the warlords are stoked by the schemes of a woman (Kaede).
The battle scenes, the sets, and the cinematography
are all excellent.  Just one complaint: there must
be a hundred warriors shot down from their horses,
but not once does a horse fall.  I am not advocating
cruelty to animals, but medieval marksmanship couldn't
have been that good!
Hidetora has two distinct personalities: the bold,
ruthless warlord, and the lost, cowardly madman.
It is to Nadakai's credit that he plays both roles
well.  His character's wild mane of white hair
perfectly matches his pathos.  The effeminate
supporting character of Kyoami is the most interesting:
the court fool can say things that, if said by others,
would be treasonous.  But it is advice worth
considering.
With the help of the Internet Movie Database,
I did some quick research on Kurosawa.  Sixteen
films that he directed have received at least
fifty votes.  All sixteen films average between
8.0 and 8.9 (out of 10), an extremely impressive
record of consistency.  Kurosawa, who was 75 years
old at film's completion, also edited and co-wrote
"Ran" (with Hideo Oguni and Masato Ide). It was
at the time the most expensive Japanese film ever
made.  It was nominated for four Academy Awards
(unusual for a foreign-language film) including
Best Director and Best Cinematography
(Takao Saito, Masaharu Ueda, Asakazu Nakai).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Place in the Sun, A (1951)
"A Place in the Sun" was an enormous commercial
and critical success.  Starring sensitive
Montgomery Clift, beautiful young Elizabeth Taylor,
and featuring a tragic love triangle as the story,
the film had substantial appeal, particularly
to women.
George (Clift) has been scraping out a living as
an unskilled laborer.  He visits his well-to-do
uncle, who gives him a job in his bathing suit
factory.  George starts his new career at the
bottom, meeting frumpy Alice (Shelley Winters) as a
fellow drudge on the assembly line.  Despite a company
rule against fraternization, they see each other.
Alice becomes pregnant, and presses him for a marriage
that would mire him deeper in poverty.
Meanwhile, George has begun dating boss's daughter
and brunette goddess Angela (Taylor).  George has
also been promised a promotion to management.  However,
Alice is in the way of his plans.  George decides to
take her boating...  and you guess the rest.
"A Place in the Sun" is based on Theodore Dreiser's
novel "An American Tragedy", which was filmed in 1931.
Not having seen this movie, I compare "Place" with
the 1927 classic "Sunrise", which also features a
love triangle, a boating accident, and second thoughts
from the protagonist.  Clift's character is as
gentle and earnest as ever, but has some of
the ambition and duplicity of his role from
"The Heiress".  Winters, who played a dynamic
romantic lead in "Winchester '73" from the year
before (1950), is depicted as poor, drab, clinging
and self-pitying.  The contrast between her and
dazzling rich girl Taylor could not be greater.
Perhaps Taylor's breathless character isn't fully
credible.  She falls too quickly and deeply in love
with Clift, and remains loyal to him to the end,
even paying him a visit on death row.  Also, Raymond
Burr acts both as police detective and prosecutor
(it must be quite a small town).
High production values and a good script and cast
paid off at the Academy Awards as well as the box
office.  "A Place in the Sun" was nominated for Best
Picture and won six Oscars, including Best Director
(George Stevens), Screenplay (Michael Wilson, Harry Brown)
and Black & White Cinematography (William C. Mellor).
Clift and Winters were also nominated for Best Actor
and Actress.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Psycho (1960)
"Psycho" is one of Alfred Hitchcock's best and most famous films.
Although it has been called a black comedy or a horror movie,
perhaps it qualifies better as a mystery.  There is considerable
suspense throughout, the Bernard HerrmanX score is outstanding, 
the script and directing is excellent, and Anthony Perkins'
character (Norman Bates) and performance is one of the most 
infamous in film history.
There are spoilers in the following paragraphs, but it would
be difficult to discuss the film properly without giving much away.
The story begins with blonde beauty Janet Leigh, whose character
is vulnerable but calculating.  She steals a large sum of cash
from her employer and flees town.  She sells her car, and stops
for the night at a cheap hotel.  There, she meets lonely hotel
owner Perkins.  Perkins has a strong love-hate relationship with
his abusive mother, who is heard but not seen.  Leigh is murdered,
apparently by Perkins' mother.  Later, a private detective traces
Leigh to the motel.  This leads to more confrontations between
Perkins and those looking for Leigh.  It is revealed that
Perkins has a split personality: one as Norman, the other as his
long-dead mother.
Hitchcock plays a trick on us by focusing the first half of
the film on Leigh, when the film is really about Norman Bates.
Even in the second half, the story is told from the viewpoint
of other characters.  These characters only know part of the
truth, adding to the mystery and suspense that permeates the
film.  
The dramatic tension is strong and endless:  Will Leigh steal
the cash?  Will she get caught, by the policeman or the car
salesman?  What is Bates' relationship with his mother?  Will
Bates get charged with his mother's crime?  Is Bates' mother
still alive?  If not, who is the old lady who lives with him?
Hitchcock keeps the audience guessing by teasing it with
misleading information.
Poor Anthony Perkins.  Prior to "Psycho", he played leading 
man roles, in successful films such as "Fear Strikes Out" and 
"On The Beach".  He was sort of a Timothy Hutton of the
1950s.  But after "Psycho", he could only be seen by the
audience as Norman Bates.  He could then only get Bates-style
roles, such as in "Pretty Poison" and the Psycho sequels.
My only real complaint about "Psycho" is the conclusion.
A psychiatrist is trotted in to explain Perkins' behaviour.
He seems to know everything: that Bates killed his mother,
other strangers, buried them all in the swamp, and didn't
steal the money.  Tying up all the loose ends in "Psycho"
goes against the grain of the rest of the film.  I can
imagine this character appearing in "2001: A Space Odyssey"
to explain things: "The monkeys represent early man, whose
murderous instincts required alien intervention to advance
human society..."
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for $ (1972)
"$" had a marketing problem: no one knew how to
pronounce the title.  Later, the film was retitled
"Dollars", then "The Heist" for foreign distribution,
but the damage had already been done.  Which is a
pity: while derivative (the film's story had been
lifted from 1970's "Perfect Friday") the film has
many entertaining scenes.
Warren Beatty stars as a bank security officer
who is in cahoots with childlike prostitute
Goldie Hawn.  Their scheme is to empty the safe
deposit boxes of three criminals, all of whom are
customers of both Hawn and Beatty's bank.  Beatty's
character is likeable but over his head (as usual).
After looting the boxes during a phony bomb threat,
his victims (gregarious Army sergeant Scott Brady,
raspy-voiced drug runner Arthur Brauss, and Vegas
casino embezzler Robert Webber) discover the
crime and in a lengthy chase attempt to corner
Beatty and recover the ill-gotten money.  The film
is set in Hamburg, (West) Germany, and Gert Frobe
plays Beatty's elderly, gullible bank boss.
"$" is for adults only.  There is much female
nudity, and Brauss gets tortured with a switchblade.
But those with proper stomachs will enjoy the
humor, whether it comes from Hawn getting chased
around her apartment by her johns, or Beatty
playing 'hero' in a bank vault all the while
robbing it.  There is much tension as well,
which climaxes with Beatty stumbling around a
frozen lake with Brauss' car bearing down on him.
Quincy Jones is credited with the driving score,
and Little Richard sings the often reprised theme
song ("Money Money Money").  Beatty and Hawn were
an item at the time of filming, and would be
re-united in the 1974 film "Shampoo".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Deadly Voyage (1996) (TV)
"Deadly Voyage" is an HBO made-for-TV production.
Most people would consider the movie unwatchable
due to its grisly themes.  I can't say that I enjoyed
the film, but it made for compelling viewing.
'Intense' is perhaps the best adjective.  By the
end of the film, however, the story loses some
credibility, even if it is based on true events.
Omar Epps stars as Kingsley Ofusu, an African
who is a stowaway on a Russian ship bound for
France.  Along with eight other stowaways, he
is looking for a better life in a western country.
Meanwhile, France is seeking to curtail illegal
immigration, and fines shipping companies $45,000
for every stowaway that they unwittingly bring.
The stowaways are detected by the crew while the
ship is en route to France.  The weak-willed captain
(Joss Ackland) wants to treat them humanely, but gives
in to his scheming, ambitious officer Ion (Sean Pertwee)
who prefers murdering them and dumping their bodies
overboard.  Complicating matters, a suspicious, unfriendly
inspector (David Suchet) representing the shipping company
is on board.  The slaughtering must take place
without the inspector's knowledge.
What follows is a storyline similar to teen-oriented
slasher films, except the hunters are Russian sailors,
and the hunted are African stowaways.  It is clear
that racial hatred plays a role in the murders,
and only those with strong stomachs will be able
to finish this tense, humorless film.
What is the message of "Deadly Voyage"?  It is
Macbethian: amoral personal ambition left
unchecked can lead to the most evil actions.
A human life is worth far more than any
governmental fine.  Hopefully, the government
of France has since lowered the fines.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ode to Billy Joe (1976)
Many hit songs (e.g. "American Pie") have been
conscripted as movie titles over the years.
The title may be somewhat appropriate to the
film's subject, but usually the plot of the
film has nothing to do with the song.  The title
has merely served to market the film.
Not so with "Ode to Billy Joe", the story of
which is derived from the 1968 hit.  And stretched
thin as well: the story sags in the final
third, with too much made of the unlikely
'shocker' that caused Billy Joe McAllister
(Robby Benson) to jump off the Tallahatchie
Bridge.
But despite the late-arriving pathos, most of
the film is much better than its reputation.
Writer Herman Raucher has a knack for dialogue,
adding life and dimension to the characters.
The rural deep South of the early 1950s is
credibly depicted.  While folks are not going
hungry, luxuries such as electricity and
indoor plumbing have generally not been
introduced.  The sweltering summers must be
survived without air conditioning, and the
boredom and lack of opportunity leads to
periodic rowdiness from the lily-white,
working class males.
Bobbie Lee (Glynnis O'Connor) is in her
mid-teens and has long since begun thinking
of boys.  Sheltered by her sympathetic but
conservative parents, she longs for lovestruck
Billy Joe, who tags after her to her obvious
delight.  But just as Bobbie Lee wheedles
dating concessions from her father, young
Billy Joe begins acting even more peculiar
than usual.  He is racked with guilt over
a deed which she cannot get him to reveal.
Benson and O'Connor were earlier teamed in
"Jeremy", a film with a different setting
but sharing the same theme of puppy love
between the leads.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gunga Din (1939)
"Gunga Din" is an action film and comedy that is set in
late 19th century India.  A film that was so costly to
make that it nearly bankrupted RKO, the production
values are high and the cast is very good.  However,
quality is sacrificed for entertainment, and "Gunga Din"
misses the mark.
"Gunga Din" is based on a Rudyard Kipling poem.  Still,
the plot is very similar to "The Lives of a Bengal Lancer"
from 1935.  Three British soldiers (Cary Grant, Victor McLaglen,
and Douglas Fairbanks Jr) are captured by an Indian
army that opposes British rule.  Grant is impish and
excitable, Fairbanks is torn between male bonding and
Joan Fontaine, and McLaglen plays mother to an elephant.
Gunga Din (Sam Jaffe) is an Indian waterboy that serves
the British army and dreams of becoming a British soldier.
So that our sympathies are clearly with the British, the
rebel Indians are depicted as belonging to a fanatical
religious cult that promotes mass murder.  The battle
between the Indian and British forces that ends the film
is predictable and unconvincing.
Cary Grant was a great comic actor, and his performance
in "Gunga Din" generates some laughs.  But his wide-eyed
character has all the maturity of a twelve-year-old.
As in the superior "Lives of a Bengal Lancer", the three
British soldiers are kept alive by their captors for
little apparent reason, and strain credibility in their
success at escaping and sabotaging the rebel forces.
My favorite film about the British adventure in India
is "Wee Willie Winkie", a Shirley Temple vehicle from 1938
that was directed by John Ford.  Like "Gunga Din", it
co-starred McLaglen and was based on a work by Kipling.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Heaven Knows, Mr. Allison (1957)
Every now and then, a film proves to be much better
than its story.  This is the case for "Heaven Knows,
Mr. Allison", which should be a laughable attempt
to combine unlikely romance and war-time heroism.
Instead, the lead characters are both sympathetic
and compelling.  Much credit goes to the well-cast
leads, Robert Mitchum and Deborah Kerr, and to
John Huston, who directed and co-wrote the script.
The story is set in 1944.  Mitchum is an orphan
and drifter who has finally found a home with
the Marines.  Kerr is a nun-to-be who is one
month away from taking her final vows.  A convoluted
plot contrivance (it takes ten minutes for the
leads to explain it) places both of them alone
together on a remote Pacific island (perhaps its
"The Blue Lagoon"), where, predictably, Mitchum
begins wooing Kerr.  Kerr, who is dependant upon
Mitchum for her survival, is torn between her two
saviors: God and Mitchum.
Their would-be relationship is endangered by the
Japanese, who alternate between occupying and
abandoning the island.  Mitchum steals food from
and sabotages the Japanese, while Kerr hides from
them in a remarkably well-lit cave.  Just when
the settlers (Kerr and Mitchum) are surrounded
by the Indians (the Japanese), the cavalry (the
U.S. Air Force and Navy) comes to the rescue.
But again, the film is much better than the
cynical plot summary would indicate.  Thanks
to the script and performances, Kerr and Mitchum
come across as two ordinary souls developing
a friendship through adversity, rather than
two formula characters in a calculated marketing
attempt to attract both male and female audiences
to the theater.
Deborah Kerr received an Oscar nomination for
Best Actress. The Huston/John Lee Mahin
screenplay (based on the Charles Shaw novel)
was also nominated.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Kabinett des Doktor Caligari, Das (1920)
Das Kabinett des Doktor Caligari (1919)
"The Cabinet of Doctor Caligari", a silent film from
Germany, may be the best feature made prior to 1920.
Certainly it is better than the over-ripe "Birth of
a Nation", and nearly as influential.  Perhaps the
first great horror film, "Caligari" is also a
psychodrama, turning the tables on the audience by
changing its perspective.
Dr. Caligari (Werner Krauss) has a booth at a
county fair, where he promotes his sleepwalking
zombie Cesare (Conrad Veidt, better known for his
role in "Casablanca" two decades later).  Patrons
at the fair include protagonist Francis (Friedrich Feher)
and his friend Alan (Hans Heinz von Twardowski), who
are rivals for the love of Jane (Lil Dagover).
Cesare, under the direction of Caligari, murders
Alan and tries to kidnap Jane.  Francis suspects Caligari,
and after some difficulty convinces the authorities.
But in a wild plot twist, Francis, Cesare, and Jane
are all inmates in a lunatic asylum run by the
benevolent Dr. Caligari.
"The Cabinet of Dr. Caligari" is a very impressionistic
film.  The sets appear to be painted cardboard, but
they give a psychedelic effect.  With its zombies,
mad scientists and lunatics, the film was both
unsettling and inspirational, with its ingredients
used in any number of Universal horror pictures
from the 1920s and 1930s.
Perhaps too much has been read into the film over the
years.  The subplot of a zombie controlled by an evil
man has been called an allegory of World War I,
while the revelation of Francis as a lunatic has been
called the result of censorship, to prevent the
repudiation of authority.  But perhaps the film should
be taken at face value: as an innovative and important
horror film, and not as social commentary about troubled
postwar Germany.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ghost and Mrs. Muir, The (1947)
"The Ghost and Mrs. Muir" wasn't so much a
ghost story as it was a romantic fantasy.
Starring lovely Gene Tierney and imposing
Rex Harrison, the film's theme was platonic
love overcoming even the barriers of death.
This theme was so successful that the story
has been frequently reprised. It was remade
as "Stranger in the Night" in 1955, and it
became a 1960s sitcom, and even a short-running
Broadway musical.
What made "Muir" a winner wasn't just the story,
however.  The script was competent, the Bernard
Herrmann score was good, and the casting was
inspired.  Tierney is perfect as the prim,
headstrong Victorian heroine, and Harrison is
perfect as the salty but benevolent sea captain
ghost.  Always droll George Sanders has an
entertaining part, and Natalie Wood fans will
enjoy her role as Tierney's young daughter.
The film had a major production problem: Tierney
broke her ankle shortly before filming was to
begin.  After shooting around the problem, the
cast was taken off prematurely forcing Tierney
to walk about in pain.
The story has newly widowed Tierney leaving
her obnoxious in-laws to live in a sea-side
home haunted by Harrison.  Also with Tierney
is Wood and outspoken housekeeper Edna Best.
Harrison and Tierney soon develop a romantic
friendship.  Best and Wood are apparently
unconcerned that she spends hours talking to
herself alone in a room.
When money becomes short, Tierney publishes
Harrison's memoirs, leading to her acquaintance
with lecherous children's author Sanders.
Tierney must choose between Harrison and
Sanders, who proves to be a cad.  He eventually
gets his comeuppance, though, as according to
Tierney he became "bald and fat and drank too
much.  He was crying, and his wife had finally
left him".  Ah, sweet revenge.  Only in the
movies is it so perfect.
"The Ghost and Mrs. Muir" was nominated for an
Academy Award for Best Cinematography (Charles Lang).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Red River (1948)
When the American Film Institute released their
list of the 100 greatest American films, the most
glaring omission was "Red River".  "Red River"
is surely the greatest Western, and perhaps even
the greatest of all films.
If "Stagecoach" delivered John Wayne from "B"
Western obscurity, "Red River" was the film that
made him a top box office draw.  "Red River" defined
his on-screen persona: the great speaking voice,
his stubborness, and his preference of leadership to
romance.
"Red River" was also the first film for Montgomery Clift,
although his second film "The Heiress" beat it to the
theatres.  A lawsuit by Howard Hughes and lengthy
post-production delayed the release of "Red River" for
two years.  You would think that Clift would be miscast
in a Western, but he does just fine, playing Wayne's
gentler alter ego.
Perhaps "Red River" should have been titled "Mutiny
on the Plains" instead.  It takes the story of "Mutiny
on the Bounty" and places it in a Western setting.
Wayne is a big-time rancher going broke despite owning
thousands of cattle, which have no market in Texas.
He aims to drive them far North to Missouri, where
waiting railroads and slaughterhouses will pay top
dollar.  Clift is his adopted son, and Walter Brennan
is his sidekick.  During the big cattle drive, Wayne's
increasing tyranny leads to mutiny.  Joanne Dru shows
up late in the film as a love interest for Clift.
"Red River" is not a perfect film.  The preteen
version of Clift's character is misplayed by Mickey
Kuhn.  Many times the lead actors are superimposed
over a Western background.  None of Wayne's hired
gunmen have any speaking lines.  The stampede
results in a litter of dead cattle, but only
some 600 head are said to be lost in the entire
driver.  Dru breaks up the climatic fight between
Wayne and Clift.  During an indian battle, she
seems more interested in annoying Clift than in
shooting the indians that are an immediate threat
to her life.  The long suggested battle between
Clift and Ireland never arrives.  These faults are
all trivial, however, compared to the magnificence
of the script (Borden Chase), the cinematography
(Russell Harlan) and the direction (by Howard
Hawks, his first Western).
Dru's character has been the subject of some
criticism.  She seems to have been inserted to
provide a requisite love interest for Clift.
However, her presence does increase the tension
of the impending confrontation between Wayne
and Clift, and provides an excuse for a
peaceful resolution.  Her character has plenty
of motivation for obsessively pursuing Clift:
he is after all a land baron, and has saved her
life from marauding indians.
"Red River" cost three million to make, quite a
sum in those days.  However, it made five million
at the box office during its initial run.  Somehow
it only received two Oscar nominations, for
Film Editing (Christian Nyby) and Writing.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Life of mile Zola, The (1937)
"The Life of Emile Zola" is an outstanding film
about the Dreyfus affair, which was a major
military scandal in France during the late
1890s.  Since it is a movie and not a documentary,
some of the characterizations and events may
not match the historical record. However, any
artistic license has only resulted in a better
film.
Versatile actor Paul Muni plays Emile Zola,
whose story begins as a struggling French author.
He finds wealth and fame writing controversial
books, and becomes the conscience of France.
In his middle age, he becomes complacent and
materialistic, disappointing those who see him
as an agent of social change.
Meanwhile, the French army discovers that a high
ranking officer is giving military secrets to the
Germans.  Dreyfus is arbitrarily found guilty of
treason, is publicly humiliated, and sentenced to
miserable imprisonment at Devil's Island.  Soon
thereafter, military officers learn the true
identify of the agent, but begin a massive and
determined campaign to cover up their mistake,
which includes exonerating the guilty officer.
After encouragement by his politically active
friends, Zola finally takes up the cause of Dreyfus,
putting him in conflict with the French Army,
which has the power to put Zola in prison.
Although the title "The Life of Emile Zola" implies
a biography, the film is largely about the Dreyfus
affair.  Since the subject is of little interest
to most Americans, then and now, it is surprising
that Warner Brothers even made this film, much less
gave it such high production values.  Although Muni
is obscure today, he was a major actor at the
time, having just won the Oscar for Best Actor for
"The Story of Louis Pasteur", another high-brow
film set in nineteenth-century France.  Muni would
be nominated for Best Actor for "Zola" as well.
During his career he would amass five Best Actor
Oscar nominations.
The message of "Zola" is universal, and applies
to any place or time.  Government officials, in
this case Army officers, whose primary goal is
to retain power, will stop at nothing to punish
opposition and manipulate the public through
propaganda.  It takes courage to oppose a
corrupt government, and your actions can be
villified rather than lauded.  The French public
did not want Dreyfus found innocent, as he had
become a handy target for national bigotry and
frustration.
Dreyfus' religion is only mentioned once, and
if you blink you will miss it.  The army brass,
looking for a traitor, peruse a list of officers.
The entry for Dreyfus notes his religion, Jew.
The head officer points his finger at the word
Jew, and says, "This is our man."  The focus
of "Zola" is on political corruption rather than
religious prosecution.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Can't Help Singing (1944)
Deanna Durbin is one of Hollywood's forgotten stars from the
1940s.  She was energetic and wholesome, and had a
very impressive singing voice, suitable for the opera.
She was a perfect role model for young teenage girls.
But when her career was at a peak, she turned her back
on stardom to live in seclusion in France.
"Can't Help Singing" was her only technicolor film, and of
course it was a musical.  Good production values and costumes 
keep it watchable.  The plot is minimal however, and the story
wanders aimlessly along, resulting in a pleasant but forgettable
movie.
"Can't Help Singing" apparently takes place during the 1850s.
Durbin plays the daughter of a U.S. Senator.  She loves
a military officer, but her father despises him, and sends
his regiment to California.  Durbin impetously runs away
to find him.  Along the way, she picks up companions:
a pair of thieves (Akim Tamiroff and Leonid Kinskey) and a 
card shark (Robert Paige).  She 'hates' Paige at first, but 
soon predictably falls for him and must choose between Paige 
and her soldier boy.
Tamiroff, a noted Hollywood supporting actor who had just
won a Golden Globe for "For Whom the Bell Tolls", is wasted here.
Tamiroff and Kinskey are obligated to provide comic relief
as blundering thieves who mistakingly believe something valuable 
is in Durbin's trunk.  They are given terrible lines and
direction by Frank Ryan, who was responsible for both.
The songs were composed by Jerome Kern. They pass the 
hummability test, but otherwise aren't particularly good.
The title song is reprised enough times that, after viewing
the picture, you may find the tune reprised in your own 
head for the next few days.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Destry Rides Again (1939)
"Destry Rides Again" is a very good movie.  Comedy and Drama,
more the former than the latter, are effectively mixed.
The plot is thick, there is plenty of action to keep things
moving, and the many supporting players have well-defined
characters.
"Destry Rides Again" is a Western Comedy.  Crooked saloon
owner Brian Donlevy, mayor Samuel Hinds, and entertainer 
Marlene Dietrich are cheating honest folks of their ranches. 
The sheriff is murdered, and drunken fool Charles Winninger is 
appointed new sheriff.  Winninger brings in legendary lawman 
James Stewart, who has eccentric law and order philosophies.
"Destry Rides Again" demonstrated that Stewart was a
comedic as well as dramatic actor, skills later demonstrated
in "Harvey" and "Magic Town".  Dietrich added another
dimension to her femme fatale stereotype, and revived
her flagging career.
It is not a perfect movie.  The closing battle at the tavern
is muddled, and Stewart's actions are not consistent.
First he is a pacifist, and then he isn't.  Now he is
amiable, now he's a tough guy.  Dietrich and blowhard
Jack Carson have sudden character transformations.
Also, Stewart's secondary love interest (Irene Hervey)
might as well be Miss Perfect.
Still, the brawl between Dietrich, Mrs. Callahan, and Stewart
is great cinema.  And there are so many great supporting
roles, especially Hinds and excitable ranch owner Tom Fadden.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for I Love You, Alice B. Toklas! (1968)
Peter Sellers made a number of bad movies, particularly
towards the end of his career.  But he also made many
good ones, movies that showed his tremendous range and
talent as a comedy actor.
In "I Love You, Alice B. Toklas!" Sellers portrays
a frustrated white collar worker, approaching middle age
and henpecked by both his mother (Jo Van Fleet) and
his clinging, shallow fiancee (Joyce Van Patten).
Disillusioned with his life, Sellers reject both it and
his fiancee.  He becomes a hippie, living with winsome
flower child Leigh Taylor-Young.  But he comes to realize
that his new life is just as empty as before, as is his
new relationship.
"I Love You, Alice B. Toklas!" is a satire.  It
effectively contrasts and ridicules the values and
lifestyles of hippies and squares in 1968 America.
The squares are always struggling: to succeed, to
conform, to win approval, even to survive.  The hippies
live in a delusional world of empty assertions of
love, aimless lifestyles, and banal philosophies.
What the hippies and squares have in common is that they 
have both no clue just how foolishly they are behaving.
The movie asks the question, "What is the best way to
live?" and gives the reply, "We will laugh at you no
matter which way you choose."
Fortunately, this well-directed film is funny consistently
enough that the audience will laugh too.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for My Darling Clementine (1946)
One of the great American myths is the gunfight at the
O.K. Corral, which took place in the small Western
town of Tombstone, Arizona in 1882.  While the shootout
did take place, the event has served mainly as a starting
point for endless Hollywood dramatizations that have little
in common except for the names of the leading characters.
Perhaps this is as it should be, since historical accuracy
and storytelling are not one and the same.  A good
story does not need to be technically accurate, it
merely needs to seem that way.
"My Darling Clementine" interprets the famed gunfight
not so much as a grudge between stern lawman Wyatt Earp
(Henry Fonda) and crafty killer Old Man Clanton (Walter
Brennan), but as a soap opera starring self-pitying gambler,
gunslinger, lover, saloon owner and doctor John Holliday
(Victor Mature).  Earp becomes a disapproving big brother
to Holliday, courting his spurned wallflower love interest
Clementine (Cathy Downs) partly to demonstrate the error
of his ways.
What keeps the film from greatness is the characters.
Mature's endless pathos becomes unintentionally comical.
Also in that category is his erstwhile girlfriend, fiery saloon
girl Chihuahua (Linda Darnell).  Brennan's character merits
more screen time, and we don't see enough of Clanton's sons
or Earp's brothers to associate their faces with their names.
Down's character appears to have been introduced as an
explanation for the title.
Still, "My Darling Clementine" is a very good film.  Legendary
director John Ford knows how to tell a story.  The scenes of
Fonda dancing and balancing himself on a chair are well done.
The cast is excellent, and so is the black and white
cinematography (Joe MacDonald).
Surprisingly, "My Darling Clementine" was not nominated
for any Academy Awards.  However, it has since staked a
reputation as one of the best Westerns, perhaps due more
to the story and the Ford and Fonda names than for its
script and characters.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sounder (1972)
One of the biggest sleepers of 1972 was "Sounder",
a film about a black family confronted with poverty
and racism in Depression-era rural Louisiana.
The family's struggles to stay together despite
the fates seemingly against them struck a nerve with
both movie audiences and Oscar voters.  "Sounder"
received four major nominations: Best Picture,
Best Adapted Screenplay (Lonne Elder III, based on
the short novel by William H. Armstrong), Best Actor
(Paul Winfield) and Best Actress (Cicely Tyson).
Perhaps director Martin Ritt and composer Taj Mahal's
sparse blues score should have been nominated as well.
Winfield is the head of the sharecropping family.
With his family going hungry, he steals a ham, leading
to his being sentenced to a hard labor camp.  Tyson
is Winfield's laundress wife, now forced to field labor
along with their three pre-teenaged children.  Wide-eyed
David Lee (Kevin Hooks), the oldest and most promising,
has the true leading role in Hooks' film debut.  In addition
to working the farm and attending school, he embarks on
a journey to visit his father at a distant labor camp.
The film can be criticized for its saintly characterization
of the three children, who exhibit only the mildest
symptoms of selfishness, sibling rivalry and brattiness.
And it seems odd that David Lee is encouraged in his
ardous and dangerous trek to visit his father, when
surely he is needed at home and at school.  These problems
are more than compensated by the telling script and
cinematography, which brings alive the rural South of
the 1930s.
The social commentary of "Sounder" is obvious but never
heavy-handed.  Blacks are segregated and second-class,
powerless and facing a life of poverty and unskilled labor.
White men in a position of power use it to maintain
Jim Crow order, and are often sanctimonious and cruel.
The poverty-striken family in "Sounder" never loses hope,
however, and their hopes seem bundled up in the future
of David Lee.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Papillon (1973)
"Papillon" may have been Steve McQueen's last great role.
With his intense and determined personality, he was perfectly
cast to play the lead.
"Papillon" tells the story of an 'innocent' Frenchman
convicted of murder during the 1930s and sentenced to serve
his time in the prisons and work camps of French Guyana,
in Central America.  Once there, Papillon (McQueen) is determined
to not only survive the hostile conditions, but escape.
He enlists the help of a wealthy counterfeiter and prisoner
(Dustin Hoffman).
Although McQueen befriends Hoffman to use his money, he
later shows surprisingly loyalty to his friend, risking his
life on several occasions for him.
Hoffman gives an even better performance than McQueen.
He is particularly good at the film's end, when his character
has become so eccentric that he talks to pigs as if they
were people.
"Papillon" is not for the faint of heart.  There is realistic
but graphic violence, and the deprivation and suffering that
McQueen endures in prison is shown at length.  Still, these
scenes are important because they demonstrate how cruel and
oppressive a "civilized" nation can be to its prisoners.
McQueen plays an underdog that attracts sympathy from
others, who aid him in his escape attempts.  However,
those characters that represent power (of Church
or State) show much less integrity and betray him.
The film has credible and non-stereotypical portrayals
of a leper, a homosexual prisoner, and an aboriginal chief.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Carlito's Way (1993)
After the disastrous "Bonfire of the Vanities", director
Brian De Palma recovered his career by making a
sure-fire, more conventional film: a crime drama starring
Al Pacino.  While no one will put "Carlito's Way" in
the same category as "The Godfather", it is a slightly
better film than it has been given credit for.  There
is much dramatic tension, the presence of Sean Penn
adds pathos, and the disco-era soundtrack is good.
"Carlito's Way" is based on the true story of Charlie
Brigante.  Brigante (Pacino) is a career criminal,
released from prison in 1975.  He has a deserved
reputation as a narcotics kingpin, but tries to go
straight upon his release.  He runs a disco nightclub,
but inevitably events and loyalties pull him back
into criminal activity.  David Kleinfeld (Penn)
is his brilliant but unstable lawyer, Penelope Ann
Miller is his girlfriend, Luis Guzman is his bodyguard.
John Leguizamo has a small but important part as
rising gangster Benny Blanco from the Bronx.
In "Scarface", Pacino was a Cuban gangster.  In
"Carlito's Way", he is a Puerto Rican gangster.  (In a
rare moment of comedy, an Italian mobster comments
that Pacino 'even looks Italian'.) Pacino is stonefaced
throughout, but he has an intense, world-weary coolness
that gives him star presence.  Sean Penn is well-cast
for his character, initially smug but soon decaying into
a psychopathic cokehead.  Miller is lovely but looks
unhappy throughout, adding to the 'onset of doom' feeling
that permeates the film.  Penn and Miller received
Golden Globe nomimations for their performances.
I'll always take a disco soundtrack over a John Williams
score, but someone should have told Jellybean Benitez
that Cheryl Lynn's hit "Got to Be Real" was from 1979.
The best part of "Carlito's Way" is the dramatic
tension.  Pacino has to resort to gunplay on several
occasions, and admittedly these are the best scenes.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Miracle on 34th Street (1994)
"Miracle on 34th Street" is, of course, a remake of
the 1947 classic.  It is a risky business filming a
new version of a famous movie.  Can you imagine a
remake of "The Wizard of Oz" or "Citizen Kane" that could
rival the original?  Remakes such as "King Kong" (1976)
or "Red River" (1988) were financial disasters or
obscurities.  Comparison to the original can only
show the weaknesses of the later edition.
The basic plot is the same.  A famous New York Department
store (not to be confused with Macy's) hires an
elderly man to play Santa.  He is so good at the role
that he becomes famous.  Evil heads of rival department 
stores plot against Santa, placing him on trial.
Meanwhile, a charming young girl is unsure whether
Santa is real or a fraud.
The story has been updated for the nineties.  A love 
interest subplot has been added,  and Santa is on trial
not only for his integrity as Santa, but is in danger
of being placed in a sanitarium.
The biggest problem that this remake has is its very
wholesomeness.  This guarantees that the mother, father
figure, daughter and Santa himself will never stray
far from their idealized family portraits, and a happy
and predictable ending is in store.
Elizabeth Perkins plays the mother, and her star turn
has her choosing whether or not to accept suitor Dylan McDermott.
Although he is perfect in every way, and is conveniently
a free agent lawyer so that he can defend Santa in court,
it takes the magic of Santa to spur the romance along.
Why Santa would spend so much attention on the well-cared
for child when many others are in greater need is an issue 
not addressed.
"Miracle on 34th Street" is a competent but overly sweet
family picture that the little tykes will likely find
tedious.

Title
Review for Morning Glory (1933)
Katherine Hepburn won four Academy Awards for Best Actress,
and was nominated on eight other occasions.  Her first Oscar 
and nomination was for "Morning Glory," a stagey drama in
which she plays a stage-struck young actress with a knack
for getting men to take a paternalistic interest in her.
Armed only with a letter from George Bernard Shaw, she
leaves her small hometown to land a starring role on Broadway.
Soon she realizes that parts of any size are not open for
the taking, and lives in poverty while playing trivial roles
in stock shows.  But she keeps trying, using her charms
to win agreeable stage veteran C. Aubrey Smith as her mentor,
and playwright Douglas Fairbanks Jr. as her proponent.  At last 
she is given her big break, a starring role, but will she be 
only a morning glory, a one-hit wonder?
Hepburn's charming character is contrasted against that of
Mary Duncan, who plays a temperamental and spoiled actress.
Producer Menjou coddles Duncan, while shunning Hepburn since 
she is too unknown to sell tickets.
I only have one major complaint.  Hepburn gets drunk at a party.
Her speech is hopelessly slurred.  To impress the stage celebrities
present, she gives two dramatic performances from Shakespeare,
both with perfect diction.  Is she drunk or isn't she?
"Morning Glory" has an outstanding script, and fine performances
by the leads and supporting cast.  The score is also excellent.
Fairbanks may actually give a better performance than Hepburn, as 
her lines are sometimes breathlessly delivered making them difficult
to understand.  This film could use closed-captioning.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Rocky (1976)
Has any actor gotten more mileage out of a single
character than Sylvester Stallone with "Rocky"?  He
had made feature films before, small supporting roles
in minor films.  "Rocky" took him to the big time,
where he remained despite the mediocrity of the
movies that followed.
But give Stallone his due.  He is much smarter than
the dumb-dumb characters he has played.  He seems
to know his limitations as an actor, building a
career playing characters that fit within his limited
range.  And, as "Rocky" showed, he can write a
script.  "Rocky" has crisp dialogue, characters
with some depth and vulnerability, and a feel-good
story destined for box office success.  His smartest
move of all was not selling the script until a
studio met his demand: he gets the starring role.
Although this may not have been for the best:
had he sold the script, perhaps he would be writing
good screenplays instead of starring in bad films.
"Rocky" tells the story of a humble boxer (Stallone),
living in a slummy neighborhood and working as
an enforcer for a loan shark.  He succeeds in a
romance with local wallflower Adrian (Talia Shire),
who lives with her verbally abusive brother Paulie
(Burt Young).  Rocky is finally given a big break
when heavyweight champion Apollo Creed (Carl Weathers)
decides to fight him.  Rocky is trained by salty
old-timer Mickey (Burgess Meredith).
"Rocky" ends with the fight between Creed and Rocky.
While entertaining, these scenes are somewhat bogus.
Rocky's first punch floors the Champ, while the
broadcaster's voiceover says that it is "the first time
ever" Creed had been knocked down.  Rocky gets his
nose broken in the first round, then proceeds to set
the world record for absorbing punches flush to the face.
Neither boxer shows any defensive skills, and they
simply take turns dishing out punishment.  At the
end of one round, the referee is unable to separate
the combatants.  While the fight decision is being
announced, Rocky seems more interested in finding his
girlfriend in the crowd than in learning whether he won.
"Rocky" won the Oscars for Best Picture and Best Director
(John Avildsen).  Stallone was nominated for Best Actor,
and for Best Screenplay.  Young and Meredith were nominated
for Best Supporting Actor, and Shire was somehow nominated
for Best Supporting Actress (when it rains it pours).  The
great theme song, "Gonna Fly Now", also pulled down a
nomination.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
"Wag the Dog" is a biting satire of U.S. Presidential 
politics.  It has been compared to "Dr. Strangelove", and
indeed it is similar in feel: both films mine for
humor by demonstrating how ludicrous seemingly ordinary
events and conversations can become, when the participants 
have lost their perspective of what they are doing.
But "Wag the Dog" is no "Dr. Strangelove".  It is too
talky, too self-satisfied, too cynical, and often annoying
in its excessive (and needless) use of obscenity.  While
there is a grain of truth in this tale of spin doctors
replacing reality with phony and manipulating images,
the notion is remarkably condescending that the media 
and the public would follow like sheep in whatever direction
they are led.
The plot has the President getting into an unrecoverable
scandal two weeks before re-election.  He has had perhaps
non-consensual sex with an underage girl, and this is the 
subject of many sly jokes (as if it could actually be funny).  
Robert De Niro plays a Presidential aide who wants the U.S. 
to start a war  with Albania to take the focus from the President's 
shenanigans.  He enlists Hollywood producer Dustin Hoffman,
idea man Denis Leary, and songwriter Willie Nelson to
fabricate this war and its images.  Things get even more
preposterous as a soldier chosen randomly to be a war hero
turns out to be a psychotic nun-raper (This is also supposed
to be funny: Does Hollywood believe that rape is a subject
for comedy?)
Sometimes the black comedy does find its target.  Willie Nelson
conducts a group of singers slogging their phony way through
a manipulative song, and the satire catches it perfectly.
Also effective are political ads with the lame slogan 
"Don't change horses in mid-stream" that appear endlessly 
on TV monitors.  But while it is good to see the taboo against
parodying U.S. patriotism broken, the joke of tossing old
shoes in support of servicemen is a groaner.
On the whole, this film is a major disappointment.
The depiction of a presidential administration that is essentially 
controlled by spin artists creating fantasy events for 
short term media payoffs, swallowed whole by the media and
a public that completely ignores substance for spectacle,
is smug and shallow and (worst of all) not often funny.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Force of Evil (1948)
"Force of Evil" an intense crime drama that is
considered by some to be a film noir classic.
While the film is quite watchable, the characters
and their actions lack credibility and warmth.
There is nary a moment of comic relief.
John Garfield stars as a lawyer for Roy Roberts,
who runs an illegal gambling syndicate.  Garfield
is also involved in the criminal activities.
He hears about a scheme that could wipe out his
brother Thomas Gomez, who heads a small-time
gambling operation.  Garfield's attempts to
protect and promote the unwilling Gomez leads
to much grief, not just for the brothers, but
Gomez' nervous accountant Howland Chamberlain.
One of the subplots involves a romance between
Garfield and goody-goody secretary Beatrice Pearson.
Garfield seems to have no interest in seducing her,
but needs her as a friend, all the while trying
to corrupt her morality.
Many of the players in "Force of Evil" perform actions
against their better judgement.  Gomez repeatedly
tells Garfield that he won't do what Garfield asks
of him, then does it anyway.  Chamberlain's character
is nearly a mirror of Gomez, harried and despondent,
refusing then agreeing.  Innocent and ethical Pearson
is fascinated with bad-boy Garfield.  She gently rebukes
his character, but seems to be hoping that he will say
something that will add meaning to her empty life.
Garfield himself is torn between multiple loyalties,
his client, ill-gotten riches and power, and his brother.
Garfield consistently chooses to protect his brother,
risking his career, his fortune and ultimately his life.
This seems at odds with his grasping character, especially
since 1) his brother shuns him and 2) they have had
little contact for years.  It is as if Garfield's midlife
crisis is one of character, and he hopes to find it in
Gomez and Pearson, by association rather than by adopting
their ethics.
Roberts and his cronies are stereotypical gangsters,
ruthless and clever, but lacking the humor or style
found in gangster roles portrayed by Cagney, Bogart
or Edward G. Robinson.  Garfield has more life than
his associates, but his character was broader in a
supporting role in "Gentleman's Agreement".
Sometimes I think that 'noir' is just a French word
that means 'insufficient lighting'.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Survivors, The (1983)
"The Survivors" is a black comedy that doesn't quite make it.
There are many funny moments, but there are also times when
it doesn't make much sense.  Still, recommended to fans of
the movie's lead actors, Robin Williams, Walter Matthau and 
Jerry Reed.
Williams is a corporate executive who is told to report
to his boss' plush office.  There, a green parrot has memorized
a speech ending in Williams' firing.  He can't believe
it until the secretary pulls a gun on him.
Distraught, he goes to a filling station and misses the
gas tank, dumping gas all over the concrete.  He is so clueless
he doesn't see this.  Matthau, the gas station owner, carelessly
throws a lit cigarette out the door.  Williams is seen driving
away, with huge balls of flame behind him.
Matthau spends six hours in a welfare line, only to be
told that self-employed folks can't be on the dole.  Like
Williams, he learns that some things can't be negotiated when 
the social service worker sprays him with mace.
Williams and Matthau end up nursing beers in the same bar,
a coincidence unbelievable anywhere except in a black comedy.
They are just getting on each others nerves when Reed comes
in and robs the place.  Matthau accidentally uncovers Reed's
face.  Reed flees.
Matthau is worried that Reed will come after him.  Sure enough,
he appears in Matthau's bedroom with a loaded gun.  Fortunately,
Williams comes to the house, and in the commotion Reed is
knocked out cold.  He gets sent to jail.
Williams suddenly becomes a gun nut, and buys a huge semi-automatic
which he tries to hide from his lovely fiance.  Of course,
she finds it.  Williams goes into his babbling schtick trying
to explain himself.  They break up, and Williams goes to a
Survivalist training camp.
Matthau takes a job as a cab driver.  Reed, freed from jail,
is his first customer.  Reed again threatens murder, but by now
the audience knows he's no killer, it's all bluster.  Matthau
makes a deal: no murders if Matthau and Williams don't tell
about the robbery.  Matthau goes to the survivalist camp to
find Williams.  He gets Williams to make a call to Reed, but
Williams, head full of survivalist brainwashing, insults Reed
instead.
Reed shows up at the camp, has a shootout with Williams, has
the survivalist forces after him, and hides out in Williams
cabin with Matthau, where they all become friends.  To escape
the survivalists, who for some reason are after them, Matthau
exposes their leader.  He turns out to be a businessman who
is milking the movement.
Many good laughs are in this film, but what a mess!
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
There is much to like and dislike about Howard Stern.
Radio's #1 bad-boy, he is a shock jock who tests
the taboos of society.  Of course he can be a real
jerk, but underneath it all, he's just an average
guy and a wonderful family man.  Or so he repeatedly
tells us, as he plays footsie with naked bimbos
while on the air.  It's just a joke, get it?
Perhaps Stern has the greatest job in America, getting
paid zillions of dollars to express his outrageous
opinions on the air, which includes the hiring of hit
men to kill people that he dislikes.  But it takes talent
to ad lib with such flair, and it has to be admitted:
Howard Stern is funny, much, much more so than Jerry Springer
could ever hope to be, and that is a very redeeming quality.
"Private Parts" tells the Stern saga, rising from
clumsy, nerdy college DJ to NBC's flagship radio station
in New York.  Along the way he marries blonde goddess
Mary McCormack, whom he nearly loses due to his radio
prattle about his marital intimacies, and his on-air
flirtations with bimbo guests and call-ins.
Although (both thankfully and surprisingly) the First
Amendment is never mentioned, Stern fights the good fight
against censorship, battling a dislikable program manager
(Paul Giamatti, dubbed "Pig Vomit" by Stern) for the
all-important right to say 'cock' on the air.  Wisely,
director Betty Thomas softens Stern's persona, downplaying
the occasional hatred and emphasizing Stern's role as
a family man.
Also appearing in "Private Parts", and also playing
themselves, are Stern's radio show cohorts Robin Quivers,
Fred Norris, and Jackie Martling.  Quivers is especially
good.
That "Private Parts" is a modestly good film is not
a surprise, given Stern's talent for dialogue.  While the
film could not have been much better, given his limitations,
it could have been much worse, as most comedies are.
"Private Parts" is well structured and avoids repetition,
and is more than willing to place Stern in embarassing
situations.  The film never drags and a good laugh is
always around the corner.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Cimarron (1931)
"Cimarron" was the first Western to win the
Academy Award for Best Picture.  In fact, it
was the only Western to win that Oscar until
the 1990s.  The irony is that during that
period, there were probably hundreds of Westerns
made that were more deserving.
Richard Dix stars as an early Oklahoman settler.
With his wife (Irene Dunne) he participates
in the famous 1889 land grab, and helps
civilize the lawless frontier town of Osage.
He starts a newspaper, which is successful
despite its controversial editorials.
Having conquered Osage, Dix leaves town in
search of new adventures.  Dunne is left behind
to run the newspaper, and her character grows
from a timid housewife to become Osage's leading
citizen.
"Cimarron" cost RKO $1.5 million to make,
making it one of the most expensive films of
its era.  Despite its accolades, the studio
lost over half a million dollars.  The budget pays
off, however, in the group shots, especially the
re-enactment of the 1889 land grab.  This is
the film's most famous scene.
"Cimarron" is a mediocre film that is made
watchable by Dix's ridiculous performance.  He
provides much unintentional comic relief, and
in his absence the film drags.  Dix's character
is a blustering and swaggering Big Man on
Campus, fearlessly and impulsively taking on
challenges.
The problems with "Cimarron" begin with the
characters.  The audience is supposed to admire
Dix as a hero, when in fact he is unknowingly a
comic figure.  Dunne's personality changes are
artificial: first she's a wallflower, then a
snobbish socialite, and finally a distinguished
matron.  We don't learn much about her until
after Dix has left and can no longer steal scenes.
What we then learn is that she is boring.
Supporting characters are one-dimensional.
We are expected to laugh at a stuttering printer
and at racist caricature Eugene Jackson, but
the attempted humor doesn't work.  A bullying
gang leader exists to demonstrate Dix's manhood,
and prostitute and social pariah Estelle Taylor
exists to demonstrate Dix's compassion.  However,
neither character trait is as entertaining as
listening to Dix's contrived banter.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gaslight (1944)
"Gaslight" is a remake of the 1940 mystery and
suspense thriller.  It is an interesting film,
with a strong cast and competent direction.
"Gaslight" stars Ingrid Bergman as an impressionable
young woman, newlywed to cunning Charles Boyer.
Oddly, Boyer takes no physical interest in Bergman,
instead preferring to psychologically torment
her.  He tells her she is losing her mind, and
trains the servants to play along with his game.
Bergman becomes a virtual prisoner in her house,
isolated and frightened.  It doesn't help that
Bergman once lived in the house as a child, and
that the house was once the site of a brutal
murder.
The irony is that it is Boyer's character who
is mentally disturbed.  His performance is
sometimes sinister, sometimes impassioned, and
he was deserving of his Best Actor Oscar nomination.
Bergman won Best Actress, although her character
is much simpler and easier to play.  The film was
also nominated for Best Picture, Best Screenplay
(John L. Balderston, Walter Reisch, and John Van
Druten) and Best Black & White Cinematography
(Joseph Ruttenberg).
The audience spends most of the film puzzled.
Why is Boyer doing these terrible things to Bergman?
Also confused is detective Joseph Cotten, who
suspects Boyer in the long-ago unsolved murder.
Angela Lansbury makes her film debut in "Gaslight".
Still a teenager, she plays an impertinent and
flirtatious house servant.  She received a
nomination for Best Supporting Actress.
Why isn't this a great movie?  Bergman and
Boyer have characters that aren't completely
credible.  Bergman puts up little resistance
to Boyer's pattern of abuse, and Boyer is a
monster.  If this film were remade today,
there would surely be physical abuse, something
too disagreeable to 1944 censors, but probably
necessary to make Boyer's character more
effective.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Breaking Away (1979)
"Breaking Away" was a sleeper, a low-budget film with
an (then) unfamiliar cast that was released to critical
and commercial success.  The film has many themes
and subplots, but they never get tangled or complex.
Some of the drama (especially in the closing race)
is a bit contrived, but most of it works, as does
most of the comic relief.
"Breaking Away" stars four unemployed teenagers who have
just graduated from high school, and are unsure of
whether to attend college.  Dave (Dennis Christopher)
is fascinated with Italy and cycling.  Mike (Dennis Quaid)
carries resentment against college students from wealthy,
out-of-town families.  Cyril (Daniel Stern) is clumsy,
but gets many good lines.  The fourth and less interesting
teenager (Jackie Earle Haley) gets angry whenever
somebody calls him short,  which seems to happen regularly.
Dave's father (Paul Dooley), a used-car salesman,
disapproves of Dave's embracing Italian culture.
This generation gap leads to many funny situations and
good lines.  Dave's mother (Barbara Barrie) is
blissfully indifferent to Dave's eccentricities or
his father's constant whining.  The score's use
of Italian opera and classical music fits in well
with situations between the family members.
Dave pretends to be a college student from Italy
to win would-be girlfriend Robyn Douglass.
When he tells her the truth, the romance is over,
reinforcing the depiction of the college students as
shallow, preppy snobs.  His fantasy of becoming Italian
ends when an Italian racing team sabotage his bike during
a race.  His character is much more humble afterwards.
Mike's desire to show up the college boys leads to a
500 mile bike race with a "cutter" team competing against
college teams.  Mike, Dave, Cyril and shorty comprise
the cutter team, so-called because their parents were
stone-cutters at one time.  The big race has some
genuine suspense, despite contrived drama concerning
injuries and rapid recoveries.  The race announcer also
has the annoying habit of only discussing the situation
of the cutter team.
Despite its minor weaknesses, "Breaking Away" has
much going for it: good comic relief, a good score,
a winning cast, a good script, and well-developed
themes of inter-generational and inter-class conflict.
"Breaking Away" won the Oscar for Best Writing, and
was nominated for Best Picture, Best Director (Peter
Yates), Best Score, and Best Supporting Actress
(Barrie).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Circus, The (1928)
"The Circus" is a silent film that was produced, directed,
and written by Charlie Chaplin.  He again is playing
the familiar tramp character, who in his struggle to get
along in the world keeps getting in and out of trouble.
The tramp gets mixed up with a pickpocket.  He is chased by
a policeman into a circus, and his attempts to avoid arrest
delight the audience, who take him for a clown.  Soon, the
tramp is a featured attraction.  Chaplin falls for the
young daughter of the abusive circus manager, but she only 
sees him as a friend.
"The Circus" may be the most Keaton-esque of Chaplin's
features.  The plot is simple, and serves mostly as a
background for lots and lots of slapstick gags.  The miracle
is that all of the gags work and are funny.  What is missing
from this film, and is usually present in Chaplin films,
is social commentary.  This time around, Chaplin is only 
trying to make us laugh, and he certainly succeeds.
What is the funniest scene in "The Circus"?  My favorite
has Chaplin walking a tightrope, with monkeys crawling over
his face in body, biting his nose and pulling his pants down.
It's a screech!  Honorable mention goes to a scene where
the jealous tramp fantasizes about giving the rival for 
his love interest a kick in the rear.
http://www.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Maltese Falcon, The (1941)
Perhaps "The Maltese Falcon" is not the greatest detective story
ever filmed.  But it is hard to find a better one, and much
harder to find a more enjoyable movie to watch.
One could say that "The Maltese Falcon" is full of cliches.
But since the film defines the genre, perhaps the real cliches
are from the later, derivative films.  While the characters
may never transcend their well-defined caricatures, it is
hard to complain when the cast is so strong, the dialogue so
crisp, and the characters themselves are so interesting.
"The Maltese Falcon" is a legendary jewel-encrusted statue,
priceless but long since lost.  Humphrey Bogart plays a
private eye who gradually gets caught up in the search for
the relic.  He is not alone, as Sydney Greenstreet,
Peter Lorre, Mary Astor, and Elisha Cook Jr. are also
involved.  All of the latter are ruthless, and will kill
if necessary to obtain the Falcon.
Bogart's is the central character.  He is always wise to the
situation, cynical to the core, and always on top.
He is blessed with a personal secretary who will do anything 
and everything without questioning why.
He is first hired by Astor, a femme fatale whose story
changes with every scene, and apparently is incapable of telling
the truth.  Soon, his partner is murdered and police detectives
are turning up the heat.  As Lorre, Greenstreet and Cook
enter the picture, Bogart has to play a dangerous hand,
trying to stay alive and out of jail while locating the Falcon
and (naturally) taking a share of the profits.
Peter Lorre is one of my all-time favorite character actors.
He has a terrific nasal voice and accent.  He delivers my
favorite line from the film, "You dirty filthy liar you!"
It cracks me up every time I hear it.
"The Maltese Falcon" was released in 1941, the same year
as "Citizen Kane", and one year before "Casablanca", another
Warner Brothers production that also had Bogart, Lorre and 
Greenstreet.  The 1940s had so many great films, almost
all of them filmed in black and white.  They knew how to
make 'em back then: emphasize cast, script and story, and never 
mind the stunts and special effects.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ju Dou (1990)
Director Zhang Yimou continued the success of
his earlier film "Red Sorghum" with "Ju Dou".
Both films starred actress Gong Li, and eventually
they would make seven films together.  Gong Li
became China's most well-known actress in the
west, while Yimou became the best-known director
from China.  Probably their best collaboration
was 1994's "To Live".
"Ju Dou" is named for Gong Li's character, a
beautiful peasant woman who is purchased by
textile mill owner Yang (Li Wei).  Yang is a
middle-aged man obsessed with having a son, so
as to continue the family dynasty.  But he is
impotent, and takes his frustrations out on
Ju Dou, as he has done with previous wives.
The film is set in China during the 1920s.
Yang has only one worker at his mill.  He is
Tianqing (Li Baotian), a distant nephew of Yang.
Lonely, lifelong bachelor Tianqing quickly falls
for Ju Dou, who turns to him as a protector from
her viciously abusive husband.  Taianqing gives
Ju Dou a child, which Yang believes to be his.
Yang soon becomes crippled, however, allowing
Tianqing and Ju Dou their chance at revenge.
The child, Tianbai (Zheng Jian), grows up believing
Yang to be his father, and lacks the director's
sympathy towards Tianqing's intimacy with
Ju Dou.
The script is sparse, with the story largely told
by cinematography.  The silk tapestries produced
by the mill have bright red and yellow colors, and
are the subject of endless close-ups, more so than
are the actors themselves.
What is the moral of "Ju Dou"?  It is a tragedy
of Shakespearean proportions.  It seems to condemn
the conservative, patrician morality of pre-revolutionary
China.  It suggests that defying that moral code
is not a good idea.  Also, don't beat your wife,
and don't judge your parents.  There may be other
messages as well: certainly "Ju Dou" has something
to say.
There is a death scene in this film that reminds
me of "The Godfather".  Remember Don Corleone having
a heart attack in the vineyards, with his grandson
standing over him and laughing?  The similar scene
here is revisited again, when Tianbai dumps a
passed-out Tianquin into the dye vat.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Laughing Policeman, The (1973)
Before Walter Matthau was a grumpy old man, he was a grumpy
middle-aged man.  In "The Laughing Policeman", his character
doesn't like to talk, and doesn't like to listen.  He is
a police detective, whose partner Evans has just been murdered
in a city bus with a "grease gun", along with everyone else
on board.
As the stiffs are carried off the bus, and the morgue learns
more about them, the cops try to trace the victims back
to the crime.  One of the victims is a John Doe junkie.
Matthau's new partner is Bruce Dern, who tries throughout
the movie to win Matthau's respect.  Matthau and Dern believe
the best way to investigate a massacre is to lean on all
the stoolies and low lifes, which has the side effect of
keeping somewhat interesting character actors on the screen.
Dern insults the stoolies, and even gives one a swishy.
A black cop works on the case, also hassling street vermin.
He has a contest with a pimp to see who can use the most
jive talk in their sentences.
Matthau interviews Evans' girlfriend, and learns that Evans
was spending his free time investigating an unsolved murder
of a prostitute.  He also learns that Evans and his girlfriend
took dirty pictures.  This revelation has nothing to
do with the central plot, and just rubs our noses in the
sleaze.  One could say that about much of the movie: the cops
externally condemn their environment, but appear to
secretly enjoy it, to the point of avoiding their families.
Informants give false trails, but eventually a tip leads
to John Doe's identity as Gus Niles, a war buddy of
Henry Camararo, who is the brother of the dead prostitute.
Evans was on the bus trailing Niles. Camararo entered the
bus to kill Niles and Evans to silence them.  Camararo is
also a wealthy businessman, so he leads an active life.
Because he is gay, this provides the excuse for Matthau 
and Dern to make scornful remarks and later follow him to
a gay bar.  Camararo scores, goes to a hotel room with his 
prize, and the cops use binoculars to see an eyeful.  Some 
movies have gratuitous violence or sex, but this movie has 
gratuitous sleaze.
Camararo realizes he's being tailed, and this leads to
a chase scene that is a pale imitation of the one in the 
then-recent "French Connection".  Camararo, on a bus with
Matthau, pulls out a handgun and is about to fire,
but is distracted by shots from Dern from a speeding car,
and Matthau tags him.  Dern has won the respect of Matthau,
just in time for the credits to roll.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Third Man, The (1949)
"The Third Man" is one of the best films of the 1940s.
It is an outstanding film, with a script so dense that
its quality cannot be fully appreciated with a single
viewing.  The quirky score, featuring a zither, puts
a light touch on what would otherwise be a very tense
film.  The cast is first-rate, and there is some fine
cinematography of Vienna's bombed out buildings and
underground sewers.
Joseph Cotten stars as potboiler author Holly Martins,
who has come to Austria to work for old friend Harry Lime
(Orson Welles).  Postwar Austria is politically divided
into sectors controlled by the U.S., England, France
and Russia.  A black market thrives, and there is much
political intrigue.  Upon arrival, Cotten learns that
Lime has died in a suspicious car accident... was it
murder?  Lime left behind other loose ends: he was
wanted on multiple counts of murder for profiteering
from diluted penicillin.  Cotten also falls for Lime's
devoted girlfriend, lovely but unhappy Alida Valli.
"The Third Man" isn't exactly a forgotten classic,
but it still has not received its due recognition.
This may be because it was a British production,
and filmed on location in Austria.  The film is
also in need of preservation: the sound quality was
low on the print that I saw.  Which is a shame, since
every word of the dialogue deserves to be heard.
There are two versions of the film.  The British print
is 104 minutes.  Producer David O. Selznick carefully
pruned 11 minutes for the American version, replacing
the opening narration by director Carol Reed with that
of Joseph Cotten.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Big Red One, The (1980)
It is World War I, and an American soldier (Lee Marvin)
stabs and kills a German soldier who is trying to
surrender.  He later learns that the war has ended,
and that he realizes that he has committed a murder.
Flash forward to World War II.  Marvin leads a platoon
of soldiers on various missions in North Africa, Italy,
France and Europe as they fight the hated Germans.
His platoon has a low survival rate since they do such
heavy front-line fighting.  Only four soldiers survive
mission after mission.  Vinci (Bobby DiCicco) is a conceited, 
cigar smoking, Italian-American writer.  Another is 
cartoonist Griff (Mark Hamill), who must confront his fear of 
combat with every mission. The other two soldiers aren't 
that interesting and aren't worth describing.
Mark Hamill hit the jackpot with the Star Wars movies, but
hasn't been seen much elsewhere.  This is his only other big
budget film that I have seen.  And his is just a supporting
role.
The title of the movie comes from a patch that the soldiers
wear, with a large "1" inside of it, representing their
division.
Attempts at black humor don't work here.  A hopelessly
nervous soldier steps on a mine and is badly hurt.  Marvin 
finds one of his balls, and reassures the soldier that 
he still has another one.  Ha ha.
Another scene that doesn't work has a soldier annoying Vinci,
who responds by putting his rifle barrel in the pest's mouth,
threatening to kill him. This occurs in full view of a hundred 
other soldiers, and there are no repercussions from this 
incredible lapse of discipline.
Marvin is injured in battle, and ends up in an enemy-held
hospital.  The hospital is liberated, and Marvin leaves it
dressed up as Arab.  He goes looking for his division.
This scene is supposed to be funny, but it doesn't work either.
Another curious episode has a German division playing
dead, allowing Marvin and company to walk over them and poke
them.  The Germans are setting a trap, but they all end up 
massacred.  Except for a German soldier who shown hiding behind
a huge wooden cross.  He is shown several times, but he doesn't
do much of anything, and later runs away.
Germans have set up a base at an insane asylum, which must be
taken by the Americans.  A beautiful woman is sent in, pretending
she is insane, kills several guards, then distracts a room
full of soldiers to allow Americans to rush in and fire away.
One of the inmates grabs a fallen soldier's guns and, grinning,
shoots a bunch of fellow inmates, saying that he is sane as
well.  The director is trying to show the irony of people killing
each other in times of war, and labelling it as sane, but the
meaning falls flat.
While searching rooms for Germans, Hamill finds one.  Both have
rifles pointed at the other.  Hamill fires first, and then slowly
fires shell after shell at the unfortunate dead German.  Marvin 
stops by after a few dozen shots, sees whats up, pats Hamill on 
the back and goes on.  Hamill continues to slowly waste ammunition
for a while longer.  Perhaps this is meant to represent
Hamill's overcoming his cowardice.  Whatever.
Near the war's end, Marvin befriends a sick child, a starving war
orphan.  He gives the kid food, and the kid puts on Marvin's helmet.
The kid seems to be in fair shape, but while Marvin is carting him
around on his back, the child suddenly dies.  Marvin carries him
for another half hour, then buries him.  While doing so, he meets
a surrendering German soldier, and stabs him.  The German collapses.
Soldiers from his division meet him and have news: the war has
ended.  Marvin has repeated his crime from the first world war.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Noz w wodzie (1962)
"Knife in the Water" was the first feature
film that Roman Polanski directed, having
earlier made a series of shorts.  It was
also the last film that he would make in
Poland, as critical success and government
interference led to greener pastures in
France and America.
Supposedly the script was written in only
three days, by Polanski, Jerzy Skolimowski
and Jakub Goldberg.  It was a low budget
film with only three actors, two of them
amateurs whose voices were later dubbed
(Polanski himself did the voice of the
drifter).  With most of the story taking
place on a sailboat, only a few sets were
used.  But Jerzy Lipman's cinematography
was very good, as was the script.
The plot has proud, successful sportswriter
Andrzej (Leon Niemczyk) spending a weekend
sailing with his younger, attractive wife
Christine (Jolanta Umecka).  Their marriage
seems loveless, and Andrzej in need of
distraction, so it is little surprise when
Andrzej picks up a nameless teenage hitchiker
(Zygmunt Malanowicz) and invites him to go
sailing with them.
>From the start, Andrzej and the drifter
try to impress each other, with the tensions
rising and falling through a series of
oneupsmanships.  Andrzej has the advantages
of greater life experience, greater physical
size, and the possession of Christine, but
he seems to need the respect of the drifter,
who isn't disposed to give it readily.
Christine tries to be a peacemaker, but
the tension between the men eventually turns
to violence.
"Knife in the Water" is a moody, interesting
character study.  However, it is often slow,
and the ending is a bit contrived to give
Christine and the young man a romantic scene
together.
"Knife in the Water" received an Academy
Award nomination for Best Foreign Language
Film.  The British Academy Awards gave it
Best Film (of any source).  Polanski later
achieved great success in America with
"Rosemary's Baby" and "Chinatown", before
an encounter with a teenage girl forced
him to leave the country.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Barry Lyndon (1975)
Director Stanley Kubrick followed the success of "2001: A Space
Odyssey" and "A Clockwork Orange" with a film that was perhaps
even more daring.  "Barry Lyndon" was a three hour costume
drama set in the 18th century, without sufficient action
to interest male viewers, and without sufficient love interest
to satisfy women viewers.  The film starred expressionless
Ryan O'Neal, who had been derided since "Love Story" despite
a quality performance in "Paper Moon."  Meticulously filmed
entirely utilizing natural light, "Barry Lyndon" was beautiful
to look at, but was a flop at the box office.  Even some critics
weren't kind, calling the film tedious and lifeless; perhaps
more a series of still life paintings than a conventional film.
But "Barry Lyndon" is outstanding.  It is not as great as
"Dr. Strangelove", but it could be Kubrick's second best film.
Besides the gorgeous visual appeal of the cinematography and
costumes, the story is highly compelling, even with the narration
curiously revealing plot spoilers.  While the viewer never
likes the characters, one can identify with them, and what
happens to them seems as natural and inevitable as if preordained
by the stars.  Redmond Barry's ultimate failure, propelled by
hunger for respect and the title of Lord that he doesn't merit,
seems a fitting punishment for treating people as mere stepping
stones to glory.
Redmond Barry (O'Neal) is first seen as an idealistic,
courageous young Irishman.  Tricked into leaving home by
relations anxious to be rid of the meddlesome youth,
he enlists in first the English, then the Prussian
Army.  His courage survives better than his morality,
and he eventually manipulates his way into a favorable
marriage with lovely, sad-eyed Lady Lyndon (Marisa Berenson).
He shamelessly dissipates the Lyndon family fortune in
attempt to buy the title of Lord, making an enemy of
his dislikable stepson (Leon Vitali).
While "Barry Lyndon" was nominated for 7 Academy Awards,
including Best Picture, Best Director and Best Adapted
Screenplay (credited to Kubrick, based on William Makepeace
Thackeray's novel), the film only won for its most obvious
strengths.  John Alcott won Best Cinematography, Leonard
Rosenman for the low-key score, and the sets and costumes
(of course) won Oscars.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Bat*21 (1988)
"Bat 21" is a different kind of Vietnam war movie.  No, not from
the Vietnamese perspective: that would be too much to expect from
Hollywood.  It does not focus on the young soldier, part of a
platoon, but instead is about a middle-aged colonel (Gene Hackman) 
shot down behind enemy lines, and a pilot (Danny Glover) who is 
determined to rescue him.
War as horror rather than heroism is a successfully explored 
theme.  The devastation of the Vietnamese countryside by the
Americans is shown, as well as the fierce fighting spirit
of the Vietnamese.  There is much tension as Hackman is always
in trouble of being discovered, and the Vietnamese stop
several abortive rescue attempts.
The relationship between Hackman and Glover, who have never met
and communicate through radio transmissions, develops to the
point where Glover is risking his life and career to save Hackman.  
Their conversations are well-scripted and believable.  Also
well done are scenes with Hackman encountering Vietnamese
farmers and children.
Perhaps is the weakest point of the film comes at the end.
Hackman and Glover survive a Yankee carpet bombing that manages
to wipe out a chasing band of Vietnamese soldiers.  It's too
bad they didn't play the lottery if they are going to be
that lucky.
Still, this is yet another important movie about the Vietnam
war, and the struggle to survive amid adversity.  A humble
film that wisely narrows its scope to Hackman's trials.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
Alfred Hitchcock directed some great films, but not every
film was great.  For example, "The Man Who Knew Too Much"
from 1956, co-starred Doris Day and seemed to be a vehicle
for her to sing "Que Sera Sera".  "Vertigo", his next
film that starred Jimmy Stewart, is considered by many
not only to be Hitchcock's best movie, but by some to
be the best movie ever.
With this in mind, I was frustrated by the first half of
the movie.  In the opening scene, Stewart and a fellow
cop are chasing a villian across rooftops.  Stewart slips,
and hangs onto a gutter for dear life.  The other cop
tries to help him, but falls to his death.  The next scene,
Stewart is safe on the ground again.  We never learn how
Stewart, in that precarious position with his terrifying 
fear of heights, got down from that rooftop safely.
The plot then moves quite slowly.  Stewart retires from
the force, flirts with his would-be girlfriend Midge (who needs
better fashion sense), and is hired by old pal Gavin to follow
his mournful, suicidal wife (Kim Novak) around.  Things certainly 
take their time as Stewart learns she has a fixation with a
long-dead woman who had committed suicide.  Stewart befriends
her, and falls in love with her.  Stewart's galpal is jealous,
but no matter, since she has only a few scenes in the movie
anyway.
Novak and Stewart visit a Sequoia tree forest.  They are
apparently the only people there.  Later, at a mission
preserved as a tourist trap, again, they are the only
ones there.  Not even employees are to be seen.  When a couple 
goes to a restaurant in the movies, the restaurant is usually 
full of people.  When they visit a scenic site, however, the 
couple is often the only ones there.  Well, maybe I'm just 
being cranky.
Novak describes a dream she had.  Stewart is able to recognize
it as an old restored mission a hundred miles away.  They
go there, and after a tender love scene, Novak runs up the
mission's tower and apparently jumps to her death, however...
It later turns out that: 1). Novak is an actress playing
Gavin's wife. 2). Novak is having an affair with Gavin.
3). Novak did not jump off the tower.  Instead, Gavin was
waiting there, with his already-murdered wife, and pushes
her off instead.
The audience is supposed to buy this incredible set-up
because it is delivered as a surprise.  But a movie is not
great simply because it has a few surprises.  Especially if
those surprises are preposterous.  Gavin apparently takes
his wife to the mission, takes her to the mission tower,
kills her there, waits for Stewart to show up with Novak,
waits for Novak to run up the stairs, knowing that Stewart
won't run up because he is afraid of heights, waits until
the post-jump commotion is over, then leaves the mission with
Novak dressed up as the wife.  With no one seeing him at
the mission with his wife or Novak, and without the coroner
discovering the murder.  How Novak was able to contact
Gavin to tell him when Stewart would arrive isn't revealed.
After the murder, what if Stewart saw a photo of the wife
in the paper or TV?  He would have known it was a set-up.
It is a different movie after Novak's jump.  The pace finally
picks up, and there is more tension.  Problems remain,
however, with character development and motivation.
Stewart is devastated by Novak's apparent death.  He has a
bizarre nightmare that has scenes of Stewart falling, flashing
red lights, and Stewart's disembodied head superimposed on weird 
animation.  Upon waking, Stewart goes into a catatonic state, and 
ends up in some sort of institution.  He's only there for one scene, 
however.  A doctor tells Midge that he might not recover for two 
years.  Next scene, however, Stewart is prowling the street.
Unless I blinked, it isn't explained how Stewart got his act
together again.
Wouldn't you know it, Stewart spots a girl who looks alot
like Novak.  She has a different hairstyle, hair color, and
fashion sense.  You'd think that he would shake it off
as a coincidence, especially given his fixation with her.
But no, he knocks on her apartment door, checks on her ID
(she's Judy Barton), asks her to go out with him, then asks her 
to quit her job, then dresses her up as Novak, even dying her hair 
the same color.  It turns out that this woman is Novak.  She must 
be a very pliable woman, as she gives in to all the endless demands 
both Gavin and Stewart make of her.  Instead of saying no,
she just gets breathless with excitement.  She also must like
older men, since Gavin and Stewart are both a quarter century
older than her.
Stewart recognizes a necklace that Judy is wearing as one that
Novak wore.  Instead of accepting this as a coincidence,
Stewart makes the incredible deduction that Novak impersonated
Gavin's wife, that Gavin killed his wife, and Novak and Gavin
had an affair.  Instead of going to the police, Stewart takes
Novak to the scene of the crime, fighting his vertigo and 
dragging the reluctant Novak up the stairs as he cross-examines 
her.  When finally suprised by a nun, Novak jumps off the tower 
(would you have?  Didn't think so) leaving Stewart gaping as the 
credits roll.
Now, it could be that I am a fault-finding grouch who
missed the point.  Or, it could be that others are overly
impressed by the Hitchcock and Stewart names, silly dream 
sequences and dubious surprises.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Quiet Man, The (1952)
John Ford wanted to direct a film about an
American boxer's return to his Irish roots,
but couldn't get any studio to bankroll it.
John Wayne had agreed to star in the picture,
and his name was box office gold, but the
studios suspected that the American public
would be indifferent to Irish culture.
Of all the Hollywood studios, Republic Pictures,
best known for their awful low-budget westerns,
ended up producing the film.  They were rewarded
with an Oscar nomination for Best Picture, while
Ford won Best Director and Winton C. Hoch won
for the rich color cinematography.
Wayne's boxing career in the states ends when
he kills a man in the ring.  He retires to the
Irish cottage where he was born, and weds fiery
red-head Maureen O'Hara.  But O'Hara's brother,
bullying Victor MacLaglen (apparently a much older
brother!) refuses to pay the dowry, forcing a
physical confrontation with Wayne.
"The Quiet Man" benefits greatly from the presence
of two of Hollywood's best character actors, Irish
curmudgeon Barry Fitzgerald and the hulking,
cantankerous McLaglen.  McLaglen would be nominated
for Best Supporting Actor for his performance.
O'Hara is radiant as always.  Wayne once again plays
himself, but he does it so well.
I don't know if the early 1950s depiction of rural
Ireland is accurate.  Apparently, all of the buildings
have stood for centuries, and in the taverns serving
black beer, there is always a fellow with an accordion
singing Irish ballads.  Horse and carts are still
common.  Whether this is an accurate portrayal or a
fantasy isn't important, however, as the viewer will
gladly accept this colorful world of rolling hills
and Irish brogues.
The film's ultimate message, that it is necessary to
confront bullies in order to prove your manhood,
bothers me a little.  (It is a wise policy to ensure
the odds are in your favor first.)  Also, there is a
scene where Wayne is pushing, dragging and even kicking
O'Hara, to an approving audience.  One woman even gives
Wayne a stick "to beat yer lovely wife with".  This is
supposed to be a comic scene, but I can't say that I
approve of it.
Still, a highly entertaining film, with excellent
performances especially by Fitzgerald and McLaglen.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Singin' in the Rain (1952)
"Singin' in the Rain" is generally considered to be
the best Hollywood musical ever.  It may well be,
as I have seen no other musical that comes close.
Perhaps the difference between this film and others
is that it is not only a musical.  If you remove
all the musical and dance numbers, you are still
left with an outstanding comedy.  In fact, it may
be the best comedy ever, unless "Dr. Strangelove"
qualifies.
The story has Gene Kelly and Jean Hagen playing
fictional silent movie stars for Monumental Pictures.
It is 1927, and "The Jazz Singer" has made silent
features obsolete.  Monumental must transition to
talkies.  One of many problems is that Hagen can't
sing, and her shrieking voice must be dubbed by
Kelly's love interest, Debbie Reynolds.  Hagen
despises Reynolds, since she has plans for Kelly
herself.  Kelly's best friend is musician Donald
O'Connor, and his studio boss is Millard Mitchell.
O'Connor wasted much of the prime of his career
making films with Francis, the talking mule.  While
I suppose that both Universal and O'Connor had bills
to pay, "Singin' in the Rain" demonstrates his
prodigious talent.  "Make 'em Laugh" in particular
is a marvel, although Kelly must be given due credit
for the choreography.
Debbie Reynolds was in her teens when this film was
made, and she radiates with energy.  Kelly is perfect
as always, and Hagen gives a career performance as
stupid prima donna Lina Lamont.
While it may be heresy to criticize such an
outstanding film, the first two thirds of the film
is even better than the last third.  The film's
momentum is disturbed by a lengthy dance sequence
that includes mysterious femme fatale Cyd Charisse.
One ballet scene has her wearing a dress that trails
on for 25 feet, lifted by a wind machine.  You've
heard of gratuitous sex or violence; perhaps this is
gratuitous Art, and it has little to do with the
rest of the film.
But trivial flaws cannot prevent "Singin' in the
Rain" from being among the best films ever made,
as well as the best musical ever and one of the best
comedies.  Particularly great are the scenes with
Kelly and Hagen in their first talky: the transition
from pantomime to dialogue is both hilarious and
revealing.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Unbearable Lightness of Being, The (1988)
The Unbearable Lightness of Being (1988)
Perhaps the worst aspect of "The Unbearable Lightness
of Being" is the satire-prone title, which many people
undoubtedly interpreted as "The Unbearable Length of an
Art Film".  It is true that at 171 minutes, the film
drags a little in the second half.  But the title, which
refers to Tereza's explanation for returning to Czechoslovakia,
is far more pretentious than the film itself.  In fact,
the film has more warmth and eroticism than anything
else.  The film's backdrop may be the 1968 Russian
invasion that toppled the progressive Czech government,
but the script is much more interested in following
the frequent sexual liasons of its lead characters.
That is not to say that politics aren't present,
only that they provide a context.  The communists are
subtly sinister bureaucrats, using intimidation and
blackmail to put fear in the hearts of the people.
But whenever politics threatens to dominate the film,
the characters leave Prague, and the script can again
focus on philanderings and infidelities.
Daniel Day Lewis is Tomas, an ingratiating brain
surgeon with a talent for seducing beautiful women.
(The film's signature line is "Take off your clothes".)
His favorite partner is Sabina (Lena Olin), who shares
his free-spirited philosophy.  Tomas begins a committed
relationship with Tereza (Juliette Binoche), whom he
eventually marries.  But he is unable to stop philandering.
Meanwhile, Soviet tanks arrive in Prague.  Our leads
flee to Switzerland, where Sabina begins an adulterous
relationship with naive Franz (Derek de Lint).
While Olin was the only cast member to receive a significant
acting nomination (Golden Globe Best Supporting Actress),
Binoche and Lewis are equally good.  Daniel Day Lewis
may be the best actor of this generation, and he is as
convincing here as he was with drastically different (and
more challenging) characters in films such as "A Room with a View",
"My Left Foot", and "In the Name of the Father".
"Being" received Academy Award nominations for Best Adapted
Screenplay (Jean-Claude Carriere and Philip Kaufman, based
on the Milan Kundera novel) and Best Cinematography (Sven Nykist;
the film was shot in France due to Czech politics).  The
Golden Globes nominated "Being" for Best Picture.
Still, much credit must go to Kaufman, as his direction
makes the characters sensual, credible and compelling.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Snapper, The (1993) (TV)
"The Snapper" is a BBC made-for-television production.
The depiction of a contemporary Irish family has an
excellent (and surprisingly graphic) script by obscure
novelist Roddy Doyle, and there are enough plot complications
to keep things interesting.
"The Snapper" is Irish slang for a baby.  The film stars
Colm Meaney (best known for his work on two "Star Trek"
series) as the blustering head of an Irish household that
includes his wife and several children.  Tina Kellegher
plays his daughter, an unmarried young woman who has become
pregnant.
The small town delights in gossiping about who the father
is, until it is revealed that he is an aging, overweight
milquetoast.  The resulting derision causes stress between
father and daughter, that may compel Kellegher to leave home
against her family's wishes.
Judging from the script, Ireland is much more relaxed
than America about the subject of sex.  A group of young
women harass a younger male waiter, and frankly discuss
their sexual adventures.  The word "bitch" is so frequently
used that it can be taken as a compliment.  When the
unwed Kellegher becomes pregnant, her popularity actually increases.
She is only ostracized when the father turns out not to
be a sleek local stud, but a married man nearly old enough
to be her grandfather.  When Meaney finds out, his first
reaction is "Jesus, that bastard's older than I am!"
Another cultural difference is that the Irish seem
to drink heavily.  Meaney visits the pub nearly every
night, and Kellegher gets plastered at a bar even though
she is nine months pregnant.  When her brother pukes in the
kitchen sink (filled with dishes) after a binge, all
father has to say is that he expects him to do the dishes
afterwards.
I enjoyed all the petty squabbling and selfishness among the
family members.  Unlike "The Waltons", this is likely how most
larger families behave.  "The Snapper" is a drama that succeeds
even more as a comedy.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for King Kong (1933)
>From the first few minutes, it is obvious that
"King Kong" is not a great movie.  The script
isn't good enough, full of cliches and one-dimensional
characters.  Fortunately, the film is partly
redeemed by the special effects and action scenes.
"King Kong" is a historically important and
entertaining film, but not particularly good.
Carl Denham (Robert Armstrong) is a gregarious
huckster and film producer/director/cameraman
who specializes in jungle spectaculars.  He needs
a blonde for a love interest angle, for dramatic
purposes finding her (Fay Wray) at the last possible
moment.  Wray is so hungry that she has resorted to
stealing apples, yet she looks terrific.  Armstrong
hires her without any knowledge of her character,
experience, or acting ability.  Clumsy phrases such as
"square", "straight" and "on the level" are used
as code words to indicate that Armstrong will not
try to seduce Wray.
On a ship headed for an uncharted island (chosen by
Armstrong based upon second-hand information, quite
the gamble) Wray meets Bruce Cabot, a crew member
who believes that women don't belong on ships.  When
pressed, he can only state that "they cause trouble".
Upon arrival, the crew stumbles onto a fantastic
native ritual.  Somehow, ship captain Frank Reicher
is able to speak their language, despite the tribe's
isolation.
Since I've made my point about the clumsiness of
the story, I'll fast forward through the synopsis.
The natives worship King Kong, a giant ape that
abducts Wray and gives her a tour of the island,
stopping to fight various giant reptiles.  Kong
is later captured by Armstrong and shipped to New York.
Kong escapes, re-kidnaps Wray, and goes on a rampage
in the Big Apple.
More complaints about the plot: how has Kong
survived for millenia on this island when he has
to fight giant reptiles for his life several times
daily?  The large search party has two survivors:
predictably, the two male leads.  How did the crew
drag Kong onto the ship? And keep him fed through
the return voyage?  After his escape, it defies
probability that Kong is able to find Wray in the
big city, and that of all the skyscrapers, he would
choose the most famous, the Empire State building,
to climb.  And anyway, why would he climb it?
To put a flag on the top of the building?
Of course, the plot is secondary to the special
effects and action scenes.  They age well: Kong
and his reptile enemies are obviously stop-motion
models, but they do not lack charm.  Kong is the
deepest character in the film, and despite his
nasty temper, you can't help but feel sorry for
the poor guy.
"King Kong" has surprisingly graphic violence and
would be an "R" movie if re-released today.  Kong
bites and squishes numerous screaming people, as does
a belligerent brontosaurus.  A scene which had crew
members devoured by giant spiders had to be deleted
from the film, as it horrified a preview audience.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Virtuosity (1995)
"Virtuosity" is a campy, action-packed thriller with some
elements of science fiction.  Despite much violence and
a few scenes that are difficult to believe, it is an
enjoyable and interesting film that is underrated and
worth a look.
Denzel Washington stars as an ex-cop with a troubled past:
while seeking revenge on a taunting mass-murderer who
killed his wife and daughter, he made the mistake of
killing some others as well.  He is now a prisoner, and
a volunteer in a bizarre virtual reality experiment
which has him tracking a sadistic and unpredictable
computerized serial killer (Russell Crowe).
A plot device has Crowe placed free in the real world: 
an android with some interesting character traits.  He has 
a massive need for attention, and his murders are intended 
as a lure for Washington, the only human that he has any 
respect for.  Desperate federal officials release Washington 
from prison to hunt Crowe down, a task that Washington 
accepts with reluctance but performs with relish.  He is 
joined by a criminal psychiatrist (Kelly Lynch) who matches 
Washington's humorless and determined disposition.
"Virtuosity" was a very enjoyable film for me to watch,
a definite guilty pleasure.  There are flaws however.
There is much gratuitous violence, most obviously in a
prison fight scene that demonstrates nothing except that
Washington is a tough guy that won't back down from a
fight.
Since I am a software programmer myself, I had trouble with
the fact that only *one* programmer was responsible for
Crowe's software (he would need a dozen engineers at least)
and of course that programmer is stereotyped as an
effiminate "mad scientist".  This engineer not only
frees this killer, but enjoys his subsequent exploits with
parental pride.
Washington's character has amazing resilence and courage,
and is even willing to engage in hand to hand combat with
the much stronger Crowe.  Okay, but can Washington outrun
the bullets from a half-dozen machine guns?
"Virtuosity" also has borrowed much of its plot from
"The Terminator".  Still, it is fun watching Crowe camp
it up, and Washington's intensity is compelling.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Nadine (1987)
"Nadine" is a surprisingly original and entertaining film.
It is not ambitious, and makes no pretense of greatness.
It is intended as a simple comedy and action picture, but
is a little more than that.  The depiction of Austin, Texas
of 1954 is credible, and the lead actors and their characters
give winning performances.  The action sequences even have
some suspense.
Jeff Bridges and Kim Basinger are married, but separated.
Bridges merely needs Basinger's signature to finalize the
divorce, so he can marry his new girlfriend.  Bridges and
Basinger really still do love each other, but have been
too busy squabbling to notice.  (The producer of "Twister"
must have seen this movie).
Meanwhile, Basinger is trying to recover nude pictures from
a slimy photographer.  Her photos are mixed with those depicting
a proposed highway's layout.  The leads to Basinger and
Bridges becoming involved in murder, conspiracy to commit
land fraud, and other lesser crimes.  Worse yet, a group
of ruthless but amusing baddies led by Rip Torn is also
after the highway photos.
There were several things about the film that I liked.
Bridges true love is not for Nadine or new fiancee Glenne
Headly, but for a pathetic nightclub called "The Blue Bonnet",
which has few customers but many unpaid bills.  In one
scene, Bridges makes an escape from the baddies by unleashing
rattlesnakes, perhaps an original concept.  In another
scene, Basinger and Bridges are forced to crawl across
a splintering ladder spanning two high buildings.
Jeff Bridges has my favorite line of the film, "I'll bet
that she's got a husband who's even dumber than she is."
He is unaware that the woman being referred to is his own
wife!
Robert Benton directed and wrote the screenplay.  While
not a household name, he has many good films on his resume,
including "Bonnie and Clyde" and "Kramer vs. Kramer".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Conversation, The (1974)
It is ironic that "The Conversation" was released the same year
that Nixon resigned.  Nixon was forced out of office largely
because he was caught committing crimes on tape.  And "The
Conversation" is about the consequences of bugging.
Gene Hackman plays a professional wiretapper.  He is well-paid
getting the scoop on others, but is very secretive, to the
point of paranoia, about guarding his own personal life.
He tapes a young couple's conversation, and begins to worry
about what may happen to them.  The man says to the woman,
"they'll kill us if they can."
Hackman refuses to turn the tapes in to his client, despite
increasing pressure from a young Harrison Ford, who is a
cheerless bad guy.  In fact, everyone in this movie is cheerless.
It is also slow, which is good for character development,
except the only character getting screen attention is
Hackman, and he doesn't reveal very much.
Women seem to want Hackman.  This seems odd, given that
he is middle-aged, nerdy, secretive, and withdrawn.
He also spies on them.  And others spy on him.
The theme of everyone under surveillance was better
developed, with more humor, in "The Anderson Tapes" (1971)
although "The Conversation" has the better cinematography.
John Cazale has a supporting role.  The only other movies I've 
seen him in are the Godfather films, "The Deer Hunter" (1979)
and "Dog Day Afternoon" (1975).  He sure found his way into 
good films.  I guess his goofy looks kept him from being cast
in insipid romantic comedies.
Look fast for Robert Duvall as the shadowy, well-guarded Director.
An interesting film, and a chance to see Shirley (Cindy Williams)
without Laverne, and Ford as a laconic villian (rather than a 
laconic hero).  Nominated for best picture, "The Conversation" is 
a bit overrated.  Towards the end it is hard to tell what's real 
and what's not, but then the surrealist moments are the best 
in the film.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Easy Rider (1969)
Wyatt (Peter Fonda) and Billy (Dennis Hopper) are motorcycle
riding dope dealers, who live on the road.  In the opening
minutes of the film, they score big, buying (and sampling)
coke from a Mexican, then selling it to Phil Spector.  Fonda
rolls the big bills in a plastic tube that he hides in
this motorcycle's gas tank.  Then Wyatt and Billy are on
the road, with the goal of reaching New Orleans by Mardi Gras,
but not in the greatest hurry to get there.
"Easy Rider" is different from most films, before or since.
There isn't that much conversation.  What dialogue exists is
to the point.  The focus is on the cinematography, showing
the open road, its countryside, small towns and their yokels.
Since the pace of the film is slow, we connect more closely
to the characters, making their feelings more real.  As the
bikers hit the road, contemporary rock songs are heard.
Hey, I think this roach is making me crash, man...
Fonda picks up a hitch-hiker, another hippie, who needs a
ride to his commune.  Fonda is sympathetic to the hippie,
while Hopper is suspicious and afraid of robbery.  The hippie
is suspicious too, refusing to be drawn into conversation.
Fonda asks who he wants to be, and the hitcher says,
"Porky Pig."
We find that commune life is better in theory than practice.
The young adults and their feral children live in abject
poverty, trying to grow crops without rain on dry dirt.
There is also a lack of focus, with everyone passing time
idly in small groups.  Fonda has a girlfriend immediately,
and fits in well.  Hopper is again paranoid and wants out
of there.  Fonda, Hopper, and their temporary girlfriends
enjoy a nude swim in a mudhole before our anti-heroes return
to the road.
Hopper and Fonda make the mistake of joining a small-town parade.
There are jailed overnight for "parading without a permit".  The
men in small country towns consistently hate Hopper and Fonda,
and their hedonistic, non-conformist lifestyle.  At the jail,
the hippies meet ACLU lawyer George Hanson (Jack Nicholson, whose
role copped an Academy Award nomination and propelled his
career to stardom).  Hanson is the town drunk, connects with
the bikers, and decides to go to Mardi Gras with them.
Fonda tells Nicholson to get a helmet, and Nicholson shows up
with his high school football helmet.  That night, Nicholson
has his roach, which he forgets to smoke as he entertains
Hopper with a wild tale of how Martians have been integrated
into American society.
The group stops in a small town cafe.  They don't get service,
but get attention from a group of sneering, wise-cracking yokels,
and a group of high school girls who ogle the bikers.  For
their own safety, the bikers decide to split, but unfortunately
for them are covertly followed and later beaten by the yokels.
Nicholson doesn't survive the attack.  
To honor his memory, Fonda and Hopper decide to visit his 
favorite New Orleans cathouse.  Hopper selects Karen Black,
Fonda selects Toni Basil (later of "Mickey" fame), and the
couples see Mardi Gras and drop acid.  There is a lengthy,
surreal drug trip, that works surprisingly well.
The bikers return to the road, but have the misfortune of
being seen by more troublemaking hicks, who drive past them
in their pickup truck and shoot them.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Rashomon (1950)
The enthusiastic Western critical response to
"Rashomon" established Akira Kurosawa as the
most noted Japanese director.  More great films
were to follow, but "Rashomon" was the first.
Its influence was demonstrated by the usually
ethnocentric Academy Awards giving the film
a nomination for So Matsuyama's sets.
The story is set in Japan in the middle ages.
Notorious bandit Tajomaru (Toshiro Mifune)
sees a beautiful woman (Machiko Kyo) travelling
a road in the forest with her warrior husband
(Masayuki Mori).  The bandit decides that he
must have her.  He tricks the husband, ties
him up, then rapes the women.  The husband is
subsequently killed, and the woman escapes.
We hear varying versions of the story, from
the point of view of the bandit, the woman,
the dead husband (through a medium) and a
witness.  These versions are all quite different,
even disagreeing on who killed the husband.
The most interesting difference in the versions
is between the bandit's and the observer's.
Both end with a dramatic swordfight between
the bandit and the husband, but the bandit's
version is heroic and skillful, while the
observer's version is clumsy and desperate.
The story is framed by a later incident,
which has three men seeking shelter from a
heavy rain and recounting the incident.
The priest (Minoru Chiaki) and firewood dealer
(Takashi Shimura) are in shock over the
extent of man's evil, while the more cynical
man (Kichijiro Ueda) is not surprised at all.
Mifune is a great actor, energetic and
charismatic.  Mifune and other cast members
would show up in subsequent Kurosawa films,
such as "The Seven Samurai" and "Throne of Blood".
With "Rashomon", Kurosawa may be saying that
there is no absolute truth, that it varies according
to the pride of the observer.  His pessimistic
assessment of man's evil nature is tempered
by a somewhat artificial ending.  A baby has
been abandoned and begins to cry (fortunately
waiting until after all the story-telling has
ended).  While the cynical man has no sympathy
for the child, both the priest and the firewood
dealer are willing to care for the helpless baby,
with the resulting moral that perhaps humanity
is not so selfish and wicked after all.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1963)
One of the better haunted house films, "The Haunting"
conveys horror without resorting to violence,
gore, or even special effects.  No ghosts ever
appear onscreen, but we know they are out there,
howling, laughing and banging, in the hallway behind
the door.  And the doorknob is turning!
A cerebral British adaption of the Shirley Jackson
novel, "The Haunting" takes place (naturally) in a
large, foreboding New England mansion with a
history of death and terror.  Psychic researcher
Dr. Markway (Richard Johnson) arrives to prove
the existence of the supernatural, bringing with
him nervous, impressionable Eleanor (Julie Harris),
psychic lesbian Theodora (Claire Bloom), and
cynical Russ Tamblyn, who is heir to the mansion.
What I liked best about "The Haunting" wasn't the
ghost scenes, which promise more than they deliver.
I liked the characters, who behave with consistency
and are well developed.  Markway is torn by conflicting
motives: he wants to study Hill House, but is also
protective of his inexperienced team members.  Theodora
is icy cool and predatory, helping to drive hapless
Eleanor over the edge.  Julie Harris is one of my
favorite actresses, and she plays her bundle of nerves
character without making her overly sympathetic.
Nonbeliever Tamblyn considers his adventure in
Hill House to be one big joke, until... well, you'll
have to see it.
The biggest weakness of "The Haunting" is that
it teases the audience with the presence of ghosts
without ever revealing them.  Why not have the door
fly open, and have an enormous green ghost sweep
around the panic-stricken guests, swirling books
and chairs?  Subtlety is all well and good, but the
film's climax can still be a real horror show.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Three Faces of Eve, The (1957)
Hollywood had a fascination with psychiatry during
the 1950s.  Perhaps the hope was strong that a
person's emotional problems were simply based upon
a single traumatic incident, which, once revealed,
would 'cure' that person.  These naive, wishful
expectations of psychiatry form the background of
"The Three Faces of Eve".
Joanne Woodward plays a woman who suffers from
multiple personalities.  Based (undoubtedly loosely)
upon a true story, 'Eve' is a drab housewife
married to a clueless hick (David Wayne).  When
a second personality emerges, a vivacious,
irresponsible flirt, Eve is somehow sent to a
psychiatrist (Lee J. Cobb, whose ability to keep
a straight face provides the major use of his
acting skills here).  Eventually, a third personality
appears, a perfect, mature woman who apparently
has combined the best aspects of the other two
personalities.
There is much humor in this film, intentional
or otherwise.  This is provided by Cobb's deadpan
delivery, Woodward's flirtatious personality,
and Wayne's dense character.  The worship of
doctors as superior beings is apparent, especially
when Cobb states that he has no sexual interest
in Woodward because he is a doctor.  The silliest
part of the film has Cobb able to resurrect
the desired Woodward personality simply by calling
for it by name.  (Eve's personality changes are
signalled by musical score changes and by her
freezing in an awkward position.)
Joanne Woodward won a Best Actress Oscar for her
wide-ranging performance.  She would turn the
tables in 1976, playing a psychiatrist treating
a woman with multiple personalities in the
made-for-TV "Sybil".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sense and Sensibility (1995)
"Sense and Sensibility" takes place at the turn of the
nineteenth century in England, when respectable women did
not have careers, and young maids were obliged to wait
for suitors.  Looks and personality mattered then as now,
but most important of all was to have a generous dowry,
for then a woman would have many suitors to choose from.
The Dashwood family consists of a husband and wife and
three daughters, two of them at marrying age.  The eldest
daughter, Elinor (Emma Thompson), has sensitive eyes but is 
reserved in displaying her feelings.  In contrast, the lovely 
middle daughter Marianne (Kate Winslet) is willful and emotive, 
as is the precocious youngest daughter Margaret (Emilie Francois).  
When the father dies, his estate goes to his son John by an 
earlier wife, leaving the Dashwoods with no dowries and only a 
modest annuity.
Worse, John's wife Fanny proves to be selfish and greedy.
She talks her husband out of increasing the Dashwood's
annuity and instead plans to kick them out of their mansion.
The Dashwoods are visited by Fanny's brother Edward Ferrars 
(Hugh Grant).  Grant and Thompson take a liking to each other, 
and the Dashwoods hope for an engagement, but meddling Fanny 
sends Grant to London.  It also turns out that Grant is already
engaged, for five years, to a woman Grant no longer wants.
Evicted, the Dashwoods move in with their cousin Sir John Middleton,
a widower who lives with his mother-in-law Mrs. Jennings.
Middleton and Jennings are gregarious people.  They are
delighted to see the Dashwood clan and set about marrying
the two elder daughters off.
Soon, Marianne has a suitor, the older, stiff Colonel Brandon 
(Alan Rickman).  However, Marianne prefers the dashing young John 
Willoughby, who shares Marianne's passion for life.  Again the 
Dashwoods expect an engagement, but unexpectedly Willoughby 
leaves for London.  It is usual in a Jane Austen novel for the most 
obvious suitor to not turn out to be the best.  Austen prefers 
character to personality.
Determined to marry off the spurned Dashwoods, Mrs. Jennings
takes the two to London, where no one shows much interest
in them.  Marianne sees Willoughby at a party, but he is cold to 
her, as he has decided to wed a woman with fifty thousand pounds
dowry instead.  He needs the money, as he has been disinherited
for bad behaviour.
The Dashwoods return to Middleton's country cottage.
Marianne, still pining for the love of Willoughby, wanders into 
the fields during a thunderstorm, to sob and stare at Willoughby's 
neighboring estate.  Fortunately, Colonel Brandon comes to the 
rescue, carrying Marianne home.  Marianne becomes seriously ill from 
her exposure but does recover, and re-kindles her romance with Brandon.
Meanwhile, Grant is freed from his romantic obligations,
and visits the cottage to declare his love for Elinor.
There is a double wedding, a happy ending.  Willoughby, who is
not invited, can only gaze wistfully at the celebration.
The story is much deeper than this article allows, and the
characters, both major and minor, come alive with their
various personalities.  Although the film is over two hours,
not a scene nor line of dialogue is unwanted.  The costumes,
cinematography, even the hairstyles are exemplary.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Inn of the Sixth Happiness, The (1958)
Ingrid Bergman's career was nearly destroyed by
her affair with an Italian director, but by 1958
her image had recovered sufficiently for her to
be cast as a saintly missionary.  In "The Inn of
the Sixth Happiness" (the title refers to a Chinese
saying) her character can do no wrong, and her
halo grows brighter and stronger as the film
progresses.
Set in northern China, the production was to be
filmed in nearby Formosa (modern-day Taiwan).
When the Nationalist Chinese government tried
to meddle with the storyline, the film's location
was changed to the British island of Wales.  There,
local residents of Chinese ancestry were cast in
supporting roles but were given no lines due
to their un-Chinese Welsh accents.
The plot was based on the Alan Burgess biography
of Gladys Aylward (Bergman).  She was an ambitious
English servant who in 1930, against all advice and
without money, took a hazardous journey to China
to work as a missionary.  There, she runs an inn
with the intention of converting travellers through
Christian storytelling.  She also becomes a paid
Chinese government official, working to end the
custom of foot-binding among young women.
As Aylward's do-gooding finds increasing success,
she wins the respect of the local Mandarin official
(Robert Donat) and Dutch-Chinese patriot Colonel
Lin (Curt Jurgens).  There is also an inevitable
romance between Lin and Aylward, which can't really
go anywhere due to the need to keep Bergman's character
pure.  Aylward's character begins performing heroic
actions whose favorable resolutions seem implausible
and simplistic.  She stops a prison riot and effects
reforms, and later leads a herd of children through
territory threatened by ruthless Japanese invaders.
While Bergman's character is ageless and immortal,
her supporting cast is not as fortunate.  Among the
martyred are elderly missionary Mrs.Lawson (Athene
Seyler), genial assistant Yang (Peter Chong), and
prison spokesman Li (Burt Kwouk).
Director Mark Robson received an Oscar nomination
for work on "The Inn of Sixth Happiness".
This was Donat's final film.  He died prior to the
film's release.  He gives a hammy but charming
performance.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Room with a View, A (1986)
Lucy (Helena Bonham Carter) is a tourist in Italy at the turn
of the century.  She is chaperoned by Charlotte (Maggie Smith).
Much older, Charlotte is well-intentioned but always makes a
muddle of things.  They have been promised rooms with a view, 
but all they can see is a back alley.  Meeting the other Inn 
residents at dinner, Mr. Emerson (Denholm Elliot) offers his 
room and that of son George (Julian Sands).  However, he makes 
this offer so tactlessly that Charlotte refuses and flees the 
dining room with Lucy.  The charmingly meddlesome vicar Mr. Beebe 
(Simon Callow) intervenes to arrange the transfer of rooms.
Lucy is passionate but repressed.  Her emotional outlet is playing 
the piano, and she prefers dramatic numbers by Beethoven.
Through much of the movie she simply seethes, annoyed at the
antics of the characters surrounding her but not always willing
to express her annoyance.
While in Italy, the gregarious Mr. Emerson implores her to talk 
to George, a diffident and mysterious young man.  
At the village square, there is a bloody row between a crowd of 
Italians.  Lucy faints, but George is there to catch her and take 
her to safety.  George believes "something wonderful has happened,"
but she represses her feelings for him, as they may not be judged 
proper by genteel society.  Later, he spontaneously and passionately 
kisses her, witnessed by the shocked Charlotte.
Lucy returns to her mother's house in England.  Free-spirited 
younger brother Freddy (Rupert Graves) also lives there.
Upon arrival, Cecil (Daniel Day-Lewis) proposes to her, and
for some reason she accepts.  If you have seen Daniel Day-Lewis
in (for example) "In the Name of the Father" (also recommended)
you would never recognize him here, playing the sneering, bookish,
affected intellectual Cecil.  He gives an even better performance 
than Maggie Smith, who instead copped the Oscar nomination.
We realize that Lucy is halfway between Cecil's world and George's.
She shares Cecil's repression of sexuality, but shares George's
passionate nature.  While the audience wants her to end up with
George, the decision is not so easy for her.
In a rather amazing set of coincidences, Mr. Beebe is the local
vicar and the Emersons rent a nearby villa.  Freddy takes a liking
to George and invites him to his house, where their fun playing
tennis and naked swimming (apparently how this film got its 
unmerited TV-MA rating) contrasts with Cecil's refusal to participate,
and his condescension towards everything and everyone.
George makes a play for Lucy, imploring her to dump Cecil for him.
Lucy, now muddled from repressing her feelings, tells him to
leave her house forever, but then breaks the engagement with Cecil,
who in his shock is almost likable.  Lucy decides to run away
from her emotional conflicts by vacationing in Constantinople
(or Athens, whatever).
Charlotte's role changes from chaperone to matchmaker after a
visit with the elder Emerson.  He convinces her to send Lucy to talk
with him.  He tells her that Lucy has been lying to everyone,
including herself, and that she loves George and should be with
him.  Uncharacteristically, Lucy breaks into tears and surrenders.
We next see her in a happy ending with George.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Raging Bull (1980)
Considered by many to be the best film of the 1980s,
"Raging Bull" falls short of that extremely high
standard.  However, it is still a great film, with
excellent performances from Robert De Niro and
Joe Pesci, and glorious black and white cinematography.
"Raging Bull" tells the story of middleweight boxer
Jake La Motta, from relatively early in his career
to about a decade after his retirement.  This covers
the years 1943 through 1964.  La Motta is the scourge
of his division, with only Sugar Ray Robinson able
to defeat him.  La Motta, an argumentative and
violent man, is managed by his equally querulous
brother Pesci.  La Motta leaves his hostile first
wife for blond beauty Cathy Moriarty, but his obsessive
jealousy towards her threatens their marriage as well
as his relationship with his brother.
Eventually, La Motta's career fails due to age and
corpulence.  He becomes a night club entertainer,
falls on hard times, but he is no quitter.
"Raging Bull" isn't for everyone.  There is much
violence and "adult" language.  The film should appeal
to men more than to women.  Men will be more likely
to sympathize and even admire La Motta, while women
will be more likely to condemn him for his violence
and self-destructive ways.
De Niro put on nearly fifty pounds in order to better
play the older, heavyset La Motta.  This is acting
beyond the call of duty.  De Niro is cool and intense
at the same time, but Pesci also gives a great
performance.  The dialogue between De Niro and Pesci
is great, and the flood of obscenities is admittedly
entertaining.
"Raging Bull" is a relentless character study, but
there is some comic relief.  La Motta buys a newfangled
television set, and is unable to get a picture on it.
One scene has him staring blankfaced at a scrambled
signal.
"Raging Bull" won Academy Awards for Best Actor
(De Niro) and Film Editing (Thelma Schoonmaker).
The editing award was undoubtedly due to the boxing
sequences, with their unusual slow motion and close-ups.
The film was also nominated for Best Picture,
Best Supporting Actor (Pesci) and Actress (Moriarty),
as well as Director (Martin Scorsese) and Cinematography
(Michael Chapman).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Accused, The (1948)
"The Accused" is a crime drama and character study.
The film has a good script and a competent cast.
There is a reasonable amount of suspense, although
one can easily guess where the plot is headed next.
"The Accused" is Loretta Young, playing a college
Psychology professor.  One of her students is brash
playboy Douglas Dick, who is determined to score with
her prim but attractive teacher.  Young stupidly
goes on a date with Dick, and ends up killing him
in self-defense.  She then tries to make it look
like a suicide.
Soon, police inspector Wendell Corey (whom you may
remember in a similar role in "Rear Window") is on
the job.  Dick's lawyer, Robert Cummings, becomes
romantically involved with Young.  Student Suzanne
Dalbert (who has a terrible foreign accent) is the
prime suspect, but eventually the focus is turned on
Young.
The career of Loretta Young was at its peak in 1948.
She had just won the Best Actress Oscar for "The
Farmer's Daughter" and would be nominated next year
for "Come to the Stable".  Her character in "The
Accused" is tense and sexually repressed, and the
glamorous, graceful Young is a bit miscast.  When
Young changes her clothes and hairstyle as part of
the cover-up of her crime, the difference is not
strong enough, perhaps because the studio felt it
would hurt her image if she were less attractive
in the first half of the film.
The best role, although a small one, is given to
Sam Jaffe, who plays a colorful forensics examiner.
The script is intelligent, perhaps too much so,
throwing in psychology jargon.  The script controls
the direction, which rushes the story along.  The
pace does maintain dramatic tension, but perhaps
the impact of key scenes would be greater if
cinematography was used more often to tell the story.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Princess, A (1995)
"A Little Princess" is a fantasy targeted to young girls,
of about the age of ten.  This means that adult males
whose notion of a great movie is watching Clint Eastwood
get the bad guys (sometimes that can be my idea of a
great movie as well) will likely find the film to be
unwatchable.
If you watch a film for action, "A Little Princess" is
painfully slow.  But if you are looking for emotion, the
film delivers the goods: privilege, injustice, revenge,
liberation, generosity, and suffering are among the themes.
While the entire plot could be condensed into an episode
of "Wishbone", the story merely provides a vehicle for
displaying the intense emotions that a little girl can feel.
The story is familiar, because it has been done before.
The original is from the children's novel by Frances Hodgson
Burnett.  There were four earlier cinematic versions,
including a silent from 1917.  The most famous version
is a Shirley Temple vehicle from 1939, which is almost
but not quite as good.
Sara (Liesel Matthews) is a young girl dotingly raised in
India by her wealthy and widowed father.  He must fight in
World War I, and he places her in a New York boarding school
run by the intimidating Miss Minchin (Eleanor Bron).
Sara becomes very popular, earning the jealousy of schoolmate
Amelia (Rusty Schwimmer).  However, Sara's father is killed
in the war and his assets are siezed.  Her tuition cannot
be paid, and she is forced into servitude, much to the
pleasure of Minchin and Amelia.  But a magical Indian servant
(Errol Sitahal) takes an interest in her fortunes.
Bron has the best role, in the fine tradition of Louise Fletcher
from "One Flew Over the Cuckoo's Nest".  She dislikes the
independent Sara, but tolerates her as long as the bills are
paid.  When Sara can no longer afford tuition, Bron dresses her
in black, steals her possessions and relegates her to the attic.
This isn't all bad, as Sara is now able to be with the shunned
black servant girl, and can show her generosity by buying flowers
from street beggars (it only becomes generous when you are
nearly a beggar yourself).
The sets, such as World War I battlefields and New York alleys,
are well done although the budget requires them to be small in
scale.  The magical Indian is present to validate Sara's childish
fantasy stories, and to make plausible the incredible coincidences
behind the reuniting of father and daughter.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Annie Hall (1977)
"Annie Hall" is a very good comedy about relationships,
from a realistic rather than romantic viewpoint.  The
film has many quirky and original comic techniques,
all of which work.  While not Allen's best film
("Manhattan" is even better), its strict focus on
relationships, its accessiblity, and its originality
make it his most popular.
Allen plays his usual character.  He is a New Yorker,
Jewish, liberal, intellectual, talkative, slightly
neurotic, and involved in relationships.  Carol Kane
and Shelly Duvall appear briefly as love interests,
but his primary target is Annie Hall (Diane Keaton).
Keaton is endearing as a goofy hedonist and whispering
supperclub singer.
Their romance is doomed by disparate interests.
Allen wants Keaton mostly for himself, while she has a
need for new experiences and new friendships.  Tony
Roberts plays Allen's sarcastic friend, while Paul
Simon has a small role as a music producer.  Christopher
Walken appears briefly as Keaton's spooky brother.
The film's enduring popularity is due to the clever
and witty script.  "Annie Hall" is funny, regardless
of the audience's demographic.  Keaton is also very
likable, much more so than Mia Farrow would be in
later Allen-directed films.
"Annie Hall" is not an outstanding film, however.
Early scenes take potshots at the working class,
mocking the future careers of his grade school
classmates, then making buffoons of blue collar
types who recognize Allen as a celebrity.  Later
and more successful scenes belittle pseudo-intellectuals
and Hollywood dealmakers.  Still, the film's point
seems to be that in the end, we are all selfish
and shallow.  Allen may be correct in this, but
Keaton's free-style Annie belies his own conclusion.
"Annie Hall" focuses on Allen and not the title
character.  While this is natural, it seems to be
asking the audience to take his side.  It does help
that Allen is very funny, and Allen-the-actor is
given great lines by Allen-the-writer.
Allen gets away with risky, inventive techniques.
In a flashback as a kid, Allen appears by the teacher's
side, and takes a poll of his classmates' future
occupations.  He becomes an animated character
to explore his relationship with the Wicked Queen
in "Snow White".  He asks a handsome, happy couple
how they manage to stay together, and their remarkable
reply is that they are shallow.  During an early
conversation between Allen and Keaton, subtitles show
what the characters are thinking about while one
desperately tries to present a appealing image
to the other.  Allen frequently talks to the camera.
Keaton has an out-of-body experience while making love
with Allen.  Keaton and Roberts play Ghost of Christmas
Past, appearing with Allen in one of his childhood
flashbacks.  What is surprising is that these various
gags work, adding originality to what could otherwise
have been an entertaining but conventional film about
a romance.
1977 was the year of the science fiction blockbusters
"Star Wars" and "Close Encounters of the Third Kind".
Despite this, "Annie Hall" won Best Picture and Best
Director (Allen), while Keaton won Best Actress.
Allen (along with Marshall Brickman) also took the Oscar
for Best Original Screenplay, while Allen was nominated
for Best Actor.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Lucas (1986)
"Lucas" is an intelligently written and directed film that
somehow misses the mark.  Much of it is painful to watch,
and many of the supporting characters aren't credible.
Corey Haim is the title character, a 14 year old nerdy
genius "accelerated" into high school.  Haim is unwilling
to accepted his designated place in the HS pecking order,
and tries desperately to win the love of pretty new-in-town
Kerri Green, ignoring the advances of adrogynous young
Wynona Ryder (her film debut).  While Green values Haim as 
a friend, she is in love with good-guy jock Charlie Sheen, 
who already has a lovely girlfriend (Courtney Thorne-Smith).
Ryder, Sheen and Courtney Thorne-Smith (of "Melrose Place") 
went on to  become stars, but not due to this film.  No wonder, 
since their characters all have problems.  Ryder is there only
to follow Haim around and get rejected by him.  It isn't
apparent why she is in love with Haim, whose chief interest
outside of Green is collecting bugs and salamanders.
I can marginally accept Sheen's character as as self-effacing, 
but his frequent role as protector to Haim seems unlikely.
Thorne-Smith is present only to be jealous of Green, and hateful
towards her.  For good measure, I don't like the football
coach either.  He is a collosal jerk, and his behavior
and decisions would get him fired in real life.
I am not implying that a film has to be pleasant or fun
to be good, but "Lucas" is simply painful to watch.  Haim
is easily identified with, and his endless setbacks and
humiliations are all too real to anyone who merely endured
high school.  A happy ending is artificially pasted on.
An interesting film, and I can see how others would view
the film more favorably than I did.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for From the Terrace (1960)
This movie is one long soap opera.  It is well enough done to
be watchable, with the script and plot carefully executed.
Leon Ames is the owner of a large steel factory.  Myrna Loy
does a good imitation of Shelley Winters as his drunken, unloved,
pathetic wife.  Ames's eldest son died of spinal meningitis as
a child, somehow making Ames bitter towards the rest of the family.
Young, angst-ridden son Alfred (Paul Newman) returns from World War 
II, in time to quarrel with his father and beat up his mother's 
boyfriend.  Refusing to work for his father, Newman instead partners
with a friend designing aircraft.
Barbara Eden makes an obvious pass at him, but Newman only has
eyes for Joanne Woodward, despite being engaged to ever-present
Jim Roper.  She treats Newman coldly, but smugly enjoys the attention.
Newman keeps working her until they are married.  On the wedding
day, Newman and Ames have an argument.  Ames has a heart attack and dies.
Myrna Loy is not to be seen from again.
Woodward still treats Newman poorly, and cheats on him with
Roper whenever he is away, which is often due to his workaholic
ambitions.  Newman is impatient with his aircraft design job,
and leaves it to work for a zillionaire executive, whose grandson
he dramatically rescues from a fall into a half-frozen lake.
His success at the firm draws the rivalry of Howard Caine, who
will stop at nothing to show Newman up.
Newman falls for a doe-eyed dark-haired daughter (Ina Balin) 
of a client. The audience is supposed to approve of his affair 
but not his wife's.
Newman's boss is high on family values, and it will ruin
his career if he gets a divorce.  Woodward starts being nice
to him again, and it turns out that it is because he is to
be made partner.  But Caine has taken photos of Newman and Balin
in a hotel bedroom and tries to blackmail him.  Newman is
given the promotion before the board of directors.  Newman
delivers what begins as an acceptance speech, then transforms
into a missive complaining about how terrible wealth and 
ambition is, etc.  He then hails a taxi, ignoring Woodward
who is still trying to keep him, and goes to live in the 
country with Balin, where they are seen having a blissful
reunion as the music sweeps and the credits roll.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gold Rush, The (1925)
"The Gold Rush" is an outstanding silent film.  It is a comedy
and is unusual in that all of the gags work.  The film stars
Charlie Chaplin, who also produced and directed it.  Whether
his intentions are to make you laugh or cry, he always gives
you a good reason to do so.
The film can be divided into two parts.  In the first half,
Chaplin's tramp character is an Alaskan prospector who
has to endure a life-threatening winter storm.  He is
also endangered by violent criminal Black Larson, and good-hearted
but very hungry Big Jim McKay.
In the film's second half, the tramp quits prospecting for
life in an Alaskan village.  There, he courts local beauty
Georgia Hale, who is already taken by playboy Hank Curtis.  
The second half is slightly better than the first.
The plot is very basic, but the scenes work very well on
their own.  One great scene has the hungry tramp eating
his boot.  In another famous scene, actually a fantasy,
the tramp entertains his girlfriend by pretending a pair
of potatoes are his dancin' feet.
The tramp character is the most famous of silent films.
But in premise it is similar to the characters portrayed
by Harold Lloyd or Buster Keaton.  These characters were
ordinary men, always optimistic and striving for something
better, no matter how bleak their situation may become.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Women (1933)
"Little Women" is a very good adaptation of the
Louisa May Alcott classic novel about four daughters
of a Northern Civil War soldier.  While the film
drags towards the end, as sisterly fun is replaced
with worries over romance and sickness, it remains
an impressive production with a fine cast and script.
Many films from the early 1930s look dated today.
This is not the case of "Little Women", which is
as sophisticated as many Hollywood productions of
today.  Perhaps that is partly because the film is
an historical drama, but mostly due to the high
production values.  "Little Women" won the Academy
Award for Best Adapted Screenplay, and was nominated
for Best Picture and Director (George Cukor).
The four daughters are brash tomboy and budding author
Jo (Katherine Hepburn), petulant baby sister Amy
(Joan Bennett), sweetly reticent Beth (Jean Parker),
and serious eldest sister Meg (Frances Dee).  Since
this is a movie, all four sisters are very attractive,
close in age, and given diverse and appealing characters.
Although this is one of her earliest films, Hepburn is
clearly the star, and gives an excellent performance.
"Little Women" is certain to appeal to women more than
to men.  There is no action, and the emotions of the
sisters is always the focus of the scenes.  Male characters,
all in supporting roles, are judged by the sisters on
the basis of their character rather than by looks, wealth
or status.  The sisters eventually go their separate ways,
but the family is again reunited at film's end.
Perhaps the adaption is too faithful to the novel.  The
story becomes bittersweet, even a tearjerker.  The first
half is much more fun, and in cinema it isn't necessary
for the daughters to grow up.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Jerry Maguire (1996)
Tom Cruise struck gold again with this feel-good
romantic comedy, landing another Best Actor Oscar
nomination.  "Jerry Maguire" was one of the most
successful films of 1996, and "Show Me the Money"
became one of the most annoying catch phrases of
that year.  While the Oscar nomination for
Cameron Crowe's screenplay was undeserved, the
supporting performances by Cuba Gooding, Jr. and
Jonathan Lipnicki make the film worth seeing.
The first half of the film has the theme
'See the sports agent hit rock bottom'.
Jerry Maguire (Cruise) works for evil conglomerate
Sports Management International.  He writes a
memo condemning corporate greed, and soon is
fired. All his clients but one are stolen by
arch-rival Bob Sugar (Jay Mohr).  His sole remaining
athlete is wide receiver Rod Tidwell (Gooding),
who is talented but has an attitude problem.
Now broke, Cruise breaks up with his violent playmate
Kelly Preston.  On the rebound, he takes up with
single mother Dorothy (Renee Zellweger), who lives
with her son Ray (Lipnicki) and world-weary older
sister Laurel (Bonnie Hunt).  Cruise loves exuberant,
nerdy-looking Ray more than Dorothy, leading to
much pouting and trauma on her part.  But no worries,
a happy ending for all concerned is inevitable.
Maguire's career is initially destroyed by his manifesto,
which contains such blasphemy as 'less clients, less money'.
Writing the memo is perhaps the only moment his character
seems emotionally honest.  He clings to Tidwell out of
desperation, marries Dorothy out of guilt, and returns
to her apparently because Tidwell caught a touchdown pass.
While Cruise can convey frustration well, he is otherwise
flat, and is outperformed by his supporting cast.  Gooding
makes Cruise look stiff, while Zellweger makes him seem
obliging but disinterested.
The Academy Awards loved "Jerry Maguire", however,
nominating the film for Best Picture.  Joe Hutshing
was nominated for Best Film Editing, while Gooding won
the Oscar for Best Supporting Actor.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Paper Moon (1973)
"Paper Moon" is an outstanding comedy and drama.
Set in the midwest during the Great Depression,
the era comes to life with black and white
cinematography, automobiles, radio shows and
popular music.
Addie (Tatum O'Neal) is a ten-year old who is
orphaned when her mother dies in a car crash.
Small-time con artist and probable father Moses Pray
(Ryan O'Neal, Tatum's real-life father) agrees
to take Addie to her only known relatives
in another state.  Addie turns out to be an even
better con artist than Moses, and the two become
partners.  Later, Moses falls for 'dancer' Trixie
Delight (Madeline Kahn), and gets into trouble with
corrupt sheriff John Hillerman.
The acting of Ryan O'Neal has been criticized throughout
his career, but he is perfect in "Paper Moon".  When
Addie makes him angry, he fumes silently, just what
you would expect from an exasperated father.  His
understated happiness and despair during good and bad
times is also appropriate to his character.
"Paper Moon" continued the success of director
Peter Bogdanovich, whose recent films were
"What's Up Doc" and "The Last Picture Show".
His career would then take a nosedive, and he would
not have another hit until "Mask" in 1985.
Tatum O'Neal gives an excellent performance.  Unlike
other child actors, she is never precocious, except
when it is appropriate, such as when perpetrating a con.
Her character is sharp well beyond her age, and if
it was not cast correctly, it would not be credible.
O'Neal makes the role believable.
Madeline Kahn and Tatum O'Neal were both nominated
for Best Supporting Actress.  O'Neal won, becoming
the youngest person to win a major Academy Award.
Kahn was on a roll in the early-mid 1970s, with
successful roles in the films "What's Up Doc",
"Paper Moon", "Blazing Saddles" and "Young Frankenstein",
all of which were nominated for Academy or Golden Globe
Best Supporting Actress awards.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
"Twister" is a surprisingly entertaining blockbuster, with
terrific special effects (e.g. tornadoes), a frantic plot,
and a love triangle.  It is also unintentionally a comedy,
adding another dimension to the sometimes overdone dialogue
and action scenes.
Bill Paxton tracks down estranged wife Helen Hunt to get her to sign 
divorce papers, so he can marry sex therapist Jami Gertz.  Hunt does
not want the divorce, and manipulates Paxton into chasing tornadoes
with her.  They soon encounter one tornado after another,
risking their lives under the pretense of gaining scientific
knowledge.
It is almost too easy to poke holes in "Twister".  So many
tornadoes, so many close calls, with Paxton always knowing where
to head the car so that their lives can be risked again.
Tornadoes hit them while they watch a drive-in movie, then
wreck their beloved Aunt's house.  Fortunately, the only
casualties from all these funnels are the plagiarizing,
richly financed rival storm chasing team.  When Paxton and Hunt
are chased by the final, most menacing twister, it never
seems to gain on them, just like a proverbial train approaching 
a beautiful woman tied to the railroad tracks.
Gertz is present to add urgency to Hunt's machinations,
and to ask layman questions so that the storm team's actions
can be cogently explained to the audience.  Paxton and Hunt
overact (Paxton gets physically angry when teased about his 
weatherman stint).  None of these "flaws" keep the film from 
being good, however.  Something else is going on, and that is 
the film may actually be a comedy, an unintentional but thankful 
result of energetic director Jan de Bont.
The storm chasing team is similar to a wolfpack.  Paxton is the
alpha male, Hunt the alpha female.  Gertz becomes the beta female,
and quits because she "can't compete."  They roam the
countryside looking for a kill (a tornado) and celebrate
afterwards.
"Twister" can be viewed at many levels: as an entertaining
spectacle, as a formula for a blockbuster, and as a latent
comedy.  However you choose to accept it, it is worth seeing.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for City Lights (1931)
"City Lights" has been billed as Charlie Chaplin's
masterpiece.  I can't agree with that description,
as several other Chaplin films that I have seen, made
both before and after "City Lights", appear to be
clearly better.
Chaplin again plays his tramp character, the one with
the baggy pants, cane, and black hat.  He falls for
a blind but sweet flower girl.  He befriends a millionaire 
(Harry Myers) who is sour when sober, but generous when 
drunk.  Chaplin attempts to use the rich man's wealth for 
the benefit of the flower girl (Virginia Cherrill).
The tramp, as always, gets into trouble in "City Lights".
His adventures aren't as interesting and amusing as in
some other Chaplin films, especially "The Gold Rush" and
"Modern Times".  The exception is a hilarous boxing scene,
which has a desperate-for-funds tramp avoiding a quick
knockout with various clever gags.  But some other
scenes don't work as well, such as the tramp accidentally
swallowing a whistle and thereafter making uncontrollable
whistle noises.
Cherrill was an unknown when cast for "City Lights".
Chaplin discovered her at a boxing match, where she was
in the next seat.  Cherill was probably a very nice person,
but she lacked the energy that other heroines in Chaplin
films had, such as Georgia Hale or Paulette Goddard.
There may be some spoilers in the next paragraphs.
I find it difficult to believe that an operation could 
restore the flower girl's sight, especially in 1931.  When 
she can see, and realizes that a tramp has been her benefactor
instead of a wealthy man, the film ends on that bittersweet
moment.  This emotion does not suit the tramp's character,
who always has his ups and downs but never loses his spirit.
A recurrent theme in "City Lights" is separation and reunion
of the tramp with Myers.  At night, Myers drinks heavily 
and regards the tramp as his best friend, the tramp
having saved his life.  But at dawn, when Myers is sober,
he has lost both his sense of humor and his memory of the
tramp.  The millionaire character is hard to accept
as anything but a plot device for Chaplin to be alternately
rich and poor while courting Cherrill.
"City Lights" remains a good movie with many clever moments,
but its reputation as one of Chaplin's best films does not 
appear to be deserved.

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
"The English Patient" dominated the 1997 Academy Awards,
nearly sweeping the important technical awards (Best Picture,
Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Score, Best Costumes,
Best Editing).  The film had a host of acting nominations
(Best Actor, Best Actress, Best Supporting Actress) but
no awards, perhaps because the cast was not famous enough.
Impressed by the honors disposed by the Academy, a flood
of people rushed to the video store to rent "The English
Patient", having ignored it while it played in theaters.
They were confronted with a slow-moving art film nearly
three hours in length.  Lots of great cinematography,
a heavy dose of romance, an unfamiliar (except Willem Dafoe)
cast, and a definite lack of action and stock characters.
I was a little disappointed by "The English Patient"
as well.  John Seale's cinematography is excellent, and
the script is intelligent and appropriately sparse.
But while it is a very good film, it is not outstanding.
The film is slowly paced and drags at times.  The half
of the story featuring nurse Juliette Binoche is not as
interesting as the half featuring pre-patient Ralph Fiennes.
Also (this complaint is really petty) the burn victim
is a dead ringer for the shape-shifter character on
"Star Trek: Deep Space Nine".
"The English Patient" has two storylines, one set in
1945 Italy, the other in 1938-1944 Africa.  The first
story has Binoche playing a vibrant nurse who believes
that she is cursed: everyone that she loves dies.
She falls for seriously burned Fiennes, and has him
taken to a deserted monastery.  They are soon visited
by threatening refugee Dafoe, who suspects that Fiennes
is a traitor, and Naveen Andrews, an Indian bomb squad
specialist who serves as love interest for Binoche.
The story of Fiennes' jaded but impassioned character is
told in intermittent flashbacks.  He works for the British,
making maps of Africa just prior to World War II.  Lovely
Kristin Scott Thomas, wife of one of Fiennes' friends,
joins the expedition.  Thomas and Fiennes are thrown together
by events, and they have a torrid affair.  Her husband
(Colin Firth) suspects.
"The English Patient" is beautifully filmed, but not
emotionally moving.  The tearjerker ending is a little
contrived, and falls just short.  There is one heckuva
plane crash, however.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Five Easy Pieces (1970)
"Five Easy Pieces" was one of three films starring
Jack Nicholson that were directed, co-written, and
co-produced by Bob Rafelson (the other films were
the weird Monkees flop "Head" and the more
successful "The King of Marvin Gardens").  The film's
lead character, an intelligent but angry drifter,
was ideally suited for Nicholson.
Nicholson plays Robert Dupea, who comes from an
upper-class family of classical musicians.  Nicholson
is a former pianist (the film's title refers to a
beginner's guide to the piano), but he currently
works as an oilman.  He again has the urge to run,
because he does not want to commit to his stupid,
clinging, pregnant girlfriend Rayette (Karen Black).
Robert learns that his father (William Challee)
has had an incapacitating stroke.  He returns home
to visit his family, which includes sister Partita
(Lois Smith) and brother Carl (Ralph Waite).
Robert soon finds something to do at home: start
a heated affair with Carl's fiancee Catherine
(Susan Anspach).
While Nicholson gives a fine performance, the
female supporting cast steals the show.  Black,
Smith, and Anspach are excellent. Helena Kallianiotes
and Toni "Oh Mickey, you're so fine" Basil have
terrific supporting roles as a pair of dike
hitchhikers.  Sally Struthers plays one of
Nicholson's 'girlfriends', and has a topless scene
(No, it isn't frightening).  There is also a score
featuring some of Tammy Wynette's best songs.
The film's most famous scene involves a confrontation
between Nicholson and a no-nonsense waitress.
He wants to order a simple breakfast that isn't
on the menu, but she'll have none of it.  If you
haven't seen the scene, it is certainly worth the
trip to the video store.  But the film's real
strength isn't the comic relief provided by Nicholson,
Black and Kallianiotes, but in the character study
of Robert Dupea.  He is a rebellious, philandering,
wandering bastard, but he is also ashamed of his
weaknesses, which are clearly out of control.
"Five Easy Pieces" received Oscar nominations for
Best Picture and Best Original Screenplay (Rafelson
and Carol Eastman).  Nicholson was nominated for Best
Actor, while Black was nominated for Best Supporting
Actress.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Swing Time (1936)
"Swing Time" is a musical comedy starring
Fred Astaire and Ginger Rogers, one of ten
films they made together.  It followed
their most successful film, "Top Hat",
repeating that film's formula of light
romantic comedy, singing, and dancing.
Astaire is once again a professional dancer,
but makes his real money gambling, thanks
to a lucky coin and cardsharp Victor Moore.
Astaire is engaged to Betty Furness, but
soon takes an interest in Rogers, who just
happens to be a dancing instructor.  Astaire
has a rival for Rogers, just as in "Top Hat",
proud conductor Georges Metaxa.
In addition to Astaire and Rogers, much of
the supporting cast from "Top Hat" returns,
particularly Helen Broderick and Eric Blore.
Some of the humor in "Swing Time" works well.
When Astaire makes an unwelcome visit to his
fiancee, the cat hisses at him.  Later, Moore
attempts to impress a dancing instructor,
and clumsily knocks down a fence.  But some
gags can be seen a mile off, like the snowball
that hits Broderick, and others just fall flat.
It is interesting that the studio would choose
homely Moore as Astaire's sidekick.  While Astaire
is always formally dressed, he still does not
look like a leading man, and does not need
competition.
Of course, Astaire vehicles are considered classics
due to the production numbers, which only make
up a quarter of the feature's length.  Even if
the songs and choreography are outstanding, the
film's grade would still be dominated by the script
that constitutes most of the film.  The songs
are well-crafted but innocuous.  Astaire certainly
can dance, and there is interesting choreography
with shadows in the 'Bojangles' production.  But
even that number is damaged by the poor singing
of the ensemble chorus.
I thought "Swing Time" was only a marginally good film.
However, most people clearly find more charm in
Fred Astaire's vehicles than I do.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
"Pulp Fiction" was the follow-up to Quentin Tarantino's
second film as both Director and Screenwriter, "Reservoir
Dogs".  Although "Dogs" is an even better film, "Pulp
Fiction" benefitted from the momentum of "Dogs", a cast
with greater name recognition, and less graphic (although
still shocking to the innocents) violence.
"Pulp Fiction" has an ensemble cast with multiple
overlapping storylines.  Samuel L. Jackson and John
Travolta are well-dressed hitmen, working for kingpin
Ving Rhames.  Travolta also plays a dubious escort
to Rhames' wife Uma Thurman.  Bruce Willis is a boxer
who renegs on an argreement with Rhames to fix a fight.
Willis' girlfriend is childlike Maria de Medeiros.
Christopher Walken has a great cameo as Willis' father.
Harvey Keitel gets Jackson and Travolta out of a fix,
Eric Stoltz is a jaded drug dealer, Roseanna Arquette
his multiply-pierced wife.  Finally, Tim Roth and
Amanda Plummer are plotting to rob a restaurant,
whose patrons include Jackson and Travolta.
"Pulp Fiction" is a terrific film.  The script is loaded
with clever dialogue (it drags only during Willis' bathroom
conversation with de Medeiros).  There is much action.  The
direction is original.  The cast (except for Tarantino, who
should stay behind the camera) is excellent.  Samuel L. Jackson
probably gives the best performance, but it was Travolta
who revived his career and received a Best Actor nomination.
"Pulp Fiction" uses obscenities freely, has much violence,
and glamorizes criminal lifestyles.  But it is wrong to
downgrade a film because one disagrees with its values.
The film takes the viewer on a wild ride, and the action
is not offensive, but unpredictable and cartoonish.
The characters aren't credible, but they become real
through the outstanding dialogue.  There is much comic relief
to break the tension, which is most intense during Thurman's
overdose.
Some of the cast from "Dogs" reappears here, including
Keitel, Roth and Tarantino.  The Tarantino trademarks of
using forgotten pop oldies as a soundtrack, shuffling scenes
out of chronological order, and inserting plot-unrelated
conversations about pop culture, are also repeated.
Although "Pulp Fiction" was too controversial for the
staid Academy, it won the Oscar for Best Original Screenplay
(Tarantino and Roger Avary).  Tarantino was nominated for
Best Director and Best Picture, while Jackson and Thurman
picked up Supporting nominations.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Woodstock (1970)
In 1969, Woodstock, New York, was the site of rock
and roll's most famous music festival.  The massive,
three day concert was declared a national disaster
area when 400,000 people descended on the site.
There was a lack of food, water, and shelter.
Heavy rains made the concert a mudbath.
Transportation was impossible: with the roads snarled
for miles, the bands were flown in by helicopter.
But Woodstock is remembered for its positive aspects.
Many of the top acts of the day performed there,
and despite the difficulties faced by the massive
crowds, there was no hint of violence.  This lengthy
documentary (nearly four hours) captures the fleeting
moment in American history when hippies were the
dominant subculture.
Much of the documentary is concert footage.  The
acts vary in both style and quality.  Legendary British
group The Who are the loudest.  Pete Townshend closes
their set by throwing his guitar into the audience.
John Sebastian, former lead singer of the Lovin' Spoonful,
is the wimpiest.  There's Crosby Stills & Nash in
their second gig, and blues screecher Janis Joplin and
guitar god Jimi Hendrix a year before their drug
overdose deaths.  (The lead singer of Canned Heat,
another Woodstock performer, would also soon die of a
drug overdose).
One has to suffer Joan Baez's martyrizing her
imprisoned husband, and also her relentless vocal
trilling.  Jefferson Airplane (a hippie band if ever
there was one) is a bit disappointing, but white
blues singer Joe Cocker is awesome (those are
guys doing the backing vocals?).  Sly and the Family
Stone, perhaps the best band at Woodstock, mix rock
and soul into a formidable rhythm section.  Santana
makes an early career appearance, with Carlos Santana
competing with Alvin Lee of Ten Years After for the speed
guitarist award.  Hendrix is less interested in speed
than in feedback, which he uses to create a wild wah-wah
version of the national anthem.  But Hendrix performs
to only a handful: he arrived late to Woodstock,
and the crowds have vanished, leaving a mountain of
litter behind.
All I can ask is, where is Creedence Clearwater Revival?
One of the top bands of 1969, they appear in the credits
but are nowhere in the soundtrack.  Did the cameramen
snooze through their set?  Perhaps they were roaming the
grounds; the concert scenes are mixed with scenes of
hippies bathing naked, nursing their infant babies, and
standing in line to call their parents on pay phones.
Some of these parents are interviewed: some are sympathetic
with the polite, peaceful hippies, while others consider
them to be trespassers and animals.  There is an announcement
from the stage that the brown acid is bad.  The film also
conducts the first interview of somebody exiting a portable
outhouse: 'How were the facilities?' 'Sure beats the
woods, man!'
The editing is sometimes sloppy, and the cinematography
is overly fond of split screens and extreme close ups
(Stephen Stills has bad teeth).  But the documentary
deserves its registry in the Library of Congress; not
just for the great rock performances, but because it
best captures the brief era of flower power.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Tree Grows in Brooklyn, A (1945)
"A Tree Grows in Brooklyn" may be the greatest of
all tear-jerkers.  "Schindler's List", it is true,
can bring out the tears.  But if you have a predeliction
for crying, nothing will do the trick for you like
this film will.  Its emotional impact on the viewer
is strong, because the script and the performances
bond us to the characters and their struggles.
Dorothy McGuire stars as Katie Nolan, mother of
earnest young teenager Francie (Peggy Ann Garner) and
streetwise pre-teenage Neeley (Ted Donaldson).
McGuire's husband is charming dreamer James Dunn,
whose drinking and inability to find steady
work condemn his family to poverty.  Their free
spirited, oft-married Aunt Sissy (Joan Blondell)
is an occasional visitor.  The story takes place
around 1900, in a Brooklyn tenement.
If one tries hard, it is possible to criticize
"A Tree Grows in Brooklyn".  At age 27, McGuire was
too young to be ideally cast as Garner's mother
or Dunn's wife.  She keeps her splendid figure
both during and immediately after her pregnancy.
Blondell's problems vanish too readily as the
story progresses.  Donaldson's character is subtly
shunted aside in preference to Garner.  Although
the family is quite poor, they seem to live in
a nice neighborhood.  All of these weaknesses
are trivial, due to straightforward direction by
Kazan, and the extremely high quality of the script.
"A Tree Grows in Brooklyn" marked a comeback for
James Dunn, whose performance won the Oscar for
Best Supporting Actor.  Dunn's career flourished
in the mid 1930s, often co-starring with Shirley
Temple as an attentive father figure.  He soon
developed a reputation for drinking, and his
soft personality did not make for easy casting.
His role in this film seems tailor-made.  It would
not be as great a film with someone else playing
the part.
"A Tree Grows in Brooklyn" was Elia Kazan's first
film.  It remains his best film, although subsequent
titles such as "A Streetcar Named Desire" and "On the
Waterfront" are more famous today.  It is an adaptation
of the Betty Smith novel.  The screenplay was credited
to Tess Slesinger and Frank Davis, who received an
Oscar nomination for Best Adapted Screenplay.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for I Am a Fugitive from a Chain Gang (1932)
I Am a Fugitive from a Chain Gang (1932)
"I Am a Fugitive" is an action-packed, sensationalist
film that succeeds in conveying a mood of urgency and
desperation.  While entertaining, and effective at
depicting the terror of (some) prison work camps,
the direction is too campy and excited, and the film
loses credibility along the way.
Paul Muni is a war hero and factory laborer who
quits his dull job to seek construction work.  Unable
to get another job, he becomes a flophouse bum.
Forced into participating in a holdup, he is captured
and sentenced to ten years in a Georgia chain gang.
The inmates are given bad food, beaten cruelly, and
forced to labor throughout the day without breaks.
Muni manages to escape, flees to Chicago, and builds
a new life for himself.  However, he is blackmailed into
marriage by a good-for-nothing (Glenda Farrell) who
knows his secret.  When he decides to dump Farrell
for perfect woman Helen Vinson, Farrell informs.
Rather than fighting extradition, Muni stupidly agrees
to return to Georgia, and is again put to work in
a miserable prison camp.
"I Am a Fugitive" was based on the 1932 novel by
Robert E. Burns, apparently rushed to the screen.
Director Mervyn LeRoy could crank them out in a hurry.
The IMDB credits him with 22 films during the years
1930 through 1933, most notably "Little Caesar" from
1930.
"I Am a Fugitive" drew nominations for Best Picture
and Best Actor (Muni).  Muni's gives a hammy and excited
performance, undoubtedly prompted by the director.
Muni's closing line, "I steal!", intended to shock the
audience, is actually humorous instead.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Foxes, The (1941)
"The Little Foxes" was nominated for nine Academy Awards,
including Best Picture, Best Director (William Wyler), 
Best Screenplay (Lillian Hellman), Best Editing, plus Best 
Actress for Bette Davis.  It didn't win a single award.
"The Little Foxes" takes place in the deep South
around 1900.  Regina (Bette Davis), her oily brother Ben
(Charles Dingle), and her greedy brother Oscar
are partners in a plan to build a factory that
will exploit the area's poor menial workers.
Ben and Oscar have their share, but Regina must
convince her sick husband Horace (Herbert Marshall)
to put up her share.  But Horace disapproves of both the
project and his wife.
There is a subplot involving Davis' daughter Alexandra
(Theresa Wright, in her film debut).  Oscar wants her to 
marry his good-for-nothing son Leo (Dan Duryea) while she
prefers the clever newspaper writer David Hewitt.
There are many good things to say about this film.
The cinematography, the sets, the costumes, and the
cast are all excellent.
But, there are problems.  The most obvious is the
film's racism.  Blacks are shown performing all the
menial labor.  They are portrayed as docile and obliging
with the minds of children.
Most of the film's protaganists aren't very likable,
either.  Davis' character is even more rude and selfish
than usual, while Ben is grasping and Oscar is brutal.
Poor Dan Duryea is again cast as a creep.  All lack any 
sense of morality.  Wright's character is sugar-sweet
despite living with her insulting mother, while her
boyfriend has no accent, and seems a more energetic
clone of her father.  The film's good-versus-evil theme 
is overplayed as well.
In one scene I disliked, Leo makes an insulting remark to 
David, who slaps him several times.  Leo finally lunges
half-heartedly at David, who punches Leo, knocking him
to the ground.  The audience is supposed to cheer for
defender-of-virtue David, but ends up wondering why Leo
is such a poor fighter.
Another silly scene has the dying Horace trying to make
it up the stairs to his medicine bottle.  He stumbles,
rises, grabs the banister, etc.  He does everything but
knock the bookcase over and tear down some curtains.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Longest Day, The (1962)
Although Vietnam War movies have been more popular since the
late 1970s, for three decades it seemed that the stream of
World War II movies from Hollywood would never run dry.
These films were very different from their later, more
disillusioned counterparts: the U.S. were the good guys,
fighting the evil Nazis and despotic Japanese.
The films about WWII began even as the war was still in progress,
as Hollywood promoted the war effort by portraying the simple
G.I. as a hero, risking life and limb for American Liberty.
This idealization succeeded because it was in fact correct:
there was no war that justified American intervention more
then WWII.  While the theme of most war movies should be to
condemn the useless slaughter, with WWII the themes of good
versus evil actually seem valid.
"The Longest Day" was a mammoth project dramatizing D-day,
the Allied invasion of France.  It was nearly three hours
in length and with an enormous ensemble cast, all playing
supporting roles.  The production was very conscientious
about realism: the actors were always of the same nationality
as their characters, and spoke in their native languages,
leading to a lot of subtitles translating French and German
dialogue.  The American role in the invasion is not exaggerated,
and the German soldiers and officers are not portrayed
as brutal stereotypes.
The truth is, a great invasion makes for great drama, and
with the attention to detail and production values of
"The Longest Day", the film couldn't miss.  Complaints that
I have about the film are minor: strafing planes don't bother
to make a second pass, it is implied that the Germans lost the
war because unstable Hitler wouldn't release the Panzer tanks,
and attempts at comic relief generally fall flat.
The cast is so enormous that it is difficult to remember who
is what.  But it is fun playing "name the actor": heavyweights
John Wayne, Robert Mitchum, Richard Burton, Sean Connery,
Rod Steiger and Henry Fonda are easily spotted, as are
middleweights such as Eddie Albert, Red Buttons, Roddy McDowell,
Peter Lawford, George Segal and Jeffrey Hunter.  For some reason,
a number of U.S. pop singers and teen idols were cast: Paul Anka,
Fabian, Tommy Sands, and Sal Mineo.
John Wayne and Henry Fonda would later have key roles in
bloated war movies that were not successful, ("The Green Berets"
and "Midway" respectively) demonstrating that the drama of
war does not always come across on film.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Grapes of Wrath, The (1940)
"The Grapes of Wrath" tells the story of the Joads,
a displaced Oklahoman sharecropper family, and one of
many forced to abandon their lands due to the Dust Bowl
and the Great Depression.  Based on the Pulitzer Prize
winning novel by John Steinbeck, the film succeeds in
depicting the poverty, to the extent of starvation, of
the homeless Okies.  There are other messages as well:
the difficulty in maintaining a family in the face of
adversity, the low value placed on the lives of migrant
farm workers, and the injustices of the capitalist
system.
Let me explain that last remark.  "The Grapes of Wrath"
is a pro-socialist film.  Socialism was at its zenith
during the Great Depression, when it seemed that capitalism
may have failed.  Franklin Roosevelt was a socialist
President, and the poor saw Big Government as a lifeline
from their jobless despair.  "The Grapes of Wrath"
condemns the faceless banks for foreclosing on the Okies,
the agricultural growers for cheating their low-paid
workers, and local police forces for their brutality
and affiliation with the capitalists.  When the Joads
finally arrive at a Government-run camp, it is as if
they have reached heaven.
Fresh from his success with "Stagecoach", John Ford
directed "The Grapes of Wrath", and almost deserved his
Best Director Academy Award (I think Hitchcock should
have won for "Rebecca").  The black and white cinematography
by Gregg Toland is excellent, with extraordinary footage
of the deep poverty of the migrant worker camps.
Henry Fonda stars as Tom Joad, a hot-tempered ex-con
who returns to his family just in time to join it on
a desperate job-hunting expedition to California.
Jane Darwell gives an excellent performance as his
mother, who tries to hold the dissolving family together
as matters go from bad to worse.  John Carradine
plays a colorful, half-mad preacher.
Fonda was nominated for Best Actor, and Darwell won
Best Supporting Actress.  "The Grapes of Wrath" was
nominated for Best Picture, and Nunnally Johnson was
nominated for Best Screenplay.  Johnson did a
reasonable job in distilling the lengthy novel into
a filmable version, changing the ending and jumbling
the chronology to soften the novel's pessimistic message.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for I Was a Male War Bride (1949)
Cary Grant had to undergo various humiliations in many
of his comedies.  In "Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream
House (1948)" he lurches from one disaster to another.
But the worst was yet to come.  In his next film,
"I Was a Male War Bride", he is a victim of multiple
physical gags, is repeatedly forced to sleep in
uncomfortable environments, and worst of all, must
dress up as a woman in order to board a ship.
Grant is a French Army officer (with no French accent)
who keeps getting assigned to work with American officer
Ann Sheridan.  Disguising their real feelings, they pretend
to dislike each other, leading to much insulting and
entertaining dialogue.  While working on a mission
to recruit a German lens-grinder, Grant gets into and
out of trouble, getting arrested, having a motorcycle
accident, etc.
Sheridan, a secret masochist, greatly enjoys Grant's
humiliations, some of which she actually instigates.
Eventually the two recognize their true feelings, and
get married.  But when Sheridan must return to the States,
Grant as an alien has only one recourse to return with her:
as Sheridan's war bride.
"I Was a Male War Bride" was the third of four comedies
starring Cary Grant that were directed by Howard Hawks.
All four films (the others were "Bringing Up Baby",
"His Girl Friday" and "Monkey Business") are excellent.
All but "Bringing Up Baby" had scripts credited to
Charles Lederer, whose talents never succeeded in
getting an Oscar nomination.  That's the trouble with
writing comedies, they're not taken seriously!
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Prime of Miss Jean Brodie, The (1969)
"The Prime of Miss Jean Brodie" is a very good
film with an excellent script.  It may be a tough
sitting for those who prefer action flicks or
comedies, but those interesting in dialogue and
character studies will enjoy it.
The film takes place in Edinburgh, England in 1932.
Jean Brodie (Maggie Smith) is a history teacher at
a private school for girls.  Her romantic liasons
with passionate art teacher Teddy (Robert Stephens)
and a well-intentioned music teacher (Gordon Jackson),
as well as her radical pro-fascist political views,
put her at odds with the formidable, conservative
headmaster (Celia Johnson).  But Brodie remains popular
with the girls in her class, especially insightful Sandy
(Pamela Franklin), stammering Mary (Jane Carr), and
serene beauty Jenny (Diane Grayson).
Vanessa Redgrave had played Brodie in the stage
production, and was originally cast in the role.
However, she was unavailable when the film production
began.  Maggie Smith took the part and won the Oscar for
Best Actress for her performance.  Celia Johnson won
Best Supporting Actress in the British Academy Awards.
The major strength of "The Prime of Miss Jean Brodie"
comes from the script, which is excellent.  The dialogue
provides great depth and credibility to the major characters,
and the direction by Ronald Neame is careful to show the
facial reactions of the characters to key lines.
The syrupy, string-laden Rod McKuen theme is the film's
most obvious weakness.  One minor complaint: it is
difficult to believe that a painter can't avoid putting
his lover's face in every portrait.  Also, the affair
between Teddy and Sandy is given slight treatment, and
you would think that Brodie would be furious rather than
merely stunned upon her betrayal.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Tokyo orimpikku (1965)
The Summer Olympics were held in Tokyo in 1964,
the first time that the games were hosted in
Asia.  "Tokyo Olympiad" is an excellent
documentary of the '64 games, with the focus
on cinematography over narration.
Director Kon Ichikawa has no interest in
counting gold medals.  Watching this film
will not tell you whether the U.S. or the
U.S.S.R. won the most medals.  Ichikawa also
makes little use of human interest stories.
We learn that the Ethiopian who won the
marathon had his appendix removed the month
before.  We briefly follow the story of an
obscure athlete from Chad, a country
participating in their first Olympics with
only two athletes in their delegation.
That's about it for human interest, which is
a fixation for American broadcast journalists
during the games.  Another surprise is the
disinterest in men's basketball, which
receives about two seconds of coverage, the
same as the water polo final.
The final surprise, at least for me, is
that Germany competed as a single team.
Given the virility of the cold war during
the previous four years (the Berlin Wall,
the Berlin airlift, the Cuban Missle crisis,
the Bay of Pigs) it must have been inspiring
for Germans to see athletics overcoming
politics.
The cinematography is outstanding.  There are
many close-ups and slow-mo shots of athletes
in action.  The camera captures the emotions
of the competitors, from the tension before
an event to the joy, exhaustion, and/or
disappointment that follows.  The narration
is in Japanese of course, with partial subtitles
in English.  Being unable to understand the
occasional jabbering may actually be a plus,
as the viewer can concentrate on the photography.
Some of the athletes became famous, like
sprinter Bob Hayes or boxer Joe Frazier.
But even the gold medal winners are mostly
obscure today, their fleeting moment of
glory captured in time but now forgotten.
"Tokyo Olympiad" is nearly three hours long,
but the documentary never drags.  It was
distributed in America in a heavily edited
version with insipid dubbed narration, but
now the original is available again.  "Chariots
of Fire" has the reputation of being the best
film about the Olympics.  But "Tokyo Olympiad"
is easily the better film.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Music Man, The (1962)
"The Music Man" is a spectacular, big budget production
of the hit Broadway musical, with Robert Preston reprising
the lead role.  The film was also a great commercial
success.  Seen today, "The Music Man" remains entertaining,
with good choreography, sets, and costumes, and a fine
performance by Preston.
The story has travelling salesman 'Professor' Hill
(Preston) arriving in a small town in Iowa in 1912.
Hill, who is a fast-talking con artist, quickly sells
the town on the idea of a children's marching band,
complete with instruments, costumes and training,
all of which is to be supplied by Hill.  The garrulous
mayor (Paul Ford) and the spinster librarian/piano
teacher Marion Paroo (Shirley Jones) suspect Hill,
but are unable to pin him down.  Hill's assistant
is local resident Washburn (Buddy Hackett), while
Paroo's much younger brother is withdrawn, lisping
Winthrop (Ron Howard).
"The Music Man" is 151 minutes long, and its length
shows.  Some of the lesser musical numbers, such as
"Shipoopi", could have been removed.  Preston's
gutteral growls are more appealing than Jones'
sub-soprano warbling, and the ensemble-sung
numbers are predictably flat.  Still, Preston
is a dynamic entertainer, and everything comes
together for "Marian The Librarian" and the opening
number syncopated with the train's rhythm on the
rails.
The problems with musicals are that the songs tend
to reduce the dramatic tension, distract from the
storyline, and force a simplification to the characters
and plot to make room for the production numbers.
Of course, there have been great musicals, in which
the songs add to the characters and story, and the
script is more than a loose means of tying the
different songs together.  "The Music Man" falls
in between; "Sadder But Wiser Girl For Me" is forced
into the story, while "76 Trombones" extends it.
"Goodnight, My Someone" is a snoozer, but "Gary, Indiana"
is a charmer.
Preston's Hill is an excellent, fully developed
character.  The town council, formed into a barber
shop quartet by Hill, works well.  Less successful
is the silly 'rebellious' teen (Timmy Everett) and
the depiction of every middle-aged woman besides
Jones' mother as affected, eccentric, clucking hens.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Laura (1944)
"Laura" is a highly entertaining murder mystery.  Well directed
and scripted, with several surprise plot twists, it rarely
drags, and survives many improbable sequences.
Laura (Gene Tierney) is an attractive, successful young woman 
who has been murdered.  The primary suspects are her suitors: 
conceited, sneering columnist Clifton WebbX and opportunistic 
ladies man Vincent Price.  Dana Andrews plays the police detective
who becomes obsessed with solving the case.  Further complicating 
matters, Price has two other girlfriends, and, well...
better not say anymore!
After seeing Price ham it up in endless horror movies, he
appears miscast playing a hearthrob.  It must be remembered
that audiences in 1944 had never seen him in any of those
movies.  Still, with unmistakable affected voice and manner,
it is difficult to believe two lovely models and a wealthy
spinster would be falling all over him, despite their better
judgement.
Clifton Webb's character is the most interesting.  Considered 
a great wit, he is in fact insecure and frail.  He is fixated 
with keeping Tierney as a potential girlfriend, never admitting
to himself that he is too old for her and she will sooner or
later take someone else.  Still, he hangs about her, shooing
off paramours, and if one lingers, pries into his affairs
for dirt to prove him unworthy of her.  All his fame and success
means nothing to him, and he will throw it all away if he
can't have her.  He gets more screen time than anyone, but
only has third billing.  I guess movie audiences would rather
see Tierney and Andrews, who are more physically attractive.
There are many silly moments in "Laura".  In no manner should
this movie's plot be compared with an actual murder investigation.
But if the characters don't behave like real people would in
their situations, they do behave consistently.  And they
are all very entertaining.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Day at the Races, A (1937)
"A Day at the Races" was the Marx Brothers seventh
film, and the follow-up to their most successful
film, "A Night at the Opera".  Much of the cast
from "Opera" returns.  The formula of mixing
comedy skits with a few musical numbers and
a romance is repeated.
Margaret Dumont again plays a wealthy woman
cynically romanced by Groucho.  Dumont is the
star patient at a struggling hospital.  Groucho
Marx is a horse doctor who has conned his way into
being chief of staff.  The hospital is owned by
lovely Maureen O'Sullivan (not to be confused with
Maureen O'Hara or Margaret Sullivan), who is
romanced by tenor Allan Jones, who owns a race
horse named Hi Hat, whose jocky is Harpo Marx.
Sig Ruman, the comic foil from "Opera", shows
up as a pompous doctor.  He is the subject of
one of Groucho's best one-liners, "Don't point
that beard at me, it might go off!"
The skits are inconsistent in quality.  Groucho
buys a stack of books from Chico, and it isn't
that funny.  When Groucho fakes a long distance
phone call from Leonard Ceeley to Florida, it
is funny.  When the Marx Brothers turn a medical
examination into chaos, it is very funny.
As in "Opera", there are some unnecessary musical
numbers.  Jones may be a fine tenor, but his
songs are empty.  The big production number
featuring dancer Vivien Fay is out of place.
Chico and Harpo take turns on a piano, with Chico
showing greater skill.  Harpo plays the harp, but
it isn't funny and never will be.  One musical
sequence is almost surreal: Harpo plays Pied Piper
for about fifty blacks, who dance and sing with
much greater energy than their white counterparts.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Innocents, The (1961)
"The Innocents" is an excellent ghost story, set
in Victorian-era England.  The script, based on the
Henry James novel 'The Turn of the Screw', is first
rate, as is the direction and casting.  Child actors
Martin Stephens and Pamela Franklin give performances
far better than could be expected, and the plot has
much drama and suspense.
The story has indifferent playboy Michael Redgrave
hiring first-time governess Deborah Kerr to care for
his orphaned cousins Flora (Franklin) and Miles (Stephens).
Upon arrival at the large, wealthy estate and mansion,
Kerr finds the children to be both happy and friendly.
But she is troubled by what she considers to be
sinister aspects to their personalities.
Kerr is startled but not intimidated by apparitions.
These ghosts resemble descriptions by housekeeper
Megs Jenkins of the former governess and valet, who
had a twisted affair and died violently.  Kerr believes
that these evil spirits are possessing the souls of the
children, and takes upon herself the task of exorcising
them.
Screenwriters William Archibald and Truman Capote no
doubt enjoyed adding creepy touches to the children's
dialogue (e.g. Flora delightedly tells Kerr: "Look!
A spider is eating a butterfly!") and in making the
ever-saintly Kerr appear to be losing her sanity.
Kerr's lack of assurance in the film's early stages
doesn't jive with her later strong will to confront
the spirits.  Jenkins' character concedes the children's
possession but disagrees with Kerr's confrontational
methods for helping them.
"The Innocents" was unjustly ignored by Oscar, but it was
awarded Best British Film by the British Academy Awards.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Princess, The (1939)
"The Little Princess" was Shirley Temple's first
technicolor production, and was her last successful
film as a child actress.  It is probably her
best film, edging "Wee Willie Winkie" for the
honor.  The enduring quality of the story is
evident by a recent version, "A Little Princess"
from 1995, which is even better than this 1939
version.
"The Little Princess" is based on the novel by
Frances Hodgson Burnett.  Set in Victorian
England during the Boer war, Temple is placed
in a luxurious girl's boarding school by her
doting father (Ian Hunter), who is to serve in
the war.  Temple, aided by her charm and father's
wealth, soon becomes the most popular girl in
the school, earning the enmity of classmate
Marcia Mae Jones.  Temple aids a romance between
implausibly idealized teachers Richard Greene and
Anita Louise.
But after her father is reported killed, and
his wealth confiscated, Temple can no longer pay
for her schooling.  Harsh headmistress Mary Nash
turns Temple into a servant, and her only friends
are an Indian servant neighbor (Cesar Romero),
comic relief and dance partner Arthur Treacher,
and fellow servant Sybil Jason.
Although the film clocks in at only 91 minutes,
there is room for three short Temple dance
numbers.  Temple's character is a supposedly a
British-born girl raised in India, but in fact
she is again playing herself.  Which she does
well: Temple has a winning positive attitude,
and she is eager to please.  Unlike most child
actors, she is completely natural in front of
the camera.  It can be argued that Temple was
the most successful of all child actors, although
Ron Howard and Macauley Caulkin had their day.
Temple was credited with saving Twentieth Century
Fox from bankruptcy, although the studio dumped
her after "The Blue Bird" laid an egg.
Romero's ingratiating Indian servant lacks the
magical powers of his counterpart in the 1995
film.  But Romero still gives a fine performance,
as he did in the 1937 Shirley Temple vehicle
"Wee Willie Winkie."  Romero is probably best
known today for playing the Joker character
in the 1960s Batman TV series.
Even Temple's best films are not taken seriously
today, probably because their target audience
was little girls (of all ages), rather than men.
Still, "The Little Princess" is better than most
if not all of the James Bond films, demonstrating
that warmth and charm compete well with dramatic
tension and action.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Brigadoon (1954)
"Brigadoon" has a few things going for it:
Gene Kelly, and an engaging story.  But sluggish
musical numbers and a lack of comic relief
keep the production from fully taking off.
"Brigadoon" stars Kelly and Van Johnson as
American tourists in Scotland, hunting grouse.
They become lost, and stumble upon a quaint
village.  This village exists for only day
every century.  Kelly falls for Cyd Charisse,
who has poise but little warmth.  Barry Jones
lands a plum role as the brogue-speaking village
elder Mr. Lundie (perhaps Barry Fitzgerald
wasn't available).  Meanwhile, love-spurned
villager Hugh Laing threatens to spoil everyone's
fantasy by leaving the village.
Director Vincente Minnelli contrasts the alleged
charm of Brigadoon with the cynical, phony lifestyle
of New York's privileged set.  Returning to
New York, Kelly becomes a space cadet dreaming
of Brigadoon, while alcoholic Johnson is somehow
racked with guilt for accidentally shooting a man
and thereby saving an entire town.  This leads
inevitably to happy ending, at least for Kelly,
although Johnson may have some explaining to do
to the Police about what has happened to his friend.
All mocking aside, the concept of Brigadoon's centennial
visit is a charming one.  The script is good, and the
sets, while phony, ("Brigadoon" was filmed in Hollywood)
are meticulous.  The limiting factor for the film is
the musical numbers, with their lumbering choreography and
ensemble choruses.  The resulting feeling is not a
visit to the Scottish highlands, but rather using a ticket
to a Broadway musical.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for This Is Elvis (1981)
Released some five years after his death, "This is Elvis"
attempts to explain the rise and fall of Elvis Presley.
Part documentary and part dramatization, actual footage
of Elvis (from home movies, press conferences, and
performances) is mixed with re-enactments featuring
four actors portraying Elvis at various ages.  (One of
them, Johnny Harra, was a professional Elvis imitator.)
The Elvisian narration was by Ray Donner, who in 1961
had a top twenty pop hit covering Elvis' "The Girl of My
Best Friend".
Presley was born Southern 'white trash'.  A powerful,
emotive singer with good looks, he was became by far
the most successful recording artist of the 1950s.
A stint in the Army changed his image from dangerous
rebel to mainstream entertainer.  He starred in a series
of movies that became worse and worse, then resurrected
his career with a television special leading to a
series of concert tours.  He married and divorced
Priscilla Presley.  His health deteriorated, perhaps
due to his ballooning waistline and addiction to
prescription pills.  He died at age 42.  He remains
famous today, not so much for his performances, but
for the tragedy of his late career.
"This is Elvis" achieves its ambitious goal of covering
the whole of Elvis' career, with the dramatic recreations
plausibly explaining how he felt at each turn.  The
film does not shy from exploring Elvis' weaknesses:
his philandering, his insecurity, vanity and reclusiveness,
and his decline into an overweight, confused pill junkie.
If anything, the negative is stressed too strongly.
While his cultural impact comes across, as does his
ability as an entertainer, this film will not in itself
convince anybody that Elvis was the greatest American
singer (which he probably was).  Also, the frequent
interchanging of fake and real Elvii becomes distracting.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for You Never Can Tell (1951)
"You Never Can Tell" is a real sleeper: a comedy
and fantasy that has no business being a very
good film, but is anyway.  The silly premise
belies the quality of the script and direction,
and the cast is likable.
A wealthy patriarch has died, and left his
fortune to his German Shephard, King.  King's
master is Peggy Dow, next in line to inherit
the estate.  Charles Drake is Dow's fiance,
who poisons the dog.  King goes to Animal Heaven,
and petitions the Animal King to return to
earth for vengeance.
King returns as detective Dick Powell, with
sidekick (and former horse) Joyce Holden.
Powell played many private eyes during his
acting career, but this character has to be
his silliest.  Powell often growls, howls,
scratches himself, eats doggie snacks, etc.
His eccentricities and confrontations with
Drake get Powell in trouble with the police.
Most of the humor is subtle, but there is
one sidesplitting scene.  The police bug
Powell's office, and huddle together to
eavesdrop.  Powell and Holden discuss their
former lives as animals, to the astonishment
of the policemen.
Of course, "You Never Can Tell" has some
flaws.  Dow's grandfather (Albert Sharpe) is
too ridiculous a character for even this film.
Drake is competent, but too much of a straight
man.  The certainty of a happy ending robs the
film of any real suspense.  Still, whodathunkit,
this is a minor Hollywood project that is
much better than expected.
1951 would prove to be the final year of
Peggy Dow's film career.  That year, she
married and retired from show business.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Anna and the King of Siam (1946)
It is impossible to avoid comparing "Anna and
the King of Siam" to the 1956 musical adaptation
"The King and I".  The latter, of course, was
even more successful, with Yul Brynner ideally
suited to play the king.  But the 1946 version
has several advantages over its more colorful
successor.
The absence of all the musical numbers allows
for a more dense script, creating deeper characters
and a more involving plot.  Aiming at a more
mature audience, "Anna" is more grim.  Two
important supporting characters that survive in
the 1956 film are killed off here (one is even
burned at the stake, and her final shrieking can
be heard).  Anna (Irene Dunne) is also more capable
of tears and is less smug than her Deborah Kerr
counterpart.  Filmed in black and white, "Anna"
can't compete with the rich colors of the musical,
but that did not prevent the film from winning
an Oscar for cinematographer Arthur Miller.
One problem that both films have is the casting
of occidentals in oriental roles.  But if not well
cast, it is a very good cast.  Rex Harrison,
making his American film debut as the Siamese king,
is both sympathetic and humorous.  Irene Dunne,
looking much younger than her 48 years, plays the
stubborn, proper schoolteacher well.  Lee J. Cobb,
as the stolid minister Kralahome, is his usual
competent self.
The story is based on the true story of Anna
Leonowens, a widowed teacher who travels to Siam
(modern-day Thailand) in 1862 to tutor the King's
children.  She is shocked by the King's extensive
harem and his arbitrary, sometimes even barbaric
ways.  She is also angry at being forced to live
in the palace instead of being given a house of her
own.  But she remains, not only as tutor to the
King's many children and wives, but also as an
advisor to the King himself.  The King's confusion
about Western ways provides much comic relief.
"Anna" was nominated for five Academy Awards,
winning two, for cinematography and sets.
Noted composer Bernard Herrman was nominated for
his score, and the Sally Benson-Talbot Jennings
screenplay was nominated.  Gale Sondergaard,
whose character Tuptin varies wildly from haughty
to impassioned, was nominated for Best Supporting
Actress.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Now, Voyager (1942)
"Now, Voyager" is a very good romance film.
The script, cast and direction is excellent,
and if the story is a bit dramatic at times,
it does succeed in maintaining interest.
It is probably true that women will enjoy
the film more than men, but "Now, Voyager"
is good enough to merit viewing by anyone.
Bette Davis plays the emotionally repressed
daughter of a wealthy elderly matriarch
(Gladys Cooper).  Cooper's cruelty and strict
upbringing results in Davis going to a sanitarium.
Separated from her mother and treated by a doctor
(Claude Rains), Davis begins an integration into the
real world, soon starting a romance with
unhappily married Paul Henreid.  Davis suddenly
becomes extroverted and popular.
Davis returns home, and begins a battle of wills
with her mother, who wants her to return to her
role as servant and repressed spinster.  Davis
romances wealthy socialite John Loder, but of
course is still in love with Henreid.  Later, she
practically adopts Henreid's withdrawn daughter
(Janis Wilson), whom she identifies with.
"Now, Voyager" has some flaws.  Davis' character
is supposed to be overweight in the first part of
the film, but she is her usual rail-thin self.
Davis' off-camera transformation from sulking loner
to glib socialite comes too quickly and easily.
The mother's sudden death from an argument with
Davis is a plot contrivance.  She is emotionally
too thick-skinned to be devastated by anything
that Davis would say.
Still, "Now, Voyager" (the title comes from a Walt
Whitman poem) is a very good movie.  Davis is
very good, and it helps that her character has
depth and, unlike many of her later film roles,
does not have "evil" characteristics.  Wilson is
excellent as the troubled daughter, and Rains makes
the most of his minor supporting role.  Davis and
Cooper were nominated for Academy Awards.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sexecutioner (1998)
Like several other cable channels, Cinemax
shows soft porn films late at night.
As you would expect, most of these aren't
very good.  Made quickly with a low budget,
acting, script, story and sets are secondary
to presenting erotic cinematography featuring
the bodies of some very beautiful women.
"Sexecutioner", at first glance, seems
like just another one of these male fantasy
skin flicks, which hardly anybody bothers
to see from beginning to end.  (They come
in the middle, so to speak.)  The cast is
full of no-names.  The plot is ridiculous
and seems fabricated to throw in lengthy
gratuitous sex scenes.  There's some
occasional bad acting here as well.
The 'story' has Mr. X taking a gig as
executioner for a California penitentiary.
X is dressed from head to toe in a black
robe, with only eyes showing.  Before
throwing the switch to the electric chair,
X insists on spending some quality time
alone with the doomed death row inmates.
At which time, it is revealed that Mr. X
is actually Alexandra (Jennifer Thomas),
a beautiful woman who proceeds to tease
and torture the convicts.  These include
mass murderer Melnick (Robert M. Shaw,
who gives the best performance), cannibal
Decker (Kenny McCabe) and fiance Swanson
(C. Johnston).  There's also subplots
involving the publicity-hungry warden
(Skip Dumas), and his guards, drunken
Hank (Bob Cain) and single mother Wanda
(Loryn Miller).  Jamaica Charley has a
good cameo as an erotic dancer.
But besides the obvious quality of the
writhing bodies of the female leads,
there's something else that's good about
the obscure soft porn film "Sexecutioner".
It's the writing and direction served
up by J.T. Finch, who throws in plenty
of cynical, black humor.  And while the
sex scenes generally detract from the
film's momentum, there is at least an
attempt to incorporate them within
the plot.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Sabrina (1954)
Audrey Hepburn was the daughter of a Dutch
baroness, and had youth, beauty, charm and an
exquisite accent.  Since she could play the
vulnerable innocent as well, she was perfectly
suited for Cinderella-type roles.
Hepburn had a star-making role in 1953's "Roman
Holiday", in which she played a princess who
pretended to be a commoner.  In her next film,
"Sabrina", she plays a chauffeur's daughter who
blossomes into a lady.  The theme of changing her
social class would be used once again in her most
successful film, "My Fair Lady".
While Hepburn was well-cast for "Sabrina", she
was given two unlikely love interests.  William
Holden, at 36, was only a little too old for his
role, as was the case for an earlier film also
directed by Billy Wilder, "Sunset Boulevard".
But Humphrey Bogart was 55, a full thirty years
older than Hepburn.  Also, "Sabrina" was
something of a comedy, and Holden and Bogart were
not known as comedic actors.
Nonetheless, "Sabrina" was a great critical and
commercial success, cementing the reputations of
Wilder, Hepburn, and Bogart.  The film was
nominated for six Academy Awards, including Best
Actress (Hepburn), Best Director (Wilder), Best
Screenplay (Wilder, Samuel Taylor, and Ernest
Lehman), and Best B & W Cinematography (Charles
Lang Jr).
Bogart and Holden play brothers who have vastly
different personalities.  Linus (Bogart) has
never married and lives for work, controlling the
business empire that was founded by his father,
Oliver (Walter Hampden).  David (Holden) is a
playboy who cares nothing for work and has gone
through several marriages.
Sabrina (Hepburn) is the daughter of a chauffeur
(John Williams) employed by the wealthy family.
Sabrina pines for David, who initially shows no
interest in her.  Sabrina is exiled to France,
where she adopts the dress and manner of a lady.
Meanwhile, David has become engaged to the
daughter of an industrial magnate.  Linus is
depending upon the marriage, as it is a
precondition of a favorable business merger.
Sabrina returns home, and catches David's eye.
To prevent the merger from falling through, Linus
begins courting Sabrina, trying to win her from
David.
Many comic touches don't quite work.  David sits
on champagne glasses.  Linus puches David,
sending him rolling across a table (and somehow
coming up smiling).  It isn't explained why
Sabrina would fall for Linus, unless money truly
can buy love.  Holden is transfixed by Sabrina,
but then is happy to pawn her off on Linus.
There is some confusion about Oliver's character,
who sneaks drinks and smokes like a schoolboy,
yet can give a stern lecture to David.  The
problems with the characters are mitigated,
however, by the graceful performances of Hepburn
and Bogart.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Mousey (1974) (TV)
"Mousey" is a humble and obscure made-for-TV movie, but it is 
surprisingly tough.  Most TV movies are targeted to women, and 
usually feature a heroic woman who has to overcome obstacles put 
in her path by a controlling man or a jealous woman.  "Mousey" is 
nothing like that formula, and is an interesting and intense 
character study of a disturbed and obsessed man.
The film stars Kirk Douglas, a veteran high school biology
teacher who has been stuck with the nickname Mousey by his
students.  His wife has recently left him, also taking her preteen 
son.  Douglas begins to stalk his ex-wife.  He begins to murder
strangers, having the disturbed logic that this will somehow
impress his wife.
Jean Seberg and John Vernon co-star.  It would be the last
American production for Seberg.
Douglas' character loves his ex-wife and her son, but he
loves them as possessions, not as individuals.  He believed that
his marriage was content, while his ex-wife thought it was
empty.  Mousey reacts to the loss of his family as if it were 
a loss of his property, with him having the "right" to recover
that property.
There is a lot of tension in the film, mostly generated by
Mousey's underlying pathos.  Douglas gives an excellent 
performance, never softening his vengeful character except for 
tenderness to his lost adopted son.  The lower budget is
obvious only in the hokey soundtrack.
"Mousey" shows that a film, even a made-for-TV movie, can be
successful in focusing completely on a single character, as long
as that character is deserving of such study.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Killers, The (1946)
"The Killers" is a crime drama and mystery that is
interesting and watchable.  However, the movie is
filled with tough guy characters that have no depth
and do not always come across as credible.
Burt Lancaster stars as the Swede, a washed-up
boxer who has turned to crime.  He meets femme
fatale Kitty (Ava Gardner) who further ruins his life
by sending him to prison.  Once freed, he participates
in a heist and double crosses his partners, leading
to his murder at the hands of contract killers.
These contract killers, shown at the film's beginning,
are simply not believable.  They are waiting for
Lancaster to show at a diner.  They sure keep a high
profile however, badgering the staff and customers,
when in real life they would likely wait outside in
a car.
After the hit has taken place, the local police
are incredibly indifferent, not bothering with the case.
It is up to Lancaster's life insurance company to
investigate.  This is a common theme to other 1940s
crime dramas ("Double Indemnity" comes to mind)
but in this case it is especially difficult to accept,
as the killers also threatened and tied up people
at the diner.
The film has no less than two "dying criminal confesses"
scenes.  In the first scene, the incoherent, unconscious
man just happens to mumble the exact information that
the insurance agent (Edmond O'Brien) wants to know, just at 
the time he has arrived at bedside.  The second scene
has Gardner screaming at the dying man "Kitty is innocent!"
over and over.  Show some respect for the dead, Ava.
I guess in a crime drama, both bad guys and good guys
have to be tough guys.  But with no one showing any emotion
and always wearing their poker faces, the characters become
caricatures.  Lancaster is an exception, performing his 
lovesick palooka role quite well.
Despite its weaknesses, "The Killers" is mildly entertaining.
But it does not live up to its reputation as a film nwah,
oops noir, classic.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
Why do people go to the theater in droves to see Batman movies?
None of them are particularly good, and no one expects them
to be.  Perhaps they go in order to tell their friends,
relatives and co-workers that they saw the movie.  Or maybe
they go to see the car.  As Batman himself says, chicks dig
the car.
In case the reader is a martian who is unfamiliar with
American pop culture, Batman (Val Kilmer, this time around)
is a super-hero who dresses in black leather at night to fight 
bad guys.  During the day he is Bruce Wayne, head of a 
conglomerate, and all-around good guy.
Two Face (Tommy Lee Jones, in what certainly is a change of pace
for him) is obsessed with killing Batman.  Two Face was once
a respectable man, but after exactly half his face was disfigured
with acid, somehow this made him go criminally insane.  Two Face
sets up a trap for Batman, locking him and a hapless security
guard in a metal box that fills with boiling acid and that is
attached to a helicopter flown by Two Face that crashes into
the Statue of Liberty.  Both Batman and Two Face survive.
I forget what happened to the security guard.  The Statue of
Liberty needs serious repairs.
Edward Enigma (James Carrey) works at Wayne Enterprises as
a techno-nerd engineer.  Carrey is a truly silly mad scientist
who has invented a device that steals brain waves.  Bruce Wayne
is not impressed and refuses to fund the project.
Carrey isn't happy about this.  After hours, he ties up his
unpleasant boss and puts the contraption on his head, sucking
the brain waves out of his head and into Carrey's.  The unlucky
boss is then pushed out a skyscraper window, no doubt to
the cheers of oppressed workers everywhere.
Like Two Face, Carrey is obsessed with Kilmer.  But while
Two Face wants to kill Batman, Carrey just wants to stump Wayne
with riddles.  But he is foiled, as Kilmer always figures 
them out.  This frustrates Carrey so much that he begins
to act like a fairy, dress in a green jumpsuit and call
himself the Riddler.
Every Batman film provides a new blonde girlfriend for Wayne
and/or Batman.  This time around it is Nicole Kidman's turn.
She is a psychologist who turns Wayne on with sultry looks
and psycho-babble.
Wayne takes her to the circus.  The Flying Graysons, a family
of acrobats, are performing.  Two Face steals the show, and
threatens to kill everyone unless Batman appears.  But he
only gets around to killing the acrobats, sparing on the
youngest, Dick (Chris O'Donnell).
For some reason, O'Donnell is invited to stay at the Wayne 
mansion.  He wants to split until he checks out Wayne's 
motorcycle collection.  Later, he discovers the Batmobile,
takes it for a spin, but gets into trouble fighting bad guys
decked in day-glo.  Fortunately for him, Batman arrives to
save him, and gives him a Parent-Child lecture about borrowing
the car without permission.
The Riddler and Two Face decide to team up to rule Gotham
City.  Their plan is to steal everyone's brain waves using
Carrey's contraption.  This scheme actually works, and now
Carrey is a bigger celebrity than Bruce Wayne.
Two Face again nearly succeeds in killing Batman, but this
time it is Batman's turn to be saved by O'Donnell.  This
makes O'Donnell so cocky that he decides to wear a
costume as well and call himself Robin.
Batman is about to score with Kidman when Two Face and
the Riddler break into his mansion, trashing it.  They
decide not to kill Kilmer because Carrey wants to
leave another riddle for him.  They take Kidman hostage.
Batman and Robin learn where Two Face's secret hideout
is and go there to rescue Kidman.  Robin ends up cornering
Two Face on a cliff, but is tricked and also becomes
a captive.  Now Batman must save both Kidman and Robin,
but his biggest challenge is keeping a straight face
when confronted with Carrey's hammy Riddler schtick.
Batman Forever is not that good of a movie.  It is often
implausible and unintentionally laughable.  But it is a
guilty pleasure.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ordinary People (1980)
"Ordinary People" was the star of the 1981 Academy Awards.
Best Picture, Best Director (Robert Redford), Best Screenplay
(Alvin Sargent), Best Supporting Actor (Timothy Hutton, 
in his first cinema film).
But there was immediate griping afterwards, which has
continued ever since.  "Raging Bull" should have won Best
Picture, naysayers said.  I have not yet graded "Raging Bull".
I am sure that it is an outstanding film.  But "Ordinary People"
is one of the best films ever, and well deserved its Academy
Awards.  Indeed, I know of only one film that won Best Picture
that is clearly better: "Casablanca".  "Schindler's List"
and "Chinatown" are about equal in quality to "Ordinary People."
While "Ordinary People" is an outstanding film, it is not a
popular one.  Action dregs such as "The Beastmaster" series
get more showings on television.  It is easy to see why many
people (men, in particular) would prefer to watch "Raging Bull".
It's more entertaining watching Robert De Niro play a boxing
champion than watching Timothy Hutton struggle with depression.
But a film shouldn't be judged by how happy it makes you feel.
"Ordinary People" may be difficult to watch, but that only adds
to its quality: it faces truths that people do not want to see.
"Ordinary People" is the story of a troubled upper-middle-class
family.  Timothy Hutton is the guilt-ridden son who survived
a boating accident that killed his brother, and who has recently
been released from a hospital after a near-fatal suicide attempt.
Mary Tyler Moore is his mother, who has repressed her grief and
hostility towards her son, yet tries to pretend that life can
go on as before.  Donald Sutherland is her husband, who finds
himself caught in the middle between wife and son, want to keep
both, but is powerless to repair the shattered family.
There's also an excellent supporting cast.  Judd Hirsch is
Hutton's psyciatrist, who seeks to pry Hutton out from his
emotional shell.  Elizabeth McGovern is Hutton's love interest,
and M. Emmet Walsh is his disbelieving swimming coach.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Godfather, The (1972)
By the time it finished its run, "The Godfather" had
the biggest box office gross of all time.  It would remain
the highest-grossing film until "Jaws" three years later.
Of all the films that have held that title, "The Godfather"
may be the best.  Unlike later title-holders like "Star Wars",
"E.T." or "Titanic" that relied at least partly upon
special effects, the success of "The Godfather" came
from its script, story, and characters.  Perhaps better than
any other film, "The Godfather" combines outstanding production,
conventional storytelling, and commercial success.
The film was based on the best-selling novel by Mario Puzo,
who also co-wrote the screenplay with the director,
Francis Ford Coppola.  Vito Corleone (Marlon Brando) is
The Godfather, the Don (head) of a successful, tightly-knit
family whose business is organized crime.  Heir apparent
is impulsive, hot-tempered Sonny (James Caan), whose brothers
are brooding Michael (Al Pacino), who tries to seperate himself
from his criminal family, and Fredo (John Cazale), who can't
seem to do anything right.  Vito has also adopted level-headed
Tom Hagan (Robert Duvall), now the family lawyer.  Michael's
second wife is Kay (Diane Keaton).
The film is set in the 1950s.  Vito's refusal to enter the
lucrative drug rackets puts him at odds with other Mafia families.
A war between the families follows.  Events place Michael
as the Don, who plots vengeance against those who opposed or
betrayed the Corleone family.  Along the way, Michael changes
from an idealistic and independent young man to a calculating,
ruthless Mafia Don.
"The Godfather" has little comic relief, but the film is rich
with ironies.  'Family' is considered to be very important by
the Mafia leaders, and yet their very actions lead to the
destruction of their own family.  'Loyalty' to the family is
also vital, enforced by 'hits' that punish betrayal, and yet
family members regularly betray one another.  While Vito's word
is his bond, the same doesn't apply to his son Michael, a
smooth operator for whom words are merely another tool for
information or influence.  Non-Sicilians are outsiders, kept
from knowledge of the 'family business', and even adopted son
Hagan is sometimes excluded.  Women are relegated to being
household servants and child raisers, although this role gives
them a longer lifespan than their vendetta-targeted husbands.
"The Godfather" won only three Academy Awards.  But they were
important ones: Best Picture, Best Actor (Brando) and Best
Screenplay.  There were also nominations for Best Director
(Coppola), Best Supporting Actor (Pacino, Caan, Duvall),
Best Editing and Best Sound.  Oddly, Nino Rota wasn't nominated
for the compelling, mournful score, although he did win the
British Academy Award for Original Film Music.
Pacino must have been surprised to have been nominated as a
supporting actor, since he saw more screen time than Brando.
But the Academy probably did not want to split the votes between
Brando and Pacino.  "The Godfather" recovered the languishing
career of Brando, who did not attend the Academy Awards ceremony.
He instead sent a minor actress who posed as an Indian named
Sacheen Littlefeather, who refused the Oscar on the grounds that
Hollywood discriminated against Indians.  Brando was nominated
for Best Actor the next year for "Last Tango in Paris",
demonstrating that the Academy didn't hold a grudge.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Love Letters (1945)
"Love Letters" is an interesting soap opera and mystery
starring Joseph Cotten and Jennifer Jones.  It was the
third of five films that they made together.  The
sometimes spooky script was written by Ayn Rand, who
is better known for her later philosophical works.
Cotten writes love letters for war buddy and cad
Robert Sully.  Cotten falls in love with his unseen
pen pal, Jones.  The brief marriage between Jones and
Sully ends with Sully murdered and Jones suffering
from amnesia.  Cotten and Jones meet and wed, but
how will she react when her memory returns?  Will
she blame Cotten for writing the love letters that
set up her disastrous wedding to Sully?
Jones and Cotten had good screen chemistry.  Jones
had an other-worldly quality, while Cotten's persona
was world-weary.  They manage to overcome a soapy
plot.  There is much melodrama made over Jones' amnesia
and recovery, while Jones' mother (Gladys Cooper)
makes an unlikely complete recovery from a stroke
that left her unable to speak.
"Love Letters" met with some some success from the
Academy, with Jones receiving an Oscar nomination for
Best Actress.  The film was also nominated for its sets.
Jones was nominated for Best Actress for four consecutive
years, 1944 through 1947.  She would marry legendary
producer David O. Selznick in 1949.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Loneliness of the Long Distance Runner, The (1962)
The Loneliness of the Long Distance Runner (1962)
British writer Alan Silltoe achieved critical
success with "Saturday Night and Sunday Morning",
a novel about a troubled young man from a working
class family.  After writing the screenplay as
well, his next effort was "The Loneliness of the
Long Distance Runner", which he also adapted for
the screen.  As in his earlier film, the anti-hero
youth, his romances, and his confrontations with
(and submissions to) authority are the dominant
themes.
Producer/Director Tony Richardson would have his
greatest success the following year with "Tom Jones"
(which starred Albert Finney, who also was the
lead in "Saturday Night and Sunday Morning").
But while "Tom Jones" was a boisterous comedy,
"The Loneliness of the Long Distance Runner"
is a grim drama.
Tom Courtenay makes his screen debut as Colin
Smith, a young man who is sentenced to a juvenile
prison after committing a burglary.  Although his
attitude remains antisocial, he becomes a favorite
of the governor (the prison administrator, played
by Michael Redgrave) due to his athletic ability.
Colin is trained as a cross country runner, in
the hopes that he win a cup when in competition
with athletes from a well-to-do boarding school.
But Courtenay still resents the system, and has
revenge on his mind.
Silltoe places the blame for Colin's behavioral
problems on his family life.  Colin's day laborer
father (Peter Madden) recently died after a
grueling illness, and Colin was the first to
see him dead.  His mother (Avis Bunnage) is
relieved, and is prompt to take a lover (Raymond
Dyer) who views Colin as a good-for-nothing.
Colin gets a girlfriend (Topsy Jane) who presses
him to get a job.  But Colin is too much the
rebel to work for the man, turning to robbery
instead.
Richardson makes heavy use of flashback, especially
when Colin is running miles by himself in the woods.
Richardson and Silltoe clearly sympathize with
Colin, and not with the governor, whose eagerness
to win the cup has overcome his common sense.
Courtenay, who was several years older than his
teenaged character, is effective in the lead role.
Bunnage is also very good.  She gives her character
a practical, hard edge appropriate for surviving
the hard knocks of life.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Doctor Zhivago (1965)
"Doctor Zhivago" is a good, if overlong, film
adaptation of the Nobel prize-winning novel by
Boris Pasternak.  While not as good as "Bridge
on the River Kwai" or "Lawrence of Arabia", director
David Lean continued his winning streak, as the
film was a commercial success and received ten
Oscar nominations.
"Doctor Zhivago" has the cinematography of an
epic, but the plot of a romance novel.  The story
takes place during the Russian Revolution.  Young,
idealistic poet/doctor Yuri (Omar Sharif) marries
Tanya (Geraldine Chaplin), but is frequently separated
from her due to war.  Lara (Julie Christie) is a
passionate woman mistreated by her lover, world-weary
politician Komarovsky (Rod Steiger).
Lara leaves Komarovsky to marry revolutionary Pasha
(Tom Courtenay), who conducts a brutal campaign against
White insurgents.  The storylines are connected as Yuri
and Lara serve together in the war, and have an affair
afterwards.  Yevgraf (Alec Guinness) is narrator and
half-brother of Yuri.
"Doctor Zhivago" goes on and on and on for 197 minutes.
This is shorter than "Lawrence of Arabia", but it feels
longer.  Dramatic touches are sometimes laughable,
such as Pasha's entrance after Komarovsky has been
shot, the long-expected first embrace between Lara
and Yuri, Yuri's bad luck upon seeing Lara for the
last time, and Yuri's insolence when his life is on
the line (which occurs often).
The theme music, which won an Oscar for Maurice Jarre,
is hummable but repetitive.  Robert Bolt somehow won
Best Adapted Screenplay over "Cat Ballou" and "Ship of
Fools".  "Doctor Zhivago" deserved its Best Art Direction
Oscar, as the sets are very impressive, especially a
cottage filled with ice formations.  As you would
expect from a big-budget Lean epic, the cinematography
(Freddy Young) is good.
While "Doctor Zhivago" is a competent film, it has
been somewhat over-rated over the years.  The characters
of Yuri and Lara do not seem real enough to merit
involvement.  Still, the film does get across some of
the horrors of war, and the irony of a 'worker's
revolution' becoming just another despotic dictatorship.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Muppet Treasure Island (1996)
It is no suprise that "Muppet Treasure Island" appeals to children.
The surprise is that it appeals to adults as well.  While kids
like the activity and silliness, adults like the gags and jokes.
Even the many songs, written by 1960's popsmiths Barry Mann and 
Cynthia Weil, are good.  Sometimes the silliness gets out of hand, 
and the plot gets left out to dry.  But there's always a good laugh
ahead to steady the course.
Billy Bones (Billy Connelly) is telling his tall tale of buried treasure 
for the nth time to his fellow tavern-dwellers.  They've heard
it all before, and no one believes him.  Also there is young busboy
Jim (Kevin Bishop), who dreams of a life at sea like his father.
A blind pirate gives Billy the black spot, which is a pirate's
death sentence.  In the commotion, the tavern burns down.  Billy soon 
dies, but not before delivering his long-hidden treasure map to Jim.
Out of work and seeking treasure, Jim convinces a rich but dimwit 
bear (Fozzy), who believes that a man lives in his finger, to fund 
his treasure hunt.  
Soon Jim is cabin boy on a ship sailing for the buried treasure.
Kermit the Frog is captain, with a green eagle as first mate.
Unfortunately, Fozzy has taken the advice of the cook, Long John
Silver (Tim Curry, who relishes the role) and stocked the crew
with pirates and scoundrels.
Fearing mutiny, Kermit tells the pirate crew to explore the
treasure island for provisions, planning to strand them on
the island.  His plan is foiled when the pirates kidnap Jim
and take him with them.  Some pirates remain on the ship and take
control of it as well.  The treasure is found, and poor Kermit
is tied up and hung upside down over a cliff with Miss Piggy,
who was hanging with pig savages on the island.  We learn that
Miss Piggy is a very bad singer.  This section of the movie
is a bit muddled, but kids won't care about the plot anyway.
But fortune smiles on the captain and his loyal followers,
and the mutiny ultimately fails.  The treasure is now safely
aboard ship and the pirates are in chains: but Long John manages
to free himself and row off with the treasure on a leaky lifeboat.
Be sure to fast forward past the closing credits to learn his
ultimate fate, and to hear a bad joke.
Muppets actors both large and small mix freely with the human actors.
Things that don't belong in pirate movies, such as a Henry Kissinger
book, a french cook, tourists in Hawaiian shirts, cheerleaders,
a jazz band, and quotes from "On the Waterfront" and "Apocalypse Now"
are there to remind us that nothing is to be taken seriously.
All your favorite muppets from the old syndicated TV show are
there, except the piano-playing dog, who isn't missed anyway.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for One-Eyed Jacks (1961)
"One-Eyed Jacks" is famous for being Marlon
Brando's sole effort as director.  At first,
Stanley Kubrick was the director, but a clash
of egos led to his abandoning the project.
Brando extended the shooting schedule from
sixty days to six months, and turned in a
four hour film.  Studio executives had the
film cut to 141 minutes, and the expensive
film lost money when finally released.
Who knows whether Kubrick's version would
have been much better.  Certainly Brando's
character would have been less heroic, and
his various romances would likely have been
downplayed.  The good news is that Brando's
version of "One-Eyed Jacks" is entertaining,
interesting and original.  It is also
clearly better than "Spartacus", the 1960
Kubrick-directed epic.
The story begins in Mexico in the year 1880.
Karl Malden and Brando are bank robbers
who are being tracked by Federales.  They
have only one horse, which can hold only
one rider.  Malden leaves Brando with promises
of returning with another horse.  He doesn't,
and Brando is captured, spending five years
in a squalid prison.
Brando escapes with Larry Duran, and the two
link up with bad-tempered bank robbers
Ben Johnson and Sam Gilman.  Brando learns
that Malden is now the affable sheriff of
Monterey, California.  The gang rides 900
miles (!) to Monterey, to rob its bank and
for Brando to exact revenge on Malden.
Various misadventures follow: Brando seduces
Malden's adopted daughter Pina Pellicer, kills
troublemaker Timothy Carey in self-defense,
and is whipped and jailed by Malden.  Finally,
there is an inevitable showdown between
Brando and Malden.
Brando is stone-faced and tight-lipped
throughout, but he remains charismatic and
likeable.  Slim Pickens has a great supporting
role as Malden's brutal deputy.  Malden also
gives a fine performance.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Caesar (1930)
There had been several silent films about
organized crime, but the mobster genre didn't
really take off until "Little Caesar".
Perhaps this was because the harsh slang
and accents given to the characters couldn't
come across in silents, or perhaps this was due
to the quality of Edward G. Robinson's
starmaking performance.  Robinson would
play numerous gangsters throughout his
career ("Key Largo", "The Last Gangster",
"Larceny, Inc.") with his ugly mug and
unsympathetic manner making him well cast for
such roles.  James Cagney and Humphrey Bogart
also contributed to the genre, which saw
a revival in the 1970s with the "Godfather"
films.
What is so striking about "Little Caesar"
is just how evil the crooks really are.
Robinson as Rico only cares about power,
money and glory.  Romancing 'dames' is
'soft stuff'.  Rico will kill anybody who
is in the way of his ambitions, especially
those crime lords who stand above him in
the hierarchy.  A tough guy who believes
a man's worst sin is to be 'yellow', Rico's
only human traits are vanity and cruelty.
He is only happy when his power is well
recognized, especially when strutting down
a street with his gang in tow.
The supporting cast isn't as interesting.
There are the usual cops and robbers,
tough guys all of them, as well as a few
'yellow' softies who need to be 'rubbed out'.
Among the latter is dancer Joe (Douglas Fairbanks
Jr.) who, under pressure from do-gooder
girlfriend Olga (Glenda Farrell), threatens
to turn Rico over to the cops.
The problems with the simplistic characters
are partly overcome by the direction, which
is full of energy and action.  Francis Faragoh
and Robert N. Lee received an Oscar nomination
for the screenplay, which was adapted from
W.R. Burnett's best selling novel.
"Little Caesar" also marks the debut of Hal
B. Wallis.  It was the first of 203 films that
he would produce.  Wallis and prolific director
Mervyn LeRoy would combine for another successful
action film in 1932, "I am a Fugitive from
a Chain Gang".
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Aliens (1986)
Director James Cameron does well with action films
starring tough, strong-willed female leads.  "Aliens",
the long-delayed sequel to 1979's "Alien", was worth the
wait since it was an ideal project for Cameron's strengths,
and likely would have been a lesser film if directed by
anyone else.
"Aliens" picks up 57 years after the first film left off.
Ripley (Sigourney Weaver) has been in living in suspended
animation in a spaceship sleeping chamber, until rescued by
a salvage team.  No one really believes her story about the
murderous alien with acid for blood, until contact is
lost with a colony on the same planet that Ripley had
battled the alien.
Ripley is sent as an advisor on a rescue mission to the
planet, along with android Bishop (Lance Henriksen), creepy
'company man' Paul Reiser, and a crew of wisecracking,
gung-ho Marines.  They soon encounter the colony's only
survivor, a little girl nicknamed Newt (Carrie Henn).
Of course, they find the aliens as well, which are
disgusting, frightening and ubiquitous.
As in the first film, Weaver is most impressive as
Ripley, whose character should be out of her element,
but always proves to be tougher (and smarter) than those
around her.  Even when Ripley's actions are wildly risk-taking
(especially when rescuing Newt at film's end) her actions
seems credible.  Credit is due first to Weaver, then to
Cameron, and then to the special effects department for
making those nasty aliens look so convincing.
In addition to the tense and frequent action scenes,
"Aliens" is interesting for its psychological aspects.
Ripley, who is a loner by nature, not only conquers the
aliens, but builds for herself a substitute family.
Newt becomes her daughter, Michael Biehn her husband, and
Bishop her father.  As in "Alien", there is a sabotaging
character (Reiser).  My favorite supporting character,
though, is the whiner (Bill Paxton), who provides the sole
comic relief.  Henn acts very well for a little kid.
"Aliens" was nominated for seven Academy Awards, including
Best Actress (Weaver).  Its only Oscar was for Best
Visual Effects, but perhaps it should have won for the
great sets (Peter Lamont, Crispian Sallis) as well.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Freaks (1932)
After director Tod Browning's big success at Universal
with "Dracula", he was given freedom at MGM for his
next film project.  "Freaks" was the result, with its
unusual cast of people with various birth defects, and
its chilling finale involving poisoning and mutilation.
The film was too strong for contemporary audiences.
After the previews went poorly, a half hour was cut
(and unfortunately, lost).  Still, "Freaks" was pulled
from release after a few weeks.  The film was a disaster
for MGM, not just financially, but for the studio's
image as well.
Today, "Freaks" has lost some of its ability to
shock audiences.  But it is still startling to see
Johnny Eck, a man without a torso who walks around
using his hands, and Prince Randian, who has no limbs
at all.  There's the Siamese twins, Daisy and Violet
Hilton, each married to a different husband.  And
there's more: people without arms, severely retarded
pinheads, a bearded lady, dwarves, and midgets
Hans (Harry Earles) and Frieda (Daisy Earles, Harry's
sister).
The 'freaks' are all part of a travelling circus.
Hans, who has inherited a fortune, has a crush on
Cleopatra (Olga Baclanova).  Cleopatra, who is
normal-sized, decides to marry Hans for his money,
and then poison him.  She is in cahoots with venal
strongman Hercules (Henry Victor).  But the closely-knit
'freaks' get wind of Cleopatra's schemes, and plan
an appropriately hideous revenge.
Browning's message is that Hercules and Cleopatra are
the real 'freaks'.  We should be judged by our character
and not our appearance.  This message was certainly
lost on the 1932 general public, but Browning has
been subsequently vindicated.  Today, "Freaks" is
considered a classic, and not an exploitation film
(unlike the embarrassing 1930s midget western "The Terror
of Tiny Town").  While the 'freaks' exact a ruthless
revenge, the actions of Hercules and Cleopatra are
so despicable that they fully deserve their fate.
While "Freaks" is a very good film, it is not
outstanding.  One of the minor "comic relief" characters
stutters, and perhaps Hercules and Cleopatra are too
crass to be credible.  First billed and all around
good guy Phroso (Wallace Ford) isn't interesting,
while the character of his girlfriend Venus (Leila
Hyams) is muddled.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Jane Eyre (1944)
"Jane Eyre" is a dramatic and entertaining version of the
Charlotte Bronte classic.  Part mystery, part romance, and
part costume drama, the film has strongest appeal to women,
but even men should enjoy the performances of leads
Joan Fontaine and Orson Welles, as well as the crackling
script.  (Actor John Houseman, of all people, is given first
credit for the screenplay.  It was also his only screenwriting
credit.)
The story takes place in England, during the 19th century.
Jane Eyre (Fontaine) is orphaned at a young age.  Raised
in a dismal charity school, her only friend is Helen
(Elizabeth Taylor, in a very early role).  She is bullied
by obsessive puritan headmaster Brocklehurst (Henry Daniell,
whom you might recognize from "The Great Dictator").
Coming of age, she is employed as a governess at an imposing
estate, where she falls in love with her employer, moody
Rochester (Welles).
Welles has a booming voice, wild eyes and a commanding
attitude.  He talks in riddles, and has a mysterious past.
There is also an insane woman that he is holding prisoner
in one of the castle's towers.
Fontaine appears uncomfortable, and her acting mostly consists
of silent suffering, which she does quite well, just as she
did in "Rebecca".  Her character falls in love very quickly
with tempestous Rochester.  This is credible, since her
self-preservation instincts would sense the opportunity in
marrying a wealthy man, and he is the first marriageable man
that she has met.
The film's biggest weakness is the ending.  I won't give it
away, but it comes suddenly and is a bit clumsily crafted.
Still, "Jane Eyre" is a very enjoyable soaper, especially
Welles' campy performance.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Enfants du paradis, Les (1945)
"Les Enfants du Paradis" is a French film better known
in the United States by its English translation,
"Children of Paradise".  It is an outstanding film
with a great cast, script and story; thoughtfully
directed by Marcel Carne.
The plot has the proud, independent Garance (Arletty)
choosing between the male leads, all of whom want her.
Baptiste (Jean-Louis Barrault) is a talented mime,
loved by Nathalie (Maria Casares).  Frederick (Pierre
Brasseur) is a gregarious actor. Lacenaire (Marcel Herrand)
is a playwright turned robber and murderer.  Louis Salou
plays a wealthy and proud aristocrat.  The relationships
between the main characters is complex, and evolves over
the film, which is about three hours in length.
It is hard to find fault with such an outstanding
film, but "Children of Paradise" has a few minor flaws.
The character of Garance is supposed to be gorgeous.
Arletty has the necessary poise for the role, but
she is actually less attractive than Casares.  Later,
we meet three playwrights who are insulted by Frederick.
Two of the authors speak in unison, completing the
sentences of the third author.  Obviously, these are
absurd characters, but they seem out of place in this
drama.
There are several plays within a play.  These are all
quite different in mood.  Frederick turns one turgid
drama into a satire, and later plays Othello as if
filled with hatred.  Baptiste's productions are allegorical.
His feelings of unrequited love, suicide and murder
end up depicted as elaborate onstage productions.
The filming of "Children of Paradise" was interrupted by
World War II, and only completed after France was liberated.
Many of the cast were members of the French resistance
against the Germans.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sirens (1994)
"Sirens" is a drama set in circa 1930 Australia.  Hugh Grant
plays a minister given the task of stopping an eccentric painter
(Sam Neill) from showing a blasphemous painting.  Along with
his beautiful but inhibited wife Tara Fitzgerald, he visits Neill's
estate.  While Grant argues for the painting's removal, Fitzgerald
becomes involved with Neill's stable of models, which include
smug Elle MacPherson, wicked Kate Fischer, waifish Portia De Rossi
and blind mute Adonis Merk Gerber.
Neill is asexual in all areas except painting.  But all
his paintings feature nudes, especially nude women.  "Sirens"
has a great deal of frontal nudity.  (If you have always wanted
to see MacPherson's body beyond what the Sports Illustrated
swimsuit issue shows, this is your opportunity.)  The models
are not content merely to bare all for Neill, and their
eroticism leads to lesbian imagery, and (especially) fantasies
with buff Gerber.  Predictably, the reserved Fitzgerald becomes
caught up in their sensual world.  Surprisingly, Grant isn't
too disturbed by this, perhaps because he consideres himself
a progressive.
Assumedly, Neill's character has inherited a large fortune.
Otherwise, it is difficult to believe he can afford his lifestyle.
He lives in a fantastic estate with woods, cliffs, and lakes,
and has at least eight dependents including himself.
The liberal attitude of the estate extends to the raising
of Neill's twin toddler daughters.  They have the run of the
house, and no notice is taken of their perpetually rude comments.
"Sirens" manages to be a marginally good film despite its
many problems.  The story lags at times, De Rossi's innocent
character isn't completely credible, and plot turns are
both predictable and unlikely (a train derailment strands
Grant and Fitzgerald at the Neill estate, and prim Fitzgerald
becomes involved with the decadent models).  Still, production
values and casting helps, and there's plenty of eroticism
served up to maintain interest.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Some Like It Hot (1959)
Close your eyes and imagine Tony Curtis and Jack Lemmon
in drag.  If this image is instantly hilarious to you,
you will be among the 95% or more who consider Billy Wilder's
"Some Like it Hot" to be one of the greatest American
comedies.
But there are always some people, such as myself, who are
sufficiently humor-impaired, non-conformist, and/or overly
critical so as not to get the joke.  Cartoonish mobsters,
empty-headed blondes, unlikely romances and Lemmon camping
it up under a wig and false breasts may provide the elements
of a great comedy, but only if the script allows and the
pieces fit together.
"Some Like it Hot" stars Curtis and Lemmon as Prohibition
era Chicago jazz musicians who witness the Valentine's Day
Massacre.  The surviving gangsters seek to kill them as well,
forcing Curtis and Lemmon to dress up as women and join
a travelling all-girl's band.  Our cross-dressing heroes
take turns romancing whispering dunce Marilyn Monroe, then
have an unlucky reunion with the gangsters in a Florida hotel.
After seeing "Some Like it Hot", I trolled the internet
for reviews of the film.  Without exception, everybody felt
that the film was both a hoot and a masterpiece, leaving
this grumpy critic uninvited to the party.  Feel free to take
the following comments with a grain of salt.  Nevertheless,
it would be dishonest to change a grade or a review based
upon the opinions of others rather than the film itself.
Compare "Some Like it Hot" to my favorite star-in-drag flick,
"I Was a Male War Bride".  Cary Grant clearly dislikes having
to dress as a woman, and men who see him dolled up only
make caustic remarks.  Jack Lemmon, on the other hand, has
a wonderful time as a transvestite, and has an elderly male
paramour (Joe E. Brown).  Curtis in drag also has a suitor,
a tactless underage bellboy.  All the film's characters readily
accept Lemmon and Curtis as women, when no one over the age of
ten would be fooled.  Cary Grant also makes a better Cary Grant
than does Tony Curtis.  A jury would have to decide which
crime merits the greater punishment: Curtis' trespass on a
yacht, or his Cary Grant impersonation.  Finally, while
"War Bride" provides a believable female lead in Ann Sheridan,
Monroe is simply a male's fantasy woman.  She's gorgeous,
stupid, willing and vulnerable.
Curtis convinces Lemmon to romance Brown, so that Curtis
can romance Monroe on Brown's yacht.  Why would Lemmon agree
to this?  Curtis is risking getting arrested, and risking
his (her?) cover, which if blown would risk their lives.
Lemmon himself has an interest in Monroe, and has no motivation
to help Curtis.  Lemmon also risks his cover in spending an
evening with frisky Brown.  Most confusing of all, Lemmon
actually enjoys dancing with Brown, and is so taken with the
wealthy but aged lecher that he seriously considers marrying him.
Curtis, who spent earlier scenes sanctimoniously criticizing
Lemmon for his lust, mysteriously changes his character to
become a risk-taking playboy.
The Chicago mobsters arrive at the same Florida hotel that
Curtis and Lemmon are staying at.  This coincidence is beyond
remarkable.  Despite the fact that law enforcement agents have
made their presence in the hotel known, and that the gangsters
have registered there as guests, and that the hotel is a public
place, there is another mob shootout.  Curtis, running for
his life from the mobsters who have spotted him, takes time
off to run up on stage, dressed as a woman, and kiss Monroe.
Monroe is so impressed by this that she leaves the band to
join Curtis in his escape.
Anyone who has made it this far into the review is likely
thinking, 'it's a COMEDY, stupid'.  Admittedly, I feel like
the guy who didn't like the film "Antz" because the characters
acted more like people.  But I feel that characters should
have plausible motivations for their actions, and I didn't
find that in "Some Like it Hot".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Visions of Light (1992)
"Vision of Light" is a documentary about cinematography.
It is well conceived and executed.  Many appropriate clips from
important and innovative films are shown.  There are interviews
with many of Hollywood's best cameramen.  Different techniques
are described and demonstrated.  Certainly the documentary
is interesting and educational.
Cameramen see films differently than the rest of us.
I have seen "Sunrise" (1927) and didn't particularly like 
the movie, due mostly to direction and character
development.  But in this documentary, "Sunrise" is
a cinema classic, due to its innovative cinematography.
Many people could find "Eraserhead" (1976), directed by David Lynch, 
to be an unwatchable film (admittedly I haven't seen it).
>From a cameraman's perspective, however, it is a great project
because of the freedom to use bizarre camera techniques.
One cameraman says that he would walk out of any movie
that consistently uses a certain camera technique,
as if the rest of the movie elements aren't relevant.
The advent of sound in the late twenties is treated as
a disaster.  This reduced the importance of camerawork,
and the actors were restricted to the range of their
microphones, causing a lot of fixed shots.  Advantages
of sound, such as naturalistic acting and much deeper 
dialogue, are ignored because it's not cinematography.
The decline of black and White films is also considered a 
tragedy.  Black and White is a perfect medium for
lighting contrasts, which convey mood.  The great movies
of the 1940s, from "Rebecca" to "The Third Man", would have 
a different feel had they been filmed in color.
Still, I didn't connect with the documentary.  Perhaps I
downgrade the importance of cinematography, in favor of
script, plot and characters.  Some movies, like "2001: A Space
Odyssey," have little script and rely almost completely
upon visuals to tell the story.  "2001" is a great movie,
but it isn't covered here, only a clip is shown at the end
without narration.  Other Kubrick projects, such as "Barry Lyndon" 
which only used natural lighting, and "A Clockwork Orange"
are ignored altogether.  Also ignored are Sergio Leone's
great spaghetti westerns of the 1960s.  Of course, in a 90 
minute documentary, only so much territory can be covered.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Over the Edge (1979)
"Over the Edge" is a disturbing film that depicts the lives and
values of teenagers, and their conflicts with parents and authority
figures.  The teens have no sense of future.  They hang out, do
drugs, sometimes beat each other up, but concepts like college,
career, and work are foreign.  They have way too much time on
their hands, nowhere to go, and nothing to do.
They live in the planned outer-suburbian community of New Grenada.
The community is struggling.  Housing construction has stopped,
the caddie dealership sales have slowed, and the adults have
a sense of desperation for new investment.  The teens clearly
have not been considered in the planning: a proposed bowling
alley and skating rink was shelved, there's no theatres, and
the kids hang out in vacant lots when necessary and crowd in the
one-room recreation center when possible.
Clearly the director sympathizes with the teens and not the
parents.  The parents love their children, want the best for
them, but are clueless as to their values and feelings.  When
the teens get into trouble, the solution always seems to be
discipline in the form of curfews and "weekends in the hill"
meaning teen jail.
One of the teens is Carl (Michael Eric Kramer), whose best
friend is Richie (Matt Dillon).  Richie is on probation, mouths
off at the police at any opportunity, and is training Carl
to do the same.  Carl is clearly intelligent, but seems bent
on resisting authority and winning the love of Cory
(Pamela Ludwig).
Dillon and Kramer obtain a handgun, which provides entertainment
as target practice until the shells are spent.  The police are
after them, and Dillon decides to steal his mother's car and
leave town.  Later chased by ill-tempered sheriff Doberman 
(Harry Northup), Dillon makes the mistake of brandishing his
unloaded handgun and is killed.  Kramer gets away.
Stunned by the death of Dillon, the adults hold a meeting
at the school "cafetorium".  There is much hand wringing and
finger pointing.  No one realizes that the kids need fast food
joints, theatres, bowling alleys, etc, which also would provide
part-time jobs.  The teens know the parents are there, and
(this is truly memorable) lock them in the school, eventually
turning off the lights and mocking them over the PA system.
Meanwhile, the "Over the Edge" teens torch and smash the 
parents cars and fire guns into the air.
This is the first film for both Matt Dillon and Vincent Spano,
who have moved on to become successful actors.  But I doubt
that they have ever been in a film this good again.  Highly
recommended especially to anarchists and sociologists.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Hard Day's Night, A (1964)
Movies starring Rock and Roll stars have rarely been treated
seriously by the public.  Usually it is for good reason.
Even the young audience is glad when the dialogue stops and
the artist or group performs a song, back in their element
again.  While establishment artists like Bing Crosby found a
home in the movies, outsiders like Elvis Presley were given
the most trivial scripts and songs, and the goal was to make
the film as quickly and cheaply as possible since the core
audience would attend no matter the quality.
"A Hard Day's Night", starring the Beatles,  did not change 
this perception, but the film demonstrated that musicians 
could act, especially if they just played themselves.
John Lennon is mischevious, Paul McCartney is sunny,
Ringo Starr is sad-faced, and George Harrisson is ironic.
The clever script gives them ample opportunity to lampoon
the establishment that sometimes fawns over, and other
times patronizes them.
Richard Lester directed and stocked with film with excellent
British character actors.  We find little-known Wilfrid Brambell
stealing the show as Paul's grandfather. He may look
"very clean" but he soon proves to be a "keen mixer".
Brambell is fond of causing trouble, and his glasses give him
enormous malignant eyes.  He has a wonderful voice that
is the masculine equivalent of a witch's cackle.
Another find is Victor Spinetti as the stessed-out 
producer of a TV show that stars the Beatles, who won't 
conform to his petty rules.  A classic moment has
Spinetti panicking when Brambell suddenly appears on stage
during an opera telecast.
The plot has the Beatles tightly scheduled by their
managers and gophers, always to and from a show, on
a train or in a hotel room.  It's no wonder that when
they have a moment of free time, they run amock in
a field.  They are rarely seen without a suit and slacks.
Ringo gets the most screen time of the Beatles.
Brambell berates him for reading a book, and gives him the
dubious advice that he should go "parading".  Ringo
takes his advice, disguises himself with a trenchcoat,
and, walking the streets alone, causes mischief,
tailed by a "bobby" (A British policeman, which apparently
lined the streets of London in 1964).  Ringo has
a humorous sequence involving a lady and his raincoat,
which ends with her falling in a hole, and Ringo
held by the police.  At the station he meets Brambell,
who has been brought in for causing a riot peddling
pictures of the fab four.  Brambell is at his best railing
against the policemen, advising Ringo to protect
his "briskets" when he is beaten to the floor, etc.,
when the policemen are so docile that they offer tea.
Both Ringo and Brambell are rescued from the police by the
remaining Beatles, who must make Spinetti's TV show.
Their performance on the show is the one disappointing
part of the film, since they mime to the studio versions.
Turn on the mikes and turn off the tape!  They also
play the same songs that we heard earlier in the film,
although it does help that they still sound great
the second time around.
"A Hard Day's Night" is the Beatles best film, a little
better than "Help" which relied more on physical comedy,
and much better than "Magical Mystery Tour" which was
just plain weird.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Nikita (1990)
I had high expectations when I saw this movie.  And it started
well enough, only increasing the anticipation.  But it quickly
became unbelievable, full of the implausible events that only
occur in action-adventure movies.  All in all, it was something 
of a letdown.  An okay film, but not the great film that I had
been hoping for.
Our anti-heroine is first seen as part of a team of addicted 
punks breaking into a pharmacy to steal drugs.  This robbery
is a failure when the owner and, later, cops arrive.  In a flood
of bullets, nearly every dies except Nikita (aka Marie,
Josephine, cutie).
In the aftermath of the raid, Nikita kills a cop for the 
pleasure of it.  This, plus several violent fits of temper,
gets her a death sentence which is commuted so that she can
become a government-paid assassin.  This is the premise of the
film, but is not credible.  Perhaps the French government does
have assassins on the payroll, but they wouldn't recruit feral
killers for the job.
Nikita has three years of training.  This includes makeup
and femininity lessons that supposedly transform her from
bitch to beauty.  She also has martial arts classes.  At one
point she bites her instructor and then jubiliantly dances
afterwards.  Her mentor is delighted with this.  Only in a
film would this happen. In real life he would be furious.
Released in the world to wait for an assignment, Nikita
immediately obtains a boyfriend.  Gender roles are reversed
in this relationship.  She is the aggressor and sets the plans,
while he constantly wants to talk and probe for info about
her past.
Nikita's first assignment is to kill several people who
just happen to be together in the same restaurant with her
when she gets the assignment.  Lots of people die in the
ensuing shootout, but not Nikita.  She is told of an
escape route that is shown to be sealed up.  This is supposed
to be another test for her.  Instead of being angry at her
mentor for this treachery, she kisses him.  Huh?
A later assignment has Nikita busting a hotel window, pointing
a rifle into the streets for several minutes, eventually shooting
someone in front of several others, and making no effort to leave
the scene.  Huh?
A third assignment again has bodies falling all around
Nikita, but her charmed existence continues unharmed.
An elaborate scheme is set up over six months to obtain the
papers in a diplomat's safe.  Would this really be worth the
body count to the French government?  Well...
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Adventures of Robin Hood, The (1938)
One of the first technicolor spectaculars,
"The Adventures of Robin Hood" was an enormous
commercial and critical success.  The sets,
costumes and cast were the best that Warner
Brothers could provide.  There was only one
problem: in a successful attempt to provide
family entertainment, the characters were
simplified and even became cartoonish.
The cast was excellent.  Swashbuckler Errol
Flynn was perfect for the role of Robin Hood.
Dashing, chivalric and energetic, Flynn set
an impossible standard for future actors to
live up to.  Claude Rains made a creepy,
scheming Prince John, while Basil Rathbone,
courageous but diabolical, was a fine villain.
Finally, Olivia De Havilland was up to the
role of Maid Marian; young, lovely and able
to switch gracefully between imperious royalty
and willing love interest.
Well, you know the story.  Good King Richard
of England (Ian Hunter) is captured during the
Crusades and held for ransom.  Prince John
takes over and becomes a brutal tax-hungry
despot.  Sir Guy and the cowardly Sheriff
of Nottingham (Melville Cooper) are his henchmen.
Sir Robin of Locksley turns bandit to fight
the oppressors, becoming Robin Hood.
Robin quickly gains colorful sidekicks which
include Little John (Alan Hale) and Friar Tuck
(Popeye-voiced Eugene Pallette).  Maid Marian,
initially disdainful of Robin, is soon converted
to his side.  Prince John doesn't stand a chance,
but uses treachery in the form of an archery
contest to even the odds.
It's all in good fun, and for the family as well,
since most all of the inevitable violence occurs
off-camera.  Still, the characters except for
Robin Hood and Prince John are lacking in depth.
There's adventure, for sure, but little room for
character exploration.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Will Success Spoil Rock Hunter? (1957)
"Will Success Spoil Rock Hunter?" is a satire that sharpens
its knives on television, advertising, and the company ladder.
Surprisingly, the humor has aged well, and the satire still
works.
The plot has advertising jinglist Rock Hunter (Tony Randall)
struggling to improve his position at a company whose president
appears to openly despise him.  He is attempting to raise
a pretty teenager (conveniently a niece) and marry girl-next-door 
Betsy Drake.  His big break comes when he convinces
movie sex symbol Rita Marlowe (Jayne Mansfield) to sponsor
an ad campaign.  This endorsement does wonders for his career,
but threatens his engagment to Drake, as Mansfield has plans of
her own for Randall.
By the mid-1950s, television was increasingly important to
American society.  Fewer people were going to the movies.
While actors and writers welcomed the extra work, the movie
studios were threatened by the new media.  "Rock Hunter"
could have been a paranoid diatribe against television,
but the parody is softened by the presence of Randall,
who appears alternately innocent and bewildered throughout.
One scene has Randall walking in oversized clothes and
platform shoes, and it's a hoot.  Randall's rising career
is epitomized by his receiving the key to the executive
washroom, and you would think it is the key to heaven's
door given the look on his face.
Jayne Mansfield is an obvious Marilyn Monroe clone, 
complete with blonde hair, large bust, and affected whispering
voice.  Her trademark is an extended, high-pitched squeal.
Mansfield would be miscast in a serious drama, but she
is fine in a parody, where her character and her adoring
fans can be lampooned.  Mansfield imitated Monroe offscreen
as well, going through several marriages and dying in
her thirties.
One thing has certainly changed over the years, and that
is Hollywood's treatment of alcohol.  The characters of
"Rock Hunter" drink freely, even at work, and a scene
where Randall gets plastered is intended to be humorous.
Umm, they don't make 'em like they used to.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for All Quiet on the Western Front (1930)
"All Quiet on the Western Front" was the first great film
of the sound era.  It remains the greatest anti-war film
ever made, and it is one of best war films ever, much better
than more acclaimed films such as "Apocalypse Now" or
"Bridge on the River Kwai".
Lew Ayres stars as a common German soldier during World War I.
(This viewpoint is unusual since nearly all English-language
world war films are from the allied perspective.)  Politics such as
what nation started the war are ignored, and the story is
life on the front lines.  Trenches, shelling, machine guns,
hand-to-hand combat, hunger and death are all the soldier knows,
and his only question is, when will it be my turn to die?
One soldier is shown reading a math book, and is told by
another, "What are you reading that for?  Someday you'll stop
a bullet and it will all be for nothing."
"All Quiet on the Western Front" rejects the patriotism
behind war.  Ayres' character even delivers the line "It is
better not to die at all than to die for one's country."
The film was banned in Germany until after World War II.
Hospitals near the battlefield fill with the wounded.
Their limbs are amputated and they cry for doctors, who
are too busy with other patients to tend to them.
Most of wounded soldiers die, and their possessions such
as watches and boots are taken from them while still
living.
The best scenes are the front line battles.  In an incredible
sequence, French soldiers are shown rushing to German trenches,
mowed down by the hundreds by German machine guns.  The French
soldiers reach the trenches, and engage in hand-to-hand combat
with the Germans.  Wrestling and spearing with bayonets follows.
It is as if the viewer is in the German trenches as well.
The horror and waste of trench warfare could not be better
demonstrated.
"All Quiet on the Western Front" was initially filmed as silent.
Influences of the silent era can be seen in some scenes,
such as soldiers eating with exaggerated hand motions and
facial expressions.
The film won Academy Awards for Best Picture and Best Director
(Lewis Milestone), and was nominated for Best Cinematography
and Best Writing.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for To Be or Not to Be (1942)
"To Be or Not To Be" is an outstanding comedy
and drama.  Better than Chaplin's "The Great
Dictator", it is surely the best Nazi satire.
While it moves freely between suspense and
comedy, the scenes with Jack Benny are generally
the comic ones.  The quality of the script
is extremely high, and the film makes the point
of praising Polish resistance and condemning
Nazism with much humor and without becoming
strident.
Joseph Tura (Jack Benny) and his wife Maria
(Carole Lombard) lead a troup of actors in Poland,
before and during the Nazi occupation.  Maria
conducts a liason with bomber pilot Lt. Sobinski
(Robert Stack, so young that he is nearly unrecognizable).
Sobinsky, part of a Polish squadron based in England,
suspects Professor Siletsky (Stanley Ridges) of
being a Nazi spy.  Siletsky returns to Poland to
deliver a list of members of the Warsaw Underground,
and Tura's troupe is recruited to prevent him
from doing so.
Jack Benny's character must impersonate Siletsky,
generating suspense and getting him into much trouble.
Benny was a great comedian with perfect timing,
facial expressions and vocal inflections.  It helps
that he is given great lines, particularly during
his interviews with blustering Colonel Ehrhardt
(Sig Rumann).
It is difficult to find problems with "To Be or Not
to Be."  Nothing comes of a suicide note that
Maria forges for Siletsky, and Benny's frequent
references to that "Great, great Polish Actor
Joseph Tura" are funny but unlikely.  Any problems
that the film has are irrelevant given the quality
of the script (Edwin Justus Mayer) and direction
(Ernst Lubitsch, who also produced).
"To Be or Not to Be" was only nominated for one
Academy Award, for the Werner Heymann score.  The
Oscar snub may have been due to Lubitsch being a
German.  It was the final film for Lombard, who
died in a plane crash shortly after production.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Shop of Horrors (1986)
"Little Shop of Horrors" is a surprisingly good movie.
Not much could be expected of a musical comedy based on a 
Roger Corman movie about a man-eating plant, heavily seeded 
with comic alumni of SCTV and Saturday Night Live.
But it certainly works.  The songs are pretty good. 
"Skid Row" is my favorite, with its downtrodden characters
and fine cinematography.  Steve Martin has a number
as a sadistic dentist that is a hoot (Bill Murray has
a great cameo as his patient).  And "Suddenly Seymour",
with its parody of Kennedy-era middle-class aspirations,
is so good it is reprised again.
Rick Moranis, Hollywood's nerd stereotype, turns in a fine 
performance as a harried lower class florist assistant,
whose life improves for the better after discovering
an unusual plant.  Unfortunately, the plant needs blood
to survive, and survive it does, growing huge and ultimately
talking.  Moranis must choose between a better life and
serving the evil intentions of this despicable plant.
Moranis' ditzy love interest (Ellen Greene) also does well.  
Even her affected voice and stilted walk suits the
character perfectly.
Minor trivia: one of three muses is Tisha Campbell.
The muses are named after early sixties' girl groups.
Levi Stubbs of the Four Tops provides the plant's voice.
Almost as dark as the Corman original, the film doesn't
take the easy way out until its ending.  The special effects
are good too.  The script is loaded with gags that succeed.
It isn't recommended for kids though, with its language,
violence and adult themes.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mary & Tim (1996) (TV)
"Mary & Tim" is a made-for-TV movie that is a remake
of 1979's "Tim".  Candice Bergen, the co-executive
producer who is also definitely the star, takes
Piper Laurie's role as the lonely middle-aged widow.
Little-known Thomas McCarthy takes Mel Gibson's
role as her much younger, gentle 'mentally challenged'
love interest.  Gibson's performance won him his
first major award, Best Actor from the Australian
Film Institute.  McCarthy's competent but bland
performance has not similarly jump-started his career.
The story has bookstore owner Mary (Bergen) spurning
match-making offers from her friends, perhaps out of
devotion to her long-dead husband.  She develops a
strong friendship for Tim (McCarthy), a mildly
retarded but good-natured handyman.  She teaches him
how to read, but he has things to teach her as well;
from an emotional point of view.
Inevitably, conflicts arise, and just in time to
keep this mild film from becoming a complete snoozer.
Tim's sister Justine (Kelli Williams) disapproves
of Bergen's growing friendship with Tim.  Tim's
father (the late Richard Kiley) disapproves of
Justine's attitude.  And Tim's mother (Louise Latham)
has run-in's with Justine's snobbish in-laws, who
consider Tim to be a family embarrassment.  But the
conflicts are quickly and predictably resolved,
with happy endings for nearly all concerned.
Some elements of the story don't completely work.
Bergen's character apparently has work-related
travel, that she never seems to embark on.  She
also seems to live quite well for a small-time
proprietor, even having a beach house.  Early
in the film, Tim is the victim of cruel practical
jokes played by his co-workers, who then promptly
vanish.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Kiss of the Spider Woman (1985)
Department of remarkable coincidences: of the four
films that Sonia Braga and Raul Julia have both
appeared in, in three of them they both received
Golden Globe nominations, while not receiving any
Academy Award nominations.  "Moon over Parador" was
over-rated, while "The Burning Season" was made for
TV.  There are no such excuses for an Oscar snub
for "Kiss of the Spider Woman".  While William Hurt
received his only Best Actor Oscar, Raul Julia
gives an equally outstanding performance.
Of course, Hurt had the more challenging role.
He plays a homosexual who fantasizes about being a
glamorous woman, while imprisoned in an South American
country for 'corrupting' a minor.  His cellmate
is political prisoner Raul Julia, who is devoted almost
completely to his cause of overthrowing the despotic
government.
At first, Julia detests his effeminate, flirtatious
cellmate, who insists on retelling and embellishing a
Nazi propaganda film that he once saw.  (This film stars
Braga, who also plays Julia's lover.)  However, Hurt's
kindness to Julia gradually leads to their friendship.
Hurt was well cast.  His facial expressions are perfect
for conveying the deeply felt emotions of his character,
and never falls into the easy trap of making the role
campy.  Julia's rage and despair are also well delivered,
and there are strong supporting performances by Jose Lewgoy
and Milton Goncalves, who play malevolent government agents.
"Kiss of the Spider Woman" also received Oscar nominations
for Best Picture, Best Director (Hector Babenco), and
Best Adapted Screenplay (Leonard Schrader).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for To Kill a Mockingbird (1962)
"To Kill a Mockingbird" is an interesting character
study, with a thoughtful script.  While its treatment
of racism is somewhat heavy-handed and simplistic,
the film is well cast and is redeemed by excellent
performances.
Based on the semi-autographical bestseller by Harper Lee
(her only novel), the story is set in a sleepy rural
Alabama town during the Great Depression.  Atticus Finch
(Gregory Peck) defends a black man (Brock Peters) unjustly
accused of raping a disturbed white woman (Collin Wilcox).
Finch is a widower with two young children, Scout (Mary Badham)
and Jem (Phillip Alford).  The children are fascinated
with reclusive, possibly retarted neighbor Boo Radley
(Robert Duvall, in his film debut).
Peck's character is similar to his in "Gentleman's Agreement",
an even better film which had him battling prejudice
against Jews.  In that film, he was also a widower and a
parent, and was willing to tackle an unpopular cause because
it was the right thing to do.  There is also an element of
"Cape Fear", where he had to protect his family from a
sinister bogeyman (there, Robert Mitchum, here, James Anderson).
"To Kill a Mockingbird" is told from the perspective of
Scout, whose character represents the author.  Taking the
focus partly off Peck lightens the film, and the scenes of
the children playing are effective.
Still, the film isn't perfect.  Peck is confronted by the
tamest lynch mob in film history.  Other than a welcome
burst of anger from Peck's maid (Estelle Evans), the black
characters are relentlessly noble and gentle.  Atticus Finch
also seems misplaced in the small town, and perhaps his
character is too close to walking on water.
"To Kill a Mockingbird" was nominated for eight Academy
Awards, including Best Picture, Best Director (Robert Mulligan),
Best Original Score (Elmer Bernstein), Best B/W Cinematography
(Russell Harlan).  Peck won Best Actor, and Horton Foote won
for his adapted screenplay.  It was Peck's only Oscar, following
four losing nominations, including "Gentleman's Agreement".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
"Blade" is an escapist film that combines action,
horror and science fiction.  Based on a comic
book series, "Blade" is energetic and watchable.
The special effects are excellent.  The plot
even has some depth.  Still, it has the feel of
a big budget, violent version of a Saturday
Morning cartoon show, while Wesley Snipes
demonstrates the emotional range of a gargoyle
statue.
You might not be aware of this, but there are
vampires living among us.  They own all the cops.
They hang out in designated nightclubs, where they
dance in ecstacy under showers that spew blood.
Apparently, they are all martial arts experts as well.
Snipes is Blade, who is half-human and half-some-
special-version-of-vampire.  Like Batman, he has
gymnastic abilities, a tool chest full of weapons,
and sullenly stalks his prey, which are vampires
instead of criminals.  Naturally, the vampires don't
like this and conspire to get him, especially
Stephen Dorff, who needs Blade for an evil plan
to bring a Vampire God back to life.  N'Bushe Wright
serves as requisite perfect-ten love interest,
although Snipes is too cool to make a play for her.
Those eager to accept "Blade" on its own terms will
enjoy the movie.  There is endless violence, lots
of showing off, and the usual humorless action hero
versus psychotic bad guy plot, with Life As We Know
It at stake.  Much of the budget goes for special
effects.  You've seen this movie before, and if
you enjoyed it then, you'll like it again.  If you
are interested in seeing a superior version,
try "Virtuosity" from 1995.
Perhaps the problem with "Blade" lies with the
two main characters.  Solemn Snipes is one tough
dude, but his personality is limited.  Therefore,
the bad guys (in this case, vampires) must be colorful
(i.e. eccentric) to retain interest.  This is,
after all, a comic book.  While Dorff is an evil
megalomaniac, he needs to be more over-the-top, like
James Carrey from "Batman Forever", and be given more
screen time.  What "Blade" (and perhaps Snipes)
doesn't realize is that the bad guys should be the
real stars of the film.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Patton (1970)
"Patton" is an intelligently written and well-plotted movie
that deserved its Academy Awards for "Best Picture" and
"Best Actor."  It is an outstanding war movie that has its
focus not on the soldiers in the trenches, but the generals
who control their destinies.
The film follows the career of George Patton (George C. Scott)
from early battles against the Germans in North Africa, and
later in Italy and in Europe.  Patton's biggest battles are
not always against the Germans, however.  He must compete
against generals Montgomery and Bradley for resources and
key assignments, and never comprehends that a four-star 
general must also be a success as a politician.
Movies are inherently fictional, even when based on actual
events or personalities.  I don't know and don't care how 
historically accurate this movie is.  When discussing Patton,
I am referring to his film character.  From the little I
know about Patton or WWII, the film is authentic enough for me.
One minor quibble: Omar Bradley's autobiography was used
as a source, and he served as a technical advisor, leading
to the Bradley character (Karl Malden) being perhaps
too saintly.
Patton is as broad a character a film could hope to have,
and a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity for an actor.  Scott
have a supporting role in "Dr. Strangelove", but he will be
forever typecast as Patton, as Patton will be forever identified
with the actor Scott.  Patton is obsessed with military history
and achieving battlefield glory.  He believes he is reincarnated,
with each life participating in the era's greatest battles.
He stubbornly refuses to see the growing international 
obsolescence of the military relative to political and 
economic alliances.
Perhaps too much is made of Patton's abilities as a general.
The audience is led to believe that Patton could have won the
European war in a few months if it wasn't for pesky Montgomery
trying to steal his glory and supplies.  A rare comic relief
moment involving Patton's cowardly pedigreed hound doesn't
quite work either.
But it is rare that a film character can have so much depth
that it can be explored for over two hours with such 
effectiveness.  Also, the tank battles, ancient ruins, and
general's housings (they lived well, with a full staff of 
toadies) have excellent cinematography.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Alive (1993)
"Alive" is one of the best disaster films ever made.  This may
be because it is based on a true story,  thus avoiding the
usual disaster formula of presenting us with dubious (but
demographically diverse) characters and unrealistic heroes.
Another difference from the typical disaster movie is that
there are no real villians in "Alive".  The character that comes
closest is the plane's mechanic, whose greatest crime is stealing
an injured girl's coat.
The story is very compelling, and the subtitle "Miracle of
the Andes" is well deserved.  (Although "Horror of the Andes" may
be even more appropriate.)  It is a miracle that anyone returned
from those mountains alive.
"Alive" begins with a chartered plane full of Uruguayan soccer
players, en route to Chile.  There is a storm, and their plane
crashes into the desolate Andes mountains.  The plane crash is
stunning.  I doubt that Hollywood has ever done another better.
About half the passengers, mostly young male soccer players,
survive the crash.  They nurse the wounded, obtain shelter from
the cold, obtain water, ration food, and wait for a rescue that
doesn't arrive.  Needed leadership is initially provided by
angst-ridden team captain Antonio (Vincent Spano) and medical
student Roberto (Josh Hamilton), but later surprisingly arises
from Nando (Ethan Hawke).  Antonio's despair, Roberto's
pettiness, and Nando's vision all come across with credibility.
The nature of the story provides dramatic tension, and the
setting (the Andes mountains) provides superb cinematography.
"Alive" will always be infamous in film circles because of its
subject matter: the survivors were forced to cannibalize the
dead, since there was no other source of food.  It is unfairly
cynical to judge the film by this, but undoubtedly that has
kept the film from receiving its due merits or box office
success.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gentleman's Agreement (1947)
"Gentleman's Agreement" is a drama that explores prejudice
against Jews.  Not the kind of prejudice that is demonstrated
in a fiery, defamatory speech, but the quiet kind, done to
exclude Jews from a job, a home, or a social occasion.
The film also infers that it is not enough merely to not
discriminate personally, but that discrimination when found
must be confronted, or it will continue.
"Gentleman's Agreement" accomplishes these ambitious goals
while being compelling rather than pedantic.  Gregory Peck
is the lead, a widower writer with a young son who has
just arrived in New York.  He has a new job at a magazine
but has a difficult assignment: he must write an article
about anti-semitism from an emotional viewpoint.
Peck's character, who is a Christian, decides to tell his
co-workers and acquantainces that he is a Jew for the
duration of the story.  He soon encounters prejudice,
and always confronts it directly, even when it comes from
his fiancee (Dorothy McGuire).  People are quick to tell
him that they are not prejudiced, but their phrases
and actions say otherwise.
Peck is perfectly cast for the role.  His character
radiates integrity and deserved self-righteousness,
giving him the moral authority to identify (and tell off)
others when they show prejudice.  The script is also
kind enough to always give him the last word.  Peck
would later have a similar (and even more famous) role
in "To Kill a Mockingbird".
I don't like McGuire's character.  She is delicate and affected,
and can't handle stress or confrontation.  Peck must choose
between her and brassy Celeste Holm.  I won't reveal his decision,
but you can guess whose side I am on.  I am not criticizing
McGuire's performance though, as she plays the character well.
Time has made some of the film's references obscure.  Bilbo
and Gerald L. K. Smith were apparently nationally-known
at the time as hate-mongers against Jews.
While the romance in "Gentlemen's Agreement" is unconvincing,
Peck's battle against prejudice remains compelling and makes
for good drama.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Scrooge (1951)
"A Christmas Carol" has to be Charles Dickens' most famous work.
There are countless versions and parodies, but all of them,
this version is probably the best.
It tells the story of Ebenezer Scrooge (Alastair Sim), an elderly
businessman who has grown cold-hearted and miserly over the years,
discarding family and disregarding his employees, especially
humble clerk Bob Crachit (Mervyn Johns).  On Christmas Eve, Scrooge is
visited by a series of ghosts, who seek to change his ways before
he has to walk the earth after death, dragging heavy chains like
his unlucky partner Jacob Marley (Michael Horndern).  The ghosts 
represent Christmas Past, Present, and Future.  Will Scrooge recognize
the error of his ways?  Will he repent and embrace mankind?
There seems to be a correlation between the ghosts of Christmas
and Scrooge's character.  The Spirit of Christmas Past is kindly,
as was Scrooge in his youth.  Christmas Present is more stern,
just as Scrooge has become cruel.  And Christmas Future is
as forboding and bleak as is Scrooge's future.
Why is this version of the classic better than its competitors?
The script is well adapted, and the direction is tight, but
the film's strength comes from the cast.  Bob Crachit, Tiny Tim,
and Scrooge's pleasant nephew all glow with the warmth of
Christmas spirit.  Alastair Sim plays Scrooge so that you feel
sorry for him, rather than despise him, especially after the
spirit of Christmas Past has shown us that Scrooge has taken
some hard knocks.
"Scrooge" is a British production, but the accents are not strong
and I had no trouble following the dialogue.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for My Bodyguard (1980)
A low-budget sleeper, Tony Bill's debut as a
director was a critical and commercial success.
The film has appeal to anyone who has had
fantasies about getting revenge on a tormentor,
or anyone who had trouble finding a place in
the cruel hierarchy of high school society.
Clifford (Chris Makepeace) is the new kid in
school, small and 'sensitive'.  He soon is a
target for Moody (Matt Dillon), who leads a
gang of bullies extorting lunch money from
undersized students.  Refusing to pay, Clifford
instead recruits hulking Linderman (Adam Baldwin)
as a bodyguard.  Linderman is silent and friendless
as the result of a gun accident that killed his
younger brother.  But Moody has a bodyguard of
his own (Hank Salas), whom Linderman seems
afraid of.
Clifford also has an eventful family life.
His father (Martin Mull) is a hotel manager and
his grandmother (Ruth Gordon) is an eccentric
manhunter.  A secondary storyline has Mull
fearing the loss of his job due to Gordon's
drunken hitting on hotel patrons.
"My Bodyguard" has some interesting bit players:
John Houseman as a hotel bigshot, George Wendt
as a maintenance man, and Jennifer Beals as a
high school student.
The script sometimes finds its mark, especially
as Linderman is brought out from his reclusive
shell.  Mull and Gordon are entertaining as usual,
while Dillon and Baldwin are well-cast.  However,
the low budget shows in the sound and editing,
and the finale is implausible.  Linderman and
Clifford win their fist fights in 'Rocky' fashion,
absorbing much punishment at first, but then
suddenly winning.  Clifford's faith in Linderman
is credible (what alternative does he have?),
but not his beating up Moody.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for I Confess (1953)
"I Confess" is not one of Alfred Hitchcock's most popular
films.  The mood is grim, there's not a lot of action,
there is a melodramatic love story, and the leading actor 
is the sullen Montgomery Clift.  In short, the film is
not tailored to appeal to a male audience.
Preceded by "Strangers on a Train" and followed by "Rear
Window", which are among Hitchcock's best films, "I Confess"
is not up to their level of quality.  But it is still
very good, and underrated.
The plot has Clift playing a priest.  He hears a confession
from Keller (O.E. Hasse) that he has just killed a man.  Since a 
confession is between God and man alone, Clift cannot turn Keller 
in for the murder.  Inspector Karl Malden suspects Clift of the 
murder, especially after he is seen in mysterious conversations 
with Anne Baxter, who had a romance with Clift prior to her 
marriage and his ordainment.
Baxter's acting is the weakest of the film.  Everything she
says is so breathless and melodramatic, one wonders whether
she could tell you what time it is, without it appearing to
be a major moment in her life.
However, Clift gives a fine performance.  He doesn't have
much emotional range (imagine him in a comedy!) but he is
perfectly cast as a falsely accused priest who must bear
his burdens in silence.
The supporting actors are also good, and have well-developed
characters given their small screen-time.  Clift's fellow
priests have their idiosyncracies (one likes to tease people,
the other has a fascination with his bicycle) and the
Crown Prosecutor is a good-natured politician, much as you
would expect him to be.
There is a great scene near the end of the film.  Clift is
surrounded by a hostile crowd, becoming a mob, that despises
him and believes him guilty of the murder.  It is an extremely
effective scene that demonstrates how wrong public opinion
can sometimes be.
In the ending, Clift is exonerated when Keller freaks out and shoots
his wife, who is about to tell all to the police.  It doesn't
make sense for him to murder his beloved wife, in front of a
hundred witnesses, in order to prevent her.  Perhaps the ending
should have left Clift confronting the angry mob, as it would
have conveyed the message of the movie even more strongly.
Not a happy ending, but then it isn't a happy film.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Alice in Wonderland (1951)
"Alice in Wonderland" is a Disney animated feature that
is better than its reputation.  It is not as great as
some of the Disney features that preceded it, such as
"Snow White", "Dumbo", or "Pinocchio", but there is
still considerable charm in the animation, story,
and voice characterizations.
"Alice in Wonderland" is based on the 19th century 
Lewis Carroll book of the same name.  The book was written
as a satire.  Disney has tried to put some of the satire
into the film, but mostly emphasizes the silliness.
There is strong appeal for both children and adults.
Alice is an English girl, perhaps thirteen years old.
She fantasizes about a world where animals talk and
things aren't so logical, and finds herself in that
world.  She is determined to learn more about
a frazzled white rabbit, a search that leads to encounters
with various extremely silly characters.  One of them
is quite dangerous: the Queen of Hearts, who is fond
of beheading those who question her authority.
The animation is quite good.  In particular, the studio
has a knack for splashing liquids, and there is great
"choreography" of dancing playing card soldiers.
The story does have an edge to it.  The walrus eats
the oysters, the crocodile eats the fishes, and the
Queen beheads several playing cards.  This is in keeping
with the spirit of Carroll's writings, which have
the useful moral that gullibility is punished.
There are some slow parts to the story.  Alice gets
lost and cries.  The audience is supposed to feel
sorry for her, but this cold-hearted reviewer merely
lost interest.  There is also a song that the flowers sing
to Alice that isn't that interesting.
Whatever Alice eats in Wonderland has her either grow
or shrink considerably.  It is fortunate for her that
her clothes change size with her as well!  Also, her
hair and clothes never get wet or dirty or have red
paint sloshed on them despite all her adventures.  I guess
liberties need to be taken with cartoons.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Courtship of Eddie's Father, The (1963)
"The Music Man" and "The Courtship of Eddie's Father" have
much in common.  They're made only a year apart, and both
co-star Shirley Jones and Ron Howard.  Jones' isn't Howard's 
mother in either film, but she is his protector.  And Jones 
ends up with much older men in both movies.
Howard is Eddie, the son of Tom Corbett (Glenn Ford), who is 
a recent widower.  Ford still grieves for his lost wife, but 
already Howard is encouraging his interest in other women.  
But Howard mostly has his heart set on the nurse next door 
(Jones).  But Ford and Jones always end up quarreling, so 
Howard tries to get Ford to pick up the young redhead Dollye
(Stella Stevens).
Dolly is good-hearted but dim-witted, so she does not
meet Ford's standards.  For some reason, he pawns her off 
on Norman (Jerry Van Dyke), who is a womanizing, sweet-talking
disc jockey.  Ford is Van Dyke's boss, and frequently tells 
him to lay off the romance talk while on the air, with 
Van Dyke cheerfully ignoring him.
Van Dyke and Stevens soon become married, a curious character 
turn for Van Dyke.  But not as curious as their decision to
have their honeymoon in Montana.  Since their characters
aren't believable anyway, its just as well they aren't
heard from again.
Ford, who oddly enough has women falling all over him, meets
the wealthy and glamorous Rita Behrens (Dina Merrill).  Ford 
and Merrill are soon an item, but Howard doesn't like Merrill, 
probably because she is never at Ford's apartment, leaving 
Howard to be parented by the housekeeper and frequent visits 
from Jones.
Howard goes to summer camp.  Ford visits him there and
they have one of their father/son talks.  Ford explains
why you shouldn't give money to a girl, and Howard apologizes
for his girlfriend being fat.  But things go wrong when
Ford tells Howard that he is to ask Merrill to marry him.  There
are tears, and soon Howard runs away from camp in an attempt
to break up the marriage.  Howard shows up at Jones'
apartment.  This leads to another argument between Ford
and Jones with remarkably cruel volleys exchanged.
One has to admit that Ford is a versatile actor.  He can
play cool, angry, and heartbroken.  When Ford confronts
Howard about his running away, Ford truly looks disheveled
and devastated, just as he should be.
Merrill agrees to marry Ford if Howard is shipped off to 
relatives or a boarding school.  Ford sees the light and 
the romance is off, clearing the way for the inevitable 
reconciliation between Jones and Ford.  The moral is clear, 
widowers should pick the wife that most suits their young 
children, rather than themselves.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Bite the Bullet (1975)
"Bite the Bullet" is a Western drama with a good
cast and good cinematography.  However, the
characters aren't completely credible, and the
dialogue is only perfunctory, keeping the film
from the greatness that some have assigned to it.
"Bite the Bullet" takes place in the west, around
the turn of the century.  A lengthy horse race,
with a prize of $2,000, attracts disparate entries.
Gene Hackman and James Coburn are the big names.
Other contestants include Candice Bergen with a
bad husband, Jan-Michael Vincent with a bad attitude,
Mario Arteaga with a bad toothache, Ben Johnson
with a bad heart, and Ian Bannen who is merely
present.
The story should provide suspense, since the
audience doesn't know who will win the race.
But the suspense never happens.  All the contestants
except Vincent are bland and likeable, and one
has a strong suspicion that first-billed Hackman,
whose character is essentially perfect, is going
to cross the finish line first.
The competitors bring new meaning to the word
"sportsmanship", helping each other as if they were
on the same team.  The friendliness leads to a
pleasant but passionless film, with only Vincent
to throw in bad vibes.  Even Vincent's character,
however, suddenly becomes a nice guy after he
meets his comeuppance.
Bergen's designer jeans fit well, but don't fit
in with the late Victorian era of the film.
Richard Brooks was both Producer and Director,
and wrote the screenplay as well.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Spanking the Monkey (1994)
When is a black comedy not a comedy?  When the humor is
occasional and ironic, and when expressions of frustration
are incorrectly interpreted.  "Spanking the Monkey" is
a family drama and not a comedy, and its themes (which,
yes, include incest) are nothing to wink at.
Raymond (Jeremy Davies) has finished his first year of
pre-med at MIT, and has landed a desirable summer internship.
Unluckily, his attractive young mother (Alberta Watson)
has broken her leg and is bedridden.  Raymond's father
(Benjamin Hendrickson) is a struggling travelling
salesman.  Raymond is forced to forsake the internship and
play nurse to his mother, a duty which soon includes
giving her showers and massages, which lead to... well,
'nuff said.  Further complicating Raymond's life is a
forward but inexperienced neighbor girl (Carla Gallo).
Raymond's joyless family is in trouble.  The problems are so
deep as to be unsolvable.  Mom is bored, lonely, isolated and
sexually frustrated.  Dad is interested only in the family
dog, exercising control, and philandering.  Raymond wants to
escape the unhappy family for his internship, and lacks
sympathy for his parents' plight.  With Raymond at college,
Dad out on the road and Mom left home, the family
members seem driven apart from each other.
"Spanking the Monkey" was the debut feature for director
David Russell, who also wrote the script.  One source
says the budget was all of $80,000, but it couldn't
have been that low!  While the film has the feel of an
indy release, the cinematography is on a par with a major
studio release, and the casting is excellent.  "Spanking"
provides proof that all that is required of an excellent
film is good writing, direction and casting.  My favorite
supporting character is Aunt Helen (Judette Jones), whose
maternal eccentricities make her the film's only true
comic character.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Palm Beach Story, The (1942)
One of a series of successful comedies written and
directed by Preston Sturges, "The Palm Beach Story"
is funny and entertaining throughout.  The depiction
of the wealthy as eccentric and generous doesn't
always ring true, and sometimes the silliness gets
out of hand, such as when the rowdy gun club members
go on a rampage.  Still, all is forgiven in the
film's second half, which has Mary Astor and her pet
Toto (Sig Arno) in hilarious form.
Joel McCrae plays a struggling entrepreneur, whose
marriage to gold-digger Claudette Colbert is failing
due to money troubles.  Colbert leaves him with nothing
but the dress on her back, but through her feminine
wiles soon ends up in Palm Beach as the love interest
of bookish zillionaire John D. Hackensacker III
(Rudy Vallee).  The eternally grouchy McCrae arrives
to win her back, but instead is foisted upon Hackensacker's
aggressive, outrageous sister (Mary Astor).
I have always identified Astor with her role as the
femme fatale in "The Maltese Falcon".  But comedy is
her true genre, and she is given a marvelous character
and some great lines in this film.  Toto, her gibberish
speaking sidekick, is a marvelous comic invention, and
the sight of him with a tennis racket is a side-splitter.
McCrae's slow burn is also entertaining.  He spends
the entire film seething.
Colbert is not quite as effective, but her character is
more problematic.  She has the dual goals of leaving her
husband and making his fortune, and she has to walk the
line between keeping her honor and perpetuating a con
on Vallee.  The story would work better if Colbert would
dump grumpy McCrae and instead marry wealthy airhead Vallee,
but such an ending would break the code of 1942 Hollywood.
Sturges gets around this problem with a last minute plot
twist, which I won't spoil for you.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Reds (1981)
Warren Beatty co-produced, directed, co-wrote and
starred in "Reds", an ambitious 200-minute biography
of American communist John Reed.  The film was
nominated for an incredible twelve Academy Awards,
but the critical praise does not seem justified.
It features a romance based mostly upon petty
quarrels, a revolution consisting mostly of
speechmaking, and political intrigue filled mostly
with more petty bickering.
Adventurer/journalist Reed (Warren Beatty) meets
attractive artist/activist Louise Bryant (Diane Keaton)
just prior to the advent of World War I.  Soon, she
leaves her conservative husband for Reed.  She also
takes up with bitter playwright Eugene O'Neill (Jack
Nicholson).  Disillusioned with Wilson's declaration
of war against the Germans, the already radical Reed
becomes a communist.
Reed travels to Russia, where he chronicles the
revolution in his famous work, "Ten Days that Shook
the World".  After the war, he returns to America,
becomes a labor agitator and forms a communist
party.  Then, it's back to Russia, which is now
involved in a civil war against West-supported
'white' armies.  Reed suffers from hardships such as
imprisonment and declining health, and joins a committee
led by fiery Grigory Zinoviev (author Jerzy Kosinski).
Bryant makes an unlikely, selfless journey to Russia
to join Reed.  Maureen Stapleton plays Emma Goldman,
another noted American communist.  Gene Hackman
also shows up in a small role.
Beatty deserves respect for making such a finacially
risky and densely political epic.  By no means are
the Russian communists glorified.  Lenin is depicted
as a cold-blooded intellectual, while Stapleton's
character is used to demonstrate disillusionment
with the Bolsheviks' repressive dictatorship.  While
the politics are on target, the story focuses too
much on Keaton, whose character dominates the film's
first half.  Perhaps this was a marketing necessity
to bring women to the theatres, but any romantic
chemistry between Keaton and Beatty is quickly
trashed by their incessant arguments.
"Reds" won three Oscars, for Best Director, Best
Cinematography (Vittorio Storaro), and Best Supporting
Actress (Stapleton).  The film was nominated in all the
major categories, including Best Actor (Beatty), Best
Actress (Keaton), Best Supporting Actor (Nicholson),
Best Picture, and Best Original Screenplay (Beatty with
Trevor Griffiths).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Come Blow Your Horn (1963)
"Come Blow Your Horn" was an early, semi-autographical
Broadway success for playwright Neil Simon.  Norman
Lear, later of 1970s sitcom fame, wrote the screenplay.
Commercial success and critical acceptance were assured
when Frank Sinatra took the lead role.  Sinatra sings
the title song, but it is the only musical number.
"Come Blow Your Horn" is a comedy, with comfortable,
familiar characters and predictable plot turns.
Sinatra's presence is the film's chief asset: he gives
an excellent performance.
The story has 21-year-old Buddy (Tony Bill) leaving
home to live with his swinging, womanizing older brother
Alan (Sinatra).  Alan's conquests include dumb-dumb
blonde Peg (Jill St. John) and the smarter, more
troublesome Connie (Barbara Rush).  Alan teaches
Buddy the ropes, perhaps too well, as Buddy becomes
a more aggressive and successful hedonist than Alan
ever was.  Meanwhile, Alan is pressured into settling
down by Connie, his father, and even his brother, who
tells him that his swinging days are over.
None of the characters in "Come Blow Your Horn" will
surprise you.  They are all chosen from a familiar
set of light comedy stereotypes: the bellowing father
(Lee J. Cobb), the housekeeping-obsessed mother (Molly
Picon), the stupid blonde, the classy woman demanding
marriage, the swinging bachelor, the beefy jealous husband
(Dan Blocker), etc.  A recurring gag is somebody
unexpected at the door.  Buddy makes jarring character
transitions from innocent freeloader to smarmy con
artist, then back again.  Sinatra is old enough to
be Buddy's father.
Still, the patient viewer will find a few good jokes.
Dean Martin has a cameo as a wino, and Sinatra does
a brief impersonation of John F. Kennedy.  Cobb, a
highly successful veteran character actor ("On the
Waterfront") is well-cast as the blustering, foreign
born father.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Strapless (1989)
Lillian (Blair Brown) is vacationing in Italy by herself.
She is also beautiful, successful, single and unattached.
In a movie this is inevitably a setup for a new romance.
Raymond (Bruno Ganz), an older, well-dressed man with an
accent, approaches her in a Church.  He follows her around,
asking ever more personal questions.  Lillian is secretly
pleased, and offers only the most perfunctory resistance
to his queries.  Raymond manages to get lunch with her, 
and even makes an appointment with her at his hotel.
But as she is about to meet him, she has a change of heart.
She sees him standing at hotel's entrance, waiting for her
like a dog waits for his master.  Perhaps alarms are going
off in her head.
Lillian is an expatriot of the U.S., now working as a
government-paid doctor in England.  She shares a flat
with her sister Amy (Bridget Fonda), who doesn't look
anything like her.  Amy is not employed, sponges off
Lillian, and paints the town with her boyfriend-of-the-month, 
but this at least gives Lillian company and a social life.
Lillian returns to her life in England.  Soon, she finds
a large, beautiful, expensive horse outside her flat.  
Raymond has tracked her down to continue their courtship.
She tries to be firm with Raymond, but he is patient
and persistent.  She nearly agrees to marry him, but
stands him up at the Courthouse altar.  Instead, she
lives with him at a house he has apparently rented.
Raymond likes to ask questions, but doesn't like to
talk, especially about his profession.  He makes evasive
references to being a bullion dealer.  He takes her
gambling, loses significant money, and can't pay the
bill.  Lillian has to write a check, and we see the
flaw in Raymond's character: he's not responsible.
Despite this incident, Lillian marries Raymond.  Soon
Raymond is fleeing creditors under the pretense
of doing business abroad, leaving Lillian to pay his
debts.  Lillian investigates Raymond, visiting his
parents and discovering another abandoned wife 
(Raymond is a bigamist).
Lillian returns to her old flat with her sister, who is 
more slovenly than ever and now pregnant.  Lillian 
lectures Amy, as if she was her mother.  Miraculously, 
Amy's character is transformed, and she cleans up the house 
and her act, and even becomes a dress designer (with a 
thing for "Strapless" dresses).
There are some sub-plots involving Lillian's work
at the hospital.  Mr. Clark (Gary O'Brien) is her
cancer patient, whose decline is realistically portrayed.
The ending is a bit flat.  Lillian agrees to organize
a charity event, and gives a lengthy speech to fellow
doctors that wins thunderous applause.  At the charity
auction, Amy has designed all the dresses.  Yawn.
"Strapless" is a woman's movie.  There is a plot, but
it serves mostly to develop the relationships between
Lillian and her lover, her sister, and her patient.
There's lots of close-ups and no car chases or crashes.
It has the feel of a TV movie.  But, the film is
well directed and scripted.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb (1964)
Dr. Strangelove, or How I Learned to Stop
Worrying and Love the Bomb (1963)
One of the best films ever made, "Dr. Strangelove"
is a black comedy about a pending nuclear war.
You can argue that George C. Scott's rabid general
is too over the top, as is Dr. Strangelove's
misbehaving robotic arm, but other than those
minor complaints, the film is virtually perfect.
General Jack D. Ripper (Sterling Hayden) suddenly
becomes insane and orders his bomber wing to
drop nuclear bombs in Russia, much to the
consternation of polite staffer Lionel Mandrake
(Peter Sellers).  As the bombers approach their
targets, President Merkin Muffley (Peter Sellers)
holds an emergency meeting in the War Room.
Also there is warmonger Gen. Buck Turgidson (Scott),
the Russian ambassador (Peter Bull), and twisted
ex-Nazi Dr. Strangelove (Peter Sellers).
Muffley manages to stop all the bombers except
one, led by redneck Slim Pickens.  James Earl Jones,
in an early role, is part of the flight crew.
"Dr. Strangelove" was produced and directed by
Stanley Kubrick, who also co-wrote the screenplay
with Peter George and Terry Southern.  The script
is hilarious throughout.  Hayden's mad ramblings
about "precious bodily fluids", Muffley's exhortation
"Gentlemen, you can't fight in here. This is the
War Room", Picken's jingoistic pep talk to his crew,
Muffley's phone conversations with a drunken Soviet
premier, Dr. Strangelove's wild schemes of mine shaft
harems, Keenan Wynn's warning "You'll have to answer
to the Coca-Cola company", the omnipresent signs
on the Army Base that read "Peace is Our Mission",
are only the highlights.
Sellers plays three roles.  He attempted Picken's
role as well, but proved unable to adopt a convincing
Texas accent.  Many of Seller's lines were improvised.
Sellers really was a comic genius, and was used by
Kubrick in his previous film, the black comedy "Lolita".
"Dr. Strangelove" received four major Oscar nominations:
Best Actor (Sellers), Best Adapted Screenplay, Best
Director and Best Picture.  But this was the year of
"My Fair Lady", which swept most of the major awards.
The Academy Award's favoritism towards colorful
big-budget musicals (e.g. "Gigi", "The Sound of Music",
"West Side Story") was never more evident.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Days of Wine and Roses (1962)
Alcoholism is an excellent dramatic theme.  The
director is given many ideas to work from.  The
personalities and fortunes of the characters
can be contrasted before and after they have been
drinking.  The effects on their health, both mental
and physical, their families, and their job can
be explored.  There can be an enabling character,
who helps the alcoholic remain afloat.  There can be
a rescuer, who attempts to stop the alcoholic from
drinking.  There can be recoveries and relapses, hopes
raised and dashed.  And the ending is in limbo,
maintaining suspense.
So it is no wonder that there have been many good
films about alcoholics.  "The Lost Weekend" is
probably the best of the genre, but "Days of Wine
and Roses" is also very good.  Blake Edwards directed
and Jack Lemmon has the lead role, although both are
better known for comedies.  While the script is
sometimes heavy-handed, and one suspects that the great
majority of alcoholics do not fall from successful
businessman to flophouse bum, the symptoms and effects
of excessive drinkings are effectively depicted.
Jack Lemmon is a gregarious public relations executive,
who wooes and wins waifish Lee Remick.  Lemmon is
already an alcoholic, and soon Remick is one as well.
Things go from bad to worse, with Lemmon losing his
job, and Remick neglecting her child.  Charles Bickford
plays Remick's sullen father, an enabler who even
offers Lemmon a drink.  Hope arrives with rescuer
and Alcoholics Anonymous member Jack Klugman, but
can Lemmon overcome his dependency and save his marriage?
The second half of the film has several extraordinary
scenes.  Lemmon is shown in a straightjacket: screaming,
kicking, biting, and sweating.  Later, he is strapped
on a bed for days, delirious and half-naked.  Remick
comes off little better, shown comatose on a couch,
drinking heavily and watching Warner Brothers cartoons.
(At least Remick remains loyal to the studio that is
producing the film.)  While unintentionally entertaining,
these scenes validate Klugman's prediction: sooner or
later the bottle becomes God.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Tarzan and His Mate (1934)
"Tarzan and His Mate" is an early Tarzan picture that is
an improvement over later films in the series, but still
lacks the quality to pass for anything above escapist
entertainment.
The plot has white ivory hunters using Tarzan to locate
and plunder a huge elephant graveyard of ivory tusks.
The hunters encounter resistance from enemy african tribes
and organized animal armies.  Jane tries to help the
hunters, one of them a discarded beau, getting in frequent
trouble and requiring rescue from Tarzan.
The film starts slowly, with our two safari-clad hunters
talking to various uninteresting white people we never see again.
The expedition begins for the ivory.  An enormous number of
Africans are hired for labor, and are cruelly used, even
shot, by the reckless expedition head.  There is a disorganized
battle with an opposing tribe, and an unlikely confrontation
with rock throwing apes.  Finally, we meet Tarzan, as he prevents
the apes from further killing off unlucky Africans.
Tarzan rules the apes and the elephants.  Heaven knows how he
has trained him, but they obey without question.  He has no
power over "bad" animals, such as lions, rhinos and crocodiles.
When he makes the mistake of leaving Jane's side, she ends
up trapped by these bad creatures, but Tarzan comes to the
rescue when called.  The lion and rhino fights are good stunts,
but the crocodile is an obvious spinning dummy.  These scenes
are possibly derived from "King Kong" (1933) which had
the big ape battling various dinosaurs to impress Fay Wray.
The wild finale involves an army of lions who for no apparent
reason are after the hunters, and even attack an opposing army
of elephants.  Tarzan is the improbable victor of a series of
one-on-one battles with enormous lions.
It is refreshing to see Jane with more sensuality than clothes,
and a sense of adventure sparks the movie.  The sets are
impressive as well.  However, muddled direction and plot keep the 
film from being more than watchable.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Late Show, The (1977)
"The Late Show" is a crime drama starring Art Carney as an
aging private eye and Lily Tomlin as his eccentric sidekick.
The action is sometimes muddled, and perhaps Carney's
character is too much on top of things, but the
film is redeemed by a good script.
Tomlin tries to hire Carney to return her kidnapped cat,
who is being held by a drug dealer that Tomlin owes money
to.  Carney isn't interested until his friend Howard Duff
is murdered, and evidence ties to the two crimes to the
same culprit.  Along with small-time fence Bill Macy
(the husband from "Maude"), Tomlin and Carney have multiple
confrontations with bad guys who are burglars and murderers.
The trail leads to gregarious fence Eugene Roche, his
femme fatale wife Joanna Cassidy, and his dim-witted bodyguard.
Your enjoyment of this film may be proportional to your
sympathy for Carney's character.  Perhaps the film should
have been titled "The Geezer Gumshoe" instead.  Carney
always seems to know what will happen next, and has a
predictable but platonic relationship with Tomlin.
"The Late Show" is similar in spirit to 1940s detective
flicks such as "The Maltese Falcon" and "The Big Sleep",
but with the more graphic language and violence typical
of 1970s crime dramas.  Especially derivative is Cassidy's
character, the beautiful but deadly woman capable of
murder and incapable of telling the truth.  Mary Astor's
character from "The Maltese Falcon" was much more enjoyable.
Still, the plot twists typical of the genre keep things
interesting, and Tomlin and Carney have a good screen chemistry.
Robert Benton directed the film, as well as wrote the script.
Benton has many successful films under his belt as director
and/or writer, including "Bonnie and Clyde", "Superman",
"Kramer vs. Kramer" and "Places in the Heart".  Carney would
make an even better film a few years later, "Going in Style".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Once Upon a Time in America (1984)
There are people who believe that most movies should be
ninety minutes or less in length.  Anything more, and the
storyline and tension becomes diluted.
Perhaps that is the case for most directors, but definitely
not for Sergio Leone, who was a master at making films that
challenged the audience's kidneys.  His best movies:
"The Good, the Bad, and the Ugly", "Once Upon a Time in
the West", and "Once Upon a Time in America", all take
their time, with the focus on cinematography rather than
script.
"Once Upon a Time in America" was his last direction, and it
could be his best.  It tells the story of the rise and
fall of New York Jewish mobsters, covering a time period
from the early 1920s to the late 1960s.  Robert De Niro
and James Woods have the leading roles, with Elizabeth McGovern
and Tuesday Weld playing their girlfriends.
The film goes on and on for nearly four hours.  This led to
heavy cuts by the studio that damaged the continuity, but
most of the film's length has since been restored.  There
are some scenes that are drawn out. For example, De Niro spends
a few minutes stirring the coffee while his fellow gangsters
impatiently wait for him to speak his mind.  But mostly
the length is due to the depth of the story, which is really
three films in one: the mobsters as adolescents, young adults,
and middle aged men.
De Niro and Woods are the leaders of their gang.  They may
be lifetime friends, but they are also rivals, with differing
ambitions.  Woods is looking for the big score at any cost,
while De Niro is content with a local fiefdom that plays
by his rules, valuing friendship and avoiding giving control
to strangers.  This leads to inevitable conflicts between
Woods and De Niro, and it doesn't help that Woods is unstable
while De Niro is prone to depression.
For an Italian director, Leone had a great interest in
American mythology, especially the West.  His attempt at
capturing the Prohibition era results in an outstanding film.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Blaue Engel, Der (1930)
"Der Blaue Engel" is a German film better known by its
English translation title, "The Blue Angel".  Two versions were
filmed simultaneously, with the same cast, one in English
and one in German.  The version discussed here is in English.
I have heard that the German language version is better,
but that may only be because it is easier to read the
English subtitles than to decipher the thick German accents
of the actors.  Having been made very early in the talkie era
does not help matters, as the sound quality is only adequate.
The story takes place in Germany during the 1920s.
A High School professor (Emil Jannings) has some rowdy
pupils in his class.  These students frequently visit a
disreputable nightclub (The Blue Angel).  When Jannings
learns of this, he visits the nightclub to catch them
in the act.  But instead of catching them, he falls in
love with a showgirl (Marlene Dietrich), resulting in
his ruin.
At the time, Jannings was a much bigger star than Dietrich.
He had made dozens of German films, and had recently won
the 1929 Academy Award for Best Actor (for both "The Way of
All Flesh" and "The Last Command").  While Dietrich's
role is much smaller, it catapulted her to Hollywood stardom.
She would never make another German film.  Curiously, it
is the only German title credited to the director,
Austrian-born Josef von Sternberg, who had a lengthy but
stormy career in Hollywood.
In the U.S., a high school teacher is not a high status
position, and the wages are much lower than that person
could make in the business world.  In Germany during the 1920s,
a high school professor was apparently very well respected.
The students stand at attention when he enters the room,
and fear his wrath.  At the nightclub, the entertainers
refer to him by title, and even bow to him.  Perhaps this
help makes the romance between Jannings and Dietrich more
believable, as what the glamorous showgirl sees in the
unkempt, stodgy, middle-aged man is beyond my understanding.
The film's strength does not come from Dietrich but
from Janning's character.  From the film's beginning,
he is shown to be somewhat foolish, but as his fortunes change,
he becomes bitter, and later humiliated and frightened.
Perhaps the lesson is that we all have a certain place
in society and life, and changing that position can only
lead to trouble.  This pessimistic view is unusual for
the cinema, which even in themes of tragic love have both
partners remain in good faith, and more often promotes the
notion that true love conquers all.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Clockwork Orange, A (1971)
Stanley Kubrick's "A Clockwork Orange" had to stun
its audiences upon release in 1971.  Like his previous
film, "2001: A Space Odyssey", Kubrick had violated
enough taboos to stretch the envelope of cinema:
what was previously unacceptable could now be done.
The contribution of "Clockwork" wasn't just the explicit
sexual violence and nudity, which had to be somewhat
edited to avoid an 'X' rating, but the film's misanthropic
attitude and bizarre sets.  The film covers sadistic
anarchy, black comedy, and deep cynicism of governmental
power. The whole cast is irredeemable except for the
prison chaplain (Godfrey Quigley), whose task in reforming
hardened criminals is presented as hopeless.
The lead (Alex, played by Malcolm McDowell) brings new
meaning to the term anti-hero.  He is a vicious, sadistic
monster who lives a nighttime fantasy life of beatings,
robbery and rapings, in which he is always the one delivering
the punishment.  As in "2001", a classic score dominates,
with Beethoven giving Alex the inspiration for his criminal
activities, which are luridly and explicitly depicted.
Alex's desire to control his fellow gang members backfires
when he is betrayed by them after committing a murder.
Alex is sentenced to prison, where he pretends to be
a born-again Christian to facilitate his release.
Alex's desire for freedom makes him a volunteer for
a brainwashing experiment, which makes him physically
nauseated when confronted with thoughts of sex or
violence.  Upon release, Alex can't escape his past,
as his former victims delight in their revenge on their
now-helpless past tormentor.
While I don't sympathize with Malcolm's character, I
do feel sorry for Malcolm.  Kubrick puts him through
the works: those eyeball clamps look painful, and it
couldn't have been much fun to lick shoes, get dunked
underwater for who knows how many takes, be trussed up
in a cast, plopped in spaghetti, etc.  Did he have a
stunt double?
Kubrick freely mixes the shocking and ironic with
blatant black humor.  The prison guard character
(Michael Bates) seems out of a Monty Python sketch,
while Malcolm's parents are stupid and maudlin.
Alex has a sculpture depicting a Jesus chorus line,
and commits a murder with a sculpture of a sexual
organ.  Kubrick skewers both conservative and liberal
politics, with the cynical, manipulative Minister
of the Interior (Anthony Sharp) no worse than the
half-mad 'subversive' writer (Patrick Magee).
By the way, there is another film in the American
Film Institute Top 100 that has even more nudity
and violence: "Schindler's List".  Presentation is
everything.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Braveheart (1995)
"Braveheart" is a very good film despite serious flaws.  The
cinematography, costumes, and direction is excellent and
generally overcomes problems with plot and character development.
"Braveheart" takes place in Scotland, during the Dark Ages.
Scotland is repressed by England, led by brutal King Longshanks.
William Wallace (Mel Gibson), a Scot commoner, avenges the 
death of his father, grandfather, wife, etc. the hands of 
the British by leading the Scots in a war for freedom.
There may be some spoilers in the following paragraphs.
Historical accuracy in epics is not always important to
a film's quality.  Any film that is not a documentary should
be considered fiction, anyway.  However, if history is to
be rewritten for the sake of simplification (Scots are
just and good, Brits are cynical and bad) or drama (Longshanks' 
son is gay, and Wallace beds the Princess of Wales) it should 
at least be credible.
I thought that there was excessive violence in the film.
There are endless spearings, stabbings, beatings, etc.
"Braveheart" appears to be both pro-violence and pro-war.
Wallace is invincible in hand-to-hand conflict, killing at
least a dozen Brits, including several after an arrow
has punctured his chest.
To justify the carnage, the British king is depicted as
evil incarnate, needing only to shoot lightning out of
his fingers to match the wickedness of the emperor in
the Star Wars films.
I didn't like the character of Longshanks son.  He is so
homosexual that he can't kiss his gorgeous bride at his 
wedding.  His hair and clothes are sissy.  He has a lover 
who is pushed off a tower by Longshanks, and no doubt 
the audience is expected to applaud this gesture.
Surely Hollywood should be beyond such depiction by now.
In a three hour film, I counted four women who have lines.
Two of the characters are very minor, the other two are
very beautiful women, one of whom is Wallace's wife, while
the other bears his child.  In the world of "Braveheart",
women only serve to supplement Wallace's manhood.
Despite these annoying flaws, I still believe that
"Braveheart" is a very good film.  The major redemption
comes from the cinematography.  The forests, valleys are
villages of Scotland are filmed in panning shots to full
advantage.  The costumes are great, and Gibson's direction
(the aforementioned problems can be blamed on the story)
is also excellent.  The length of the film and its slow
pace also help, since it broadens the characters and
builds the dramatic tension.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Baby Doll (1956)
"Baby Doll" was considered shocking when it was first released.
At this much later date, it just seems contrived. Tennessee 
Williams  wrote the screenplay, and Elia Kazan directed.
The film stars Carroll Baker as the title character, a gorgeous 
young woman who has been married for the past year to failed
businessman Karl Malden.  It was a precondition for their marriage
that it would not be consummated until its first anniversary,
which is now pending.  Malden, desperate to revive his business
and gain access to his wife's bed, burns down the plant of his
arch-rival Eli Wallach.  His plan succeeds at first, as Wallach
must use Malden's facilities to produce his cotton.  But Wallach
and Baker begin a liason that could prove Malden's undoing.
There are two kinds of people who will enjoy this movie: those
who would like to see Karl Malden act like an idiot, and those
who would like to see Carroll Baker wearing skimpy clothes.  
Admittedly, many people fall into one or both categories, 
but more is expected of "Baby Doll", which somehow was nominated 
for several Oscars.
The opening scene has Malden peeping through a hole in a wall
at Baker, who is sleeping in a crib and sucking her thumb.
This sets the tone for the movie, as Malden behaves like a
reckless idiot and Baker acts like she is half her age.
It is difficult to like or sympathize with any of the leading
characters, who are selfish and even criminal.
There are several conversations between Wallach and Baker
that seem endless, as he first sizes her up and then tries 
to win her.  Baker's motivation to fall for Wallach seems
suspect, coming right after he has threatened to kill her.
The arguments between Malden and Baker that open the film 
are much more entertaining.
There are several black actors in this film, but they
are given racist parts.  They are shown idly passing 
time, dissipated, laughing at everything but doing nothing.
"Baby Doll" also doesn't seem to know whether it is a comedy
or a drama.  Perhaps it would have worked better strictly as
a comedy.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Christmas Story, A (1983)
Back in December, the cable station TNT showed "A Christmas Story"
twelve consecutive times.  The film has become the most televised
Christmas movie, relegating "It's a Wonderful Life" to benchwarmer
status.
It is a story of about one month of Ralphie's life.  Ralphie
is a boy, about nine years old, growing up in a middle class
neighborhood during the (late?) 1930s.  He dreams of getting
a BB gun for Christmas, waits anxiously for his Little Orphan
Annie package to arrive in the mail, and suffers indignities
at the hands of the local bully.  The narrator is Ralphie
grown up, and his nostalgic and whimsical (but never patronizing)
comments bring across what it feels like to be a kid.
My favorite narrated line is "getting ready for school was
like preparing for deep sea diving", delivered as the kid
brother is weighed down by layers of winter clothing.
Darren McGavin plays Ralphie's father.  His character is
excitable and gregarious, and he plays it so winningly that
you forget that he is old enough to be Ralphie's grandfather.
Why is "A Christmas Story" so popular?  Because it's funny!
It is a rare comedy in which nearly all the scenes work, and
repeated viewings only add to the fun, since one catches things
that were missed the first time around.  For example, before the
mother sets out to "accidently" break father's ridiculous 
leg lamp, she has a knowing look on her face and has waited until
father is distracted by fighting the wheezing furnace.  And when
father whispers to mother the shocking obscenity that Ralphie
had just uttered, his young brother leans forward to overhear
with a huge grin on his face.
There is a department store Santa who definitely does not have
the Christmas spirit, and his elf helpers are even more surly
than he is.  One of the most intimidating Santas in film history,
it is no wonder that kids start crying as soon as they are dragged
by elf helpers to his lap.  Great stuff.
Only a few minor criticisms.  A joke about the word 'fragile'
doesn't come off.  Also, the film may have been secretly funded
by the milk lobby, as many kitchen scenes feature a large, full
milk bottle, and then there's the decoder ring secret...
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
Jay Roach directed this silly spoof of mid-1960s
pop culture, but co-producer/screenwriter/lead actor
Mike Myers is clearly the man in charge.  He plays
the two key (and most outrageous) roles, and the
loose, gag-ridden script seems patterned after his
other great commercial success, "Wayne's World"
from 1992.
I can't say that I 'got' all the 1960s references.
>From "Goldfinger" we have Alotta Fagina (aka Pussy Galore)
and Random Task (aka Oddjob).  From "You Only Live Twice"
there's Dr. Evil (aka Blofeld) and his cat.  I'm sure
there are others, but I haven't seen the Matt Helm
films, and memories blur the escapist action spy movies
together anyway.
The story begins in 1967.  Austin Powers is a
goofy-looking ladies man and special agent, chasing
arch enemy and bad guy Dr. Evil.  Both roles are played
by hammy Mike Myers.  A plot contrivance has both men
cryogenetically frozen until 1997.  They discover that
the world, and culture, has changed; but they resume
their old rivalry and livestyles anyway.  Myers is
provided with love interest Elizabeth Hurley, who is
disgusted with him at first but of course soon comes
around.  Dr. Evil is introduced to his estranged son
Scotty (Seth Green) and inevitably hatches a scheme
that threatens to destroy the world.
Like most screwball comedies with thin plots, the
humor is hit and miss.  The best joke is a reference
to Lucky Charms cereal.  Dr. Evil and Scotty have
some silly arguments that are funny (the group therapy
scene, and a disagreement on the best method to kill
Austin Powers).
But the gags can fall flat as well: Austin's mincing
funny faces, faux chest hair, and references to his bad
teeth.  There is much bathroom humor, which panders
successfully to teen demographics who haven't seen
"Goldfinger".  One gag is especially flogged to death:
Austin and Hurley naked, with various inanimate objects
raised to substitute for body parts that would not be
shown on commercial TV.
Instead of seeing a mediocre satire about the mid-60s,
why not see a contemporary satire from the mid-60s?
"I Love You, Alice B. Toklas!" will fit the bill nicely,
and it stars Peter Sellers instead of a lesser imitation.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for In the Heat of the Night (1967)
"In the Heat of the Night" is a detective story
that takes place in rural Mississippi.  A wealthy
businessman has been killed.  An odd couple is
on the case: a black detective visiting from
Philadelphia (Sidney Poitier) and the local
redneck sheriff (Rod Steiger).  Poitier must
overcome the mass stupidity and racism of the
podunk town to find the murderer.
"In the Heat of the Night" won the Academy Award
for Best Picture.  White guilt over having denied
black actors decent roles for the previous half
century may have played a role.  It was considered
a seminal film upon release for its condemnation of
bigotry.
Ironically, the film is in itself bigoted: it
supports the common prejudice that rural white
Southerners are ignorant, violent and racist no-accounts.
Even the Mayor ("Patty Duke Show" dad William Schallert)
believes that a black man should be shot if he slaps
a white man, while the sheriff denies black men
their names, calling them "boy".  The townsfolk
dress as if they shop for clothes at Goodwill.
No doubt racism is rampant, in the South as well as
the North, in the 1960s as well as now.  But the film
goes to far in making its point, losing credibility
in its shrillness.  Poitier's use of slang
(e.g. "Can you dig it?") also dates the film.
To be fair, the story never drags, and the title song
(performed by Ray Charles) is outstanding.
Steiger won Best Actor for his performance.  His
character gradually gains respect for Poitier,
and by film's end they have nearly become friends.
"In the Heat of the Night" spawned two sequels
starring Poitier, and a long-running television series.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Shop of Horrors, The (1960)
For those who like their comedy black, with no
cream or sugar, "The Little Shop of Horrors" is
for you.  Made in two days with a cast of unknowns,
with a script written in under a week, and featuring
a story about a talking man-eating plant, the
film is far better than it has any expectation of
being.
Gravis Mushnick (Mel Welles) runs a struggling skid row
florist shop.  Other employees are clumsy fool Seymour
(Jonathan Haze) and ebullient dimwit Audrey (Jackie Joseph).
Seymour's hilariously hypocondriac mother is played by
Myrle Vail.  Seymour can only keep his pathetic job if
he can nurse to health an unusual crowd-drawing plant,
a plant that needs human blood in order to grow.
Seymour sort-of commits a series of murders to feed
the plant, which soon overruns the florist shop.
The legend behind "The Little Shop of Horrors" is
that a studio executive gave low-budget director
Roger Corman a challenge: to make a film using a
storefront set before it was to be torn down.  Necessity
is the mother of art as well as invention, and
"The Little Shop of Horrors" could be Corman's best
film.  Charles Griffith, who had previously collaborated
with Corman on the cult classic "A Bucket of Blood",
wrote the viciously funny script.
Ignored upon release, "The Little Shop of Horrors"
slowly gained notoriety over the years.  Its status
of a cult film was helped by the presence of then-
obscure Jack Nicholson, who has a small part as a
lunatic masochistic dental patient.  The film was
remade as "Please Don't Eat My Mother" (1972)
and the sequel was "Little Shop" (1991).  It eventually
become a Broadway musical, which became an excellent
film version in 1986.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Treasure of the Sierra Madre, The (1948)
The Treasure of the Sierra Madre (1948)
"The Treasure of the Sierra Madre" is an outstanding film
that demonstrates how greed can corrupt one's soul.
Humphrey Bogart delivers one of his most memorable
performances playing a scraggly down-and-outer,
whose gold prospecting windfall leads only to paranoia
and violence.
The story begins with Bogart and fellow bum Tim Holt
living a marginal existence in rural Mexico in 1925.
After winning a small lottery and meeting old-timer
prospector Walter Huston, the three seek their fortune
in the Sierra Madre mountains, a dangerous land where
water is scarce and bandits are common.
After the trio discover and mine a gold bonanza, Bogart
becomes mentally unstable.  His mind plays paranoid
tricks on him, and he turns to violence.  Bogart did not
receive an Academy Award nomination for his role, but
certainly he deserved one.  He often played characters
that were either good or evil, but were on the wise and
in control of their circumstances.  Bogart's character
here is not as smart as he thinks he is, and is controlled
by external events.
The supporting cast is very entertaining.  We soon
encounter the director, John Huston, playing a man in
a white suit who disdainfully gives pesos to a begging
Bogart.  Huston won Oscars for both Best Director and
Best Script.  Incredibly, these would be the only Academy
Awards of his career, which included work on such films
as "The Maltese Falcon", "The African Queen" and
"The Alphalt Jungle".
In a cantina, there is a great performance by
a Mexican boy peddling lottery tickets.  The kid turns
out to be Robert Blake, age 14 but looking and sounding
much younger.
Walter Huston, John Huston's father, is dynamic as the clever
old-timer, who always knows what to do in every situation.
He won the Best Supporting Actor Oscar for his role.
Although boring white-bread Bruce Bennett gets fourth billing,
that billing was more deserved by Alfonso Bedoya, who plays
a bandit leader.  His character is treacherous and mercurial,
and he has the film's most memorable line: "I don't have to
show you any stinkin' badges!"
I think that "Treasure of the Sierra Madre" is a little
better than "The Maltese Falcon", and thus is probably the
best film that John Huston directed.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Always Outnumbered (1998) (TV)
Made-for-television movies do not get the respect they sometimes
deserve.  HBO made one of the best films last year, "Don King: Only
in America", and "Always Outnumbered" is one of the best films of
this year.  But these films are relegated to instant obscurity,
because the only screens that they are shown on reside in living
rooms and bedrooms.
"Always Outnumbered" stars Laurence Fishburne as ex-convict
Socrates Fortlow, paroled after serving a long sentence for double
murder.  He has moved to a Los Angeles ghetto, and ekes out an
existence collecting bottles and cans from dumpsters.  He tries to
get a better job, but his stubborness and intimidating presence
interfere.
With little going for him except pride and determination,
Fortlow has more success helping others than himself.
He semi-adopts a young street kid (Daniel Williams), steering
him away from a gang.  He helps save the marriage of a troubled
neighbor couple, and gets medical help for a an aging, ailing
friend (Bill Cobbs).
While Fortlow becomes a hero, his achievements are not just
due to his integrity.  He is a big, intimidating man, and he
regularly takes advantage of his size to get his points across.
A lesson here is that if you must live in poverty, it really
helps to be built like a linebacker.
Walter Mosley, who also wrote the book, wrote the screenplay.
He probably deserves even more credit than director Michael Apted.
The script is outstanding, with the only flaws showing up
at the film's end, when the loose ends are all tied up perhaps
too neatly.  Early scenes also threaten to stereotype minor white
characters as jerks, but this tendency is overcome later
in the film.
It is possible that "Always Outnumbered" would not be successful
as a theatrical release, despite its quality.  Fishburne, Cobbs
and Natalie Cole are a generation older than young filmgoers who
might prefer to see Will Smith.  The depiction of urban poverty and
youth gangs is not glamorized.  There is no room for comedy
in this stark drama.  Once again, we can be grateful for HBO
for ignoring demographics and simply producing an excellent film.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Stone Boy, The (1984)
Grief is a terrible thing.  It saps your energy,
your motivation, your focus and even your feelings.
Grief is still worse when mixed with guilt:
not only must you deal with the loss, but also with
the fact that it is you who is responsible.
And if you are also a minor, it is worse still,
as you are unable to change your environment
and must face the blame and loss every day.
Twelve year old Arnold Hillerman (Jason Presson)
lives on a farm in Montana with his brother Eugene
(Dean Cain), sister Nora (Susan Blackstone) and
parents Joe (Robert Duvall) and Ruth (Glenn Close).
A freak hunting accident leaves Eugene dead and
Arnold responsible.  The family must get through
not only their grief, but also their buried
resentment against Arnold.  Arnold, feeling shunned,
is unable to express his grief and guilt to the
degree his parents expect.
Arnold moves in with this gentle, wise grandfather
(Wilford Brimley).  Meanwhile, Eugene's girlfriend
Amalie (Cindy Fisher) becomes involved with Ruth's
brother Andy (Frederic Forrest).  Since Andy is married
to Lu (Gail Youngs), this leads to the disintegration
of their marriage.  Linda Hamilton has a small role
as a bus passenger.
The script was based on a short story by Gina Berriault,
who also co-wrote the screenplay.  Dean Cain (Eugene)
is the son of the director, Christopher Cain, while
Gail Youngs was Duvall's wife at the time of filming.
"The Stone Boy" is slow at times, with the film's
sad tone interrupted only by Forrest's abrasive,
bullying character.  At one point, Arnold runs away
from home to visit Reno, Nevada: nobody even considers
calling the police.  Still, "The Stone Boy" is well
cast and succeeds as a tearjerker, without manipulative
characters or plot.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sand Pebbles, The (1966)
"The Sand Pebbles" was a lengthy, expensive,
highly dramatic epic.  A risky proposition
for 20th Century Fox, their confidence in
Producer/Director Robert Wise was redeemed
when the film proved commercially successful
and received eight Academy Award nominations.
Set in China of 1926, Steve McQueen played the
lead role, sailor and engineer Jake Holman.
Holman transfers to the small warship San Pablo,
which is nicknamed 'Sand Pebbles' by its crew.
Holman wants to be left alone to maintain
the ship's engine, only to learn that Chinese
'coolies' perform all actual on-board work.
Humorless, dramatic Captain Collins (Richard Crenna)
prefers it this way, to free up the sailors for
an on-deck show of force, designed to intimidate
China.
Holman's campaign against the 'coolies' (he
also refers to them as 'slope-heads') makes
him unpopular with the crew.  Later, Holman
changes his racist ways, befriending his
engine room trainee Po-han (Mako).  Holman even
trains him to fight loudmouthed bully Stawski
(Oakland).  Holman also befriends Frenchy
(Richard Attenborough, who has to hide his
British accent) who is in love with well-
educated, mixed blood Maily (Marayat Andriane).
These actions make Holman even more unpopular
with the crew, who consider Po-han to be a grunt
and Maily to be a prostitute.
Civil War rages across China, threatening the
lives of American missionaries.  Collins
violates orders to send the San Pablo on a
rescue mission, one of whom (Candice Bergen,
in an early role) has a big crush on Holman.
"The Sand Pebbles" is nearly three hours long,
but has few unnecessary scenes.  The sets are
impressive, especially the old steam engine and
the fleet of Chinese junks.  The cast is excellent
as well, with only Crenna's curious angst
marring the performances.  The film's biggest
problem is that that the non-officer sailors all
seem to be stupid savages, except for Frenchy and
Holman.  The crew is also frequently insubordinate
to Collins, apparently for dramatic purposes.
The Oscar nominations included Best Picture,
Best Actor (McQueen), Best Supporting Actor
(Mako) and Best Color Cinematography (Joseph
MacDonald).  The film failed to take any trophies,
most instead going to the costume drama "A Man For
All Seasons".
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for High Noon (1952)
"High Noon" is one of the best Western films ever
made, but it is really about character: doing what
you believe is right, even if nobody supports you,
even if it means risking your life.  Gary Cooper's
Will Kane is the very definition of 'character' and
'duty'.
Cooper is retiring as the sheriff of a small town,
to run a store in a distant town with young bride
Grace Kelly (in her first significant role).  He is
about to leave town when a telegram arrives: four
ex-convict gunmen are coming to town at Noon to kill
him, since he was the man who sent them 'up the river.'
Cooper is unable to get anyone to stand with him
against the gunmen.  His friends tell him to leave
town, his enemies simply want him dead.  Cooper
must face the gunmen alone.
Will Kane's character keeps him from getting help.
He turns down help from several people who are too
young or too incompetent to face the gunmen.  He
refuses to strike a deal with immature deputy Lloyd
Bridges, because it would not be the right thing to
do.  He asks, but does not demand or cajole, others
to stand with him.  His new bride threatens to leave
him if he stays, but Kane won't turn from duty.
During the climatic gun battle, he takes the time to
free horses from a burning barn, and he steps in
front of a gun to prevent his wife from being taken
hostage.  All of this for an undeserving, ungrateful
town.
This example of exemplary character reminds me
of "A Man For All Seasons", which had Sir Thomas More
refusing to sanction the divorce of King Henry VIII.
Kane, and More, value their integrity more than their
lives, even more than their family's welfare.  They
will do what they feel is right, despite friends and
family telling them to do otherwise.  But while More
fought his lost cause with words, Kane is not a man
of words.  He spends much of the film in stunned silence,
disbelieving that no one will stand by him.  Without
complex arguments to support himself, Kane is even
more alone than More was.  Both films were directed
by Fred Zinnemann.
The film's tension is ever present and increasing.
There are frequent shots of various clocks, with the
hands approaching Noon.  Like "Rope", the movie was
filmed in real-time.  There is only one comic relief
from the tension: when the children are herded from
the church, they shout in delight at their unexpected
freedom.
"High Noon" has only three obvious flaws.  The theme,
sung by Tex Ritter in a baleful drone, is reprised
again and again.  (It did win the Oscar for Best Song).
There is also a fight scene between Cooper and Bridges
that doesn't quite fit.  The four gunmen are
interchangeable bad guy stereotypes, but admittedly
their characters are not important to the story.
Cooper won Best Actor, and Katy Jurado won Best
Supporting Actress.  Her character somehow manages to
be the former girlfriend of Cooper, Bridges and
Ian MacDonald, who plays the lead bad guy.
Zinnemann was nominated for Best Director, and the
film was nominated for Best Picture and for the
script.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Philadelphia Story, The (1940)
It's time for the quiz show, Name That Movie!
A 1940 film starring Cary Grant, based on a play,
in which he tries to break up his ex-wife's next-day
marriage to a man who isn't right for her.  "His Girl
Friday"! Bzzzzt, wrong answer.
Let's try again.  This comedy co-stars Cary Grant
and Katherine Hepburn.  Their romance is threatened
by a next-day marriage by one of them to a third party.
"Bringing Up Baby"!   Bzzzt, wrong again.
The correct answer is "The Philadelphia Story".
This film asks the question, should Katherine
Hepburn cancel the wedding with uptight John Howard,
and instead marry awkward writer Jimmy Stewart, or
perhaps meddlesome ex-husband Cary Grant?  Anyone
who has a seen a film before can safely answer, YES.
With famous names like Stewart, Grant, and Hepburn,
and with well-regarded director George Cukor in
control, how could the film go wrong?  The problem
isn't so much the familiar storyline, which is
complicated by the addition of humble secondary love
interest Ruth Hussey, and numerous extraneous and
stereotypical family members.  The problem is with the
script, which isn't nearly as funny as the writers
believe it to be.  The effect is one comic scene after
another that falls short, like the routine of a mediocre
comic that messes up all his jokes.
How, then, does one account for the great critical
and commercial success of the film?  Perhaps the
impressive cast helped, and perhaps folks caught
in the continuing Depression enjoyed laughing at
the foibles of the well-to-do set.  Or, perhaps I
have simply misinterpreted the film.
James Stewart won Best Actor for his performance.
Perhaps he deserved it, for surviving the lines that
he had to deliver.  His character rapidly changes
from caustic to shameless in his devotion for Hepburn.
They have a "drunk" scene together which perpetuates
the myth of the funny drunk who can't stop hiccupping.
Somehow, Donald Ogden Stewart won the Academy Award
for Best Screenplay, despite competition from films
such as "The Grapes of Wrath" and "Rebecca".
Cukor was nominated for Best Director, Hepburn for
Best Actress, Hussey for Best Supporting Actress,
and the film for Best Picture.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Alexis Zorbas (1964)
It shouldn't be that way, but expectations can change 
the way one perceives a film.  If not much is expected, 
such as with "High Velocity" (1977), but the film turns 
out to be relatively good, one is pleased.  On the other
hand, if expectations are high, one is disappointed even 
if the film is still marginally good.
This was my reaction to "Zorba the Greek".  The great, 
relevatory entertainment never arrived.
Anthony Quinn stars as Zorba, an impetuous, aging
journeyman capable of noble action and impulsive sentiment.
He takes a liking to distant, well-dressed Englishman
Alan Bates, who takes Quinn with him to remote area of Greece
to work an abandoned mine.  While Bates struggles to make
his fortune, Quinn is busily trying to teach him
hedonistic and extroverted ways.
Quinn gives an excellent performance in a difficult role.
The trouble is, his supporting characters aren't very
interesting.  Bates is ever out of place, dependent upon
alter ego Quinn for all social and business interaction.
Pathetic landlady Lila Kedrova is boring and often unintelligible.
She did win Best Supporting Actress, however.
Spoilers follow, but are necessary for further picking
apart this over-rated classic:
A beautiful widow is hated by the men in the town, primarily
because she won't marry any of them.  She ends up terrorized
and brutally killed, in a public, extended, unpleasant, and 
unnecessary sequence.
The village folk are portrayed very badly.  Besides committing
the aforementioned pointless murder, they rush to plunder
Kedrova's estate even as she is on her deathbed (her death happens
rather suddenly, her cold kills her in a few minutes).
They are cowardly workers, fleeing in terror at the first
sign of trouble.  As monks, they drop everything to gorge 
themselves on wine.  They are depicted without any sympathy
to their poverty or lack of education or opportunity.
To be fair, there are moments of drama and entertainment.
Quinn surely deserves his Best Actor nomination.  Unlike the
vast majority of Hollywood's output, it is not formulaic
or manipulative.  But it is not the great movie that was
hoped for.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for She (1935)
Victorian-era British writer H. Rider Haggard wrote two
adventure books that have been adapted to films ever since.
These stories are "King Solomon's Mines" and "She".
While the former is probably more famous, the latter
has seen the most film versions.
During the silent era alone, six versions were produced.
The first is an 1899 short from France.  Versions followed
in 1908, 1911, 1916, and 1917. The first feature adaptation
came in 1925.  Much later, Ursula Andress starred in a
1965 adaptation, which along with a 1985 version got
dreadful reviews.
Probably the best telling of She is the Merian C.
Cooper production from 1935.  Fresh from his success with
King Kong, Cooper lavished She with impressive,
expensive sets, an enormous cast of extras in costumes,
and elaborate choreography.
As was the case for King Kong, the production values
make the film good despite a campy, almost laughable script.
Although She lacks the lurid thrills of King Kong,
the script is a little better, and the cast is much better.
The story begins with John Vincey (Samuel S. Hinds) suffering
from radium poisoning.  A scientist, he has spent his life
trying to develop an element that brings eternal life.
His assistant is Holly (Nigel Bruce).  Now dying, Vincey
sends for his dashing son, Leo (Randolph Scott).  He implores
him to travel to a remote, frozen wasteland in China, where
this element may exist.
Leo goes, taking the unflappable, know-it-all Holly with him.
Along the way, they encounter a beautiful, orphaned young
woman named Tanya (Helen Mack).  The three stumble upon a
hidden, underground palace, where She (Helen Gahagan) rules
ruthlessly as a queen.  Billali (Gustav von Seyffertitz) is
her devoted second in command.
She is an ageless woman who is many centuries old.  She once
bathed in a strange, unique flame, which gave her eternal youth.
She takes an immediate liking to Leo.  But Leo already (and
predictably) has something going with Tanya, making She
murderously jealous.
She is very entertaining.  The sets and choreography
are first rate.  The hokey, dramatic script and direction
provides much unintentional comic relief.  Somehow, this
adds to the film's quality.  While Gahagan is a bit hammy,
Mack, Bruce and von Seyffertitz are very good.
She marks the only film appearance of stage actress
Helen Gahagan, in the starring role.  Gahagan would later
marry actor Melyvn Douglas, and eventually was elected to
several terms in the U.S. Congress.  She ran for the U.S.
Senate, but was defeated in 1948 by future president Richard
Nixon.  Nixon called her "The Pink Lady" during the campaign,
because she was supposedly soft on communism. (73/100)
briankoller@usa.net
http://elvisfan.simplenet.com/movies/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Monkey Business (1952)
There was great suspense at the 1952 Academy Awards.
Who would win the Oscar for Best Supporing Chimpanzee?
There were many close-ups of the faces of the nominees:
Cheetah, from "Tarzan's Savage Fury".  Esther, from
"Monkey Business".  Bonzo, from "Bonzo Goes to College".
Thunderous applause rocked the auditorium when the winner's
name, Esther, was announced.  At only six months, Esther
was the youngest chimp to be so honored.
Esther gave a very moving acceptance speech.  After much
hooting and screeching, she described the discrimation she
had overcome: not being allowed to join the Academy, not
getting listed in the credits, even being imprisoned in a
small metal cage, against her will.  And her agent had taken
her entire paycheck!
This is a silly way to begin a film review.  But it is
appropriate, for "Monkey Business" is a very silly movie.
One of several screwball comedies directed by Howard Hawks
and starring Cary Grant, "Monkey Business" is often hilarious.
The plot has Grant cast as a middle-aged, fuddy-duddy chemist,
working on a Fountain of Youth serum at a private research
center headed by Charles Coburn.  His wife (Ginger Rogers)
is devoted to him despite his absent-mindedness.  At the lab,
a chimp escapes from a cage and re-mixes Grant's formula,
getting it into the water cooler.  Grant and Rogers unwittingly
drink the formula and regress into their youth, getting into
endless ridiculous situations.  My favorite scene has
Grant pretending he is an Indian brave, and leading a scalping
party for Grant's hapless rival Hugh Marlowe.
Also present is Marilyn Monroe, cast as Coburn's dim-bulb
secretary.  Monroe and Coburn have a famous dialogue that
runs something like this:
Coburn: You'd better get somebody to type this.
Monroe: Oh, Mr. Oxley, can't I try again?
Coburn: No, this is important.
(Monroe walks out of the room, with Coburn gaping at her)
Coburn: Anybody can type.
Screwball comedies, where the plot consists of a series of
connected gags, are very difficult to pull off.  The gags
have to be funny, they have to fit the characters, and they
have to make sense within the framework of the film.
Unpredictability and imagination is required.  The screwball
comedy is something of a lost art, with most recent attempts
resorting to bathroom humor and pandering to the youngest
audience, as in the "Police Academy" series.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
"Titanic" has the highest box office gross of all time:
over one billion dollars.  It is also the most expensive
film ever made, at two hundred million dollars.  And it
was one of the most successful films ever at the
Academy Awards, winning eleven Oscars.  So, what is wrong
with this picture?  Plenty.
Has a film ever before received fourteen Academy nominations
without one for the screenplay?  While direction, casting
and cinematography are important, the key component of a
film's quality is usually the script.  The 'Titanic' script
is burdened with lame and unlikely dialogue between the
romantic leads (e.g. "I'll never let go") and loaded with
one-dimensional characters.
While the 'Titanic' story lends itself to class conflict,
this feature is over-emphasized.  The 'rich' characters
are either half-embalmed snobs or despicable jerks,
excepting only gregarious hero Molly Brown (Kathy Bates)
and spoiled, passionate love interest Rose (Kate Winslet).
The film begins with a current day Titanic salvage operation.
For dramatic purposes, Rose (Gloria Stuart), now 101 years old,
is brought on board the salvage ship.  She tells her
increasingly dubious story to the rapt crew.
Rose is pressured by her mother to wed abusive Cal
(Billy Zane).  Her friends are so shallow, and Cal such a
jerk, that Rose is driven to tears and makes a suicide
attempt.  With 2200 passengers, you'd think that more than
just Jack would be on deck to save her, and he doesn't look
strong enough to pull her back onboard.  Of course, they
soon have a romance, which of course is disapproved of
by Mom and the surprisingly jealous fiance.
The film is late in its second hour before the Titanic
finally gets around to hitting the iceberg.  "Titanic"
then begins to lift scenes from the vastly superior
"A Night to Remember" from 1958, mixing them in with
long sequences of Rose and Jack repeatedly rescuing
each other from deepening and near-freezing water.
The film ends with more silliness.  Survivor Zane
is unable to find Rose during the long voyage to
America, despite Rose's mother being on board
(conveniently, her character disappears during this
time).  Rose doesn't find the blue diamond in her
coat pocket until she reaches New York!  There is
also a dream sequence which has Jack and Rose enter
the Titanic's gigantic ballroom to incongruous massive
applause from the well-to-do guests, who were so
maligned for their shallowness in the film's
first half.
Since director James Cameron is at his best during
action scenes, "Titanic" can be entertaining at times.
The story is dramatic, and the special effects are
convincing.  But given the dubious script, characters
and events, "Titanic" may be the most over-praised
film of our generation.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Three Days of the Condor (1975)
Robert Redford was one of the biggest
movie stars at the time that this cerebral,
plotty thriller was released.  Although
commercially successful, "Three Days
of the Condor" never quite achieved the
critical attention of other Redford films
of the era, such as "All the President's
Men" and "The Sting".  But "Condor" was
a very good film as well, and its themes
of governmental conspiracy and paranoia
reflected cynical post-Watergate attitudes
towards political institutions.
Redford's character is Joe Turner, initially
a cheerful, well-read employee of the American
Literacy Historical Society, a CIA front
whose staff peruses spy novels to generate
ideas for the agency's activities.  Turner
discovers and naively investigates evidence
revealing a shadow organization within the CIA,
which responds by hiring mercenaries to kill
everyone at the ALHS.
Out to lunch, Turner is spared, but the hitmen
led by Joubert (Max von Sydow) are still on his
trail.  Worse, his bosses at the CIA, especially
Higgins (Cliff Robertson) and Wabash (John Houseman)
also seem to prefer Turner dead.  Desperate and
paranoid, Turner kidnaps a beautiful and surprisingly
sympathetic stranger (Faye Dunaway) for the use
of her house and car.  This creates a dubious
if entertaining love interest subplot.
Predictably, the CIA executives are portrayed
as duplicious and indifferent to human life.
Turner makes an unlikely character transition
from bookworm to action hero.  Still, Redford's
skills as an actor transcends his character,
and the script is intelligent and well written.
Joubert, both noble and sly, is a memorable
hitman character.
Based on David Rayfiel's novel "Six Days of the Condor"
(Hollywood is always abridging the classics), the
film received a single Oscar nomination, for best
editing.  It was one of seven films starring Robert
Redford that were directed by Sydney Pollack.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Sword in the Stone, The (1963)
In Medieval England, Merlin the Magician and his intellectual 
owl companion Archimedes recognize Arthur to be the
future king.  Young Arthur is nicknamed "Wart" and is
a humble servant to a bullying, beefy knight (Sir Ector)
and his selfish, dim-witted, oafish son Kay.
Merlin tricks Wart into his house.  Merlin begins the
education of Wart, to make him fit to be King.  Curiously,
this involves changing Wart into various animals.
Wart becomes a fish, and learns to swim.  He becomes
a squirrel, and learns to scamper about trees.  He
becomes a bird, and learns to (you guessed it) fly.
Merlin also transforms into a fish and squirrel, so
enjoying himself that he sings badly.  In these animal
forms, Wart's life is in constant danger.  As a fish,
an enormous pike threatens to gobble him, and Archimedes
uncharacteristically swims to rescues him.  A wolf
chases Wart when he is in squirrel persona. The real
lesson he must be learning is that it is much safer
being human, since being King does not involve much
swimming, scampering or flying.
As a bird, Wart flies into the house of wicked witch
Madame Mim, who is a near copy of the wicked witch
in several 1950s Bugs Bunny shorts.  Mim turns herself
into a cat to eat Wart.  Merlin comes to the rescue
and must fight a "Wizard's Duel" to save him.
Mim turns herself into various monsters to get Merlin,
but he of course has a clever transformation and the
last laugh.
There is to be a jousting tournament, the winner
to become the English King.  Merlin is disappointed in Wart 
when he decides to become Kay's squire at this event.
Wart forgets Kay's sword, and must go fetch it.
Unable to get it, he has to settle for the sword
in the stone, which only he can remove.  Wart becomes
Arthur, King of Britain, and the moral once again
is that brains overcome brawn.
"The Sword in the Stone" was, at the time of its release,  
likely the weakest of Disney's animated movies.  The appeal
to children is present, but lacks the sophistication to 
interest adults.  The humor is mostly physical (e.g. Sir Ector
falls in a bucket and is clobbered by magic plates, and
the poor wolf gets it just as Wiley E. does) but lacks the 
inspiration of the Warner Brothers shorts that this movie
imitates.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Full Metal Jacket (1987)
Another Vietnam War movie?  What can be said about the Vietnam War
that hasn't been said already?  "Full Metal Jacket" answers that
question, and demonstrates that there is always room for a
great film, even if the genre has already been thoroughly explored.
"Full Metal Jacket" is really two different films, with Matthew
Modine's everyman character bridging the gap.  The first half
has several dozen marine recruits undergoing basic training,
under constant verbal and physical abuse from a tough-as-nails
drill sergeant (R. Lee Ermey, who should have won Best Supporting
Actor, even if he was a marine drill sergeant in real life).
His favorite target is fat, slow recruit nicknamed Gomer Pyle
(Vincent D'Onofrio).  Those who are considering joining the 
marines should see this film.  It may change their mind!
Only three mild criticisms about the first half, which is
superior to the second half.  Out of the large number of
marine recruits, only four (Joker, Snowball, Pyle and Cowboy)
have speaking parts.  Did the writers think we would get
confused with too many characters, or was the producer
unwilling to pay extras to speak?  Also, Modine frequently
does a John Wayne impersonation, which is not very good!
Finally, Pyle has a weird character turn that doesn't seem
likely despite all the abuse and brainwashing he has received.
The second half of the film has Modine in Vietnam, covering the
war first as a journalist and then as a soldier.  The early
scenes of this second half are outstanding, but when Modine
finally sees action the film declines slightly, though still
excellent.  War is hell, but in this case not quite as
interesting.
One observation is that the American soldiers have great
respect for the North Vietnam soldiers, but contempt and
bitterness towards the people of South Vietnam.  This may
be due to its corruption, depicted through extended scenes
of negotiations with prostitutes, or the notion that
South Vietnam was not grateful for the "assistance" of
Uncle Sam.  Actually, given scenes of a soldier in a helicopter
machine-gunning every Vietnamese he sees, of any age or gender,
it is clear why the South Vietnamese weren't so grateful!
Not the greatest war movie ever (I still favor "All Quiet on
the Western Front") but probably one of the best Vietnam 
movies ("Apocalypse Now" was overlong and lacked necessary 
focus.) and the best basic training movie.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Bringing Up Baby (1938)
"Bringing Up Baby" is the first of four screwball
comedies starring Cary Grant and directed by
Howard Hawks.  While the second film, "His Girl Friday",
is considered to be the best, the fact is that all
four films are excellent and of nearly equal quality.
"I Was a Male War Bride" and "Monkey Business" are
the last two films, made about a decade later than
"His Girl Friday".
"Bringing Up Baby" has a deceptively simple storyline.
Grant is a blustering, bumbling, bespectacled paleontologist,
who has spent the last four years assembling a brontosaurus
skeleton.  His fiance is lovely but frigid, and henpecks
him mercilessly.  They are to be wed the next day.
Grant is given the task of convincing a wealthy
philanthropist to donate a million dollars to the
museum that employs him.  Attempts at securing this
endowment are endangered by Grant's encounters
with Katharine Hepburn.  Hepburn has fallen for Grant,
and causes endless troubles for him in an attempt
to get his attention.
The plot relies on several incredible coincidences.
Hepburn lives with her aunt, who just happens to be
the wealthy philanthropist.  Grant just happens to be
getting married the next day.  Hepburn lies to her
aunt, saying that Grant is a big game hunter.  It just
happens that the aunt's dinner guest is also a big
game hunter.  Finally, what are the odds that two
leopards would be roaming the woods of Connecticut
on the same night?
While these coincidences would be infuriating in a
serious drama, they are enjoyable here, perhaps due
to the expressions of alarm and confusion they cause
on Grant's face.  Grant was a terrific comic actor,
and a perfect foil for Hepburn's imaginative machinations.
Grant's character struggles to find normalcy, and
to escape from Hepburn, but he ends up bound ever
closer to her, and in increasingly ridiculous
situations.
There are some really funny scenes in "Bringing Up Baby".
My favorite has Hepburn dragging a wild leopard by
a leash, and berating it for its resistance.  Another
great scene has Hepburn and Grant frantically seeking a
dinosaur bone, digging holes at random in the front yard.
Character actor Charles Ruggles has a great turn as a game
hunter fond of imitating leopard calls, while Barry Fitzgerald
once again plays a cantakerous Irishman.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for West Side Story (1961)
"West Side Story" won ten Academy Awards, making it
one of the most honored of Hollywood films.  But
it also one of the most over-rated.
The plot is an update of Shakespeare's Romeo and
Juliet.  It involves two rival gangs co-existing in a
slummy New York neighborhood.  The Jets are Italian
Americans, the Sharks are Puerto Rican.  The gangs
meet at a dance to discuss terms of a rumble.
At the dance, former Jet leader Tony (Richard Beymer)
falls mutually in love with Maria (Natalia Wood),
who is the sister of Shark leader Bernardo
(George Chakiris).  Maria pleads with Tony to
prevent the rumble, and Maria's relatives plead
with her to avoid Tony, who is "one of them."
There are good things to say about "West Side Story."
Some of the songs have good melodies, the sets are
good, and I like the bigoted cop character (Bill Bramley).
Natalie Wood is lovely, although, like most of
the cast, she is too grown-up to be a convincing
teen-ager.
The problems begin with the much-acclaimed dance
numbers.  I have this notion that gangs are a
primitive form of organized crime, but the gangs
in "West Side Story" are only guilty of showy,
synchronized dancing.  The rival gangs should forget
about the rumble and hold a dance contest instead.
The songs are also over-rated.  While I like
"I'm So Pretty", many numbers feature Tony and/or
Maria mooning softly (and artificially) at length.
The film's basic message is that bigotry is wrong.
This moral, while unarguable, is nothing new, and
"West Side Story" makes its point far too many
times.
Except for Chakiris, all of the cast was dubbed, even
Rita Moreno.  Choreographer Jerome Robbins was the
original director, but was replaced with Robert Wise
when the production fell behind.  The film's Academy
Awards include Best Picture, Best Director,
Best Color Cinematography (Daniel Fapp), Best Supporting
Actor (Chakiris) and Actress (Rita Moreno).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Iceman Cometh, The (1973)
American Film Theater was a production company
with a good idea.  Why not film top-quality plays,
casting them with famous (if past their box office
prime) actors?  Aware that these films would not
have folks standing in line to see them at theaters,
they were distributed for limited engagements only,
with the audience sometimes paying in advance to
see them through a subscription.
About ten films were made, from 1972 through 1975.
Perhaps the most famous of these films was "The
Iceman Cometh", the 1947 Eugene O'Neill play about
alcoholics hiding from life behind 'pipe dreams'.
It starred Lee Marvin as the garrulous Hickey,
a reformed drunk seeking to free his fellow
alcoholics from the bottle by shattering their
'pipe dreams'.  Among the drunks are Harry Hope
(Fredric March, in his final film), an elderly
man who hasn't been outside in twenty years,
Larry (Robert Ryan), a world-weary anarchist who
fears death, and Parritt (young Jeff Bridges),
who sold out his mother and 'the cause' for a
turn with a prostitute.
The full length of "The Iceman Cometh" is four
hours.  The version that I saw had one hour removed,
and another version exists that is under two hours.
Not having seen the four or two hour versions, I
can't compare them with the three hour version.
I have heard that a television production from 1960
with Jason Robards as Hickey is superior, but I
haven't seen that either.  I can say that the 1973
version is a good film, but not a happy one.  The
large collection of eccentric and pathetic drunks
have little to look forward to except the next
drink, which is not always easy to obtain.
The performances are good all around.  Blustery
Marvin may or may not make as good a Hickey as
Robards, but he had to learn and deliver a mountain
of lines, which he does effortlessly.  His
character provides the play's suspense: why
did he become reformed, what happened to his
wife, and will he succeed in reforming the drunks?
Not all the characters are as interesting,
particulary Hugo (played by future Boss Hogg
Sorrell Booke) with his ravings about the
bourgeois and the willow trees.
kollers@home.com
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Basketball Diaries, The (1995)
"The Basketball Diaries" is a lurid and uncompromising study
of how drug addiction can destroy lives.  The film has been
ignored or underrated because many people would find it
unwatchable.  The protaganist's decline into the lowest of
society could hardly be made more graphic.
Leonardo DiCaprio stars as Jim Carroll, a Catholic high school 
student and basketball star.  He is also a would-be poet, 
scribbling essays in a journal that he jealously guards.  Jim's 
risk-taking, anti-social behaviour and drug abuse soon leads to 
the destruction of his life.  Quitting school and leaving home, 
he turns to hard-core criminal acts to get money for his next fix.
He has little understanding of his situation, no desire to 
overcome his habits, and the only question is will he end up 
in prison or in a morgue.
If you have the stomach for this sort of movie, you will be
rewarded.  There are many outstanding scenes, such as Jim
attempting to cheer up friend and leukemia patient Bobby,
and Jim trying to play basketball while on downers.
There is a Catholic priest in "The Basketball Diaries" who
serves as a harsh father figure for Jim.  Never smiling, he
seems to know what trouble Jim is getting into and is
determined to punish him for it.  Carroll later has a 
drug-induced fantasy where he stalks and shoots the
priest with an enormous rifle.  He also has a confession
scene with the priest where he learns that sins whether 
great or small carry the same number of "Hail Marys."
A great movie that is without a general audience, one can be
grateful for cable television so that it can be shown
uncensored and without compromise.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Toy Story (1995)
"Toy Story" is a landmark in cinema animation, not only for its
unique and high-quality "virtual reality" look, but also for 
the quality of the script and story.
"Toy Story" is about Andy's toys.  Andy is a typical kid,
perhaps ten years old, and is blessed with an assortment of
toys that walk and talk independently when no humans are
looking.  Andy's favorite toy is a cowboy doll (Woody, voiced by
Tom Hanks).  However, Woody soon has serious competition
from a Space Ranger toy (Buzz, voiced by Tim Allen).  Woody's
jealousy of Buzz ultimately leads to both toys in the
clutches of disturbed neighbor kid Sid, who destroys toys.
Can Woody and Buzz find their way back to Andy?
Meanwhile, Buzz must learn to accept that he is just a toy.
The animation of "Toy Story" is superb.  From a technology
standpoint, this is the most important animated film since
"Snow White."  The toys live in a virtual reality world,
where everything is very lifelike, yet clearly animated.
Andy's toys have a very entertaining rapport.  Some of the
toys are suspicious and cruel, others endearingly earnest.
Their petty squabbles and jealousies are funny and very 
well written.  It is interesting to contrast Andy's toys
with Sid's.  Sid enjoys "operating" on his toys, interchanging
parts until they look like worse than one of Dr. Moreau's
freaks.  It is not an original observation to note that
Sid's toys are hideous but gentle, silent yet organized,
while Andy's toys are conventional but bicker endlessly.
The quality of "Snow White" was never fully repeated.  The
prospects are brighter for topping "Toy Story" since the
animation techniques may become cheaper and better over time.
It will prove more difficult to improve upon the clever 
dialogue, and the plot which is full of dramatic tension.

Title
Review for In the Name of the Father (1993)
"In the Name of the Father" is an excellent drama
that tells the story of Gerry Conlon, an Irish
petty criminal who finds himself framed, along with
friends and entire family, for an IRA bombing that
he had nothing to do with.
Conlon is played by one of my favorite actors,
versatile Daniel Day-Lewis, with the same intensity
and credibility that he had in his Oscar winning
role in "My Left Foot".  The film makes it clear
that Conlon is more irresponsible than innocent, but
the same cannot be said for his family, especially
disapproving father Giuseppe (Pete Postlethwaite).
The relationship between Gerry and his father is
extensively explored.  They love each other, but
Gerry is frustrated because he cannot meet the
expectations of his father.  Still, Giuseppe believes
that his son is innocent of the bombing.  Emma
Thompson plays a British lawyer who is convinced
of the injustice of their case and seeks to free them.
IRA terrorist (and fictional character) McAndrew
(Don Baker) is inserted to make obvious a cover-up
by British policemen.  When both Conlons end up
rejecting McAndrew's methods, "In the Name of the
Father" finally repudiates terrorism as a method
of achieving political independence.
The film scores points when rebuking martial law,
allowing suspects to be held indefinitely without
counsel and subject to torture and intimidation.
Judicial injustice is an under-rated movie theme,
greatly increasing the audience's sympathy
and identification with the oppressed.
The film's pro-Irish sympathies are expressed
in the soundtrack as well, which features Irish
acts such as U2 and Sinead O'Connor.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Muriel's Wedding (1994)
"Muriel's Wedding" is a comedy with dramatic elements.  The film
is often interesting, but many scenes aren't credible, and the
humor doesn't always work.
Muriel (Toni Collette) is an Australian young woman with 
problems.  She hasn't had a job for two years, is somewhat 
overweight, is getting shunned by her former friends, and 
spends free time alone in her room listening to ABBA songs.  
She steals a large sum of money from her parents, and 
spends it on a vacation, where she is befriended by old 
high school chum Rhonda (Rachel Griffiths).  Not able to 
face her parents, Muriel moves away from home.  Her situation 
continues to improve as she has an arranged marriage with a 
South African swimmer needing Australian citizenship.  
Things do not go as well for her parents, or for Rhonda.
The audience is expected to sympathize with Muriel, if not
identify with her.  But she has few redeeming qualities besides
humility: she is a liar and a thief, she's not particularly 
bright, and she has no ambition in life besides marriage.  
The people I feel sorry for is her parents.  Her father is a 
garrulous local politician with three unemployed adult children 
still living at home.  He makes the mistake of giving Muriel a 
blank check, and she cleans out his account and absconds.  Soon 
he finds himself facing prison with his career destroyed.  
The mother is betrayed by everyone she loves.
In the first part of the film, Muriel tries to hang out with
several snobbish young women who reject her.  They are
shallow beyond belief, and have no inhibitions about discussing
their crude sexual adventures.
Before meeting her husband, Muriel dates a nervous, pale
fellow.  He is so taken with her that he attends her wedding.
I just don't see his character attending the wedding.
He would have to go to some trouble to find out when and
where it was, and certainly there are more interesting women
for him to develop an obsession for.
Muriel's new-found husband proves to be a disappointment.  He
dislikes her and is only interested in Olympic training.  He
has a constant sneer on his face.  Later in the film, he
suddenly desires her.  This change in his behaviour isn't
convincing.  Even more unlikely is what happens next: Muriel,
who has fantasized about marriage all her adult life, dumps
her now-interested famous and dreamy husband to take care of
her now-paraplegic friend Rachel, who is already cared for
by her mother.
"Muriel's Wedding" is by no means a bad film, but it is
overrated.  I recommend it mostly to those who might enjoy
listening to some of ABBA's hit singles, since that constitutes
the film's score.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gone with the Wind (1939)
"Gone with the Wind" is perhaps the most successful film
of all time.  It was the top grossing film until at least
"The Sound of Music", some thirty years of inflation later.
The story, and the characters, have become a part of
American cultural heritage.
The story begins in Georgia, just prior to the Civil War.
Beautiful and spoiled Scarlett O'Hara (Vivien Leigh) schemes
to win the love of the honorable Ashley Wilkes (Leslie Howard),
who is engaged to his saintly cousin Melanie (Olivia De Havilland).
Scarlett fails in this effort, but wins the admiration of
dashing scoundrel Rhett Butler (Clark Gable).
Ashley marries Melanie, then goes off to fight the Civil War.
Scarlett moves to Atlanta to be with Melanie and wait for
Ashley's return.  Eventually, Union troops siege and capture
Atlanta, forcing Scarlett, Melanie, and her newborn baby
to flee to Scarlett's home at Tara, which has been impoverished
by looting Federal troops.
After much humiliation and unethical behavior, Scarlett rebuilds
Tara and becomes a wealthy businesswoman.  She marries Rhett
and has a daughter, but her marriage is stormy.
Is "Gone with the Wind" pro-slavery?  In the pre-war scenes,
blacks seem content with their lot, and show devotion to the
white "masters" that control their lives.  Pork (Oscar Polk) is a
shuffling, slow-talking stereotype.  Prissy (Butterfly McQueen)
is described by Rhett as a "simple-minded darky".
But to its credit, "Gone with the Wind" has two very strong
and positive roles.  The characters listen with respect
to Mammy (Hattie McDaniel), whose straightforward comments
make for sage advice.  McDaniel won Best Supporting Actress,
an outstanding achievement during an era of segregation.
Big Sam (Everett Brown) shows great courage rescuing Scarlett
from grave danger.
However, my favorite supporting character is Scarlett's
exuberant first husband Charles Hamilton (Rand Brooks).
Also, Aunt Pittypat (Laura Hope Crews) gives an excellent
comic-relief performance.
"Gone with the Wind" also won major Oscars for Best Screenplay
(Sidney Howard), Best Actress (Scarlett O'Hara),
Best Color Cinematography, Best Director, and Best Picture.
Fleming was credited as director, although four directors
were used.  This was a clean sweep of all major awards
except Best Actor, which passed over Clark Gable.  (Vivien
Leigh's husband, Laurence Olivier, was also nominated, for
"Wuthering Heights."  The winner that year was Robert Donat).
"Gone with the Wind" clocks in at 222 minutes, more than twice
the length of an typical film from 1939.  The story does sag
once or twice, but only in comparison with its best parts.
The film peaks midway, during the siege of Atlanta.  The film's
best action scenes are here, and the devastation war is clearly
demonstrated by the horrific hospital scenes and acres of wounded
soldiers.
The film picks up again during a postwar sequence loaded with
suspense. Scarlett has narrowly escaped an attack on her by
lowlifes in a shantytown.  A dangerous vigilante action is then
taken by the men in Scarlett's life, while their wives wait
anxiously for their return.
Scarlett O'Hara, the central character, is shrewd, manipulating,
and selfish.  She is despised by most of the other female
characters.  Yet she is presented to the audience clearly as
a heroine.  Women identify with her determination, and she
shows positive traits helping Melanie to deliver her baby,
and saving and rebuilding Tara after the war.
Rhett Butler is a self-proclaimed scoundrel, but he keeps
performing heroic actions that contradict what he says,
just as his love for Scarlett shows despite his frequent
cruelty to her.  Although he enjoys adventures apart from
Scarlett, one of the film's recurrent themes is his
return to her, and his determination to have her love him
more than Ashley.
One wonders at first viewing why Melanie is so nice to
Scarlett, who constantly schemes to steal Ashley from her.
But Melanie does not view Scarlett as a threat, and
perhaps she loves her more than Scarlett loves Ashley.
Of course, "Gone with the Wind" is a costume epic and a
soap opera.  Because of its genre, and its strong appeal to
women (the story is told through Vivien Leigh's character),
there are naysayers (mostly men) who dislike the movie.
But there is no doubt that it an outstanding film.  If the
costumes, the cinematography, and the script aren't enough
to convince (which they certainly should be), the leading
characters are extremely interesting and well defined.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for James and the Giant Peach (1996)
The Roald Dahl children's book comes to life in this
partly animated, partly live action feature.  This is a
Disney-funded movie with songs by Randy Newman and directed 
by Henry Selick.  It is strange and interesting, but 
doesn't quite deliver.
James is a typical little boy who has the ideal life
with his loving parents, who plan on taking him to
New York City to see the Empire State Building.  But
instead his parents are eaten by a rhino that
comes out of the clouds (I am not making this up)
and James is sent to live with his Aunts.
His Aunts are horrid step-parents who complete each
other's sentences, need makeovers badly, and delight
in their cruelty to James.  He spends his days doing
chores and sleeps in the attic, while his Aunts lazy
about.  For dinner he is given fish heads to eat.
After rescuing a spider, things look up for James
when he encounters a curious man who gives him green
glowy things he says are magic crocodile tongues.
Whatever, they sure jump around a lot, and James
can't catch any of them.  They find their way into
a peach, which soon grows to be the size of a house.
All of this is live-action.
The Aunts sell admission to see the giant peach,
treating the other neighborhood children as badly
as they do James.  Later, James takes a bite from
the peach.  A hole opens in the side of the peach.
James crawls in, and the movie becomes stop-motion
animated.
James meet the peach's other residents, an assortment
of bugs such as a centipede, a grasshopper, a worm
and a lady spider who serves as a mother figure to
James.  These bugs are bigger than James and can talk
(and, unfortunately, sing).  To escape the pesky
Aunts, the centipede frees the big peach from its
stem, and the peach rolls down the hill landing in
the Atlantic Ocean, on course to New York City.
A giant mechanical shark threatens the peach.  James
has the bright idea of using the worm to attract
seagulls, which the spider uses her web to anchor
to the peach.  The peach is now airborne and manages
to escape from the hungry shark, which in its stubborn
efforts to get the peach self-destructs.
James has a nifty little dream sequence that is the 
best part of the movie.  Too bad he wakes up.
The peach goes off course due to carelessness
on the part of the braggart centipede.  To redeem
himself, he jumps in the icy waters to retrieve a
compass.  I don't know how he knew there was a compass 
down there.  He must have read the script.
The compass is on a wrecked ship surrounded by skeletons
of the unlucky crew.  These skeletons spring to life to
attack the poor centipede.  The spider and James come
to the rescue, and all survive with the compass.
Back on course, the evil rhino comes out of the clouds
to get James and his peach.  James confronts him, saying
he doesn't exist, and the rhino goes away.  That was easy.
But the peach falls out of control, landing smack on
the Empire State building.
The Aunts re-appear, claiming their peach and wanting to
take James back to his attic.  James' bug friends come out
of the peach, and the lady spider spins a web around
the nasty old Aunts.  We next see what is left of the peach,
its giant pit, which is still home to the big bugs and
James, who sits on a porch regaling visiting children with 
tales of his adventures.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
"Bean" is a comedy based upon the British television series
"Mr. Bean", which is familiar to American viewers due to runs
on PBS stations.  Rowan Atkinson is Bean, sort of a British
version of Pee Wee Herman, who makes goofy faces, mumbles
when it is a possible alternative to speaking, and conducts
experiments with people or physical objects around him
that usually end in disaster.
Bean is employed by a British museum.  He is regarded as
a useless and is relegated to sitting in a chair in a
corner, where he can do harm as long as he remains there.
To be rid of him, even temporarily, he is sent to 
a Los Angeles museum to preside over the ceremony of
that museum acquiring a priceless work of art.
Unlucky museum curator Peter MacNicol draws the assignment
of hosting Bean during his visit.  Out of his element, Bean 
gets into increasing trouble.  His inability to socially
interact with others alienates MacNicol's family, which
promptly moves out.  MacNicol soon has even worse fears
of unemployment and imprisonment, all due to Bean's
eccentric and destructive antics.
The movie is different from the series.  In the series, people
regard Bean as mostly normal.  In the movie, Bean, the exact 
same character, is regarded as bizarre, alien, and dangerous, 
and not merely eccentric.  This interesing tack would leave
us feeling sorry for Bean, if his behaviour would only deserve
such sympathy.  But heavens, he practically needs to be
institutionalized!
Although "Bean" is by no means a bad movie, it does have some
problems.  I can accept Bean's character, but not MacNicol's
bonding to this obvious destructive idiot who seems bent
on destroying his life.  I don't understand how Bean could
be left alone in a room with a priceless painting.  And Bean,
who is demonstrated to be incompetent in the first half of
the film, performs complex and heroic actions in the second
half that he seems nowhere capable of in the first half.
I don't like the character of MacNichol's daughter (Tricia Vessey).
What a brat!  Burt Reynolds has a cameo as a General.  His
character has some stupid lines, and he constantly has a smirk 
on his face (perhaps he is thinking of his paycheck for probably
one day's work).
Still, if you a fan of the "Mr. Bean" show, you will probably
enjoy the movie.  You may alternately laugh and groan as
Bean gets into trouble.  At ninety minutes, the film is the
proper length and doesn't drag often.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Chinatown (1974)
"Chinatown" may be Roman Polanski's best film.  It may
be Jack Nicholson's best film as well, better than
"Five Easy Pieces" or "One Flew over the Cuckoo's Nest".
It starts out seemingly an ordinary detective story
and murder mystery.  However, the plot gets thicker and
thicker as Nicholson unravels a massive real estate scheme
and learns who is behind it.
Nicholson plays a private investigator who works in
Los Angeles during the 1930s.  He is hired by a wife
who suspects her husband is cheating.  Nicholson takes
incriminating photos of him, which are stolen and used
to smear the husband, who then appears to have committed
suicide.
But nothing is as it appears, not the wife, the affair,
or the suicide.  Nicholson knows he has been duped,
and is determined to learn the full story, which involves
murder, real estate fraud, and an artificial water shortage.
His investigation also uncovers terrible family secrets
involving the murder victim's wife (Faye Dunaway) and
her cantankerous, powerful father (John Huston).
Nicholson is well cast as the cynical and hard-working
private eye.  His character has similarities to Humphrey
Bogart's in "The Maltese Falcon", but Nicholson's is not
as sharp, and is more willing to con his way into gaining
information.
Likewise, Dunaway's character is similar to that of Mary
Astor's in "The Maltese Falcon".  Both characters seem
unwilling to tell the full truth, and claim to love their
hired detective, but Dunaway's is much softer and
better intentioned.
John Huston, more noted as a director than as an actor,
gives a great performance as the grasping schemer
who also wants the daughter he doesn't deserve to have.
Roman Polanski has a great cameo as the enforcer with a
knife.  He will always be known more for his off-camera
life than for the films that he has directed, but perhaps
that isn't as it should be.  "Chinatown" is an outstanding
film, perhaps even the best film of the 1970s.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Diamonds for Breakfast (1968)
"Diamonds For Breakfast" is a comedy with surrealistic elements.
It fittingly stars Marcello Mastroianni, whose most famous film
is the surreal "8 1/2".  While the comedy often doesn't work,
the fantasy elements keep things interesting.
Mastroianni is the son of a Russian nobleman.   The nobleman 
gambled away the family jewels, and now they reside in a British
museum.  Mastroianni decides to steal the jewels.  To do this,
he recruits a series of beautiful women, each of whom will do
his bidding once he makes love to them.  In an elaborate
bait-and-switch scheme (the women are the bait, and the jewels
are switched) the jewels are his again!  But then things begin
to unravel...
To keep Mastroianni onscreen as much as possible, he plays other
roles as well, especially a bearded ancestor who appears now
and then to offer advice and encouragement.  Mastroianni also
sings the title song, where we learn that there are limits
to his talents.
Because of the mix of reality and fantasy, and a first-time
director apparently without anyone looking over his shoulder,
"Diamonds For Breakfast" is confusing and muddled.  Much of
the storyline is difficult to accept even in a comedy, such
as the ease in which the diamonds are switched, and Mastroianni's
success with "the family gift", which appears to be the ability
to bed any woman and convert her into a slave.  Also curious
is that with all these beauties to choose from, the woman he
prefers is also the least attractive.
Not quite there either as a comedy or as an art film, "Diamonds
For Breakfast" is doomed to obscurity.  It is recommended only
to Mastroianni fans.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Dear God (1996)
"Dear God" is an alleged comedy.  The film stars Greg Kinnear
as a con artist brought before a judge and given the choice
of work or jail.  Kinnear chooses a job at the post office,
serving his time in the dead letter office.  There, he meets
his co-workers, most of whom are eccentric.  You will recognize
Tim Conway and Laurie Metcalf.  Conway isn't awful, but he
isn't given much to work with.  Metcalf is a candidate for
Most Disappointing Supporting Actress.
An attempt by Kinnear to steal money and valuables from the mail
to pay off bullying loan sharks somehow leads to a campaign by
his postal co-workers to do good deads for troubled folks who have
written letters to God.  This leads to a second confrontation with
a judge, for tampering with the mail.  I guess God is upset when
others read his mail.
This is a really bad movie.  I would never have suffered through
it, except that relatives actually paid money to rent it, and
kept waiting forlornly for Tim Conway to be funny.  Nothing in
the movie is funny, which is rare even for very bad comedies.
Kinnear has a love interest who doesn't care that he is a broke
con artist in trouble with both the law and the mob.  The film is
full of scenes that make little sense, such as a downtown parade
featuring five second cameos of has-been stars, and Metcalf
giving a bizarre courtroom demonstration that involves dogs,
chanting, and beating a trashcan like a drum.
The real con here is "Dear God" as a comedy.  Garry Marshall,
the Director and thus the man most responsible for this waste of
videotape, has a few cameo scenes.  Lock him up and throw away
the key, and tell Kinnear to read the script before signing
another contract.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Dumbo (1941)
"Dumbo" is perhaps the second best full-length animated motion
picture, behind only "Snow White".  The movie is flawless, from
the charming animation, to the vocal characterizations, to its
moral of not judging a person (or an elephant) by its appearance.
We begin whimsically with a stork delivering babies.  The stork
is voiced by Sterling Holloway, later of "Winnie The Pooh"
fame.  He has a heavy load this time: an elephant.  Meanwhile,
poor Mrs. Jumbo of a travelling circus is waiting anxiously for 
her new arrival, trunk longingly in the air.
One of my favorite characters in the movie is the train,
which manages to talk as it whistles and chugs along.
The animation of the train beginning its journey is marvelous.
The stork makes his delivery, not departing without reading a
poem.  All the elephant ladies gather to see the baby elephant.
They are charmed, until it is revealed that the baby has
enormous ears.  Mrs. Jumbo and Jr are ostracized and the
baby is jeeringly named Dumbo.
Dumbo is mercilessly tormented by adolescent kids.  Jumbo grabs
one of them with her trunk and spanks him.  This leads to
quite a ruckus.  Jumbo manages to dump the circus announcer
into a tub of water, but she ends up imprisoned in chains in a
dark, lonely train car.
Luckily, Timothy J. Mouse, the best friend a cartoon elephant
ever had, enters the story.  He has the idea for an act:
a pyramid of elephants, with Dumbo jumping on top.
Unfortunately, Dumbo trips on his ears, tumbles into the
pyramid, tearing down the big top.  The audience flees in
a mob.
With his big ears, Dumbo makes a great circus clown.  In a fine
sequence, clowns try to put out a burning building, getting
nowhere, while poor Dumbo is at the top story.  He must jump
to be saved: but the net is a custard pie.  The crowd laughs,
but Dumbo is humiliated in this role, and is snubbed by
the other elephants.
Dumbo and Timothy unknowingly drink spiked water.  In typical
cartoon fashion, they are immediately plastered.  Dumbo blows
bubbles from his trunk.  One turns into a pink elephant, and
there is a terrific "dream sequence" of pink elephants marching
and dancing.  This ends with Dumbo and Timothy in a high
tree branch, sleeping it off.
A flock of black crows spots the elephant sleeping the tree.
These crows are derogatory sterotypes of blacks, complete with
jive talking, cigars, and funny hats.  One crow has a deep
bass voice.  Still, the crows are not that offensive.  They are
funny, and in the end they help Dumbo and Timothy out of
the tree and into the air.  At any rate, they come off better
than the film's "white" characters, who torment Dumbo and 
imprison his mother.
Dumbo believes he needs the "magic feather" to fly.
At the next circus performance, the clowns have raised the
height of the building to the roof of the big top, and
Dumbo is again forced to jump.  Timothy and the magic feather
are with him, and the mouse urges him to open his ears
to fly.  Dumbo drops the magic feather: will he fly or crash?
He flies, divebombs all his stunned enemies, (the clowns,
the ringmaster and the other elephants) and there is a
triumphant finale of the circus leaving town with Dumbo
flying and his happy mother freed.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for My Left Foot (1989)
"My Left Foot" is based on a true story, the life
of Christy Brown.  Born with cerebral palsy in a
lower middle class Irish family, Brown overcomes
severe physical handicaps and local prejudice
to become a noted painter.
"My Left Foot" is the only limb that works for
Brown.  The other leg and both arms are useless.
His face is eternally caught in an extreme
grimace, and he can only speak with difficulty.
He writes, paints, and moves about using only
his left foot.
"My Left Foot" isn't completely a story of triumph
over handicaps.  There are many painful scenes
of setbacks for Brown, at first when he is
unable to communicate, and later when he is
unable to find the romantic love he craves.
He can be verbally abusive, and sometimes he
drinks too much.  He is not above self-pity
either.  These unhappy scenes probably didn't
help at the box office, but they validate the film.
Daniel Day Lewis plays Christy Brown, and
deservedly won a Best Actor Oscar for his
performance.  Lewis is possibly the best
actor of our generation, and the quality and
variety of his film roles is impressive.
He was a fop in "A Room With a View", a
philanderer in "The Unbearable Lightness of
Being", and an impassioned prisoner in
"In the Name of the Father", all of them
outstanding films.
In supporting roles, Brenda Fricker is excellent
as Brown's mother.  She won an Academy Award
for Best Supporting Actress.  Ray McAnally
is Brown's father, an unemployed bricklayer
who struggles with his role as head of the
household.  Fiona Shaw plays a sunny social
worker and arts patron who helps Christy
face the world.
While "My Left Foot" is a very good film,
it is not without flaws.  There is a bar-room
fight scene played for laughs, which is perhaps
requisite to films based in Ireland, but
doesn't work in this case.  Also, the happy
ending seems artificial, even if it is a
true story.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Hunt for Red October, The (1990)
This movie stars Sean Connery, as the Lithuanian-born captain
of a Russian submarine who wants to defect to the U.S., bringing
his prototype sub (The Red October) with him.  Alec Baldwin also 
stars as a government analyst who is a complete expert on Connery 
and what he will do next.
Connery is cast, apparently, because Americans can't tell a
British accent from a Eastern European one.  He kills a
KGB agent on his newly-launched sub in cold blood, because
the agent will get in the way.  While a surprise, the audience
is supposed to approve of the murder because the victim is
after all a KGB agent and therefore not a human being.
The Russian sub has prototype engines that are nearly silent.
Yet the Americans learn how to track this submarine, while
the Russians can't.
Connery sends a message to the Soviets, telling them that he
is defecting.  He fails to inform about the Americans that he
is defecting!  This leads to the entire Soviet fleet after
him.  The Russian ambassador to the U.S. eventually requests
that the U.S. also hunt down and destroy the sub, using the
pretext that Connery will fire his missiles on the U.S.
The Americans are extremely rude to the Soviet ambassador,
apparently for dramatic purposes.
Baldwin briefs government officials on Connery.  He knows
everything about him except what he had for breakfast last
Wednesday.  While the other officials argue stupidly,
it dawns on Baldwin that Connery is going to defect.
In addition to being the best-looking and most impassioned,
it happens throughout the movie that Baldwin is the only one 
who knows exactly what Connery will do.  This makes it almost
believable that everyone will do, despite orders, whatever
he asks, including that he be flown by helicopter to
a submarine (the Dallas) in the North Atlantic ocean, since 
he has figured out that is where Connery will defect.
Connery fakes a nuclear accident on the sub, as a pretext
to abandon the crew in rafts on the surface, so his
staff can turn the sub over to the Dallas.  Baldwin boards
the Red October, and we are surprised to learn that he speaks
fluent Russian.  One of Connery's loyal staff turns out to be
a pro-Soviet saboteur.  Baldwin, of all people, goes after
him with a handgun and gets him. Meanwhile, a Soviet sub 
has located the Red October and fires missiles at it.  
Fortunately, Connery is so clever that the missiles
end up turning around and destroying the Soviet sub.
"The Hunt For Red October" is based on a Tom Clancy book.
But if I did not know otherwise, I would have presumed that
the plot of this movie was the winner of a contest for
being most unbelievable.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
ID4 was an huge escapist summer hit.  The audience came
to see the White House blown up, and to see writhing aliens
get theirs.  If special effects are all you care about,
by all means check out this otherwise dumb-dumb movie.
Aliens place enormous spaceships over Earth's biggest cities,
and just leave them there, apparently for sustaining
dramatic tension.
Bill Pullman is the U.S. President.  Will Smith is a jetfighter
pilot.  Randy Quaid is a confused cropduster who claims to
have once been kidnapped by aliens.  His kids are amazingly
good looking.  Jeff Goldblum is a goofy nerd, Judd Hirsch
his goofy dad.
Goldblum, who just happens to be the only techno-wizard smart
enough to figure out when the Aliens will launch their attack,
just happens to have an ex-wife who is the President's
Chief of Staff, who just happens to be a young and gorgeous
woman.
One of Goldblum's co-workers is fluttery and cowardly and
has a raspy voice.  He wins the 1996 non-Academy Award
for most annoying supporting actor.
Finally, the long-promoted event arrives.  Aliens blow up the
White House, the Capital, make thousands of cars fly in the
air, killing the raspy voiced guy (no loss).  However,
Will Smith's perfect "10" stripper girlfriend is about the
city's only survivor, the only one smart enough to flee her
car and hide in an office located in a subway tunnel.
Afterwards, she leads a relief effort and finds and comforts
the injured first lady, whom the President apparently couldn't
find room for in Air Force 1.
Will Smith and his squadron attack an enemy spaceship.  All
the jets are destroyed except Smith's.  We get to see lots
of planes blow up.  Smith's plane runs out of gas (wouldn't
he have refueled before he left?) but he parachutes to
safety.  After some trash talk, he takes an alien hostage.
He soon encounters Randy Quaid, who gives Smith and alien
a ride.
Pullman learns that aliens did crash in Roswell, New Mexico,
in 1949.  He visits the top secret laboratory there, meeting
goofy mad scientist Brent Spiner.  Smith and alien also
show up, and meet the President.  Spiner operates on the
alien, which springs back to life (the operation is a success)
and attacks Spiner.  Pullman has a conversation with the
alien.  When the icky alien isn't polite, it is shot.
Smith commandeers a helicopter (apparently he can fly anything)
and thru ESP finds his girlfriend and the first lady,
who lives just long enough for a tender bedside moment with
Pullman.
Clever Goldblum somehow creates a computer virus that can
take down the alien shields, allowing counterstrikes.  Ever-handy
Smith learns to fly the alien spacecraft from the Roswell crash,
and docks with the mothership to allow passenger Goldblum
to execute the virus.  Alien vessels attack the base and the
jets, destroying all but the supporting cast.  Drunken oaf
Quaid volunteers for a strike force and blows up the mothership.
Pullman also flies a jet to fight the aliens.  Even more
amazing, Smith and Goldblum escape the aliens alive.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Ben-Hur (1959)
"Ben-Hur" is a massive, sprawling MGM epic set in
the first century AD, during the life of Christ.
Directed by William Wyler, the film plods along
for most of its 212 minutes, marginally good but
lacking in humor, action, or spark.  There are
solemn religious overtones and the usual stereotypes
in Roman epics (The bad, corrupt Romans; The good,
oppressed Jews).  The famed chariot race sequence
delivers the goods, and is much better than the rest
of the film, but is hardly sufficient to bring the
entire film to a higher grade.
Charlton Heston stars as the title character.
Ben-Hur begins the film as a wealthy Judean prince.
He is the childhood friend of the new Roman precept
Messala (Stephen Boyd), but politics soon makes them
enemies.  Boyd finds a good excuse to imprison
Ben-Hur's family, making Ben-Hur a galley slave.
After Ben-Hur saves the life of moody Roman general
Arrius (Jack Hawkins), Arrius adopts Ben-Hur, who
becomes a champion chariot racer.  But soon Ben-Hur
leaves Rome for Judea, to find his family and get
revenge on Messala, who co-incidentally is a great
chariot racer.  On his way, he just happens to meet
Sheik Ilderim (Hugh Griffith) who has great horses
but no jockey.
The viewer must wait over two hours before seeing
the film's centerpiece, the Chariot race sequence.
This was directed by legendary stuntman Yakima Canutt
and is excellent.  Messala's dirty tricks, especially
the spiked probe, adds much dramatic tension to an
already exciting sequence.  The problem is that
the chariot race is about the only action that
"Ben-Hur" has.
I have no problems with Charlton Heston's performance.
He has screen charisma, and can project indignation well.
The film might have been more fun with offbeat casting
(Robert Mitchum? Gregory Peck?) but Heston does fit
the melodramatic bill.
Christ shows up in the story now and then, and his
crucifiction is depicted in the finale.  We do not
see Christ's face or hear his voice.  By film's
end, Ben-Hur has become religious propoganda.  Anyone
who has seen a Hollywood film before is not surprised
when the leprosy of Miriam (Martha Scott) and Tirzah
(Cathy O'Donnell) is cured.
"Ben-Hur" won a mountain of Academy Awards, including
Best Picture, Best Director, Best Actor (Heston),
Best Cinematography, and Best Supporting Actor (Griffith).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for It (1927)
Clara Bow's film career peaked in 1927 with two
highly successful silent classics.  One was "Wings",
the aviation drama that was the first film to win
the Academy Award for Best Picture.  Her other
great success for that year was "It".  For the
rest of her short career (her last film was in 1933)
Bow would be known as the 'It' girl.
"It" was loosely based upon Elinor Glyn's pulp
novelette, which defined 'it' essentially as a code
word for overwhelming sex appeal.  Paramount cleverly
used Glyn and her 'it' concept, to promote Clara
Bow as the epitome of 'it'.  This led to Glyn
being paid $50,000 for a brief appearance in the
film, and to proclaim Bow as the 'it' girl.
"It" is also noted for having an early screen
appearance by Gary Cooper, who has a brief role
as a newspaper reporter.  Cooper was reportedly
one of Bow's many conquests.  Scandals, both
real and fabricated, helped drive Bow out of
Hollywood.
"It" is one of the best preserved silent films
that I have seen.  There are no dancing lines
or exploding white dots, no orange-yellow tones,
and no obvious missing frames.  Such problems
are endemic to most 1920s films, but not this one.
The storyline would probably annoy feminists if
the film was made today.  Betty (Bow) works as an
impoverished salesgirl in a large department store
owned by dashing but humorless Waltham (Antonio
Moreno).  Betty's best friend is troubled unwed
mother Molly (Priscilla Bonner), whose baby is
the target of meddlesome social workers.
Betty works hard to catch the eye of Waltham,
whose fiancee Jacqueline (Adela Van Norman) is
attractive but boring.  Betty uses grinning
fop Monty (William Austin) to get access to
Waltham, who doesn't stand a chance.  Bow's
vivacious, flirtatious personality struck
a chord with film audiences who saw her as
emancipated from the restrictive moral code
that preceded the Jazz Age.
Yes, but how good is the movie?  Producer Adolph
Zukor's attention ensured a big budget with good
sets.  The characters are all stock, but the
film has its charm, no doubt supplied more by
Bow's presence than by Clarence Badger's
direction.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Parapluies de Cherbourg, Les (1964)
Has there ever been a film more lovely than
"The Umbrellas of Cherbourg"?  Pretty faces,
voices, melodies and colors; it's a film where
tenement walls are painted bright green, and
ageless mothers are as lovely as their
daughters.  Only once is there a respite
from relentless beauty, when Guy shows up
for work in a dirty uniform.
The strength of "Cherbourg" comes from its
sets, its melodies, and its story.  But it
is known chiefly for its cinematic invention
of dialogue sung not spoken.  Its songs are
all derived from the dialogue between two
characters.  This might seem a gimmick if
the 'script' wasn't so revealing of character,
or if the Michel Legrand melodies weren't so
memorable.  But not even the most cynical
of observers can prevent from being swept
away by the film's brilliance.
The story is pure romance.  It begins in
France of 1957.  Guy (Nino Castelnuovo) is
a young auto mechanic who dreams of operating
his own gas station.  He lives with his sickly
Godmother (Mireille Perrey) who is nursed by
comely, gentle Madeleine (Ellen Farner).
Genevieve (Catherine Deneuve) is a young
woman who works in a financially failing
umbrella store owned by her mother (Anne Vernon).
Guy and Genevieve are lovers, but are parted
by his drafting into the war with Algeria.
(Some spoilers follow, which are needed in
order to better analyze the film.  You've probably
either already seen the film or never will,
but otherwise, at least now you've been warned.)
A final encounter with Guy leaves Genevieve
pregnant.  Her mother schemes to remedy the
situation by marrying her off to wealthy,
well-mannered diamond merchant Roland (Marc
Michel, reprising his character from director
Jacques Demy's earler film "Lola").  This comes
to pass.  Guy returns from the war, and after
some sulking makes the equally practical decision
of marrying loyal Madeleine.
A final, accidental encounter between Genevieve
and Guy is wistful but only confirms that both
have made the right decision.  That "Cherbourg"
begins with such an intense romance between the
leads, and ends with them as virtual strangers,
is as strong a commentary about the fleeting
nature of love as can be found in cinema.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mutiny on the Bounty (1935)
"Mutiny on the Bounty" is an outstanding film, with
excellent cast and cinematography, and an even better
script.  The film never flags for a moment, and
all scenes work, whether dramatic, romantic or comic.
In late nineteenth century England, a ship is launched
to Tahiti, to obtain breadfruit trees for feeding slaves
on a British colony.  Captain Bligh (Charles Laughton)
is a brutal taskmaster, punishing his seamen even upon
death.  First Mate Fletcher Christian (Clark Gable)
openly disapproves of Laughton's methods.
With both men stubborn and hot-tempered, conflict is
inevitable.  Gable takes the ship and sends Laughton off
in a lifeboat with some loyal mates.  Against all odds,
Laughton makes it to England, and returns to the sea
in a second ship to catch and hang the mutineers.
It is difficult to say what is more impressive: the
cinematography of the big ships, cleverly giving the
illusion of sailing the high seas, or the script,
which gives the actors dramatic but natural lines.
I liked how events went after the mutiny.  Laughton, who
was selfish and cruel on the Bounty, is equally just and
kindly on the lifeboat.  This character transition was
credible to me, because these were his loyal men, because
it was what was needed to reach shore, and his anger
was focused on seeing Grant hang.
Grant and the mutinous crew are hunted men without a
country.  Grant shows remorse for becoming an infamous
outlaw, but no remorse for taking the ship to save
lives and stop Laughton's cruelty.
Tahiti is depicted as a tropical paradise, with the
most benevolent people (natives who look suspiciously
anglo-saxon) in world history.  Too bad civilizations
like that cannot exist long, since it is ripe for
exploitation by outsiders.
"Mutiny on the Bounty" won the Oscar for Best Picture.
Laughton, Grant, and Franchot Tone (who plays a good-guy
officer tried for mutiny) were all nominated for Best
Actor, but must have split the votes between them.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Best Years of Our Lives, The (1946)
There are many war movies.  However, after the Vietnam war, 
Hollywood believed that a new film genre was born with 
"Coming Home" (1978): the postwar movie.  This genre deals
with soldiers after they have returned from the war, and
sometimes find that the greater battle was not left behind.
Spouses have grown independent, children have grown up and
become strangers, and skills learned in the war may not
translate to stateside jobs.  And if you've left a part of
you behind on the battlefield, physically and/or mentally, 
you must face your inner demons, overcome handicaps, and
find a new place in society.
Of course, there's rarely such a thing as a new genre.
"The Best Years of Our Lives" had "Coming Home" beat by
more than thirty years, and what's more, it is a superior
film, with a broader story and a better script.
"The Best Years of Our Lives" concerns the return of three
World War II veterans, and their problems adjusting to
postwar society.  The oldest (Fredric March) promptly
gets a promotion and has a strong supporting family,
anchored by wife Myrna Loy and full-grown daughter 
Teresa Wright.  But he has a drinking problem, feels guilty
about his success, and bears unfathomable antipathy towards 
his obliging boss.
Dana Andrews is the second veteran, and his leading man looks
ensure the most screen time.  His readjustment is more
difficult.  His skill at dropping bombs doesn't help him
land a job, and his wife proves selfish and shallow.  Aware
of his problems, he spends much of the movie wearing a
dazed look, as if saying 'How could this have happened to
me, such a swell guy?'
Harold Russell is a sailor who lost his hands in battle.  
He now has metal hooks in their place, that allow him to open 
doors and light matches, but he can't hug his fiancee with them.
Russell has strong family support and a devoted fiancee,
but struggles with depression and inadequacy.  Russell won the
Best Supporting Actor Oscar for his performance, but did not
appear in another movie until a minor role 34 years later.
I guess the studios wouldn't lend him a hand.
"The Best Years of Our Lives" takes its time, and the
slow pace is very agreeable, allowing commonplace dialogue
to make characters and events appear real.  Andrews
doesn't find his wife until the film's second hour,
giving him plenty of time to estabish bonds with March,
Russell, and Wright.
Hoagy Carmichael is in this movie.  I mention this because
he is always welcome, and he sure can play a piano.
It can be argued that "The Best Years of Our Lives" is
really a lengthy soap opera.  Well, bring on the detergent,
and don't forget your hanky.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Betty Ford Story, The (1987) (TV)
Like Rodney Dangerfield, made-for-television movies
get no respect.  It is true that most of them aren't
particularly good, but the same can be said for most
films that play in theatres.  TV movies have smaller
budgets, less stellar casts, are less promoted and
less lauded.  When the AFI top 100 list was published
last year, no TV movies made the cut.  The very idea
was unthinkable.
But there have been many excellent television movies
over the years.  Promotion and quality do not go
hand in hand, and great scripts and acting are not
limited to the big screen.  For example, take
'The Betty Ford Story'.  The script is excellent,
and Gena Rowlands won both an Emmy and a Golden Globe
for her performance as the former First Lady.
Due to the short time limitations of a television
movie, the plot moves quickly through ten years
of Betty Ford's life.  The story begins with
husband Gerald ascending the Presidency upon
Nixon's resignation.  Betty soon provides a sharp
contrast to previous First Lady's: she expresses
political opinions, campaigns aggressively for
her husband, and for her own agenda (including the
ill-fated Equal Rights Amendment).
Betty is plagued with health problems.  She
develops breast cancer, and has to have a masectomy.
She has advanced arthritis, which requires strong
pain killers to continue an active schedule.
Gradually she becomes addicted to both pills
and alcohol, which consumes her life after Ford
loses the 1976 election to Carter.  Fortunately,
a family intervention saves her life and gives
her a new mission: founding her self-named clinic.
Gerald Ford was ridiculed in the media for stupidity
and physical clumsiness, but those traits are
absent in Josef Sommer's credible portrayal.
His political ambitions sometimes conflict with
Betty's needs, and he is a classic enabler when
it comes to her addictions, but otherwise he's a
great guy.  Their children look like Ken and Barbie,
but their dialogue is first rate: covering the
bases from family teasing to concern over their
troubled mother.  But this is Rowlands' movie,
and her portrayal of the plucky First Lady is
well deserving of her awards.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Unforgiven (1992)
"Unforgiven" was a long time in coming.  The
script was written by David Webb Peoples in
1976.  Eventually, the rights were acquired by
Clint Eastwood, who waited to film it until
he had aged enough to match the lead character.
Certainly, "Unforgiven" was worth the wait:
Eastwood won both Best Picture and Best Director,
and was nominated for Best Actor.
Eastwood plays William Munny, formerly a notorious
drunk, train robber and killer.  He later married a
woman who reformed him.  Smallpox left him a widower,
and he struggles to raise two adorable children
(Shane Meier and Aline Levasseur) by scratching out
a living as a pig farmer.
Meanwhile, two cowboys (David Mucci and Rob Campbell)
disfigure a young prostitute (Anna Thomson) in the
town of Big Whiskey.  The tough local sheriff Little
Bill (Gene Hackman) merely fines the men, with the
fine payable to the prostitute's humorless owner
(Anthony James).  Outraged, the other prostitutes pitch
together a $1,000 reward payable upon the murder of
the two cowboys.
With his farming enterprise failing, Munny is enticed
to collect the bounty by a near-sighted, boasting,
would-be gunman (Jaimz Woolvett).  Munny also convinces
his old friend Ned (Morgan Freeman).  The three arrive
at Big Whiskey, but have a run-in with Little Bill,
whose definition of law-and-order does not include
roaming hired gunmen.  The brutal sheriff has already
disposed of one mercenary, English Bob (Richard Harris),
taking his pulp writer sidekick Beauchamp (Saul Rubinek)
for good measure.
"Unforgiven" was nominated for nine Academy Awards,
winning four.  Gene Hackman won Best Supporting Actor,
and Joel Cox won for editing.  The screenplay, the
cinematography (Jack Green), the sets and the sound
were also nominated.
For once, the Academy had picked a film fully
worthy of Best Picture.  "Unforgiven" not only
revitalized the Western epic, but gave it a
human face and memorable characters.  Except
for the climatic showdown, "Unforgiven" depicts
a West filled with characters who are neither
heroes or villains, and with flaws that are all
too obvious.
The film also makes a statement about personal
redemption: despite the protestations by Eastwood's
character that he is reformed, his actions prove
otherwise.  The conversations between Little Bill
and the pulp writer dismiss the myth of the West,
which is restored by Eastwood in his big showdown.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for To Have and Have Not (1944)
"To Have And Have Not" is a highly entertaining movie
that combines drama and romance.  The script and story
is very good, and the cast is excellent, stocked with
many favorite actors from the 1940s.
Humphrey Bogart is an entrepreneur in Vichy-controlled
France, making a living renting his fishing boat.  His
sidekick is lovable drunkard Walter Brennan.  He lives in
a hotel owned by Frenchy, a Free French loyalist.
Hoagy Carmichael tinkles the ivories in the hotel bar,
where Bogart befriends pickpocket Lauren Bacall.
Bogart and Bacall get mixed up with the Free France
movement, leading to encounters with the local authorities
led by Dan Seymour.
There are many similarities to "Casablanca".  Bogart plays
the same tough guy with a tender heart.  He fights the
agents of the Nazis.  His love interest is a much younger
blonde.  He spends time in a bar with a piano player.
Dan Seymour is in both films.  "To Have and Have Not" is not 
quite in the same class, however, as the script is not as 
great and the direction is much looser, with several filler 
scenes that are fun but reduce essential dramatic tension.
The chemistry between Bogart and Bacall is remarkable.
Of course, they became married in real life.  In this film,
however, it seems odd that Bogart's character, a jaded
but honest sort, would put so much faith in a young 
pickpocket.  This was Bacall's first movie.
The more interesting relationship is between Bogart and
Brennan.  Bogart respects Brennan despite his constant
begging for drinks.  Brennan is fond of asking strangers
whether they've been bit by a dead bee, and both Brennan
and Bogart listen closely to the tone of the stranger's
answer.  It is a quick character test, and if the stranger
is annoyed by the question, he fails the test.
The 1940s seem to have a higher percentage of great films
than other decades.  Usually a glance at the cast is all
that is needed to tell whether the film is fluff or
substantial.  "To Have and Have Not" demonstrates that a 
good story and a strong cast can make a very good film,
without the emphasis on action, stunts and special effects
that more recent films have.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Clueless (1995)
Amy Heckerling has done it again.  The writer/director of
"Look Who's Talking" did an even better job with this movie.
Both films are comedies, but the characters aren't caricatures.
Both films have a genuine warmth that is hard to find in films of
any era.
Cher (Alicia Silverstone) is a teenager much more interested
in fashion and status than anything else.  Still, she dotes
on her lawyer father, and comes up with endless one-liners,
giving the impression that she is not as clueless as she appears.
Cher's step-brother law student Josh (Paul Rudd) moves in to 
assist his step-father.  Josh and Cher get on each other's
nerves, but underlying their relationship is a sexual tension.
Her best friend is Dionne, a cheerful socialite who has a
love/hate relationship with boyfriend Murray (Donald Adeoson Faison,
who gives a fine performance).  They all go to a posh
high school, where Cher meets new kid Tai (Brittany Murphy).
Cher adopts Tai, training her to have the same shallow aspirations
as herself.
Tai connects with druggie skateboarder Travis (Breckin Meyer)
but as Travis has low status, Cher steers Tai to Elton
(Jeremy Sisto) who only has eyes for Cher.  Elton and Cher
misunderstand the other's intentions, and when Elton makes a pass
at Cher, she flees the car, promptly meeting a robber.
Stranded, Cher is forced to call Josh to rescue her.
Cher's report card has low grades, but she manipulates the 
teachers into improving them.  The sarcastic debate teacher
won't budge, however, so Cher sets him up with environmentalist
teacher Miss Geist.  After the debate teacher begins giving easy
grades, all the schoolkids give Cher a standing ovation during
lunch.  Upon seeing the report card grades, Cher's father declares
that he "could not be more proud of her than if she had
actually deserved them".
Cher falls for new kid in school Christian (Justin Walker)
and throws herself at him.  When he fails to make a pass,
Cher asks herself, "Did my hair get flat?"  But Christian is
clearly gay, something Cher should have realized when he
made her watch "Spartacus".
Things continue to go wrong for Cher.  She fails her
driving test when she hits a parked car and nearly kills
a biker.  She learns she can't negotiate a failed driver's 
test.  Tai and Josh are hitting it off, and Tai becomes
more popular at school, triggering rare jealousy in
Cher and making her finally question her values.
As Cher attempts a character transformation, her real purpose
may be to entice Josh, who falls for her.  Tai ends up with
Travis, who has given up drugs, while Dionne and Murray
have reconciled.  With the debate teacher marrying
Miss Geist, it is a warm and happy ending all around.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Casablanca (1942)
"Casablanca" comes closer to perfection than any other
film that I have seen, and is probably the best film
ever made.  "Casablanca" has everything: a great script,
a great cast, and outstanding cinematography and direction.
If you are reading this, you've probably seen the film
several times.  "Casablanca" stars Humphrey Bogart as
Rick, who owns a popular nightclub in Casablanca, Morocco.
The film takes place during World War II, and the Nazis
have taken France.  Morocco is a French territory.
Casablanca is filled with refugees trying to escape
Nazi influence, and there is a black market for exit visas.
Deeply cynical Rick tries to suppress his anti-Nazi sentiments,
as does corrupt official Claude Rains.  Peter Lorre and
Sydney Greenstreet are simply profiteers.  Conrad Veidt
plays a dislikable Nazi officer, who is chasing fugitive
Paul Henreid.  Henreid is married to lovely Ilsa (Ingrid
Bergman), who once had an affair with Rick.  Rick, whose
motto is "I don't stick my neck out for nobody", is asked
to help Henreid escape.  He is also tempted to resume his
romance with Ilsa.
What makes "Casablanca" possibly the best film ever made?
The most important element is the script, which is the
most quoted in film history.  The script was based on
an obscure unproduced play, "Everybody comes to Rick's",
and according to legend was written hastily during filming.
But more than in any other movie, the script brings out
the depth of the characters, with Veidt's contemptible Nazi
as the only stereotype.  Even minor supporting actors,
such as piano player Sam (Dooley Wilson) and desperate
refugee Annina (Joy Page) are made real.
The glorious black and white cinematography is the
second most important element.  The cinematographer was
Arthur Edeson, who was also behind the camera for two of the
best films from the 1930s, "All Quiet on the Western Front"
and "Mutiny on the Bounty".  But of course the shots were
under the Director's supervision.  The director was
Michael Curtiz, who remains relatively obscure despite
his body of work, over 150 films including "The Adventures
of Robin Hood", "Angels with Dirty Faces", "Yankee Doodle
Dandy" and "Life with Father".  These famous films are all
very different, ranging from crime drama to comedy to
adventure to musical, showing the range that Curtiz had.
As great as the cast is, it is less important than
the script and cinematography.  Rains should have won
Best Supporting Actor, while Bogart and Bergman
are inseparable from their roles.  Lorre is probably
my all-time favorite character actor.  "Casablanca"
was key to Bogart's subsequent career as an anti-hero
male lead, as he previously was noted for supporting
roles portraying gangsters.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Jazz Singer, The (1927)
"The Jazz Singer" is of great historical importance,
as it was the first feature to incorporate dialogue
and sound.  Although primarily a silent, the musical
numbers all have sound, and there are brief snippets
of dialogue.  The ad-libbed dialogue by Al Jolson
delighted the audience.  The tremendous box office
success launched the film career of Jolson, and put
the Warner Brothers studio on the map.
The story has an aging orthodox Jewish tenor (Warner Oland,
better known for playing Charlie Chan in 1930s movies)
raising his young son Jakie (Bobby Gordon) to take his
place in the synagogue.  Jakie wants to be a jazz
singer, however, and runs away from home.  Years later,
Jakie (now played by Jolson) is a success, about to
star in a broadway show.  But on opening night, which
falls on the Jewish Day of Atonement, his father
becomes gravely ill. Jake's mother (Eugenie Besserer)
implores him to skip the show to sing in the synagogue,
which she believes will reconcile him with his father.
"The Jazz Singer" has been been criticized for its
heavyhanded drama.  The film's story and characters are
simplistic.  Jakie's father is humorless and stubborn,
his mother is selfless and loving, and even his girlfriend
and Broadway co-star (May McAvoy) isn't more than an
ambitious pretty face.  The choices that Jakie must make,
between career and family, jazz and religion, take on
a significance in the story that is much greater than
the viewer's interest.
More interesting are the musical numbers.  Jolson
has a couple black-faced numbers, delivering "Mammy"
with mawkishness ripe for parody.  There a few
uptempo numbers, and Jolson's enthusiasm and ability
to entertain is evident.  While "The Jazz Singer"
is not a good movie, it isn't bad either.  It is
a watchable Jolson vehicle, as well as one of
the most historically significant films.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for From Here to Eternity (1953)
"From Here to Eternity" racked up 13 Academy Award
nominations, and won five Oscars, including Best Picture,
Best Director (Fred Zinnemann, who had been nominated
the year before for "High Noon"), Best Screenplay
(Daniel Taradash) and Best B/W Cinematography (Burnett Guffey).
Winning the only Oscars of their careers were
Best Supporting Actor Frank Sinatra, and Best Supporting
Actress Donna Reed.  Montgomery Clift and Burt Lancaster
were nominated for Best Actor, while Deborah Kerr picked
up a nomination for Best Actress.
Today, the film is best known for the beach scene
with Lancaster and Kerr, considered to be one of the
most romantic in screen history, and Sinatra's performance,
which rejuvenated his career.
The setting is Pearl Harbor, Hawaii, shortly before the
surprise Japanese attack began direct U.S. involvement
in World War II.  Clift is a soldier and bugler who transfers
to a new regiment.  A former middleweight boxer, he is pressured
by contemptible Captain Holmes (Philip Ober) to box for
the regiment.  Clift refuses, and is harassed by Holmes
and the regiment's boxers.  Clift's sole friend is Maggio
(Sinatra).  Clift gets a girlfriend (Reed), who is a
'hostess' at a private club (in the novel, the club is
a whorehouse, while Reed's character is a prostitute).
Holmes' right hand man is Lancaster, a Sergeant who has
eyes for Holmes' unhappy wife (Deborah Kerr).  Their affair
is illegal under Army rules and could land him in prison.
The much-lauded beach scene is not representative of
the Lancaster/Kerr romance, which is furtive and bitter.
The critical and commercial success of "From Here to
Eternity" is understandable.  It is a good film, and it
has strong appeal for both men (war theme) and women
(romance theme).  It appeals to American patriotism,
especially in the scene where heroic soldiers led by
Lancaster shoot down a Japanese bomber.
Essentially the film is a soap opera, with the dual
troubled romances of Clift/Reed and Lancaster/Kerr.
To increase sympathy for our romantic leads, Holmes'
character is selfish, cruel and philandering, while
Sinatra's tormentor Fatso (Ernest Borgnine) is a sadistic
bully.  How much one appreciates the film is proportional
to one's sympathy for Clift and Lancaster, both of whom
are stubborn with self-destructive streaks.  Some of
the dramatic scenes are manipulative and heavy-handed,
especially the various death scenes, Clift's fistfight,
and the come-uppance of Holmes and the regiment's boxers.
"From Here to Eternity" reminds me of "The Young Lions",
a film from 1957.  Clift plays a very similar character,
a soldier forced to fight other soldiers, who gets the
girl, goes AWOL, and forces the premature retirement of
his Captain.  In "The Young Lions", Dean Martin's
character merges the roles of Sinatra (Clift's friend)
and Lancaster (in refusing to get a promotion).
Since "The Young Lions" is the later film, one could
say that it ripped off "From Here to Eternity".  But
"The Young Lions" is really an improvement, as it is
a much better film, probably due to the presence of
Marlon Brando.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Unmarried Woman, An (1978)
Erica (Jill Clayburgh) and Martin (Michael Murphy) are a 
long-married couple in their late thirties.  They have
a teenage daughter Patti.  Martin is a stockbroker, while
Erica works part time at an art gallery.
There is some stress in their relationship.  Martin is
sexually demanding, and Martin seems distracted.  She asks
him about this, but he won't give her an answer.
Erica is a bit smug about her marriage.  When she hangs with
the girls, she can listen to their romantic tales with
a subtle smile that comes from never needing to be in
their position.  When the artist Charlie hits on her while
working at the art gallery, she can fend off his passes
and retain her sense of humor.
One day, out of nowhere, Martin bursts out sobbing.  He tells
Erica that he is having an affair with a much younger woman,
and is going to leave Erica for her.  This is so devastating
to Erica that she staggers down the sidewalk for awhile, then
throws up.  After Martin leaves, she exterminates the house
of his presence, throwing out all his possessions and taking
off her wedding ring.
One of Erica's friends arranges a lunch date for her.  Erica
does not have the best attitude towards men now, and freaks
when he makes a pass at her.  He is kicked out of the cab,
and left stranded on a New York freeway.
Erica begins seeing a psychiatrist, with the sessions paid
for by her ex-husband.  She tells Erica to begin dating men.
Erica has a quickie with Charlie, then begins a relationship
with another painter, Saul Kaplan (Alan Bates).
I can't say much for Saul's paintings.  He is shown dumping
buckets of paint on a huge canvas, tilting the canvas to
make blurry rainbows of color.  I guess actually drawing
something is not to his liking.
At a party, we learn that Erica's shrink is a lesbian,
and Saul, with Erica, meets Charlie.  Charlie makes amusing
boorish comments, infuriating Saul, and both end up wrestling 
on the table.  Erica seems secretely pleased that men are
fighting over her.
Saul becomes part of Erica's life.  He begins trying to talk
her into staying with him at his country home for the summer.
Erica does not want to give up her new-found independence.  
Saul meets daughter Patti, who asks impertinent questions 
designed to test him.  He passes.
Martin and Erica occasionally meet each other while jogging.
Now that she is in a relationship, the former hostility she
showed towards him has vanished.  She gets to triumph over
him when he admits to her that his affair has ended, and
asks to move back in with her.  When she says sorry, one
can hear the voice inside her saying, "HA!"
Saul has to go to his summer cottage without Erica.  As
a parting gift, he gives her one of his enormous paintings,
but since she is at his apartment she has to find a way
to carry it down the streets to her place.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for 4 Little Girls (1997)
"4 Little Girls" is a Spike Lee production and his first
documentary.  The film is about a 1963 terrorist bombing 
of a church in Birmingham, Alabama by segregationalists,
killing four black children who were attending Sunday 
school. 
"4 Little Girls" is like no other Spike Lee film.  He
stays behind the camera, and the political, social and
racial aspects of the bombing are downplayed.  The focus
of the documentary is on the victims, their short lives,
and their family members and friends who continue to 
grieve to this day. 
Through the 1950s to mid-1960s, Birmingham was one of the 
most segregated city in the South.  Many members of the
police force were also members of the Klan.  The 1963
church bombing was the twenty-first for the city.  The
hate-filled segregationist that was responsible was
well-known, but was not put on trial until 1977.  He had
committed many such bombings, but moved with impunity
because segregation was the law of the land.  Even the
state Governor, George Wallace, was a hard-core segregationist, 
and is shown in an old video clip blocking the entrance to a 
school, surrounded by state guardsmen. 
The political conflict between the segregationists and
civil rights leaders such as Dr. Martin Luther King, and
the demonstrations led by young adults (one scene has
police turning fire hoses on them) are the most interesting
parts of the documentary.  I would have graded this documentary
higher had this subject been the film's focus. 
Instead the focus is on the four girls killed in the church 
bombing.  There are exhaustive interviews with friends and 
family.  When a friend breaks from telling a rembrance to sob, 
the camera makes certain to capture the lengthy moment of 
private grief for permanent video preservation.  The mother 
shows her daughters' scout uniform, her dolls, her toys.  
These scenes, drenched in grief, are significant only because 
the daughter was brutally murdered, and the murder itself is 
significant primarily as a milestone in the struggle for equal 
rights. 
One element that bothered me about the documentary is the 
depiction of the four victims as young children.  Three of
the four were fourteen years old: teenagers, not little girls.  
The fourth victim was eleven.  The reverend Jesse Jackson 
refers to them as "innocent babies."  Certainly they were 
innocent, and no one of any age deserves to die in an act of 
terrorism, but they were not babies.  Bill Cosby has a brief 
scene where he states that the victims could have been Harvard 
graduates and could have become doctors.  Well, they could have 
become U.S. Presidents, but it isn't necessary to speculate
about their future in order to get across the tragedy and 
injustice of their deaths. 
I know that I come across as insensitive by criticizing 
"4 Little Girls."  I realize that I may be the only person who
has seen it and not given it a very positive review.
However, I believe that it is wrong to raise the grade of a 
film because of its subject, no matter how important. 
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Alfie (1966)
"Alfie" is a British production starring Michael Caine
as the title character, a selfish skirt-chaser who
only begins to question his values at film's end.
"Alfie" is an underrated film with an excellent
script by Bill Naughton, who also wrote the play.
The soundtrack is also outstanding, featuring jazz
arrangements by Sonny Rollins and the title song,
which comes at the film's *end* (as are all the credits)
and is performed by Cher.  I also liked the casting,
the cinematography, and the costumes.
While "Alfie" did not win any Academy Awards, it
was nominated for a slew of them.  Best Picture,
Best Actor (Caine), Best Supporting Actress (Vivien Merchant)
and Best Writing.  It won the 1967 Golden Globe for
Best English-Language Foreign Film.
Caine's character dominates the film.  The women come
and go in his life.  While he needs their love and
companionship, they are replaceable objects to him.
To refers to a woman in the third person, as "it" or "bird".
He prevents having an emotional attachment to a woman
by not considering her as a person.  His character is
contrasted against that of romantic rival Humphrey (Graham Stark)
whose love is permanent and unconditional.
But Alfie is not without feelings.  He can feel sorry for
himself, of course, but also shows love for his out-of-wedlock
son Malcolm, sympathy for a sickly man in a sanitarium,
and remorse towards his aborted fetus.
Caine talks to the camera incessently, often while in
the middle of conversation with others, who take no notice.
The camera becomes Caine's best friend and confidant,
and allows him to present his train of thought.
While films like "Tom Jones" have characters looking
directly at the camera, and speaking, I know of no other
film, one-man plays notwithstanding, that have used this
technique as much and as sucessfully.
Alfie has a medical examination that goes on for at least
ten minutes, talking to the camera all the while.  A doctor
keeps asking him pointed questions, and Alfie is clueless
that his health is clearly in danger.  His character seems
to completely lack introspection early in the film, and
develops only limited self-awareness as the story progresses.
Look for Shelly Winters and Denholm Elliot in small roles.
Winters is radiant and colorful, as usual.  Jane Asher,
who was famous at the time for having been Paul McCartney's
boyfriend, plays one of Alfie's girlfriends.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
"The Mask of Zorro" is action-packed escapist fun,
perhaps a guilty pleasure for some, but it is
too shallow and ridiculous to be considered a good
movie.
"The Mask of Zorro" begins in California in the
year 1820, when it was still a Spanish possession.
Anthony Hopkins is Zorro, masked action hero by day,
aristocrat by night.  Governor and bad-guy Stuart
Wilson learns Hopkins' identify, and jails him,
for good measure killing his wife and kidnapping
his infant daughter.
Twenty years later, Hopkins escapes from prison,
and being too old for the role, instructs enthusiastic
bandit Antonio Banderas to take his place as
Zorro.  Banderas' brother has been killed by
Matthew Letscher, who is Wilson's right-hand man.
Meanwhile, Wilson has a plan of buying California
from Mexico, with gold extracted via slave labor from
a local mine.  Hopkins seeks revenge on Wilson, Banderas
seeks revenge on Letscher, and Banderas romances
Catherine Zeta Jones, who is Hopkins' now-adult
daughter.
What can be said that is positive about "Zorro"?
The sets are excellent, especially the mine.
The costumes are very good, and the endless action
scenes are well choreographed.  Zeta Jones is
beyond beautiful, and the cast is energetic.
So, why isn't "The Mask of Zorro" (not to be confused
with "The Mark of Zorro", the silent epic starring
Douglas Fairbanks Sr.) a good movie?  It's all action
and no thought.  The film is riddled with little problems.
I'll just describe a few of them.
Hopkins spends twenty years in prison.  The day Wilson
returns from Spain and pays a visit looking for Zorro
is the very day that Hopkins decides to escape.  Well,
if it was so easy, why didn't he break out twenty
years earlier?
Both Hopkins and Banderas can fight multiple swordsmen
at once.  They can also outrun bullets.  But when
the duel their enemies one-on-one, they can barely
hold their own.  Hopkins and Wilson have numerous
opportunities to kill each other, but don't.  It is
almost as if they prefer the other to stay alive,
so as to make their own life more interesting.
Hopkins trains Banderas to be not merely a great
swashbuckler and acrobat, but a gentleman as well.
He must be a great teacher, since Banderas learns
it all in just a few scenes.  It took Professor Higgins
an entire three-hour movie to train Eliza Doolittle.
Jones is a big fan of Zorro, and espouses pro-peasant
attitudes, despite being raised by despot Wilson.
It is amazing to me, but not to the writers, that
she never takes her father's side, and falls for
Zorro immediately.
Scenes typical of a Zorro movie, such as hapless soldiers
fumbling in an attempt to catch Zorro, Zorro swinging
from convenient ropes and chandeliers like Tarzan,
and jumping two stories onto a stationary horse
(Wouldn't that break the horse's back?  Wouldn't that
cause an, um, groin injury?) are present.  It is
probably impossible to make a great movie about Zorro,
(or Godzilla, or Batman, for that matter) unless it
is done as a parody, such as was done in "Zorro, the Gay
Blade" some years back.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for When the Daltons Rode (1940)
A stranger (Randolph Scott) arrives in a sleepy western town,
and waits for a stage coach to take him to the next town.
To pass the time, Scott strolls the streets, and sees a family
having their portrait taken.  There is a mishap in the studio,
and Scott laughs.  This makes one of the clan angry 
(Brian Donlevy, fresh from playing the villian in 
"Destry Rides Again").  Scott next witnesses an altercation
between Ozark Jones (Andy Devine, fresh from playing comic
relief in "Stagecoach", and the only man on earth who can
talk off-key) and his latest girlfriend.
She has a gun and, to protect himself, Ozark hides behind
Randolph Scott.  It is Donlevy's turn to laugh, and Scott
and Donlevy get into a scuffle with Donlevy ending up in
the horse trough.  The tension is broken when Scott realizes
that they are old childhood friends: Scott was a neighbor to
this Dalton family.  Scott is invited to stay at the Dalton
ranch.
Scott hits on a woman at the ranch.  She turns out to be
a Bob Dalton's fiancee.  This love triangle is wooden and
empty, getting in the way of the film's pace.  Scott, who
is a lawyer by trade, agrees to stay in town to fight
banking interests who want to take the Dalton's land.
Soon, overseers arrive to take inspect the homestead.
Donlevy accidentally kills an overseer and is put on trial 
for murder.  Of course, Scott defends him, but Donlevy's
easily roused temper again flares in the courtroom.
There is violence, the Daltons flee the courtroom, and
become bank-robbing outlaws.
The Donlevy trial is the turning point of the film.
A good western drama suddenly becomes an average western
shoot-em-up.  The pace is too quick: now the Dalton gang
is wanted dead or alive, and their daring adventures
include robbin a train loaded with both gold and deputees.
There are some good stunts in these scenes.
The Dalton gang returns to their hometown with the
intention of going straight.  But they can't resist pulling
one last job.  The bank holdup misfires, the Dalton gang
is killed in a shootout, with only Scott surviving.
He gets the girl and first billing, but not the glory,
which must have been annoying to him when he first read
the script.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Dead End (1937)
"Dead End" is an excellent adaptation of the Broadway play
about the troubled lives of the poor in New York City.
"Dead End" weaves three story lines.  The most important
features a gang of delinquent kids, trying to act tough
and on their way to reform school.  Their dialects and
dialogue is very entertaining, especially when they mock
their wealthy neighbors.  The Dead End Kids ended up with
their own movie contract, which lasted for years through
films that declined into the Bowery Boys series.
The second storyline stars Humphrey Bogart as a killer
on the lam returning to his hometown to visit his mother
and old girlfriend (Claire Trevor).  Bogart had a great 
tough guy voice, and again plays a gangster, something he 
did often prior to "Casablanca."  Trivia: this is one of 
two Bogart films where his character has had plastic surgery
to disguise his appearance.  Can you name the other one?  
The answer is at the end of this review.
The third storyline is inevitable but not as interesting.
Joel McCrae must choose between two girlfriends, a wealthy
blonde and a somewhat whiny brunette.  Naturally, he ends up 
choosing the more attractive of the two.  McCrae's character
is not wholly credible, and temporarily changes from
laconic leading man to action hero when the plot demands
punishment for Bogie.  Fortunately, the Dead End Kids
get much more screentime.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? (1962)
What Ever Happened to Baby Jane? (1962)
"Baby Jane" is a wicked comedy and thriller
starring Bette Davis and Joan Crawford.  It
is a good film, full of suspense and humor.
It is probably the most important film that
either star made after 1960, as its success
led to a series of older actresses in macabre
roles.
The story begins in 1917.  Baby Jane (Julie Allred)
is a child star and spoiled brat, pampered
by her smarmy show-biz dad (Dave Willock) while
older sister Blanche (Gina Gillespie) is ignored.
By the mid-1930s, the tables have turned.
Blanche is a moviestar, while the alcoholic
Jane is shunned by the studios.
Blanche's career is ruined when she becomes
paralyzed in an auto accident that Jane is
blamed for.  But Blanche (Crawford) and Jane
(Davis) continue to live together in the now
decaying mansion of their youth.  Blanche arranges
to sell the mansion, and to place the unstable
Jane in an institution.  Jane's response is to
isolate and terrorize Blanche.  Meanwhile, Jane
seeks a pathetic revival of her career with
impoverished pianist Edwin (Victor Buono).
The best part of "Baby Jane" are the opening scenes,
when Jane is a child.  Her wretched, maudlin singing
voice is a perfect send-up of manipulated (and
manipulative) child stars.  Perhaps someday there
will be a prequel to "Baby Jane", further exploring
this character.
Bette Davis looks awful.  Although only 54 at the
time, her pasty white makeup makes her appear grotesque
and much older.  Crawford, as the gentle victim of
Davis' bizzare cruelty, suffers many indignities.
Gossip about "Baby Jane" centers on the two star's
dislike of each other.  Supposedly, for the scene
where Davis drags Crawford, Joan hid weights under
her dress, helping to injure Davis' back.  Campy and
malevolent, Davis was perfectly cast for the role of Jane;
the baddest of all the 'bad girl' roles of her career.
Buono, a memorable character actor, makes his film
debut in "Baby Jane".  He earned an Oscar nomination
for Best Supporting Actor for his performance.
Davis was nominated for Best Actress, and Ernest
Haller was nominated for the cinematography.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Cleopatra (1934)
Much tighter than the 1963 spectacle, the 1934 version
also has high production values and elaborate sets.
While the campy performances make the film closer to
'Melrose Place' than a history lesson, they are also
a guilty pleasure.  Cecil B. DeMille both directed
and produced, and fans of 'The Ten Commandments'
will appreciate the costumes, cinematography and
choreography.  Scenes of a ship battle between the
Romans and Egyptians are particularly impressive,
as is a production number featuring bathing beauties
bearing clams.
"Cleopatra" uses well-known historical facts to form
the story's outline, but the contents are pure Hollywood
fantasy.  Cleopatra (Claudette Colbert), who is of Greek
ancestry, is the Queen of Egypt in first century B.C.
Powerful Rome threatens her kingdom, and to preserve
it she takes first Julius Caesar (Warren William), then
Marc Antony (Henry Wilcoxon) as lovers.  But Octavius
(Ian Keith) is dismissive of her charms, and vows to
take Egypt as Rome's prize possession.
Colbert as the flirtious, scheming, pampered Cleopatra
puts more warmth into the role than Elizabeth Taylor
was capable of.  While not a household name today,
she was one of the most famous and successful actresses
of the 1930s and 1940s, usually playing plucky heroines
in romantic comedies.  1934 was a great year for Colbert,
as she would win the Best Actress Oscar for "It Happened
One Night"
Caesar and especially Antony are cast as stupid, grasping
egotists, giving their characters welcome if unintentional
comic aspects.  The cinematic tendency to depict Roman
rulers as selfish and corrupt is present as well.
"Cleopatra" was nominated for Best Picture, but settled
for Best Cinematography (Victor Milner).  It was also
nominated for Best Assistant Director (Cullen Tate),
Best Editing (Anne Bauchens) and Best Sound
(Franklin Hansen).  Despite the presence of DeMille,
the 1934 version of "Cleopatra" cost one-fiftieth of its
1963 successor, and was a great box office success.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for American in Paris, An (1951)
I don't understand it, myself.  Since "Singin' in the Rain" is
the greatest musical of all time, how come "An American in
Paris", made just the year prior, and also featuring Gene
Kelly, is not nearly as good?  How can a film that has
received so much acclaim over the years be such a letdown?
I have often criticized films that have too much action
and not enough content.  The same criticism can sometimes
be applied to art films; in this case, too much ballet
and not enough content.
"An American in Paris" does have a plot.  A love story,
of course, that thinly winds its way through numerous
lengthy production numbers.  An ex-GI painter (Gene Kelly)
is living (and struggling) in Paris.  A wealthy socialite
(Nina Foch) promotes his career, but seems more
interested in his body.  Kelly falls for chipmunk-cheeked
Leslie Caron, who is engaged to stage performer Georges
Guetary.  Unemployed pianist Oscar Levant is the laconic
mutual friend of Kelly and Guetary.
Undoubtedly, Kelly was an outstanding actor, dancer, and
choreographer.  But perhaps the envelope was pushed too
far in "An American in Paris".  Comparing with two Kelly
vehicles that I admire, "Singin' in the Rain" and "Take
Me Out to the Ball Game", both had better storylines,
and better supporting casts.
It is possible that since I don't have knowledge of European
culture, that I can't appreciate songs about German composers,
and lacking an understanding of ballet, I can't appreciate
eighteen minute ballet sequences.  But I enjoyed the
production numbers from the aforementioned Kelly vehicles.
The magic doesn't work here, perhaps because the numbers
fill up most of the movie, perhaps because Caron is only
perfunctory, or perhaps Donald O'Connor and even Frank Sinatra
are missed.  Perhaps because Guetary sings like Al Jolson,
while Levant appears about to fall asleep.
In any event, "An American in Paris" received more Oscars
than any other Kelly vehicle.  Awards were won for Best
Picture, Best Art Direction, Best Cinematography, Best Costume
Design, Best Music and somehow even Best Writing.  There
were no nominations for acting, but Vincente Minnelli was
up for Best Director.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for And the Band Played On (1993) (TV)
Matthew Modine stars as Dr. Don Francis, who has spent his
life working for the U.S. Government fighting worldwide
epidemics.  He is sent to the Center for Disease Control in
Atlanta to fight the beginnings of what would become the
AIDS epidemic.  He selflessly works long hours, with
substandard equipment, and badgers his boss for more
research money and equipment.
Modine and his doctor co-workers are intrigued and
puzzled by what they are learning about this yet-unnamed
epidemic.  They struggle to link it to sexual intercourse,
and find it can also be spread through blood transfusions.
The American Red Cross does not come off well here, refusing
to pay for blood screening of donors, thus helping to cause 
needless additional AIDS victims.
If you are an ardent Republican, you will not enjoy this
movie.  Reagan is a villian here, slashing the funding
of the CDC and indifferent to the plight of gays, and later
hemophiliacs, drug users, and newborn babies, who have
contracted AIDS.  There is an except of a Ronnie speech 
where he boasts to have cut the budget of every government 
department except for Defense.
Gays, devastated by the epidemic, are portrayed as persons 
instead of stereotypes.  There's only one character I find
annoying: Kiko, who is huffy, effiminate, and indecisive.
Numerous stars, such as Steve Martin, Richard Gere and Lily
Tomlin, have cameos, unusual for a humble HBO production.  Look 
for Phil Collins as a cynical bathhouse owner: the man can act.
Dr. Bob Gallo (Alan Alda) is an AIDS researcher who tries to
take all the credit for discovering the AIDS virus, which in
fact was first isolated by a team of doctors in France.
Gallo is portrayed as about the biggest jerk ever.  Alda plays
his character perfectly.
The movie ends with several pages of text softening the 
criticism of Dr. Gallo, and describing new developements in
AIDS.  This is followed by a series of still pictures of
famous people who have died of AIDS, mixed in with photos of
people who haven't, with a maudlin Elton John song in the
background.  Some text could be useful in figuring out who
some of these people are.  Elizabeth Taylor is shown and
someone is sure to think she's died of AIDS.  Or they could
skip the whole ending altogether, as the movie is already over
two hours and it discordant to follow a dramatization with
a memorial.
But here I am nitpicking what is a excellent HBO TV-movie,
intelligently written, revelatory, and socially aware.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
"One True Thing" has a very high quality to entertainment
ratio.  While it is certainly a very good film, with
an excellent cast and script, it is a difficult film
to watch.  While the advertising campaign would have
you believe that the film is heartwarming, the emotional
impact is closer to wrenching.
George (William Hurt) is a successful college professor
and author.  His upper class family consists of kindly
socialite wife Kate (Meryl Streep), and their two
grown children: outspoken reporter Ellen (Renee Zellweger)
and gentle screw-up Brian (Tom Everett Scott).
Ellen has grown up worshipping her father and rejecting
her mother.  By becoming a reporter, she is emulating
her father's writing profession, and by remaining single,
she has avoided the charitable and housewife roles of
her mother.
Unhappily, Kate develops cancer and undergoes chemotherapy.
George asks his daughter to leave her job in New York
and help her mother.  Ellen reluctantly agrees, and
the decision changes her life.  Her career and her
boyfriend become secondary to her family, and she realizes
that her childhood opinion of her parents was wrong.
Ellen discovers that her mother is strong and selfless,
while her father is weak and selfish.  In general,
men do not come off well in "One True Thing".  Her
brother Brian is flunking out of school and is like
a lost puppy, while her boyfriend Jordan (Nicky Katt)
has all the weaknesses of her father with none of his
strengths.
"One True Thing" is certain to receive some Academy
Award nominations.  Streep will likely be nominated for
Best Actress, and Karen Croner will likely be nominated
for Best Adapted Screenplay, based on a novel by
Anna Quindlen.
The usual opening night audience of teens and young
adults was replaced by middle-aged adults, compelled by
the Streep and Hurt names.  The audience was generally
silent, but occasionally shuddered during the more
revealing moments.
"One True Thing" is not an entertaining film, but
it is an important film.  The audience is challenged
to confront terminal illness and devastating
disappointment in family members.  While "One True
Thing" may be an emotionally draining film, it is
well worth the effort.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Take Me Out to the Ball Game (1949)
Musicals have long been out of vogue.  Thin plots, synchronized
dancing, corny arrangements and an emphasis on smiling and
costumes are not elements considered important to making
a great movie.
But Hollywood magic can visit musicals as well.  "Take Me Out
to the Ball Game" is surprisingly good, and only drags
for brief stretches in its second half.  The many musical
numbers are impressive, especially in the choreography.
Frank Sinatra and Gene Kelly are the co-stars.  They are
star players on a circa 1910 baseball team, whose pennant
drive is threatened by a new owner and love interest
(Esther Williams) and a crooked gambler (Edward Arnold).
The shallow plot mostly serves to provide a series of settings
for the musical numbers.
Kelly and Sinatra have good chemistry together.  This was
the second and least-noted of their three films together,
coming after "Anchors Aweigh" and before "On the Town".
Sinatra may have been the better singer and the bigger
star, but Kelly was the better actor and dancer.  Kelly also
choreographed and directed the musical segments, which of
course are vital to the film's quality.
Esther Williams, one-time world record-holder for the
100 meter breaststroke, is relegated to a supporting role.
She has an obligatory bathing scene, wearing a one-piece suit
complete with bathing cap.  She is beautiful and confident,
and can even carry a tune.  Despite its obscurity, "Take Me Out
to the Ball Game" may be the best of her vehicles, discounting
"A Guy Named Joe" where she had a lesser role.
Betty Garrett plays Sinatra's love interest, just as she
would in "On the Town", also made in 1949.  She also appeared
in another watchable Williams vehicle from that same year,
"Neptune's Daughter."
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Fighting Seabees, The (1944)
"The Fighting Seabees" is an entertaining,
action-packed war picture.  While racist and
exaggerated, the film compensates for this
with good dialogue and energetic direction.
John Wayne stars as Wedge Donovan, who runs
a construction company hired by the Army.
The workers build fortifications on war-zone
pacific islands, but are continually picked off
by Japanese snipers.  After the construction
workers have a disastrous offensive against
the Japanese, Donovan is convinced by Navy
brass Robert Yarrow (Dennis O'Keefe) that the
workers need to be trained as soldiers.  Wayne,
now a Lt. Commander, leads his men into further,
more successful battles.
The war battles and military politics take
up about half of the film.  The other half
involves a romantic triangle between Donovan,
Yarrow and reporter Constance Chesley (Susan
Hayward).  Yarrow is in love with Chesley,
Chesley is in love with Donovan, and Donovan
is in love with himself.
Yarrow's lack of romantic confidence results
in his constantly asking Chesley whether she
is in love with Donovan.  Meanwhile, Chesley
has to work harder and harder inventing
plausible pretexts for her attention to Donovan.
But Donovan coyly sidesteps Chesley's advances,
and is only interested in the welfare of his
workers.
William Frawley (later of "I Love Lucy" fame)
has a comic relief supporting role as a
construction worker.  There are unlikely scenes
of the flabby, middle-aged man undergoing basic
training: it just doesn't look right.  But his
comic timing is still on target.
"The Fighting Seabees" was released during
World War II.  There are derogatory script
references to the Japanese (they are called
'animals', 'nips', and 'bug-eyed monkeys') that
are excusable only in that soldiers of that era
would actually say things like that.  Japanese
snipers and pilots are shown grinning malevolently
before firing, as if taking pleasure in killing.
This revealing hatred of the Japanese helps
explain why thousands of Japanese Americans were
stripped of their possessions and herded into in
internment camps during WWII.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for I'll Never Forget What's 'is Name (1967)
Andrew Quint (Oliver Reed) is an advertising executive who
is first seen carrying an enormous axe down the street.  
No one takes any notice of him as he enters his office building, 
takes the elevator, and goes to his office.  He then hacks his 
desk to pieces, a novel method of quitting one's job.  His now 
former boss is Jonathan (Orson Welles), a schemer and comic relief 
who still wants Andrew back, to direct a commercial with the 
purpose of winning some award.
Andrew wants to be a serious writer, so he joins the small
staff of a high quality but much ignored journal.  There,
he meets Georgina (Carol White) whom, along with Josie
(Marianne Faithful) and his wife (Wendy Craig), he alternates
between as the mood suits him.
Andrew attends a school reunion, where he runs into the
bully Maccabee (Harvey Hall).  Maccabee tries to steal his
girl, and ends up beating Andrew up.  The film shows
its surrealism as youth and adult versions of Andrew, his
girlfriend and Maccabee appear in alternate shots, sometimes
even the same shots, sometimes in color and sometimes in
black and white.  It's a good show, but what does it mean?
Andrew wakes up in Georgina's houseboat.  Jonathan pays
a social call, and makes faces eating barley flakes.
Andrew still refuses to work for Jonathan.  Jonathan then
buys the magazine Andrew works for and shuts it down.
By this time Andrew is disillusioned with his life and his
juggling of wife and girlfriends (all of them near look-alike
blondes) and decides to film that commerical for Jonathan
"to tell the truth".
Andrew makes several eccentric decisions as the director,
which no one questions, although Jonathan is puzzled.
When the film is finally screened, it is a riot.  It is
a commercial for a 1960s version of a camcorder.  There
are shots interspersed between bikini-clad models presenting
the camera, and the "family" films you can shoot with it.
These family scenes involve Andrew's various girlfriends
shouting angrily at him.  There are also splices of
Adolf Hitler and atomic explosions.  At the end, the
models toss their cameras into a dumpster, which is
crushed by a truck driven by Andrew.  This bizarre film
wins wild applause, and Jonathan has won his award.
Maccabee and Andrew have a fight at the ensuing party,
ostensibly over Craig.  After a bloody row, Andrew is
victorious.  Jonathan gives him the award, and Andrew
later dumps it in the river.  He plans on working next
for Jonathan's competitor.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Champion (1949)
"Champion" is the film that made Kirk Douglas a movie star.
With his intense, expressive personality and his physique,
he was perfectly cast as a middleweight boxer who wants
to have it all: fame, fortune, respect, and whatever lady
catches his eye.
"Champion" takes Douglas' character from humble beginnings
to a boxing championship.  At first, he is paired with
his brother (Arthur Kennedy), who is lame and must walk
with a cane.  Douglas is forced by an angrily protective father
to marry Ruth Roman, whom he deserts to try his luck as a boxer.
As Douglas' boxing career takes off, his character changes,
and he becomes selfish and grasping.  His wife, his manager,
several girlfriends, and finally even his brother are discarded
by him as he reaches for success.
Much is made of Douglas's character turn.  Perhaps I am
judging by the moral standards of a different era, but to me,
the worst thing he does is abandon his wife, and that comes
early in the film.  I don't think that he owes complete
loyalty to a manager who takes a quarter of his earnings
and helps fix fights against him, nor loyalty to women who
are using him, or are wed to someone else.  Certainly he is
a louse, but his character comes across more sympathetically
than the script's interpretation.  This may be partly due to
the compelling performance by Douglas.
Another minor complaint are the boxing scenes.  The drama
and brutality of boxing comes across, but the boxers lack
any defensive skills.  The bouts are typically one man
pummeling the other.  Of course, this is done for dramatic
purposes, and is a weakness common to every boxing film
I have seen, especially the "Rocky" series.  But that
doesn't make it less annoying.
Still, "Champion" is an excellent film.  The pace never slows,
the dialogue is crisp and to the point, and Douglas' character
is deep and fully explored.  One scene has the badly-battered
Douglas on the canvas, his face bloodied and grimaced, but
he is determined to get up and defeat his opponent.  His
motivation is not to keep the champion belt, but to silence
the ringside announcers who have already counted him out.
This one scene perfectly defines his character.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Fifteen and Pregnant (1998) (TV)
"Fifteen and Pregnant" is a made-for-television movie,
produced by the Lifetime cable channel.  It is a
highly credible and interesting study in teenage
pregnancy, and its effect on the family.
Tina (Kirsten Durst) gets knocked up by jerk boyfriend Ray
(Daniel Kountz), who promptly dumps her.  Tina finds reluctant
family support from her embittered mother (Park Overall) and
father (David Andrews).  Andrews has been evicted by Overall,
but is attempting a reconciliation.  Tina's best friend is
unwed teen mother Laurie (Margot Demeter), who is struggling
to make something of her life.
There is nothing romantic about "Fifteen and Pregnant".
Tina has become pregnant because she feels that her
life is empty, and perhaps a baby would add meaning
to it.  Her faith in Kountz, and her desire to have a
loving relationship with him, is quickly shattered.
The poverty, hassles and struggles of becoming a young
unwed mother are effectively shown.
Tina's pregnancy isolates her from school friends.
This is actually positive, as it stops her tobacco and
alcohol abuse, and increases her interdependence with
Demeter.  But she remains selfish, and naive about what is
in store for her.  Her parents are ambivalent: they
want to punish her for becoming pregnant, but they
know that she will need support.
Julia Whelan is a bit miscast as the "younger" "fat" sister.
Her character is excellent however.  As the family focus
is on Tina's pregnancy and the parent's potential
reconciliation, she understandably feels left out.
The siblings say viciously cruel things to each other:
there is jealousy and strong disapproval, but it
fits the unblinking unromatic mood of the film.
Margot Demeter gives a superb performance as Tina's friend.
It is unfortunate that few people will ever see this
made-for-cable instant obscurity to take notice of it.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mrs. Miniver (1942)
"Mrs. Miniver" won a mountain of Academy Awards,
including Best Picture, Best Director, Best Screenplay,
Best Cinematography, Best Actress and Best Supporting
Actress.  There were also nominations for Best Actor
and Best Supporting Actor.
With all those awards, you would think that it
would be a great film.  But time has not been
kind to "Mrs. Miniver".  Released in the summer
after the U.S. entered WWII, the film's depiction of
heroic Brits enduring the bombings of the hated
Nazis was just what America wanted to see.  Americans
wanted to feel good about the sacrifices that were
being made to support the war effort.  To criticize
"Mrs. Miniver" would be unpatriotic, even treasonous.
With the Nazis long since safely vanquished, it is
possible to detach the quality of the film itself
from the large spoonful of propaganda that it delivers.
We are left with a well-crafted production filled
with saintly characters and manipulative plot
elements.  "Mrs. Miniver" is an above-average
soap opera that falls well short of the glory
cast upon it.
The story focuses on the Miniver family.  Walter
Pidgeon is the father, Greer Garson his wife.
They have three children, one of them (Richard Ney)
is now adult and fresh from Oxford.  Ney becomes
a fighter pilot and romances Teresa Wright, who
is the daughter of elderly snob Dame May Whitty.
When faced with inevitable German bombings,
the cast is uniformly stoic and brave.  They are
also the nicest people you will ever meet.
Mrs. Miniver does slap a boasting German soldier,
but is otherwise perfect.  Pidgeon is perfect
and unflappable.  Wright is as sugar sweet as
ever.  Ney returns from Oxford as a pompous
intellectual, to the bemusement of his parents.
Upon meeting Wright, he becomes perfect
as well, albeit with more energy as befits
a young man in love.  Even the forever-outraged
Whitty, who expects the world to cater to her,
is eventually tamed and trained by Garson.
Garson was 34 years old at the time of filming,
and looks younger.  She is too young to be the
mother of a grown man.  Ney, playing her son,
was 24.  Garson and Ney would later marry in
real life.  Garson was nominated for Best Actress
every year between 1940 and 1946, except for
a lapse in 1941.  "Mrs. Miniver" was her only
winning nomination.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Wrong Box, The (1966)
"The Wrong Box" is a British comedy with an excellent
cast, and with colorful Victorian-era costumes and sets.
The script was based on a novel written by Robert Louis
Stevenson and Lloyd Osbourne.  The film was directed
by Bryan Forbes, who also produced.
The ensemble cast is led by John Mills and Ralph Richardson.
They play elderly brothers who are the last survivors
of a tontine, which is a trust fund in which each participant
contributes an equal share.  The tontine was set up by their
parents when they were children.  Over the years, it has
grown into a considerable fortune.
Cantankerous Masterman (Mills) plans to win the tontine by
murdering his brother Joseph (Richardson).  This comes as
a shock to Masterman's aged butler (Wilfrid Lawson)
and his naive adopted son Michael (Michael Caine).  Joseph
is a clueless, hilariously insufferable windbag with three
adopted children, Julia, John and Morris, now grown.  Julia
(Nanette Newman, wife of director Forbes) is poised and lovely
but empty-headed.  John (Dudley Moore) is a good-for-nothing
skirtchaser.  Morris (Peter Cook) is a relentless schemer
who plots with John to win the tontine by producing a fake
death certificate for Masterman.  This certificate can be
obtained from the eccentric Dr. Pratt (Peter Sellers, who alas
has only a small part) whose office is overrun by cats.
Michael Caine also made "Alfie" that same year, 1966.
His role in "Alfie" would receive Best Actor nominations
from both the British and American Academies.  "Alfie"
was a cynical swinger, and completely the opposite character
from his role in "The Wrong Box".  In this film, he worships
Julia from afar, who fortunately and unbeknowst to him
worships him in return.  Their Victorian romance, complete
with unnatural, stilted conversation and a slow motion makeout
scene, is played strictly (and successfully) for laughs.
Cook's character is stuffy and hypocritically moralistic,
making his boldly larcenous schemes all the more comical.
Cook and Moore were often paired in 1960s British comedies,
beginning with the television show "Not Only... But Also".
The most notorious of these films is "Bedazzled", in which
Moore sells his soul to the devil, who is of course played
by Cook.
"The Wrong Box" was nominated for several British Academy
Awards.  Julie Harris (no, not the actress) won for
Best Costumes, while Richardson was nominated for Best Actor.
Ray Simm was nominated for Best Art Direction, which
assumedly did not include the television attennae visible
atop the roofs of the Victorian-era homes.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Jailhouse Rock (1957)
"Jailhouse Rock" is Elvis Presley's best film.
He plays an ex-convict struggling to becoming a star
as a pop singer.  His business partner and would-be
girlfriend is Judy Tyler.  Presley's character 
achieves fame and fortune as a recording artist
and movie star, but has he surrendered his humanity
and values in a greedy and decadent lifestyle?
Elvis Presley had much in common with Frank Sinatra and
Bing Crosby.  They all were fabulously successful American
singers whose fame and charisma also extended to successful
film careers.  But while Sinatra and Crosby would eventually
win Academy Awards, Presley was not as fortunate.  Some of
his early films were passable, but as Hollywood moguls tried
to mine his popularity, the movies came quicker and the
scripts grew worse and worse.  By the time his studio contracts
had been fulfilled, his career had nearly been destroyed.
It is no wonder that most Presley films are terrible.
Because there was a soundtrack album to sell, the film had
to be laden with songs.  This meant that Presley had to portray
a singer, and the plot would have to be stripped.  He had to 
have someone to sing to, which meant one or more pretty girls.
Add fancy cars and a tropical locale, and what else would be
needed to bring the teenagers to the drive-in?
"Jailhouse Rock" was Presley's third film, made at the peak
of his career, and before the formula had taken over.
Yes, he plays a singer, but the Lieber-Stoller songs are
top-notch.  He also has a surly attitude, and the party
atmosphere of later films is missing.  Best of all, the script
is terrific, only occasional stumbling to underscore his
platonic romance with Judy Tyler or to moralize over his 
loss of values.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for King and I, The (1956)
Margaret Landon's novel "Anna and the King of Siam"
was successfully adapted to the screen in 1946.
In 1951, it became a hit musical, featuring songs
by Rogers and Hammerstein.  Yul Brynner shaved his
head for his role as the King (he would eventually
give over 4,000 performances).  He also starred in
the film version of the musical, winning a Best Actor
Oscar in the process.
Deborah Kerr, wearing hoopskirts wide enough to
function as parachutes, played the schoolteacher.
Her singing was dubbed by Marni Nixon, who would
later dub Natalie Wood in "West Side Story" and
Audrey Hepburn in "My Fair Lady".
The story of "The King and I" remains largely
faithful to the 1946 film version, although it
has been made more gentle (the characters of
Louis and Tuptim survive in the musical incarnation).
The $6.5 million production also boasts glorious
widescreen color cinematography, showcasing the costumes
and sets better than the original.  Still, I prefer
the 1946 version with its more dense script, which
has been simplified in the musical version to
accomodate the songs.
The story is well known.  In 1862, the widowed Anna
(Kerr) arrives in Siam (modern-day Thailand) to tutor
the many children of the King (Brynner).  The King is
a polygamist, and his many wives have produced
dozens of cute little kids, all of whom apparently
are under the age of twelve.  The King's latest
acquisition, a gift from Burma, is Tuptim (Rita Moreno).
But Tuptim is in love with Lun Tha (Carlos Rivas),
with whom she plans to elope.
Anna and the King have something in common: they
are both stubborn.  Anna insists on having an adjoining
brick house built for her, while the King wants her
at his beck and call.  As she wins his respect, she
becomes one of his chief advisors, especially for
impressing visiting British dignitaries who have
plans of making Siam a 'protectorate'.  In a coincidence
that could only occur in a movie, the British Ambassador
(Alan Mowbray) had once proposed to Anna.
My sympathies go to poor Louis (Rex Thompson), Anna's
pre-adolescent son.  Perpetually dressed up like
Little Lord Fauntelroy, one can only hope that Mother
will spring for a new wardrobe by the time he hits
puberty.
There is an interesting play-within-a-play, Tuptim's
Siamese adaptation of "Uncle Tom's Cabin".  Elsewhere,
however, the musical numbers, even when performed
by Asians, are completely Western in style.  Sometimes
they can be lame as well: "Hello Young Lovers" and
"We Kiss in a Shadow" are better in reputation than
in practice.
Brynner, of course, makes an excellent King of Siam.
His character has more bark than bite, and is often
quite funny; sometimes he even gets the best of Anna,
which is no small task since her character is more or
less perfect.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Angels with Dirty Faces (1938)
The great success of "Dead End", the 1937 film that
starred Joel McCrae, Humphrey Bogart, and the 'Dead End'
kids, inevitably led to a sequel.  "Angels with Dirty
Faces" reunited Bogart and six of the 'Dead End' gang.
Because the producing studio had been changed from
United Artists to Warner Brothers, the character names
were also changed.  McCrae was both romantic lead and
good guy in "Dead End".  In the sequel, James Cagney
takes over as leading man, while the good guy is the
priest played by Pat O'Brien.
The plot tells the familiar story of childhood pals
going separate ways, become rivals as adults.
Rocky Sullivan (Cagney) grows up to be a career
criminal and racketeer, while Jerry Connelly (O'Brien)
becomes a priest.  They both vie for the souls of
the 'Dead End' kids, who seem destined to become
the next generation of Rocky Sullivans.  Other story
lines have Sullivan double-crossed by his lawyer/partner
Frazier (Bogart), and Sullivan romancing a reluctant
Ann Sheridan.
Cagney is excellent.  He is perfectly cast as a gangster,
the little tough guy with a deeply hidden heart of gold.
During shootouts with the police or rival gangsters, one
can't help but root for him, all the while aware that the
1930s code requires him to come to a bad end.  Bogart's
character is cowardly and two-faced when compared to his
aggressive character from "Dead End", while the hoodlum
kids have been softened and placed in more secondary roles.
"Angels with Dirty Faces" is Cagney's film, and he dominates
every scene he is in.  This was the film that made him
famous, and rescued him from the bit roles he had been
playing.
"Angels with Dirty Faces" received three Oscar nominations;
Best Actor (Cagney), Best Director (Michael Curtz, who would
go on to direct 'Casablanca') and Best Original Story
(Rowland Brown).
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sunrise (1927)
"Sunrise" is about a farmer and his young wife, and their
relationship.  He has been neglecting the farm as of late,
instead cheating on his sweet, childlife with an evil,
chain-smoking seductress, who not only tells him to kill
his wife, but has worked out the plan.  He is to take her
rowing on the lake, then, when no one is around, push her 
out.  (Montgomery Clift must have seen this movie, for he
would later pull the same stunt in "A Place In The Sun".)
While the farmer loves his wicked girlfriend, he is racked
with guilt about what he is doing to his trusting wife.
Standing over her menacingly in the boat, she is terrified
and pleas for her life.  He can't go through with it.
Upon reaching shore (they are across the lake, in the big
city) she runs from him.  There are several scenes of him
caressing and reassuring her.  One wonders what the
Mystery Science team would be wise-cracking.
They attend a wedding, and as he hears them taking the
vows, he acts so guilty and contrite that she forgives him.
They have a romantic kiss in the middle of the street,
their tender moment not appreciated by the 1920s street
traffic.  Since the movie isn't particularly good, it is
fun to check out Hollywood's depiction of 1920s transportation.
There are trains, trolleys, a double-decker bus, and
horse-drawn carriages.  Surprisingly, the roller coaster
looks much like it does today.
The farmer is getting a shave, just like in the old
western movies.  The wife admires from a distant seat, when
some rascal sits next to her and shows great disrespect.
When the farmer's shave is finished (he has his priorities)
he rescues his wife and pulls a knife on the cad,
demonstrating that is okay to threaten someone's life
as long as you are only just giving them a good scare.
Our couple has their photo taken, and we can admire the
enormous vintage camera.  While in the studio, the two
act goofy and break a ceramic statue behind the photographer's
back.  The head has been knocked off, so the farmer replaces
it with a golf ball decorated with a smiley face.
Next, they go to the carnival.  The farmer proves expert
at a carny game of throwing balls.  This somehow results in
a baby pig running loose into the dance hall, then into the
kitchen, much to the surprise of a waiter sneaking a drink.
He drops the bottle, apparently never having seen a small
pig before.  The pig reluctantly drinks the spilt liquor,
apparently the best take the director can come up with.
The couple go dancing.  Since this is a movie, as soon
as they begin, all the other couples stop and applaud, as
if they had never seen anything so amazing.  But the bill 
must still be paid.
The reconciled couple row the boat home.  Bad luck has it that
a wicked storm arises, eventually capsizing the boat.  They
are separated.  The husband makes it to shore (now back in
the hinterlands) and calls for his wife, rallying the countryside.
Dozens of men in boats with candles suddenly show up, looking
for the wife who was last seen clinging to a bundle of reeds.
Some random reeds are shown floating, and the poor farmer is
devastated.
Meanwhile, the evil brunette has been waiting all this time
for her sap to return without the wife.  She meets him, and
he throttles her, much to the cheers of the audience.
Lucky for her, he is called away from his act of assault 
and battery by cries that they have found his wife, who is
safe after all.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for In the Mood (1987)
"In the Mood" is a light comedy based on the true
story of Sonny Wisecarver, a fifteen-year-old boy
who made national headlines in 1944.  With the
Normandy invasion pending, the media was looking
for some 'comic relief' and found it in Wisecarver,
who had married a woman in her twenties.  He
was labelled the "Woo-Woo Kid", but according
to Wisecarver, he was "just looking for a nice
girl his age."
"In the Mood" has the outward appearance of a
love story, but the film is one big wink to the
audience.  It isn't relevant how accurate the
film is, that is, whether Wisecarver (played by
Patrick Dempsey) was actually as sweet and innocent
as he is portrayed.  What is important is that the
comedy works, that the humor is subtle rather than
obvious.  The troubles that Wisecarver continually
gets into are delivered as comedy rather than as
drama, and we are too busy laughing at him to take
him seriously.
"In the Mood" did not do well at the box office,
won no awards, and got middling critical reviews.
But a good subtle comedy can be as rare as a
snowfall in Acapulco, and "In The Mood" deserves
a second look.
The real Sonny Wisecarver has a cameo as a
mailman in the newsreel.  He calls Wisecarver
a "pervent" and a "communist".  Okay, it's
funny, but there really is a message: you
shouldn't judge celebrities from their publicity.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Bend of the River (1952)
"Bend of the River" is a good Western, with well-developed
themes of loyalty and redemption, with revenge thrown in
for good measure.
"Bend of the River" stars James Stewart, who has the enormous
task of leading a team of homesteaders, first across the
country in conestoga wagons, and then securing them needed
suppiles after the settlement has been founded.  Of course,
many troubles await the hapless settlers, who seem wholly
dependent upon Stewart for their aid.  
Both Stewart and his sometime partner Arthur Kennedy have 
been on the wrong side of the law in the past.  Patriarch 
Jay Flippen, figurehead leader of the expedition led in fact 
by Stewart, does not believe that a person's moral character 
can change.  While we know that Stewart will be loyal to the 
homesteaders to his final breath, can Stewart convince Flippen 
of this when he learns of Stewart's past?  More important, will
Kennedy, who repeatedly saves Stewart's life, remain loyal to
the cause despite temptations to profiteer the supplies?
Stewart's first Western was the comedy "Destry Rides Again" 
in 1939.  Looking to extend his range, he made his next,
more serious, western, "Winchester '73" in 1951.  It was 
an excellent movie. "Bend of the River" is generally a good 
movie, but it has some faults that help keep it short of 
the quality of its predecessor.
Early in the film, Stewart and Kennedy hunt and kill 
raiding Indians who communicate by imitating bird calls.  
These scenes are practically lifted from the great western 
"Red River" (1948).
There are derogatory stereotypes of blacks.  A white riverboat
captain has a black assistant (Stepin Fetchit) that is dim-witted 
and has slurred speech.  There is also a sassy housemaid with 
a strong Southern accent.  Intended as comic relief, to modern
eyes it just looks like racism.
Universal studios was promoting the career of then-unknown 
Rock Hudson.  His gratuitous good-guy gambler character 
appears to have been inserted by force into the film, and
he is out of place.
Stewart's obsession with obtaining suppliers for the settlers
leads to a gunfight with considerable carnage.  Stewart never
questions whether obtaining a few barrels of grain and meat
is worth the lives of a half-dozen men.
Look for Henry Morgan, who would much later play Col. Potter
on the TV show M*A*S*H, in a minor supporting role.
Faults aside, "Bend of the River" is an intelligent western,
filled with action and tension, with nary a dull moment.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Diary of Anne Frank, The (1959)
You would think that "The Diary of Anne Frank" would make a
terrific movie.  There is suspense, bad guys, innocent victims,
and all are believable because they are taken from real life
incidents.  But while the basis of a great movie is here,
this film can't deliver the goods.  One problem is it mostly
takes place in an attic.  But it is talky, overlong, and our
young heroine is miscast.  Anne Frank is played by Millie
Perkins, at 21 too old for the role, and gratingly precocious
and self-absorbed.
It is World War II.  The Nazis have taken over Europe and
are bent on hunting down and exterminating jews.  A group of
jews are forced to hide in an Amsterdam attic, in a factory
owned by a good samaritan who shows up now and then to give
them food.
Among the shut-ins are Anne Frank, her older sister Gretchen, 
her parents, and a handsome young man named Peter and 
his parents. Anne's parents, as portrayed in the film, 
are ever-patient saints, while Peter's parents are often jerks.  
Anne must compete with Gretchen for the attention of Peter,
who is more interested in playing with his cat.
Life is boring for everyone in the attic.  To pass the time,
they read books, and Anne begins a diary.  They must all be
quiet during the day, or workers below will hear and report
them.
The film is at its best when demonstrating how strangers forced
to live at length in close quarters will get on each other's
nerves.  Food deprivation and fear of discovery only increase
the stress.  Shelly Winters, who won an Oscar for her performance,
plays Peter's mother.  Her character is all over the place,
alternatively charming, bitter, and hysterical.
One night a burgler breaks into the factory and hears noises made
by the jews in the attic.  Their days are numbered now, since
someday when the burglar is caught he will turn them in to
reduce his sentence.
Later, a kindly, elderly dentist joins the group.  He tells
them horror stories of neighbors getting stripped of their
possessions and shipped to death camps.  But now three food
rations must be stretched to feed eight people.  Still, no one
seems to lose any weight.
The dentist and Anne must share a room.  He is also allergic
to Peter's cat.  These scenes provide rare comic relief.
Anne begins having nightmares, waking up screaming, frightening
the others and endangering their presence.
The movie drags on, much as did their real life in the attic.
The shut-ins begin to appear miserable and catatonic.
The exception is Anne, who is still vivacious due to
a budding but platonic relationship with dreamy Peter.  
A few years pass.  The jews celebrate Hannukah with makeshift
decorations.  A bombing raid tears a small hole in the roof.
German soldiers hear noises and check out the factory, nearly
discovering them.  Peter's father is caught stealing food, 
and is nearly evicted.  They hear of D-day and have hope of 
liberation.  But their hope is proved false when German troops 
learn of their hiding place, and they are all taken away 
to concentration camps.
One must separate the film from its historical context.  When I
criticize the movie, I am not lacking sympathy for European Jews,
who suffered great losses of property, life, and liberty.
But you can't slap a gold star on a movie based upon good
intentions and a redeeming subject matter.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House (1948)
Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House (1948)
"The Bachelor and the Bobby-Soxer" was a hit
comedy in 1947.  The film starred Cary Grant
and Myrna Loy, and it made box office sense
to reunite them the following year in another
comedy, "Mr. Blandings Builds His Dream House".
Based upon the Eric Hodgins novel, the premise
is familiar.  Blandings (Grant) is a modestly
wealthy advertising executive who lives in a
cramped New York City apartment with wife Muriel
(Loy) and young daughters Joan (Sharyn Moffett)
and Betsy (Connie Marshall).  Blandings decides
to buy a decrepit house in Connecticut, for which
he pays a fortune.  It turns out that the house
must be demolished, and a 'dream house' is built
in its place, with predictable but amusing problems
arising.  Blandings' bad financial decisions are
made despite the advice of 'family friend' Bill
Cole (Melvyn Douglas) who apparently still has
an interest in Muriel, his college sweetheart.
The Blandings' all have one thing in common: a
desire for a high standard of living (and something
unique) that has overcome their common sense.
Blandings also has some delusions about how much
he knows, a characteristic tailor-made for Grant's
considerable comic talents.
Grant was especially good at delivering sarcasm:
he could say "Good Morning" and make it sound
like a resentment against past affronts.  Romantic
jealousy was also a frequent theme in Grant films,
from "His Girl Friday" thru "North by Northwest".
In "Mr. Blandings", Grant suspects Loy and Douglas
(especially given Douglas' complacent and
self-satisfied manner) and his barely controlled
childish jealousy never fails to be funny.
Loy sometimes has a self-satisfied manner
as well.  This comes from her character,
of course, which is a gentle satire of a
materialistic housewife.  Grant and Loy take
little notice or interest in their children as
they obsess over their dream house.  Marshall
does a good job with her character, despite
its stereotype of a precocious intellectual.
briankoller@usa.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Face in the Crowd, A (1957)
Before Andy Griffith hit the goldmine with a long-running
weekly television series, he made two very good films
in the late 1950s, "A Face in the Crowd" and "No Time
for Sergeants".  The two films presented very different
Griffiths.  While he begins as a down-home Southerner
in both, in "A Face in the Crowd" he becomes a power-mad
manipulator, while in "No Time for Sergeants" he never
strays from his Gomer Pyle imitation.  Guess which film
had greater commercial success...
Griffith, in his film debut, plays "Lonesome" Rhodes,
a talented entertainer discovered by Patricia Neal in a
podunk Arkansas jail.  Rhodes gets a local radio show
where his mesmerizing home-spun philosophizing and charm
makes him a celebrity.  Soon he graduates to a Memphis
television show, then a national show in New York.  Rhodes
is all too aware of his power over his audience, and becomes
a monster, hungry for political power and contemptuous of
his followers.
Lee Remick makes her screen debut as Rhodes' young wife,
while Walter Matthau is his world-weary writer.
Anthony Franciosa is Rhodes' cynical, on-the-move agent.
"A Face in the Crowd" received no Academy Award nominations
and stiffed at the box office, despite its quality and
the presence of Elia Kazan as director and Budd Schulberg
as writer (they had collaborated on "On the Waterfront").
Perhaps the public wasn't ready for the film's indictment
of television and its ability to manipulate the masses with
phony images.
The weakest part of "A Face in the Crowd" may be the ending,
in which good (naturally) triumphs over evil.  Milquetoast
Matthau delivers a speech to Griffith like a judge passing
a sentence, while Griffith goes half-mad upon his come-uppance.
But still, "A Face in the Crowd", if anything, is more relevant today
than during its own era.  Both Reagan and Clinton have demonstrated
that national electoral appeal comes from images more than
substance.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Godfather: Part II, The (1974)
The sequel to the 1972 blockbuster, "Part II" somehow
manages to be an even better film than its predecessor,
despite the absence of Marlon Brando and (except for a
flashback scene) James Caan.  While "Part II" did not
exceed the box office gross of the original, it did
better at the Academy Awards, winning six Oscars versus
the three that "The Godfather" had won.  These Oscars
included some of the most important: Best Picture, Best
Director, Best Supporting Actor (Robert DeNiro) and Best
Adapted Screenplay (Author Mario Puzo and Coppola).
"Part II" is two hundred minutes in length, but the film
seems to pass more quickly.  Set in the 1950s, the story
picks up soon after "The Godfather" left off: Michael Corleone
has moved some operations to Las Vegas, but remains involved
in New York organized crime.  He also seeks to expand operations
to pre-Castro Cuba, in partnership with aging, chronically
ill Hyman Roth (Lee Strasberg).  He also has to defend himself
against congressional hearings into his criminal activities.
As in the first film, Michael ruthlessly punishes those
who oppose or betray the 'family' (i.e. himself).  Although
his success continues, he also becomes ever more cold and
distant: nearly a personification of evil.  The only emotions
that remain are the desires to punish those who have hurt him.
There also flashbacks of Michael's father Vito first as a boy,
then as a young man.  Vito (De Niro) immigrates to America,
alone, to escape a vendetta against his family.  Although he
can be as ruthless as his son would later be, Vito also
rewards with favors those who are on his side.  Since the
people he kills seem to deserve it, Vito comes off better
than Michael does.  De Niro's detached cool provides a
welcome break from Pacino's relentless gloom, and it was
wise of Coppola to shuffle the two films together despite
the film's length and the disturbance of continuity.
Those who believe that Troy Donahue never made a good film
stand corrected.  Donahue has a small role as Talia Shire's
fortune-hunting suitor.  Michael V. Gazzo, who has a
marvelously raspy voice, has a great supporting role as
trouble-besetted mobster Frank Pentangeli.  As in the first
film, John Cazale and Robert Duvall give excellent
performances.
"The Godfather Part II" also won Academy Awards for its
score, co-credited to Nino Rota and Carmine Coppola (Francis'
father), and for its sets.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Parallax View, The (1974)
"The Parallax View" is an interesting and disturbing thriller
that takes an unusual attitude towards assassination
conspiracies: not only do they exist, but they are vast,
organized, ruthless, faceless and permanent.
Warren Beatty stars as a third-rate reporter who uncovers
an enormous conspiracy about the recent assassination of
a U.S. Senator.  Not only did the real killer escape, but
witnesses to the shooting are also being killed, one by one.
Beatty is apparently the only employee of small-time
newspaper publisher Hume Cronyn, and he goes undercover
to infiltrate an organization that he believes hires
violent misanthropes as assassins.  Several narrow escapes
with death fail to convince him of the obvious: he is in
over his head.
There is much action in "The Parallax View".  Some of it
does not seem necessary to the plot, but it is engrossing
anyway; Beatty has confrontations with a rural sheriff
and his deputy, and with desperate witnesses who believe
that they are on a list to be killed.
But at the heart of the film is a mystery.  Beatty is
determined to find out what the Parallax Corporation is
all about, and whether there is any limit to its power.
Beatty must pass careful screening to become one of their
operatives.  He has to take an unusual written exam, and
be monitored while watching a bizarre film consisting of
positive and negative images.  This screening is to detect
sociopathic personalities that Parallax believes are present
in loyal assassins.
Beatty's character is not particularly bright, perhaps
overconfident in his ability to con people, and too greedy
for the big story to keep out of trouble.  But these
weaknesses make for an ideal male lead in a detective
story.  It also helps that there are no love interests
or other subplots to sidetrack the real story, which is,
will Beatty succeed in taking down Parallax?
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Searchers, The (1956)
"The Searchers" is a very good western, directed by
John Ford and starring John Wayne, one of many films
that they made together.  Considered by many to be
one of the best western films ever made, it falls
short of that lofty standard.  However, it is very
entertaining, with Wayne as commanding a presence
as ever.
The story begins in 1868.  Ethan Edwards (Wayne) is a
former confederate soldier, finally returning home after
three years of wandering.  He stays with his brother
and his family, which includes a wife, children Debbie,
Lucy and Ben, and adopted son Martin (Jeffrey Hunter).
An attack by Comanche indians results in the kidnapping
of ten-year-old Debbie.  Ethan and Martin then spend
seven years searching for Debbie.  Ethan, while familiar
with the ways of the Comanche, despises them.  Martin
fears that when Ethan finally encounters Debbie (Natalie
Wood) that he will kill her for becoming a Comanche.
There are many good things to say about "The Searchers".
The cinematography (Winton Hoch) is excellent.  Wayne
proves again that, despite his reputation, he can act.
Hank Worden is an entertaining character actor.  The
script is good, and there is much suspense.
But what keeps "The Searchers" from being an outstanding
film?  Perhaps the focus is too heavily on Wayne, who is
obligated to carry the film.  When they finally find Debbie,
she doesn't want to leave the tribe.  When they find her
again, shortly later, she is eager to leave.  These lines
are Wood's only dialogue in the film, and her character
isn't further explored.  Wayne's motivation to find Debbie
is questionable.  He obsessively searches for her for seven
years, when he is likely to kill her when he finds her.
Then there is the character of Laurie (Vera Miles), a
hot-tempered Swedish woman who waits for Martin for years.
Her character is similar to, but lacks the depth of, Maureen
O'Hara's in "The Quiet Man", another Ford-Wayne collaboration.
By an amazing coincidence, Ethan and Martin finally return
home during Laurie's wedding ceremony.  In an unlikely
development, her hayseed groom (Ken Curtis) decides not to
marry her.  Finally, Martin manages to penetrate an indian
village, kill Chief Scar (Henry Brandon), and flee with
the now-willing Debbie, all promptly before the cavalry
arrives to wipe out the village.  Martin, whose character
is clumsy and has comic elements, has never demonstrated
the ability to succeed in such an adventure before, and it
is not part of his character.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for To the Ends of the Earth (1948)
Narcotics had been a taboo subject of the production code for years, ever
since Reefer Madness (1936) had unintentionally become a cult film
for pot smokers.  But To the Ends of the Earth not only tackled the
epidemic of worldwide opium smuggling, but portrayed the Treasury Department
detectives in such a positive light that they provided technical support.
Treasury commissioner Harry J. Anslinger even has a cameo appearance.
Always reliable and entertaining Dick Powell is the lead, playing federal
agent Michael Barrows.  Barrows is a family man who tends his rose gardens
in New York City.  But he is willing to drop everything at a moment's notice
to travel around the world, on the trail of opium smugglers.
The film is set during the mid-1930s.  Sinister, unseen Japanese
imperialists are behind the shipments.  Their scheme is to weaken the West
through drug dependency, to facilitate global conquest.  Powell follows the
trail through China, Egypt, and Cuba.  At each turn, he encounters two kinds
of people: helpful, courageous, honest government agents, and shady, greedy,
ruthless suspects who help produce or smuggle the opium.
To seeming innocents who keep appearing in the story are attractive Ann
Grant (Signe Hasso) and her young, orphaned, even more attractive ward, Shu
Pan Wu (Maylia).  Shu Pan Wu is in her late teens, but acts much younger,
like a sweet and friendly child.
Powell is a laconic derring-do hero, at one point climbing the side of a
cliff to reach suspected poppy fields.  His life is frequently in jeopardy,
but he remains unflappable.  He is completely comfortably in his
surroundings, no matter how exotic they may be.
He is also without hormones, which may be uncinematic but perhaps was
necessary to retain technical support from the feds.  This is the primary
difference between Barrows and James Bond: while the femmes may be fatale,
he never drops his chivalric guard.
Like in all good detective stories, solving one puzzle leads directly to
another.  The script and direction is crisp, and there is often some
suspense present.  The only real problem, then, is the credibility of the
characters and of the events themselves.  Certainly, opium smugglers would
go to the depths depicted to move their wares.  But the dramatic suicides
and omnipotent agents seem to be from a world unlike our own.
briankoller@usa.net
http://elvisfan.simplenet.com/movies/movies.html
http://www.epinions.com/user-briankoller

Title
Review for Anastasia (1956)
Ingrid Bergman won the Oscar for Best Actress for her
role in "Anastasia", which cemented her Hollywood
comeback following her scandalous affair with
Italian director Roberto Rosellini.  The film was
based on the Marcelle Maurette play, and also provided
good roles for bald-headed, fiery-eyed Yul Brynner
and noted stage actress Helen Hayes.
Anastasia, youngest daughter of Czar Nicholas II,
was murdered by the Bolsheviks following the Russian
Revolution.  Or did she somehow survive?  Someone
apparently believes so, or they wouldn't have a
ten million dollar trust fund waiting for her to
show up to claim it.
It is the early 1920s, and Brynner is conspiring with
Akim Tamiroff and Sacha Pitoeff to produce a credible
Anastasia so that the account can be defrauded.  Bergman,
a woman without an identity who bears a physical
resemblance to Anastasia, is rescued from a suicide
attempt by Brynner.  He then coldly trains her to pass
as Her Majesty.
But there are many skeptics, and to succeed Bergman
must convince Anastasia's still-living grandmother (Hayes).
Along the way, it becomes obvious that Bergman really is
Anastasia.  She also must choose between two suitors,
pleasant rogue Prince Paul (Ivan Desny) and imposing,
abrupt Brynner.
The best thing about "Anastasia" is the dense script.
There are many clever lines that reveal the
idiosyncrasies of the characters.  Bergman, Hayes
and Brynner are well cast.  The biggest problem
with "Anastasia" is the ending; there is no romantic
chemistry between Bergman and Brynner, and it is
difficult to believe that Brynner would forgo his
hard-won jackpot and that Bergman would pass up a
chance to play Princess.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Gimme Shelter (1970)
In late 1969, the Rolling Stones headlined a
free concert at the Altamont Speedway, located
outside San Francisco.  It was billed as the
Western Woodstock, in comparison to the legendary
music festival held just a few months before.
And the two concerts had many things in common.
Jefferson Airplane and the Grateful Dead performed
at both, there were hundreds of thousands of
fans in attendance, illicit drugs were rampant,
there was disorganization and transportation problems,
and many fans decided that they would enjoy the
concert more if they took off all their clothes.
But there was a significant difference between
Woodstock and Altamont: violence.  Whatever faults
Woodstock may have had, it was peaceful.  There
were four deaths at Altamont, including a gun-waving
fanatic stabbed and beaten to death by Hell's Angels.
The violence begins when the Stones arrive for the
concert.  Mick Jagger is punched in the jaw by
a crazed hippie before he can reach his trailer.
Even during the warm-up acts, the Hell's Angels,
foolishly hired as security, are clubbing concert
attendees, especially those rushing the stage or
messing with their motorcycles.  Airplane lead singer
Marty Balin is mistakenly assaulted by a Hell's Angel.
By the time the Stones are performing, there is a
constant melee in front of the stage, causing Jagger
to break off singing to plead uselessly for an end
to the fighting.
This story is jumbled with other scenes involving
the Rolling Stones.  We see them leaving their room
at a dumpy Holiday Inn (these guys needed better
managers), watch them listen with dazed expressions
to playbacks from upcoming album "Sticky Fingers",
and watch them watch themselves on monitors,
post-concert.  Jagger and drummer Charlie Watts
do the talking, guitarist Keith Richards and the
others are mostly seen smoking cigarettes or
playing onstage.
Among the concert performers is Tina Turner, who
treats her microphone like a giant phalanx symbol.
Among the many cameramen, some of whom were themselves
assaulted, was a young George Lucas.
--

Title
Review for Shadow of a Doubt (1943)
"Shadow of a Doubt" is a suspense thriller directed by
Alfred Hitchcock.  The film stars Joseph Cotten as a bitter
man who has strangled several widows for their fortunes,
and Theresa Wright as his niece, who is unaware of his
crimes and worships him.  When Cotten pays an extended
visit to Wright's family, his curious behavior as well as 
visits from detectives lead Wright to realize that he
is a murderer, putting her own life in jeopardy.
"Shadow of a Doubt" is a good film despite many nagging
problems.  It benefits from an excellent cast and an
intelligent script.  Most of the problems arise from
character development and plot, and while each taken
separately are minor, they combine to keep the film from
being one of Hitchcock's best.
Detectives track Cotten to Wright's home.  They go to
much trouble and waste much time to obtain Cotten's photograph
on the pretext of a magazine article.  They want to
detain Cotten for questioning, but they don't want to
upset Wright's mother, so they wait until Wright can
convince Cotten to leave town.  These detectives are
the nicest and most inoffensive in screen history,
and I don't understand how a murderer's freedom of
movement is a secondary consideration to his sister's
temporary emotional state.
Hume Cronyn and Wright's father enjoy conversations
about the best ways that one could murder the other.
The film does need comic relief, but the droll British humor
doesn't cross over well to this side of the Atlantic.
Hitchcock didn't learn this lesson, as he would later
make an entire film with this style, "The Trouble With Harry."
Presumably, Cotten went to visit his sister to escape
detectives.  You would think he would keep a low profile
and remain pleasant, but instead he launches into diatribes
against wealthy widows and loudly suggests at the bank
that his brother-in-law is an embezzler.  He is also fond
of bragging of his wealth.
Eventually, Wright realizes that Cotten is guilty.  He
all but confesses to her.  Later, he makes two nearly
successful attempts at her life.  Still, she says nothing
about this to the detective, even though he is courting her.
She even agrees to get on the train with Cotten, where,
of course, he makes a third attempt on her life.  Despite
being half his size, she manages to outwrestle him 
on the train.
Since it is revealed in the opening scenes that Cotten
is guilty, the suspense comes from Wright's relationship
with him: will she discover his crimes, then, will he
succeed in killing her.  It is inconceivable that Wright
would not figure things out, and also inconceivable that
she would be murdered.  The suspense seems manufactured
in scenes such as Wright rushing to the library before
it closes, as if the library would not be open the next day.
One final, minor complaint.  Does every film have to have a
romance?  This is a movie about Cotten and Wright, and
a romance between Wright and a detective (who presumably
is many years older than her) seems an unnecessary addition.
Hitchcock is held to a high standard, and that is the
standard I judge his films by.  "Shadow of a Doubt" remains
a good and interesting film, but he has made many that
are better.
kollers@shell.mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Purple Rose of Cairo, The (1985)
"The Purple Rose of Cairo" is an imaginative and clever
comedy, directed by Woody Allen and starring Mia Farrow
and Jeff Daniels, who both give strong performances.
The film is set in a small town during the depression
of the 1930s.  Farrow plays a klutzy waitress and abused
spouse whose only escape from dreadful reality is
the local movie theatre.  While watching a particular
film for the fifth time, one of the characters
(Daniels) steps out into the theatre from the movie
screen to romance her.
This is the first of many surprising, original,
and humorous plot twists, all of which work very well.
Daniels-the-character is a naive, good-natured
person with little knowledge of the real world,
and the resulting misunderstandings (he can't spend
his play money, he is clueless about prostitutes)
are very funny.
Soon, Daniels-the-actor comes to town from Hollywood
to confront Daniels-the-character, while Farrow
must choose between the two Daniels and her
good-for-nothing husband (Danny Aiello).  Allen
remains behind the camera.
Allen, while making us laugh, has a couple points
he is getting across.  He lampoons Hollywood hypocrisy,
which is present in the 1930s as in any era.  The
various actors come across as petty, manipulative
and self-involved.  The film also has a negative
depiction of men.  Of all the major and minor male
characters, only Daniels-the-character, who isn't real,
is a swell guy.  Other characters, including the
husband, Daniels-the-actor, and the restaurant owner,
do not come off well.
"The Purple Rose of Cairo" won the Golden Globe award
for Best Screenplay (by Allen), and was given an Oscar
nomination in that category.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Waterworld (1995)
We all know the rap about Waterworld.  It was one of the most
expensive movies ever, but still turned a profit.  It is like
"The Road Warrior" but not as good.  It is overlong.  Well, all
these things are true, and there are other problems as well,
but the movie is still marginally good.  Just maybe it was worth
the cost after all.
Waterworld takes place in a future when the ice caps have melted,
making a planet a landless ocean.  To their credit, mankind has
survived, in limited numbers, on man-made atolls and on various
boats and ships.
Kevin Costner is the mariner, a loner who spends all his type on
his boat, and his interaction with others is purely to trade.
Visiting an atoll to trade his dirt (more valuable than gold),
Costner meets Jeanne Tripplehorn (JTH to save keystrokes) and
buys all her supplies.  He meets trouble at the colony, however,
and is discovered to a mutant, with gills behind his ears.
For some reason, he is then put in a cage and condemned to death.
Just as sentence is being passed (his cage is slowly descended
into a mudpit) a band of Smokers (described later) attack the atoll.  
In the carnage that follows, JTH makes a bargain with Costner: she 
will free him from his nearly-submerged cage if he takes her away 
on his boat with him. They also take her adopted daughter, who has a 
tattoo on her back that may be a map to dry land.
Much time is then spent developing the bonds between Costner,
JTH, and the child.  At first Costner considers dumping the both
of them overboard, especially the bratty child, but gradually they
become a family unit, protected by Costner.
The Smokers are after Costner's boat, because they want to kidnap
the child in order to find dry land.  The Smokers are led by
Dennis Hopper, who has apparently survived getting beheaded in
"Speed" although he has only one eye now.  Hopper is the comic
relief, necessary since no one else has a sense of humor,
and has several good lines.  His band of outlaws also supply
several good stunts with their willingness to perform dangerous,
often fatal maneuvers on speedboats.
The inevitable happens.  Hopper kidnaps the child and torches 
Costner's boat.  Some guy in a helicopter, that we met at the 
atoll early in the film, has good timing and rescues Costner and JTH.
The child is now on Hopper's battleship, annoying Hopper and 
his sidekick with her brave prattling about how her new stepdad 
will come to rescue her.  The odds that Costner would get to
the battleship, find the girl alive, successfully confront the 
villian, destroy the ship, and save himself and the girl are
about the same odds that a snowman would survive a Dallas summer.
But it happens.
Using the helicopter, the girl's tattoo, and some old National
Geographic maps, dry land is discovered.  Even more amazing,
no one else has settled it yet.  But the mariner does not want to
enjoy bliss on Eden, and returns to the sea.
The film is full of non-sequitors.  How can a large group of
Smokers continue to consume cigarettes when there is no arable
land to grow tobacco?  How can man develop gills in a few
hundred years when whales, seals, penguins etc haven't in millions
of years?  I could go on but you get the point.
But I shouldn't be too hard on the film.  The big budget delivers
good sets, stunts and explosions.  I like the movie's attitude
as well: humanity finds a way to survive despite the odds.
No, it isn't as good as "The Road Warrior", but don't tape 
over it just yet.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Grand Hotel (1932)
"Grand Hotel" is an early talkie, one of the first
to feature an 'all-star' cast.  The film won
the Academy Award for Best Picture, and has been
considered a classic ever since.  Except for Greta
Garbo's camping, the performances are good,
especially by Lionel Barrymore and Wallace Beery.
Seen today, however, the story and script seems a
bit melodramatic, and the characters too narrowly
defined.
Based on the novel "Menschen" by Vicki Baum, the
story takes place in a luxurious Berlin Hotel
that teems with staff and guests.  Garbo, who
was an enormously popular actress at the time,
gets first billing as a famed but egocentric
ballerina.  Wallowing in self-pity, her suicide
attempt is aborted by John Barrymore, a Baron who
has turned to hotel thievery to repay his gambling
debts.
The Baron is the central character around which the
others revolve.  He befriends terminally ill bookkeeper
Lionel Barrymore, who has withdrawn his life savings
for a final fling.  Lionel's employer is disagreeable,
beefy Wallace Beery, who is attempting a liason with
young stenographer Joan Crawford.
Garbo, while beautiful, gives a campy performance
of her affected ballerina character.  Her arm gestures,
long pauses, and the tight close-ups on her face
are reminiscent of the silent era.  She delivers
her famous line "I Vant to be alone" on three occasions.
John Barrymore coasts through his role, as the outwardly
placid and pleasant aristocrat who is in fact desperate
for funds as his life has been threatened by mobsters.
He also manages to smoke about a pack of cigarettes
during the movie.
Beery's character subtly changes from stiff autocrat,
burdened by business troubles, to belligerent tyrant,
bullying the Barrymores and nearly scoring with Crawford
(who has promised to be 'very nice' to him).  At no
point is his character sympathetic, even early in the
film when he professes to be a family man and an ethical
businessman.  However, this unsympathetic portrayal
suits the film well.
Lionel Barrymore gives the best performance as the
mousey bookkeeper, finally able to tell off his boss
and assume a gregarious, benevolent disposition.
He tries to pack a lifetime of hedonism into a
single day, knowing that it could be his last.
His character is the most sympathetic, more so than
his brother's, since his troubles are not of his
own making.
"Grand Hotel" was remade as "Weekend at the Waldorf"
in 1945, and later became a Broadway musical.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for President's Analyst, The (1967)
Perhaps this purportedly hilarious satire was
never that funny, even in 1967.  But there are
positive things to say about "The President's
Analyst".  James Coburn does well in the lead
role, the sets and cinematography are good,
and there's plenty of action.
Dr. Sidney Shaefer (Coburn) has been selected
to be the President's psychiatrist.  At first,
Shaefer is pleased with his important position.
But he soon tires of being at the President's
beck and call.  He is constantly tailed by
'FBR' and 'CEA' agents.  Worse, the unpleasant
'FBR' chief has separated him from his girlfriend
(Joan Delaney) because he 'talks in his sleep'.
Shaefer decides to flee.  But having been privy
to Presiential secrets, he becomes a kidnapping
target for Russian spies, and thus an assassination
target for American spies.  Much silliness follows,
including Shaefer joining a hippie rock band led
by Barry Maguire, and an assault on the insidious
telephone monopoly.
There is much cartoonish violence in this satire.
Many fiendish agents meet their maker.  Violence
does not bother me in films when it is necessary
or when its consequences (i.e. suffering) are shown.
But in "The President's Analyst" the shootings,
stabbings, stranglings, etc. are solely intended
to be humorous, and not ironical or repressive.
The biggest surprise in "The President's Analyst"
is that the Russians, represented by their top spy
Kropotkin (Severn Darden), are the good guys.
The 'FBR' and 'CEA' agents prefer Shaefer dead,
except for Don Masters (Godfrey Cambridge), who
wants Shaefer to return as his personal analyst.
The second surprise is that when Coburn wears a
hippie wig he looks a lot like Neil Young.
Also, Will Geer looks like Colonel Sanders, but
this is not as surprising.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Lives of a Bengal Lancer, The (1935)
"The Lives of a Bengal Lancer" is an interesting action
film set in British-controlled India.  While the drama
centering around young Richard Cromwell's inability to
please his crusty father is overplayed, and the British
goal of subjegating the Indian populace not exactly
laudable, the dialogue and teasing competitiveness between
Gary Cooper and Franchot Tone is entertaining.
"The Lives of a Bengal Lancer" was directed by Henry
Hathaway and was based on a novel by Major Yeats-Brown.
Cooper stars as a British soldier eager to fight a
fortified Indian village.  His impulsiveness is opposed
by Sir Guy Standing, who prefers laying siege.  Cooper
is soon joined by young recruits Tone and Cromwell.
Cromwell is the hapless son of Standing, who opposes his
son's presence and refuses to give him any special treatment.
Will Cromwell win his father's love and respect? Will
the British flag wave triumphant over the 'rebel' village?
"Bengal Lancer" made a big splash, and the Academy nominated
the film for Best Picture and Best Director, as well as
lesser technical awards.  Time has not been kind to the
movie's depiction of silent, toadying Indians under British
rule.  Another flaw is that Cooper, Tone and Cromwell
often seem to be the only three soldiers in the army.
Still, the atmosphere of Colonial India is captured,
and the heroic battle scenes in the finale are rousing
albeit heavy-handed.
My favorite moment from the film has Cooper and Tone
in an Indian prison cell, whiling away boredom betting
thousands of non-existent rupees on cockroach races.
The cockroaches are named after the British and Indian
commanders.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Sweet Smell of Success (1957)
"Sweet Smell of Success" was a commercial and critical
failure when first released.  It wasn't nominated for any
Academy Awards.  It nearly ruined the career of director
Alexander MacKendrick.  But over time, the film has acquired
a reputation.  With its dark and squalid themes of men
exchanging their integrity for money and power, it never
compromises in its pessimistic attitude towards human nature.
Tony Curtis plays a detestable press agent, who earns
his fees by getting plugs for clients in newspaper columns.
Lancaster is a self-important gossip columnist who knows
just how important it is to Curtis's career to place his
plugs.  Lancaster lives with his sister Susan Harrison,
and is pathologically determined to remain living with her.
Lancaster is "freezing" Curtis from his column until Curtis
can break up a romance between Harrison and jazz musician
Steve Dallas (Marty Milner).  Lancaster and Curtis go to
unbelievable depths, even willing to commit serious crimes,
to achieve this.
While Curtis feels an occasional twinge of remorse, this
cannot be said for Lancaster's character.  People have been
fawning over him for so long that he has come to believe in
his own omnipotence.
Burt Lancaster somehow got top billing over Tony Curtis,
although the latter gets much more screen time.  This may
be because Lancaster co-produced the film.
The major handicap to "Sweet Smell of Success" is that the
two leads are so rotten to the core that their actions are
less interesting than repugnant.  Their characters are
contrasted against dismally earnest Milner and meek Harrison,
who aren't interesting at all.  Also, dated slang and petty
bickering sometimes hampers the script.
Still, one has to admire the producers for disdaining
box office success in pursuit of their goals.  The film's
condemnation of gossip sheets and the people behind them
could not be made more clear.  And if the dialogue is
occasionally overdone, the writing is still much better
than you can find in an Audie Murphy western.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for How Green Was My Valley (1941)
"How Green Was My Valley" was the toast of the 1941 Oscars,
winning Best Director (John Ford) and Best Picture.  Nominated
but losing was "Citizen Kane", demonstrating that values
as much as quality determines Academy Award success.
In a Welsh coal-mining town in the late 19th century, the 
Morgan family is headed by father Donald Crisp, Best Actor) and 
his wife Sara Allgood (nominated for Best Actress).
There's also daughter Maureen O'Hara, four sons who are also 
coal-miners, and young schoolboy Roddy McDowell.
There is much good about this film.  The script is so good
that the dialogue sounds like poetry.  The plot keeps things
moving.  Crisp, Allgood, and McDowell are given broad characters 
and perform flawlessly.
It's not quite an outstanding movie, however.  One problem 
is that the four coal-mining sons are all rugged, manly, and
interchangeable.  O'Hara is in love with the minister
Walter Pidgeon, and their forbidden and platonic romance,
complete with long looks and stilted dialogue, damages the film.
Also, the miners don't act like you would expect.  I can
believe that they walk down the streets singing in unison, 
but they never curse, boast, tell lewd jokes, talk with a 
harsh accent, lose their temper or otherwise act human.
One interesting casting is the hateful, shrewish minister 
Cyfartha, played by Barry Fitzgerald.  Fitzgerald typically 
plays cantankerous but lovable Irishmen, so he is being cast
against type here.
A surplus of workers causes the mine owners to reduce wages.  
The miners form a union and strike.  This pits Crisp, who 
opposes unions, against his pro-union sons.  As the strike
wears on, bitterness by the town's coal-miners against Crisp
leads to Allgood and McDowell falling to a frozen lake.
They are saved and survive, but McDowell is left unable to
walk.
Pidgeon visits the Morgan household to cheer up McDowell
and tease O'Hara.  With his help, he learns to walk again.
Later, the wealthy mine owner's son visits the Morgan family
to propose to O'Hara.  The family must force her into
marriage, since her heart belongs to Pidgeon.
Now fully recovered, McDowell is admitted to an elite school
out of town.  He is the only coal-mining son, and so is bullied
not only by classmates but by the sadistic headmaster.
Upon walking home after being bloodied in a fight, McDowell
is taught how to box by his family.  Now McDowell can outbox
the school bullies, winning their respect, but the cruel 
headmaster has him caned.
Again walking home bloodied, a few of the coal-miners visit
the school to confront the headmaster, beating him unconscious
in front of his class.  Surprisingly, this scene is almost a
comedy, and it works.
After graduating, his father wants him to become a doctor or
lawyer, but McDowell wants to prove his manhood and demonstrate
his respect for the family by becoming a coal-miner.  Mother
is pleased with this but Crisp is disappointed.
The coal mining sons begin to leave home, as they are downsized
by the mine owners.  The married son dies in a mining accident,
and the others leave the country for better opportunity.
O'Hara's marriage fails, and there is gossip that it is because
she has liasons with Pidgeon.  Pidgeon confronts his congregation,
and lambasts them for their ignorance.
There is another accident at the coal mine.  Bad luck would have
it that it is another Morgan, this time Crisp.  Pidgeon and
McDowell must go down into the mine to retrieve Crisp, who
dies in McDowell's arms.
The director decides not to leave the movie on such a downer,
so he adds a gratuitous, tear-jerking scene where the entire
Morgan family is seen reunited on a valley.
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html

Title
Review for Down to the Sea in Ships (1922)
This age of this early silent feature is apparent
from its company credits.  It was produced by the
Whaling Film Corporation (probably not a major
studio even in those days), and was distributed
by Wholesome Film Services.  It was filmed on
location at New Bedford, Massachussets.
Not surprisingly, the storyline involves whaling.
Set in mid-19th century New Bedford, conservative
Quaker Morgan (William Walcott) forbids his daughter
Patience (Marguerite Courtot) to marry Dexter
(Raymond McKee), because Dexter is a miller and
has never harpooned a whale.  Meanwhile, villainous
Finner (Pat Hartigan) schemes to pirate Morgan's
whaling ship, and for good measure marry his
creepy bookkeeping partner Siggs (J. Thornton Baston)
to Patience.
At this point, the experienced viewer wonders
how the inevitable plot convolutions will work
to foil the plans of Finner and Siggs, and transform
Dexter into an accomplished whaler so that he can
wed Patience, thereby tying all the loose ends into
a happy ending.  This is done in predictable
fashion, but there are some interesting scenes
as a whale is hunted and subsequently slaughtered.
The maritime industry of New Bedford had
already seen its best days by 1922, and this
film captures the tail end of the whaling era.
The film salutes the cameramen (A. G. Penrod and
Paul H. Allen) in the opening credits "who,
in small boats, stood by their cameras at the
risk of their lives to photograph the fighting
whales".
"Down to the Sea in Ships" also marks the
inauspicious film debut of a seventeen-year-old
Clara Bow.  She plays the 'mischievous'
younger daughter of Morgan, and is a stowaway
on the whaling ship.
kollers@mpsi.net
http://members.tripod.com/~Brian_Koller/movies.html
